 



THE HISTORY OF THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION


[Red Flag]


Leon Trotsky

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

First published in Russian in 1930 and 1932
Translated by Max Eastman, 1932
Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 8083994
ISBN 0913460834

Transcribed for the World Wide Web by John Gowland (Australia), Alphanos
Pangas (Greece) and David Walters (United States) 1997 through 2000.

Converted to eBook format by Kollektiv Yakov Perelman in October 2013,
from the on-line version of _The History of the Russian Revolution_
available at the Trotsky Internet Archive.
EBook proofed and reset by Pablo Stern (Britain), 2017, with a new cover
inspired by David King's 60th anniversary cover.

Cover photos: Lenin and Trotsky at the second anniversary celebration of
the October Revolution in 1919; The October Revolution.


Table of Contents


VOLUME ONE _The Overthrow of Tzarism_

  Preface

  1 Peculiarities of Russia’s Development

  2 Tzarist Russia in the War

  3 The proletariat and the Peasantry

  4 The Tzar and Tzarina

  5 The Idea of a Palace Revolution

  6 The Death Agony of the Monarchy

  7 Five Days

  8 Who Led the February Insurrection?

  9 The Paradox of the February Revolution

  10 The New Power

  11 Dual Power

  12 The Executive Committee

  13 The Army and the War

  14 The Ruling Group and the War

  15 The Bolsheviks and Lenin

  16 Rearming the Party

  17 The April Days

  18 The First Coalition

  19 The Offensive

  20 The Peasantry

  21 Shifts in the Masses

  22 The Soviet Congress and the June Demonstration

  23 Conclusion

  Chronological Table for Volume One

  Appendix I

  Appendix II

  Appendix III


VOLUME TWO _The Attempted Counter-Revolution_

  Introduction to Volumes Two and Three

  24 The July Days: Preparation and Beginning

  25 The July Days: Culmination and Rout

  26 Could the Bolsheviks Have Seized the Power

  27 The Month of the Great Slander

  28 The Counter-Revolution Lifts Its Head

  29 Kerensky and Kornilov

  30 The State Conference in Moscow

  31 Kerensky’s Plot

  32 Kornilov’s Insurrection

  33 The Bourgeoisie Measures Strength with the Democracy

  34 The Masses Under Attack

  35 The Rising Tide

  36 The Bolsheviks and the Soviets

  37 The Last Coalition


VOLUME THREE _The Triumph Of The Soviets_

  38 The Peasantry Before October

  39 The Problem of Nationalities

  40 Withdrawal from the Pre-Parliament and Struggle for the Soviet
  Congress

  41 The Military-Revolutionary Committee

  42 Lenin Summons to Insurrection

  43 The Art of Insurrection

  44 The Conquest of the Capital

  45 The Capture of the Winter Palace

  46 The October Insurrection

  47 The Congress of the Soviet Dictatorship

  48 Conclusion

  Note to the Appendices

  Appendix I: Some Legends of the Bureaucracy

  Appendix II: Socialism in a Separate Country

  Appendix III: Historic References on the Theory of Permanent
  Revolution



PREFACE


 

During the first two months of 1917 Russia was still a Romanov monarchy.
Eight months later the Bolsheviks stood at the helm. They were little
know to anybody when the year began, and their leaders were still under
indictment for state treason when they came to power. You will not find
another such sharp turn in history – especially if you remember that it
involves a nation of 150 million people. It is clear that the events of
1917, whatever you think of them, deserve study.

The history of a revolution, like every other history, ought first of
all to tell what happened and how. That, however, is little enough. From
the very telling it ought to become clear why it happened thus and not
otherwise. Events can neither be regarded as a series of adventures, nor
strung on the thread of a preconceived moral. They must obey their own
laws. The discovery of these laws is the author’s task.

The most indubitable feature of a revolution is the direct interference
of the masses in historical events. In ordinary times the state, be it
monarchical or democratic, elevates itself above the nation, and history
is made by specialists in that line of business - kings, ministers,
bureaucrats, parliamentarians, journalists. But at those crucial moments
when the old order becomes no longer endurable to the masses, they break
over the barriers excluding them from the political arena, sweep aside
their traditional representatives, and create by their own interference
the initial groundwork for a new régime. Whether this is good or bad we
leave to the judgement of moralists. We ourselves will take the facts as
they are given by the objective course of development. The history of a
revolution is for us first of all a history of the forcible entrance of
the masses into the realm of rulership over their own destiny.

In a society that is seized by revolution classes are in conflict. It is
perfectly clear, however, that the changes introduced between the
beginning and the end of a revolution in the economic bases of the
society and its social substratum of classes, are not sufficient to
explain the course of the revolution itself, which can overthrow in a
short interval age-old institutions, create new ones, and again
overthrow them. The dynamic of revolutionary events is _directly_
determined by swift, intense and passionate changes in the psychology of
classes which have already formed themselves before the revolution.

The point is that society does not change its institutions as need
arises, the way a mechanic changes his instruments. On the contrary,
society actually takes the institutions which hang upon it as given once
for all. For decades the oppositional criticism is nothing more than a
safety valve for mass dissatisfaction, a condition of the stability of
the social structure. Such in principle, for example, was the
significance acquired by the social-democratic criticism. Entirely
exceptional conditions, independent of the will of persons and parties,
are necessary in order to tear off from discontent the fetters of
conservatism, and bring the masses to insurrection.

The swift changes of mass views and moods in an epoch of revolution thus
derive, not from the flexibility and mobility of man’s mind, but just
the opposite, from its deep conservatism. The chronic lag of ideas and
relations behind new objective conditions, right up to the moment when
the latter crash over people in the form of a catastrophe, is what
creates in a period of revolution that leaping movement of ideas and
passions which seems to the police mind a mere result of the activities
of “demagogues.”

The masses go into a revolution not with a prepared plan of social
reconstruction, but with a sharp feeling that they cannot endure the old
régime. Only the guiding layers of a class have a political program, and
even this still requires the test of events, and the approval of the
masses. The fundamental political process of the revolution thus
consists in the gradual comprehension by a class of the problems arising
from the social crisis – the active orientation of the masses by a
method of successive approximations. The different stages of a
revolutionary process, certified by a change of parties in which the
more extreme always supersedes the less, express the growing pressure to
the left of the masses – so long as the swing of the movement does not
run into objective obstacles. When it does, there begins a reaction:
disappointments of the different layers of the revolutionary class,
growth of indifferentism, and therewith a strengthening of the position
of the counter-revolutionary forces. Such, at least, is the general
outline of the old revolutions.

Only on the basis of a study of political processes in the masses
themselves, can we understand the role of parties and leaders, whom we
least of all are inclined to ignore. They constitute not an independent,
but nevertheless a very important, element in the process. Without a
guiding organisation, the energy of the masses would dissipate like
steam not enclosed in a piston-box. But nevertheless what moves things
is not the piston or the box, but the steam.

The difficulties which stand in the way of studying the changes of mass
consciousness in a revolutionary epoch are quite obvious. The oppressed
classes make history in the factories, in the barracks, in the villages,
on the streets of the cities. Moreover, they are least of all accustomed
to write things down. Periods of high tension in social passions leave
little room for contemplation and reflection. All the muses – even the
plebeian muse of journalism, in spite of her sturdy hips – have hard
sledding in times of revolution. Still the historian’s situation is by
no means hopeless. The records are incomplete, scattered, accidental.
But in the light of the events themselves these fragments often permit a
guess as to the direction and rhythm of the hidden process. For better
or worse, a revolutionary party bases its tactics upon a calculation of
the changes of mass consciousness. The historic course of Bolshevism
demonstrates that such a calculation, at least in its rough features,
can be made. If it can be made by a revolutionary leader in the
whirlpool of the struggle, why not by the historian afterwards?

However, the processes taking place in the consciousness of the masses
are not unrelated and independent. No matter how the idealists and the
eclectics rage, consciousness is nevertheless determined by conditions.
In the historic conditions which formed Russia, her economy, her
classes, her State, in the action upon her of other states, we ought to
be able to find the premises both of the February revolution and of the
October revolution which replaced it. Since the greatest enigma is the
fact that a backward country was the _first_ to place the proletariat in
power, it behoves us to seek the solution of that enigma in the
_peculiarities_ of that backward country – that is, in its differences
from other countries.

The historic peculiarities of Russia and their relative weight will be
characterised by us in the early chapters of this book which give a
short outline of the development of Russian society and its inner
forces. We venture to hope that the inevitable schematism of these
chapters will not repel the reader. In the further development of the
book he will meet these same forces in living action.

This work will not rely in any degree upon personal recollections. The
circumstance that the author was a participant in the events does not
free him from the obligation to base his exposition upon historically
verified documents. The author speaks of himself, in so far as that is
demanded by the course of events, in the third person. And that is not a
mere literary form: the subjective tone, inevitable in autobiographies
or memoirs, is not permissible in a work of history.

However, the fact that the author did participate in the struggle
naturally makes easier his understanding, not only of the psychology of
the forces in action, both individual and collective, but also of the
inner connection of events. This advantage will give positive results
only if one condition is observed: that he does not rely upon the
testimony of his own memory either in trivial details or in important
matters, either in questions of fact or questions of motive and mood.
The author believes that in so far as in him lies he has fulfilled this
condition.

There remains the question of the political position of the author, who
stands as a historian upon the same viewpoint upon which he stood as a
participant in the events. The reader, of course, is not obliged to
share the political views of the author, which the latter on his side
has no reason to conceal. But the reader does have the right to demand
that a historical work should not be the defence of a political
position, but an internally well-founded portrayal of the actual process
of the revolution. A historical work only then completely fulfills the
mission when events unfold upon its pages in their full natural
necessity.

For this, is it necessary to have the so-called historian’s
“impartiality”? Nobody has yet clearly explained what this impartiality
consists of. The often quoted words of Clemenceau that it is necessary
to take a revolution “en bloc,” as a whole – are at the best a clever
evasion. How can you take as a whole a thing whose essence consists in a
split? Clemenceau’s aphorism was dictated partly by shame for his too
resolute ancestors, partly by embarrassment before their shades.

One of the reactionary and therefore fashionable historians in
contemporary France, L. Madelin, slandering in his drawing-room fashion
the great revolution – that is, the birth of his own nation – asserts
that “the historian ought to stand upon the wall of a threatened city,
and behold at the same time the besiegers and the besieged”: only in
this way, it seems, can he achieve a “conciliatory justice.” However,
the words of Madelin himself testify that if he climbs out on the wall
dividing the two camps, it is only in the character of a reconnoiterer
for the reaction. It is well that he is concerned only with war camps of
the past: in a time of revolution standing on the wall involves great
danger. Moreover, in times of alarm the priests of “conciliatory
justice” are usually found sitting on the inside of four walls waiting
to see which side will win.

The serious and critical reader will not want a treacherous
impartiality, which offers him a cup of conciliation with a well-settled
poison of reactionary hate at the bottom, but a scientific
conscientiousness, which for its sympathies and antipathies – open and
undisguised – seeks support in an honest study of the facts, a
determination of their real connections, an exposure of the causal laws
of their movement. That is the only possible historic objectivism, and
moreover it is amply sufficient, for it is verified and attested not by
the good intentions of the historian, for which only he himself can
vouch, but the natural laws revealed by him of the historic process
itself.

The sources of this book are innumerable periodical publications,
newspapers and journals, memoirs, reports, and other material, partly in
manuscript, but the greater part published by the Institute of the
History of the Revolution in Moscow and Leningrad. We have considered
its superfluous to make reference in the text to particular
publications, since that would only bother the reader. Among the books
which have the character of collective historical works we have
particularly used the two-volume _Essays on the History of the October
Revolution_ (Moscow-Leningrad, 1927). Written by different authors, the
various parts of this book are unequal in value, but they contain at any
rate abundant factual material.

The dates in our book are everywhere indicated according to the old
style – that is, they are 13 days behind the international and the
present Soviet calendar. The author felt obliged to use the calendar
which was in use at the time of the revolution. It would have been no
labour of course to translate the dates into the new style. But this
operation in removing one difficulty would have created others more
essential. The overthrow of the monarchy has gone into history as the
February revolution; according to the Western calendar, however, it
occurred in March. The armed demonstration against the imperialist
policy of the Provisional Government has gone into history under the
name of the “April Days,” whereas according to the Western calendar it
happened in May. Not to mention other intervening events and dates, we
remark only that the October revolution happened according to European
reckoning in November. The calendar itself, we see, is tinted by the
events, and the historian cannot handle revolutionary chronology by mere
arithmetic. The reader will be kind enough to remember that before
overthrowing the Byzantine calendar, the revolution had to overthrow the
institutions that clung to it.

L. TROTSKY
Prinkipo
November 14, 1930

 



THE HISTORY OF THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION


[Red Flag]



VOLUME ONE: THE OVERTHROW OF TZARISM



CHAPTER 1 PECULIARITIES OF RUSSIA’S DEVELOPMENT


 

The fundamental and most stable feature of Russian history is the slow
tempo of her development, with the economic backwardness, primitiveness
of social forms and low level of culture resulting from it.

The population of this gigantic and austere plain, open to eastern winds
and Asiatic migrations, was condemned by nature itself to a long
backwardness. The struggle with nomads lasted almost up to the end of
the seventeenth century; the struggle with winds, bringing winter cold
and summer drought, continues still. Agriculture, the basis of the whole
development, advanced by extensive methods. In the north they cut down
and burned up the forests, in the south they ravished the virgin
steppes. The conquest of nature went wide and not deep.

While the western barbarians settled in the ruins of Roman culture,
where many an old stone lay ready as building material, the Slavs in the
East found no inheritance upon their desolate plain: their predecessors
had been on even a lower level of culture than they. The western
European peoples, soon finding their natural boundaries, created those
economic and cultural clusters, the commercial cities. The population of
the eastern plain, at the first sign of crowding, would go deeper into
the forest or spread out over the steppe. The more aggressive and
enterprising elements of the peasantry in the west became burghers,
craftsmen, merchants. The more active and bold in the east became, some
of them, traders, but most of them Cossacks, frontiersmen, pioneers. The
process of social differentiation, intensive in the west, was delayed in
the east and diluted by the process of expansion. “The Tzar of Muscovia,
although a Christian, rules a lazy-minded people,” wrote Vico, a
contemporary of Peter I. That “lazy” mind of the Muscovites was a
reflection of the slow tempo of economic development, the formlessness
of class relations, the meagerness of inner history.

The ancient civilisations of Egypt, India and China had a character
self-sufficient enough, and they had time enough at their disposal, to
bring their social relations, in spite of low productive powers, almost
to the same detailed completion to which their craftsmen brought the
products of their craft. Russia stood not only geographically, but also
socially and historically, between Europe and Asia. She was marked off
from the European West, but also from the Asiatic East, approaching at
different periods and in different features now one, now the other. The
East gave her the Tartar yoke, which entered as an important element
into the structure of the Russian state. The West was a still more
threatening foe – but at the same time a teacher. Russia was unable to
settle in the forms of the East because she was continually having to
adapt herself to military and economic pressure from the West. The
existence of feudal relations in Russia, denied by former historians,
may be considered unconditionally established by later investigations.
Furthermore, the fundamental elements of Russian feudalism were the same
as in the West. But the mere fact that the existence of the feudal epoch
had to be established by means of extended scientific arguments
sufficiently testifies to the incompleteness of Russian feudalism, its
formlessness, its poverty of cultural monuments.

A backward country assimilates the material and intellectual conquests
of the advanced countries. But this does not mean that it follows them
slavishly, reproduces all the stages of their past. The theory of the
repetition of historic cycles – Vico and his more recent followers –
rests upon an observation of the orbits of old pre-capitalist cultures,
and in part upon the first experiments of capitalist development. A
certain repetition of cultural stages in ever new settlements was in
fact bound up with the provincial and episodic character of that whole
process. Capitalism means, however, an overcoming of those conditions.
It prepares and in a certain sense realises the universality and
permanence of man’s development. By this a repetition of the forms of
development by different nations is ruled out. Although compelled to
follow after the advanced countries, a backward country does not take
things in the same order. The privilege of historic backwardness – and
such a privilege exists – permits, or rather compels, the adoption of
whatever is ready in advance of any specified date, skipping a whole
series of intermediate stages. Savages throw away their bows and arrows
for rifles all at once, without travelling the road which lay between
those two weapons in the past. The European colonists in America did not
begin history all over again from the beginning. The fact that Germany
and the United States have now economically outstripped England was made
possible by the very backwardness of their capitalist development. On
the other hand, the conservative anarchy in the British coal industry –
as also in the heads of MacDonald and his friends – is a paying-up for
the past when England played too long the role of capitalist pathfinder.
The development of historically backward nations leads necessarily to a
peculiar combination of different stages in the historic process. Their
development as a whole acquires a planless, complex, combined character.

The possibility of skipping over intermediate steps is of course by no
means absolute. Its degree is determined in the long run by the economic
and cultural capacities of the country. The backward nation, moreover,
not infrequently debases the achievements borrowed from outside in the
process of adapting them to its own more primitive culture. In this the
very process of assimilation acquires a self-contradictory character.
Thus the introduction of certain elements of Western technique and
training, above all military and industrial, under Peter I, led to a
strengthening of serfdom as the fundamental form of labour organisation.
European armament and European loans – both indubitable products of a
higher culture – led to a strengthening of tzarism, which delayed in its
turn the development of the country.

The laws of history have nothing in common with a pedantic schematism.
Unevenness, the most general law of the historic process, reveals itself
most sharply and complexly in the destiny of the backward countries.
Under the whip of external necessity their backward culture is compelled
to make leaps. From the universal law of unevenness thus derives another
law which, for the lack of a better name, we may call the law of
_combined development_ – by which we mean a drawing together of the
different stages of the journey, a combining of the separate steps, an
amalgam of archaic with more contemporary forms. Without this law, to be
taken of course, in its whole material content, it is impossible to
understand the history of Russia, and indeed of any country of the
second, third or tenth cultural class.

Under pressure from richer Europe the Russian State swallowed up a far
greater relative part of the people’s wealth than in the West, and
thereby not only condemned the people to a twofold poverty, but also
weakened the foundations of the possessing classes. Being at the same
time in need of support from the latter, it forced and regimented their
growth. As a result the bureaucratised privileged classes never rose to
their full height, and the Russian state thus still more approached an
Asiatic despotism. The Byzantine autocratism, officially adopted by the
Muscovite tzars at the beginning of the sixteenth century, subdued the
feudal Boyars with the help of the nobility, and then gained the
subjection of the nobility by making the peasantry their slaves, and
upon this foundation created the St. Petersburg imperial absolutism. The
backwardness of the whole process is sufficiently indicated in the fact
that serfdom, born at the end of the sixteenth century, took form in the
seventeenth, flowered in the eighteenth, was juridically annulled only
in 1861.

The clergy, following after the nobility, played no small role in the
formation of the tzarist autocracy, but nevertheless a servile role. The
church never rose in Russia to that commanding height which it attained
in the Catholic West; it was satisfied with the role of spiritual
servant of the autocracy, and counted this a recompense for its
humility. The bishops and metropolitans enjoyed authority merely as
deputies of the temporal power. The patriarchs were changed along with
the tzars. In the Petersburg period the dependence of the church upon
the state became still more servile. Two hundred thousand priests and
monks were in all essentials a part of the bureaucracy, a sort of police
of the gospel. In return for this the monopoly of the orthodox clergy in
matters of faith, land and income was defended by a more regular kind of
police.

Slavophilism, the messianism of backwardness, has based its philosophy
upon the assumption that the Russian people and their church are
democratic through and through, whereas official Russia is a German
bureaucracy imposed upon them by Peter the Great. Mark remarked upon
this theme: “In the same way the Teutonic jackasses blamed the despotism
of Frederick the Second upon the French, as though backward slaves were
not always in need of civilised slaves to train them.” This brief
comment completely finishes off not only the old philosophy of the
Slavophiles, but also the latest revelations of the “Racists.”

The meagerness not only of Russian feudalism, but of all the old Russian
history, finds its most depressing expression in the absence of real
mediaeval cities as centres of commerce and craft. Handicraft did not
succeed in Russia in separating itself from agriculture, but preserved
its character of home industry. The old Russian cities were commercial,
administrative, military and manorial – centres of consumption,
consequently, not of production.. Even Novgorod, similar to Hansa and
not subdued by the Tartars, was only a commercial, and not an industrial
city. True, the distribution of the peasant industries over various
districts created a demand for trade mediation on a large scale. But
nomad traders could not possibly occupy that place in social life which
belonged in the West to the craft-guild and merchant-industrial petty
and middle bourgeoisie, inseparably bound up with its peasant
environment. The chief roads of Russian trade, moreover, led across the
border, thus from time immemorial giving the leadership to foreign
commercial capital, and imparting a semi-colonial character to the whole
process, in which the Russian trader was a mediator between the Western
cities and the Russian villages. This kind of economic relation
developed further during the epoch of Russian capitalism and found its
extreme expression in the imperialist war.

The insignificance of the Russian cities, which more than anything else
promoted the development of an Asiatic state, also made impossible a
Reformation – that is, a replacement of the feudal-bureaucratic
orthodoxy by some sort of modernised kind of Christianity adapted to the
demands of a bourgeois society. The struggle against the state church
did not go farther than the creation of peasant sects, the faction of
the Old Believers being the most powerful among them.

Fifteen years before the great French revolution there developed in
Russia a movement of the Cossacks, peasants and worker-serfs of the
Urals, known as the Pugachev Rebellion. What was lacking to this
menacing popular uprising in order to convert it into a revolution? A
Third Estate. Without the industrial democracy of the cities a peasant
war could not develop into a revolution, just as the peasant sects could
not rise to the height of a Reformation. The result of the Pugachev
Rebellion was just the opposite – a strengthening of bureaucratic
absolutism as the guardian of the interests of the nobility, a guardian
which had again justified itself in the hour of danger.

The Europeanization of the country, formally begun in the time of Peter,
became during the following century more and more a demand of the ruling
class itself, the nobility. In 1825 the aristocratic intelligentsia,
generalising this demand politically, went to the point of a military
conspiracy to limit the powers of the autocracy. Thus, under pressure
from the European bourgeois development, the progressive nobility
attempted to take the place of the lacking Third Estate. But
nevertheless they wished to combine their liberal régime with the
security of their own caste domination, and therefore feared most of all
to arouse the peasantry. It is thus not surprising that the conspiracy
remained a mere attempt on the part of a brilliant but isolated officer
caste which gave up the sponge almost without a struggle. Such was the
significance of the Dekabrist uprising.

The landlords who owned factories were the first among their caste to
favour replacing serfdom by wage labour. The growing export of Russian
grain gave an impulse in the same direction. In 1861 the noble
bureaucracy, relying upon the liberal landlords, carried out its peasant
reform. The impotent bourgeois liberalism during this operation played
the role of humble chorus. It is needless to remark that tzarism solved
the fundamental problem of Russia, the agrarian problem, in a more
niggardly and thieving fashion than that in which the Prussian monarchy
during the next decade was to solve the fundamental problem of Germany,
its national consolidation. The solution of the problems of one class by
another is one of those combined methods natural to backward countries.

The law of combined development reveals itself most indubitably,
however, in the history and character of Russian industry. Arising late,
Russian industry did not repeat the development of the advanced
countries, but inserted itself into this development, adapting their
latest achievements to its own backwardness. Just as the economic
evolution of Russia as a whole skipped over the epoch of craft-guilds
and manufacture, so also the separate branches of industry made a series
of special leaps over technical productive stages that had been measured
in the West by decades. Thanks to this, Russian industry developed at
certain periods with extraordinary speed. Between the first revolution
and the war, industrial production in Russia approximately doubled. This
has seemed to certain Russian historians a sufficient basis for
concluding that “we must abandon the legend of backwardness and slow
growth.”[1] In reality the possibility of this swift growth was
determined by that very backwardness which, alas, continued not only up
to the moment of liquidation of the old Russia, but as her legacy up to
the present day.

The basic criterion of the economic level of a nation is the
productivity of labour, which in its turn depends upon the relative
weight of the industries in the general economy of the country. On the
eve of the war, when tzarist Russia had attained the highest point of
its prosperity, the national income per capita was 8 to 10 times less
than in the United States – a fact which is not surprising when you
consider that 4/5 of the self-supporting population of Russia was
occupied with agriculture, while in the United States, for every one
engaged in agriculture, 2½ were engaged in industry. We must add that
for every one hundred square kilometres of land, Russia had, on the eve
of the war, 0.4 kilometres of railroads, Germany 11.7, Austria-Hungary
7. Other comparative coefficients are of the same type.

But it is just in the sphere of economy, as we have said, that the law
of combined development most forcibly emerges. At the same time that
peasant land-cultivation as a whole remained, right up to the
revolution, at the level of the seventeenth century, Russian industry in
its technique and capitalist structure stood at the level of the
advanced countries, and in certain respects even outstripped them. Small
enterprises, involving less than 100 workers, employed in the United
States, in 1914, 35 per cent of the total of industrial workers, but in
Russia 17.8 per cent. The two countries had an approximately identical
relative quantity of enterprises involving 100 to 1000 workers. But the
giant enterprises, above 1000 workers each, employed in the United
States 17.8 per cent of the workers and in Russia 41.4 per cent! For the
most important industrial districts the latter percentage is still
higher: for the Petrograd district 44.4 per cent, for the Moscow
district even 57.3 per cent. We get a like result if we compared Russian
with British or German industry. This fact – first established by the
author in 1908 – hardly accords with the banal idea of the economic
backwardness of Russia. However, it does not disprove this backwardness,
but dialectically completes it.

The confluence of industrial with bank capital was also accomplished in
Russia with a completeness you might not find in any other country. But
the subjection of the industries to the banks meant, for the same
reasons, their subjection to the western European money market. Heavy
industry (metal, coal, oil) was almost wholly under the control of
foreign finance capital, which had created for itself an auxiliary and
intermediate system of banks in Russia. Light industry was following the
same road. Foreigners owned in general about 40 per cent of all the
stock capital of Russia, but in the leading branches of industry that
percentage was still higher. We can say without exaggeration that the
controlling shares of stock in the Russian banks, plants and factories
were to be found abroad, the amount held in England, France and Belgium
being almost double that in Germany.

The social character of the Russian bourgeoisie and its political
physiognomy were determined by the condition of origin and the structure
of Russian industry. The extreme concentration of this industry alone
meant that between the capitalist leaders and the popular masses there
was no hierarchy of transitional layers. To this we must add that the
proprietors of the principal industrial, banking, and transport
enterprises were foreigners, who realised on their investment not only
the profits drawn from Russia, but only a political influence in foreign
parliaments, and so not only did not forward the struggle for Russian
parliamentarism, but often opposed it: it is sufficient to recall the
shameful role played by official France. Such are the elementary and
irremovable causes of the political isolation and anti-popular character
of the Russian bourgeoisie. Whereas in the dawn of its history it was
too unripe to accomplish a Reformation; when the time came for leading a
revolution it was overripe.

In correspondence with this general course of development of the
country, the reservoir from which the Russian working class formed
itself was not the craft-guild, but agriculture, not the city, but the
country. Moreover, in Russia the proletariat did not arise gradually
through the ages, carrying with itself the burden of the past as in
England, but in leaps involving sharp changes of environment, ties,
relations, and a sharp break with the past. It is just this fact –
combined with the concentrated oppressions of tzarism – that made the
Russian workers hospitable to the boldest conclusions of revolutionary
thought – just as the backward industries were hospitable to the last
word in capitalist organisation.

The Russian proletariat was forever repeating the short history of its
origin. While in the metal industry, especially in Petrograd, a layer of
hereditary proletarians was crystallised out, having made a complete
break with the country, in the Urals the prevailing type was
half-proletarian, half-peasant. A yearly inflow of fresh labour forces
from the country in all the industrial districts kept renewing the bonds
of the proletariat with its fundamental social reservoir.

The incapacity of the bourgeoisie for political action was immediately
caused by its relation to the proletariat and the peasantry. It could
not lead after it workers who stood hostile in their everyday life, and
had so early learned to generalise their problems. But it was likewise
incapable of leading after it the peasantry, because it was entangled in
a web of interests with the landlords, and dreaded a shake-up of
property relations in any form. The belatedness of the Russian
revolution was thus not only a matter of chronology, but also of the
social structure of the nation.

England achieved her Puritan revolution when her whole population was
not more than 5½ millions, of whom half a million were to be found in
London. France, in the epoch of her revolution, had in Paris also only
half a million out of a population of 25 million, Russia at the
beginning of the twentieth century had a population of about 150
million, of whom more than 3 million were in Petrograd and Moscow.
Behind these comparative figures lurk enormous social differences. Not
only England of the seventeenth century, but also France of the
eighteenth had no proletariat in the modern sense. In Russia, however,
the working class in all branches of labour, both city and village,
numbered in 1905 no less than 10 million, which with their families
amounts to more than 25 million – that is to say, more than the whole
population of France in the epoch of the great revolution. Advancing
from the sturdy artisans and independent peasants of the army of
Cromwell – through the _sansculottes_ of Paris – to the industrial
proletarians of St. Petersburg, the revolution had deeply changed its
social mechanism, its methods, and therewith its aims.

The events of 1905 were a prologue to the two revolutions of 1917, that
of February and that of October. In the prologue all the elements of the
drama were included, but not carried through. The Russo-Japanese war had
made tzarism totter. Against the background of a mass movement the
liberal bourgeoisie had frightened the monarchy with its opposition. The
workers had organised independently of the bourgeoisie, and in
opposition to it, in soviets, a form of organisation then first called
into being. Peasant uprisings to seize the land occurred throughout vast
stretches of the country. Not only the peasants, but also the
revolutionary parts of the army tended toward the soviets, which at the
moment of highest tension openly disputed the power with the monarchy.
However, all the revolutionary forces were then going into action for
the first time, lacking experience and confidence. The liberals
demonstratively backed away from the revolution exactly at the moment
when it became clear that to shake tzarism would not be enough, it must
be overthrown. This sharp break of the bourgeoisie with the people, in
which the bourgeoisie carried with it considerable circles of the
democratic intelligentsia, made it easier for the monarchy to
differentiate within the army, separating out the loyal units, and to
make a bloody settlement with the workers and peasants. Although with a
few broken ribs, tzarism came out of the experience of 1905 alive and
strong enough.

What changes in the correlation of forces were introduced by the eleven
years’ historical development dividing the prologue from the drama?
Tzarism during this period came into still sharper conflict with the
demands of historic development. The bourgeoisie became economically
more powerful, but as we have seen its power rested on a higher
concentration of industry and an increased predominance of foreign
capital. Impressed by the lessons of 1905, the bourgeoisie had become
more conservative and suspicious. The relative weight of the petty and
middle bourgeoisie, insignificant before, had fallen still lower. The
democratic intelligentsia generally speaking had no firm social support
whatever. It could have a transitional political influence, but could
play no independent role: its dependence upon bourgeois liberalism had
grown enormously. In these circumstances only the youthful proletariat
could give the peasantry a programme, a banner and leadership. The
gigantic tasks thus presented to the proletariat gave rise to a urgent
necessity for a special revolutionary organisation capable of quickly
getting hold of the popular masses and making them ready for
revolutionary action under the leadership of the workers. Thus the
soviets of 1905 developed gigantically in 1917. That the soviets, we may
remark here, are not a mere child of the historical backwardness of
Russia, but a product of her combined development, is indicated by the
fact that the proletariat of the most industrial country, Germany, at
the time of its revolutionary high point – 1918 to 1919 – could find no
other form of organisation.

The revolution of 1917 still had as its immediate task the overthrow of
the bureaucratic monarchy, but in distinction from the older bourgeois
revolutions, the decisive force now was a new class formed on the basis
of a concentrated industry, and armed with new organisations, new
methods of struggle. The law of combined development here emerges in its
extreme expression: starting with the overthrow of a decayed mediaeval
structure, the revolution in the course of a few months placed the
proletariat and the Communist Party in power.

In its initial task the Russian revolution was thus a democratic
revolution. But it posed the problem of political democracy in a new
way. While the workers were covering the whole country with soviets,
including in them the soldiers and part of the peasantry, the
bourgeoisie still continued to dicker – shall we summon or not summon a
Constituent Assembly? In the course of our exposition this question will
rise before us in full completeness. Here we wish only to mark the place
of the soviets in the historic succession of revolutionary ideas and
forms.

In the middle of the seventeenth century the bourgeois revolution in
England developed under the guise of a religious reformation. A struggle
for the right to pray according to one’s own prayer book was identified
with the struggle against the king, the aristocracy, the princes of the
church, and Rome. The Presbyterians and Puritans were deeply convinced
that they were placing their earthly interests under the unshakeable
protection of the divine Providence. The goals for which the new classes
were struggling commingled inseparably in their consciousness with texts
from the Bible and the forms of churchly ritual. Emigrants carried with
them across the ocean this tradition sealed with blood. Hence the
extraordinary virility of the Anglo-Saxon interpretation of
Christianity. We see even today how the minister “socialists” of Great
Britain back up their cowardice with these same magic texts with which
the people of the seventeenth century sought to justify their courage.

In France, which stepped across the Reformation, the Catholic Church
survived as a state institution until the revolution, which found its
expression and justification for the tasks of the bourgeois society, not
in texts from the Bible, but in the abstractions of democracy. Whatever
the hatred of the present rulers of France for Jacobinism, the fact is
that only thanks to the austere labour of Robespierre are they still
able to cover their conservative rulership with those formulas with the
help of which the old society was exploded.

Each of the great revolutions marked off a new stage of the bourgeois
society, and new forms of consciousness for its classes. Just as France
stepped over the Reformation, so Russia stepped over the formal
democracy. The Russian revolutionary party, which was to place its stamp
upon a whole epoch, sought an expression for the tasks of the revolution
neither in the Bible nor in that secularised Christianity called “pure”
democracy, but in the material relations of the social classes. The
soviet system gave to those relations their simplest, most undisguised
and transparent expression. The rule of the toilers has for the first
time been realised in the soviet system, which, whatever its immediate
historic vicissitudes, has penetrated as irrevocably into the
consciousness of the masses as did in its day the system of the
Reformation or of pure democracy.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. The assertion is made by Professor M.N. Pokrovsky. [See Appendix I]



CHAPTER 2 TZARIST RUSSIA IN THE WAR


 

Russia's participation in the war was self-contradictory both in motives
and in aims. That bloody struggle was waged essentially for world
domination. In this sense it was beyond Russia’s scope. The war aims of
Russia herself (the Turkish Straits, Galicia, Armenia) were provincial
in character, and to be decided only incidentally according to the
degree in which they answered the interests of the principal
contestants.

At the same time Russia, as one of the great powers, could not help
participating in the scramble of the advanced capitalist countries, just
as in the preceding epoch she could not help introducing shops,
factories, railroads, rapid-fire guns and airplanes. The not infrequent
disputes among Russian historians of the newest school as to how far
Russia was ripe for present-day imperialist policies often fall into
mere scholasticism, because they look upon Russia in the international
arena as isolated, as an independent factor, whereas she was but one
link in a system.

India participated in the war both essentially and formally as a colony
of England. The participation of China, though in a formal sense
“voluntary,” was in reality the interference of a slave in the fight of
his masters. The participation of Russia falls somewhere halfway between
the participation of France and that of China. Russia paid in this way
for her right to be an ally of advanced countries, to import capital and
pay interest on it – that is, essentially, for her right to be a
privileged colony of her allies – but at the same time for her right to
oppress and rob Turkey, Persia, Galicia, and in general the countries
weaker and more backward than herself. The twofold imperialism of the
Russian bourgeoisie had basically the character of an agency for other
mightier world powers.

The Chinese compradors are the classic type of the national bourgeoisie,
a kind of mediating agency between foreign finance capital and the
economy of their own country. In the world hierarchy of the powers,
Russia occupied before the war a considerably higher position than
China. What position she would have occupied after the war, if there had
been no revolution, is a different question. But the Russian autocracy
on the one hand, the Russian bourgeoisie on the other, contained
features of compradorism, ever more and more clearly expressed. They
lived and nourished themselves upon their connections with foreign
imperialism, served it, and without their support could not have
survived. To be sure, they did not survive in the long run even with its
support. The semi-comprador Russian bourgeoisie had world-imperialistic
interests in the same sense in which an agent working on percentages
lives by the interests of his employer.

The instrument of war is the army. Inasmuch as every army is considered
unconquerable in the national mythology, the ruling classes of Russia
saw no reason for making an exception of the army of the tzar. In
reality, however, this army was a serious force only against
semi-barbaric peoples, small neighbours and disintegrating states; on
the European arena it could act only as part of a coalition; in the
matter of defence it could fulfill its task only be the help of the
vastness of spaces, the sparsity of population, and the impassability of
the roads. The virtuoso of this army of serfs had been Suvorov. The
French revolution in breaking open the doors of the new society and the
new military art, had pronounced a death-sentence on the Suvorov type of
army. The semi-annulment of serfdom and the introduction of universal
military service had modernised the army only as far as it had the
country – that is, it introduced into the army all the contradictions
proper to a nation which still has its bourgeois revolution to
accomplish. It is true that the tzar’s army was constructed and armed
upon Western models; but this was more form than essence. There was no
correspondence between the cultural level of the peasant-soldier and
modern military technique. In the commanding staff, the ignorance,
light-mindedness and thievery of the ruling classes found their
expression. Industry and transport continually revealed their bankruptcy
before the concentrated demands of wartime. Although appropriately
armed, as it seemed, on the first day of the war, the troops soon turned
out to have neither weapons nor even shoes. In the Russo-Japanese war
the tzarist army had shown what it was worth. In the epoch of
counter-revolution the monarchy, with the aid of the Duma, had filled up
the military stores and put many new patches on the army, especially
upon its reputation for invincibility. In 1914 came a new and far
heavier test.

In the matter of military supplies and finances, Russia at war suddenly
finds herself in slavish dependence upon her allies. This is merely a
military expression of her general dependence upon advanced capitalist
countries, but help from the Allies does not save the situation. The
lack of munitions, the small number of factories for their production,
the sparseness of railroad lines for their transportation, soon
translated the backwardness of Russia into the familiar language of
defeat – which served to remind the Russian national liberals that their
ancestors had not accomplished the bourgeois revolution and that the
descendants, therefore, owed a debt to history.

The first days of war were the first days of disgrace. After a series of
partial catastrophes, in the spring of 1915 came the general retreat.
The generals took out their own criminal incapacity on the peaceful
population. Enormous tracts of land were violently laid waste. Clouds of
human locusts were driven to the rear with whips. The external rout was
completed with an internal one.

In answer to alarmed questions from his colleagues as to the situation
at the front, the War Minister Polivanov answered in these words: “I
place my trust in the impenetrable spaces, impassable mud, and the mercy
of Saint Nicholas Mirlikisky, Protector of Holy Russia” (Session of
August 4, 1915). A week later General Ruszky confessed to the same
ministers: “The present-day demands of military technique are beyond us.
At any rate we can’t keep up with the Germans.” That was not the mood of
a moment. Officer Stankevich reports the words of an engineer of the
corps: “It is hopeless to fight with the Germans, for we are in no
condition to do anything; even the new methods of fighting become the
causes of our failure.” There is a cloud of such testimony. The one
thing the Russian generals did with a flourish was to drag human meat
out of the country. Beef and pork are handled with incomparably more
economy. Grey staff non-entities, like Yanushkevich under Nikolai
Nikolaievich, and Alexeiev under the tzar, would stop up all cracks with
new mobilisations, and comfort themselves and the Allies with columns of
figures when columns of fighters were wanted. About fifteen million men
were mobilised, and they brimmed the depots, barracks, points of
transit, crowded, stamped, stepped on each other’s feet, getting harsh
and cursing. If these human masses were an imaginary magnitude for the
front, for the rear they were a very real factor of destruction. About
five and a half million were counted as killed, wounded and captured.
The number of deserters kept growing. Already in July 1915 the ministers
chanted: “Poor Russia! Even her army, which in past ages filled the
world with the thunder of its victories ... Even her army turns out to
consist only of cowards and deserters.”

The ministers themselves, with a gallows joke at the “bravery in
retreat” of their generals, wasted hours in those days discussing such
problems as whether to remove or not to remove the bones of the saints
from Kiev. The tsar submitted that it was not necessary, since “the
Germans would not risk touching them, and if they did touch them, so
much the worse for the Germans.” But the Synod had already started to
remove them. “When we leave,” they said, “we will take with us what is
most precious.” This happened not in the epoch of the Crusades, but in
the twentieth century when the news of the Russian defeats came over the
wireless.

The Russian successes against Austria-Hungary had their roots rather in
Austria-Hungary than in Russia. The disintegrating Hapsburg monarchy had
long ago hung out a sign for an undertaker, not demanding any high
qualifications of him. In the past Russia had been successful against
inwardly decomposing states like Turkey, Poland, Persia. The
south-western front of the Russian army, facing Austria, celebrated
immense victories which made it very different from the other fronts.
Here there emerged a few generals, who to be sure demonstrated no
military gifts, but were at least not thoroughly imbued with the
fatalism of steadily-beaten commanders. From this milieu there arose
subsequently several white “heroes” of the civil war.

Everybody was looking for someone upon whom to lay the blame. They
accused the Jews wholesale of espionage. They set upon people with
German names. The staff of the Grand Duke Nikolai Nikolaievich gave
orders to shoot a colonel of the gendarmes, Myasoyedov, as a German spy,
which he obviously was not. They arrested Sukhomlinov, the War Minister,
an empty and slovenly man, accusing him – possibly not without
foundation – of treason. The British Minister of Foreign Affairs, Grey,
said to the president of the Russian Parliamentary Delegation: Your
government is very bold if it dares in time of war indict its War
Minister for treason. The staff and the Duma accused the court of
Germanophilism. All of them together envied the Allies and hated them.
The French command spared its army by putting in Russian soldiers.
England warmed up slowly. In the drawing-rooms of Petrograd and the
headquarters at the front they gently joked: “England has sworn to fight
to the last drop of blood ... of the Russian soldier.” These jokes
seeped down and reached the trenches. “Everything for the war!” said the
ministers, deputies, generals, journalists. “Yes,” the soldier began to
think in the trenches, “they are all ready to fight to the last drop ...
of my blood.”

The Russian army lost in the whole war more men than any army which ever
participated in a national war – approximately two and a half million
killed, or forty per cent of all the losses of the Entente. In the first
months the soldiers fell under shell fire unthinkingly or thinking
little; but from day to day they gathered experience – bitter experience
of the lower ranks who are ignorantly commanded. They measured the
confusion of the generals by the number of purposeless manoeuvres on
soleless shoes, the number of dinners not eaten. From the bloody mash of
people and things emerged a generalised word: “the mess,” which in the
soldiers’ jargon was replaced by a still juicier term.

The swiftest of all to disintegrate was the peasant infantry. As a
general rule, the artillery with its high percentage of industrial
workers, is distinguished by an incomparably greater hospitality to
revolutionary ideas: this was clearly evident in 1905. If in 1917, on
the contrary, the artillery showed more conservatism than the infantry,
the cause lies in the fact that through the infantry divisions, as
through a sieve, there passed ever new and less and less trained human
masses. The artillery, moreover, suffering infinitely fewer losses,
retained its original _cadres_. The same thing was observed in other
specialised troops. But in the long run the artillery yielded too.
During the retreat from Galicia a secret order was issued by the
commander-in-chief: flog the soldiers for desertion and other crimes.
The soldier Pireiko relates: “They began to flog soldiers for the most
trivial offences; for example, for a few hours’ absence without leave.
And sometimes they flogged them in order to rouse their fighting
spirit.” As early as September 17, 1915, Kuropatkin wrote, citing
Guchkov: “The lower orders began the war with enthusiasm; but now they
are weary, and with the continual retreats have lost faith in a
victory.” At about the same time the Minister of the Interior spoke of
the presence in Moscow of 30 000 convalescent soldiers: “That’s a wild
crowd of libertines knowing no discipline, rough-housing, getting into
fights with the police (not long ago a policeman was killed by the
soldiers), rescuing arrested men, etc. Undoubtedly, in case of disorders
this entire horde will take the side of the mob.” The same soldier,
Pireiko, writes: “Everyone, to the last man, was interested in nothing
but peace ... Who should win and what kind of peace it would be, that
was of small interest to the army. It wanted peace at any cost, for it
was weary of war.”

An observant woman, Feodorchenko, serving as sister of mercy, listened
to the conversations of the soldiers, almost to their thoughts, and
cleverly wrote them down on scattered slips of paper. The little book
thus produced, _The People at War_, permits us to look in that
laboratory where bombs, barbed-wire entanglements, suffocating gases,
and the baseness of those in power, had been fashioning for long months
the consciousness of several million Russian peasants, and where along
with human bones age-old prejudices were cracking. In many of the
self-made aphorisms of the soldiers appear already the slogans of the
coming civil war.

General Ruszky complained in December 1916 that Riga was the misfortune
of the northern front. This is a “nest of propaganda, and so is Dvinsk.”
General Brussilov confirmed this: From the Riga district troops arrive
demoralised; soldiers refuse to attack. They lifted one company
commander on the points of their bayonets. It was necessary to shoot
several men, etc., etc. “The ground for the final disintegration of the
army was prepared long before the revolution,” concedes Rodzianko, who
was in close association with the officers and visited the front.

The revolutionary elements, scattered at first, were drowned in the army
almost without a trace, but with the growth of the general discontent
they rose to the surface. The sending of striking workers to the front
as a punishment increased the ranks of the agitators and the retreat
gave them a favourable audience. “The army in the rear and especially at
the front,” reports a secret service agent, “is full of elements of
which some are capable of becoming active forces of insurrection, and
others may merely refuse to engage in punitive activities.” The Gendarme
Administration of the Petrograd province declares in October 1916, on
the basis of a report made by a representative of the Land Union, that
“the mood in the army is alarming, the relation between officers and
soldiers is extremely tense, even bloody encounters are taking place.
Deserters are to be met everywhere by the thousands. Everyone who comes
near the army must carry away a complete and convincing impression of
the utter moral disintegration of the troops.” Out of caution the report
adds that although much in these communications seems hardly probable,
nevertheless it must be believed, since many physicians returning from
the active army have made reports to the same effect. The mood of the
rear corresponded to that of the front. At a conference of the Kadet
party in October 1916, a majority of the delegates remarked upon the
apathy and lack of faith in the victorious outcome of the war “in all
layers of the population, but especially in the villages and among the
city poor.” On October 30, 1916, the director of the Police Department
wrote, in a summary of his report, of “the weariness of war to be
observed everywhere, and the longing for a swift peace, regardless of
the conditions upon which it is concluded.” In a few months all these
gentlemen – deputies, police, generals, and land representatives,
physicians and former gendarmes – will nevertheless assert that the
revolution killed patriotism in the army, and that the Bolsheviks
snatched a sure victory out of their hands.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The place of coryphées, in the chorus of military patriotism,
undoubtedly belonged to the Constitutional Democrats (Kadets). Having
already in 1905 broken its dubious ties with the revolution, liberalism
at the beginning of the counter-revolutionary period had raised the
banner of imperialism. One thing flowed from another: once it proved
impossible to purge the country of the feudal rubbish in order to assure
to the bourgeoisie a dominant position, it remained to form a union with
the monarchy and the nobility in order to assure to capital the best
position in the world market. If it is true that the world catastrophe
was prepared in various quarters, so that it arrived to a certain degree
unexpectedly even to its most responsible organisers, it is equally
indubitable that Russian liberalism, as the inspirer of the foreign
policy of the monarchy, did not occupy the last place in its
preparation. The war of 1914 was quite rightly greeted by the leaders of
the Russian bourgeoisie as their war. In a solemn session of the State
Duma on July 26, 1914, the president of the Kadet faction announced: “We
will make no conditions or demands. We will simply throw in the scales
our firm determination to conquer the enemy.” In Russia, too, national
unity became the official doctrine. During a patriotic manifestation in
Moscow the master of ceremonies, Count Benkendorff, cried to the
diplomats: “Look! There is your revolution which they were prophesying
in Berlin!” “A similar thought,” explained the French minister
Paléologue, “was evidently in the minds of all.” People considered it
their duty to nourish and propagate illusions in a situation which, it
would seem, absolutely forbade illusions.

They did not wait long for sobering lessons. Very soon after the
beginning of the war one of the more expansive Kadets, a lawyer and
landlord, Rodichev, exclaimed at a session of the Central Committee of
his party: “Do you really think we can conquer with those fools?” Events
proved that it was not possible to conquer with fools. Liberalism,
having more than half lost faith in the victory, tried to employ the
momentum of the war in order to carry out a purgation of the camarilla
and compel the monarchy to a compromise. The chief implement towards
this end was to accuse the court party of Germanophilism and of
preparing a separate peace.

In the spring of 1915, while the weaponless soldiers were retreating
along the whole front, it was decided in governmental circles, not
without pressure from the Allies, to recruit the initiative of private
industry for work in behalf of the army. The Special Conference called
for this end included, along with bureaucrats, the more influential
industrialists. The Land and City unions which had arisen at the
beginning of the war, and the Military-Industrial Committees created in
the spring of 1915, became the points of support of the bourgeoisie in
the struggle for victory and for power. The State Duma, backed by these
organisations, was induced to intercede more confidently between the
bourgeoisie and the monarchy.

These broad political perspectives did not, however distract attention
from the important problems of the day. Out of the Special Conference as
out of a central reservoir tens of hundreds of millions, mounting up to
billions, flowed down through distributing canals, abundantly irrigating
the industries and incidentally nourishing numberless appetites. In the
State Duma and in the press a few of the war profits for 1914 and 1915
were published. The Moscow textile company of the Riabushinskys showed a
net profit of 75 per cent; the Tver Company, 111 per cent; the
copperworks of Kolchugin netted over 12 million on a basic capital of 10
million. In this sector patriotic virtue was rewarded generously, and
moreover immediately.

Speculation of all kinds and gambling on the market went to the point of
paroxysm. Enormous fortunes arose out of the bloody foam. The lack of
bread and fuel in the capital did not prevent the court jeweller
Faberget from boasting that he had never before done such a flourishing
business. Lady-in-waiting Vyrubova says that in no other season were
such gowns to be seen as in the winter of 1915-16, and never were so
many diamonds purchased. The night clubs were brim full of heroes of the
rear, legal deserters, and simply respectable people too old for the
front but sufficiently young for the joy of life. The grand dukes were
not among the last to enjoy this feast in times of plague. Nobody had
any fear of spending too much. A continual shower of gold fell from
above. “Society” held out its hands and pockets, aristocratic ladies
spread their skirts high, everybody splashed about in the bloody mud –
bankers, heads of the commissariat, industrialists, ballerinas of the
tzar and the grand dukes, orthodox prelates, ladies-in-waiting, liberal
deputies, generals of the front and rear, radical lawyers, illustrious
mandarins of both sexes, innumerable nephews, and more particularly
nieces. All came running to grab and gobble, in fear lest the blessed
rain should stop. And all rejected with indignation the shameful idea of
a premature peace.

Common gains, external defeats, and internal dangers, drew together the
parties of the ruling classes. The Duma, divided on the eve of the war,
achieved in 1915 its patriotic oppositional majority which received the
name of “Progressive Bloc.” The official aim of this bloc was of course
declared to be a “satisfaction of the needs created by the war.” On the
left the social-democrats and Trudoviks did not enter the bloc; on the
right the notorious Black Hundred groups. All the other factions of the
Duma – the Kadets, the Progressives, three groups of Octobrists, the
Centre and a part of the Nationalists, entered the bloc or adhered to it
– as also the national groups: Poles, Lithuanians, Mussulmans, Jews,
etc. In order not to frighten the tzar with the formula of a responsible
ministry, the bloc demanded “a united government composed of men
enjoying the confidence of the country.” The Minister of the Interior,
Prince Sherbatov, at that time characterised the bloc as a temporary
“union called forth by the danger of social revolution.” It required no
great penetration to realise this. Miliukov, the leader of the Kadets,
and thus also of the oppositional bloc, said at a conference of his
party: “We are treading a volcano ... The tension has reached its
extreme limit ... A carelessly dropped match will be enough to start a
terrible conflagration ... Whatever the government – whether good or bad
– a strong government is needed now more than ever before.”

The hope that the tzar, under the burden of defeat, would grant
concessions, was so great that in the liberal press there appeared in
August the slate of a proposed “Cabinet of confidence” with the
president of the Duma, Rodzianko, as premier (according to another
version, the president of the Land Union, Prince Lvov, was indicated for
that office), Guchkov as Minister of the Interior, Miliukov, Foreign
Minister, etc. A majority of these men who here nominated themselves for
a union with the tzar against the revolution, turned up a year later as
members of the “Revolutionary Government.” History has permitted herself
such antics more than once. This time the joke was at least a brief one.

A majority of the ministers of Goremykin’s cabinet were no less
frightened than the Kadets by the course things were taking, and
therefore inclined towards an agreement with the Progressive Bloc. “A
government which has not behind it the confidence of the supreme ruler,
nor the army, nor the cities, nor the zemstvos, nor the nobles, nor the
merchants, nor the workers, not only cannot function, but cannot even
exist – the thing is obviously absurd.” In these words, Prince Sherbatov
in August 1915 appraised the government in which he himself was Minister
of the Interior. “If you only arrange the scene properly and offer a
loophole,” said the Foreign Minister Sazonov, “the Kadets will be the
first to propose a compromise. Miliukov is the greatest possible
bourgeois and fears a social revolution above everything. Besides, a
majority of the Kadets are trembling for their own capital.” Miliukov on
his side considered that the Progressive Bloc “would have to give in
somewhat.” Both sides were ready to bargain, and everything seemed
thoroughly oiled. But on August 29 the Premier, Goremykin, a bureaucrat
weighed down with years and honours, an old cynic playing politics
between two games of _grand-patience_ and defending himself against all
complaints by remarking that the war is “not my business,” journeyed out
to the tzar at headquarters and returned with the information that all
and everybody should remain in their places, except the rambunctious
Duma, which was to be dissolved on the 3rd of September. The reading of
the tzar’s order dissolving the Duma was heard without a single word of
protest: the deputies gave a “hurrah” for the tzar, and dispersed.

How did the tzar’s government, supported according to its own confession
by nobody at all, survive for over a year and a half after that? A
temporary success of the Russian troops undoubtedly exerted its
influence and this was reinforced by the good golden rain. The successes
at the front soon ceased, to be sure, but the profits at the rear
continued. However, the chief cause of the successful propping up of the
monarchy for twelve months before its fall, was to be found in a sharp
division in the popular discontent. The chief of the Moscow Secret
Service Department reported a rightward tendency of the bourgeoisie
under the influence of “a fear of possible revolutionary excesses after
the war.” During the war, we note, a revolution was still considered
impossible. The industrialists were alarmed, over and above that, by “a
coquetting of certain leaders of the Military Industrial Committee with
the proletariat.” The general conclusion of this colonel of gendarmes,
Martynov – in whom a professional reading of Marxist literature had left
some traces – announced as the cause of a certain improvement in the
political situation “the steadily growing differentiation of social
classes concealing a sharp contradiction in their interests, a
contradiction felt especially keenly in the times we are living
through.”

The dissolution of the Duma in September 1915 was a direct challenge to
the bourgeoisie, not to the workers. But while the liberals were
dispersing with cries of “Hurrah!” – to be sure, not very enthusiastic
cries – the workers of Petrograd and Moscow responded with strikes of
protest. That cooled off the liberals still more. They feared worst of
all the intrusion of an uninvited third party in their family discussion
with the monarchy. But what further step was to be taken? Accompanied by
a slight growl from the left wing, liberalism cast its vote for a
well-tried recipe: to stand exclusively on legal grounds, and render the
bureaucracy “as it were, unnecessary” in the course of a mere fulfilment
of their patriotic functions. The ministerial slate at any rate would
have to be laid aside for a time.

The situation in those days was getting worse automatically. In May 1916
the Duma was again convoked, but nobody knew exactly what for. The Duma,
in any case, had no intention of summoning a revolution, and aside from
that there was nothing for it to say. “At that session” – Rodzianko
remembers – “the proceedings were languid; the deputies attended
irregularly ...The continual struggle seemed fruitless, the government
would listen to nothing, irregularities were increasing, and the country
was headed for ruin.” In the bourgeoisie’s fear of revolution and its
impotence without revolution, the monarchy found, during the year 1916,
a simulacrum of social support.

By autumn the situation was still worse. The hopelessness of the war had
become evident to all. The indignation of the popular masses threatened
any moment to flow over the brim. While attacking the court party as
before for Germanophilism, the liberals now deemed it necessary to feel
out the chances of peace themselves, preparing their own future. Only in
this way can you explain the negotiations of one of the leaders of the
Progressive Bloc, the deputy Protopopov, with the German diplomat,
Warburg, in Stockholm in the autumn of 1916. The Duma delegation, making
friendly visits to the French and English, could easily convince itself
in Paris and London that the dear Allies intended in the course of the
war to squeeze all the live juice out of Russia, in order after the
victory to make this backward country their chief field of economic
exploitation. A defeated Russia in tow to a victorious Entente would
have meant a colonial Russia. The Russian possessing classes had no
other course but to try to free themselves from the too close embrace of
the Entente, and find an independent road to peace, making use of the
antagonism of the two more powerful camps. The meeting of the Duma
deputy with the German diplomat, as a first step on this road, was both
a threat in the direction of the Allies with a view to gaining
concessions, and a feeling out of the actual possibilities of
rapprochement with Germany. Protopopov was acting in agreement not only
with the tzarist diplomats – the meeting occurred in the presence of the
Russian ambassador in Sweden – but also with the whole delegation of the
State Duma. Incidentally the liberals by means of this reconnoitre were
pursuing a not unimportant domestic goal. “Rely on us” – they were
hinting to the tzar – “and we will make you a separate peace better and
more reliable than Stürmer[1] can.” According to Protopopov’s scheme –
that is, the scheme of his backers – the Russian government was to
inform the Allies “several months in advance” that she would be
compelled to end the war, and that if the Allies refused to institute
peace negotiations, Russia would have to conclude a separate peace with
Germany. In his confession written after the revolution, Protopopov
speaks as of something which goes without saying of the fact that “all
reasonable people in Russia, among them probably all the leaders of the
party of ’the People’s Freedom’ (Kadets), were convinced that Russia was
unable to continue the war.”

The tzar, to whom Protopopov upon his return reported his journey and
negotiations, treated the idea of a separate peace with complete
sympathy. He merely did not see the necessity of drawing the liberals
into the business. The fact that Protopopov himself was included
incidentally in the staff of the court camarilla, having broken with the
Progressive bloc, is explained by the personal character of this fop,
who had fallen in love, according to his own words, with the tzar and
the tzarina – and at the same time, we may add, with an expected
portfolio as Minister of the Interior. But this episode of Protopopov’s
treason to liberalism does not alter the general content of the liberal
foreign policy – a mixture of greed, cowardice and treachery.

The Duma again assembled on November 1. The tension in the country had
become unbearable. Decisive steps were expected of the Duma. It was
necessary to do something, or at the very least say something. The
Progressive Bloc found itself compelled to resort to parliamentary
exposures. Counting over from the tribune the chief steps taken by the
government, Miliukov asked after each one: “Was this stupidity or
treason?” High notes were sounded also by other deputies. The government
was almost without defenders. It answered in the usual way: the speeches
of the Duma orators were forbidden publication. The speeches therefore
circulated by the million. There was not a government department, not
only in the rear but at the front, where the forbidden speeches were not
transcribed – frequently with additions corresponding to the temperament
of the transcriber. The reverberation of the debate of November 1 was
such that terror seized the very authors of the arraignment.

A group of extreme rightists, sturdy bureaucrats inspired by Durnovo,
who had put down the revolution of 1905, took that moment to present to
the tzar a proposed programme. The eye of these experienced officials,
trained in a serious police school, saw not badly and pretty far, and if
their prescription was no good, it is only because no medicine existed
for the sickness of the old régime. The authors of the programme speak
against any concessions whatever to the bourgeois opposition, not
because the liberals want to go too far, as think the vulgar Black
Hundreds – upon whom these official reactionaries look with some scorn –
no, the trouble is that the liberals are “so weak, so disunited and, to
speak frankly, so mediocre, that their triumph would be as brief as it
would be unstable.” The weakness of the principal opposition party, the
“Constitutional Democrats” (Kadets), is indicated, they point out, by
its very name. It is called democratic, when it is in essence bourgeois.
Although to a considerable degree a party of liberal landlords, it has
signed a programme of compulsory land redemption. “Without these trumps
from a deck not their own” – write these secret counsellors, using the
images to which they are accustomed – “the Kadets are nothing more than
a numerous association of liberal lawyers, professors and officials of
various departments – nothing more.” A revolutionist, they point out, is
a different thing. They accompany their recognition of the significance
of the revolutionary parties with a grinding of teeth: “The danger and
strength of these parties lies in the fact that they have an idea, they
have money (!), they have a crowd ready and well organised.” The
revolutionary parties “can count on the sympathy of an overwhelming
majority of the peasantry, which will follow the proletariat the very
moment the revolutionary leaders point a finger to other people’s land.”
What would a responsible ministry yield in these circumstances? “A
complete and final destruction of the right parties, a gradual
swallowing of the intermediate parties – the Centre, the
Liberal-Conservatives, the Octobrists and the Progressives of the Kadet
party – which at the beginning would have a decisive importance. But the
same fate would menace the Kadets ... and afterwards would come the
revolutionary mob, the Commune, destruction of the dynasty, pogroms of
the possessing classes, and finally the peasant-brigand.” It is
impossible to deny that the police anger here rises to a certain kind of
historic vision.

The positive part of their programme was not new, but consistent: a
government of ruthless partisans of the autocracy; abolition of the
Duma; martial law in both capitals; preparation of forces for putting
down a rebellion. This programme did in its essentials become the basis
of the government policy of the last pre-revolutionary months. But its
success presupposed a power which Durnovo had had in this hands in the
winter of 1905, but which by the autumn of 1917 no longer existed. The
monarchy tried, therefore, to strangle the country stealthily and in
sections. Ministers were shifted upon the principle of “our people” –
meaning those unconditionally devoted to the tzar and tzarina. But these
“our people” – especially the renegade Protopopov – were insignificant
and pitiful. The Duma was not abolished, but again dissolved. The
declaration of martial law in Petrograd was saved for a moment when the
revolution had already triumphed. And the military forces prepared for
putting down the rebellion were themselves seized by rebellion. All this
became evident after two or three months.

Liberalism in those days was making its last efforts to save the
situation. All the organisations of the enfranchised bourgeoisie
supported the November speeches of the Duma opposition with a series of
new declarations. The most impudent of these was the resolution of the
Union of Cities on December 9: “Irresponsible criminals, fanatics, are
preparing for Russia’s defeat, shame and slavery.” The State Duma was
urged “not to disperse until the formation of a responsible government
is attained.” Even the State Council, organ of the bureaucracy and of
the vast properties, expressed itself in favour of calling to power
people who enjoyed the confidence of the country. A similar intercession
was made by a session of the united nobility: even the moss-covered
stones cried out. But nothing was changed. The monarchy would not let
the last shreds of power slip out of its hands.

The last session of the last Duma was convoked, after waverings and
delays, on February 14, 1917. Only two weeks remained before the coming
of revolution. Demonstrations were expected. In the Kadet organ _Rech_,
alongside an announcement by the chief of the Petrograd Military
District, General Khabalov, forbidding demonstrations, was printed a
letter from Miliukov warning the workers against “dangerous and bad
counsel” issuing from “dark sources.” In spite of strikes, the opening
of the Duma was sufficiently peaceful. Pretending that the question of
power no longer interested it, the Duma occupied itself with a critical,
but still strictly business question: food supplies. The mood was
languid, as Rodzianko subsequently remembered: “We felt the impotence of
the Duma, weariness of a futile struggle.” Miliukov kept repeating that
the Progressive Bloc “will act with words and with words only.” Such was
the Duma that entered the whirlpool of the February revolution.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. Prime Minister from January to November 1916. [_Trans._]



CHAPTER 3 THE PROLETARIAT AND THE PEASANTRY


 

The Russian proletariat learned its first steps in the political
circumstances created by a despotic state. Strikes forbidden by law,
underground circles, illegal proclamations, street demonstrations,
encounters with the police and with troops – such was the school created
by the combination of a swiftly developing capitalism with an absolutism
slowly surrendering its positions. The concentration of the workers in
colossal enterprises, the intense character of governmental persecution,
and finally the impulsiveness of a young and fresh proletariat, brought
it about that the political strike, so rare in western Europe, became in
Russia the fundamental method of struggle. The figures of strikes from
the beginning of the present century are a most impressive index of the
political history of Russia. With every desire not to burden our text
with figures, we cannot refrain from introducing a table of political
strikes in Russia for the period 1903 to 1917. The figures, reduced to
their simplest expression, relate only to enterprises undergoing factory
inspection. The railroads, mining industries, mechanical and small
enterprises in general, to say nothing of agriculture, for various
reasons do not enter into the count. But the changes in the strike curve
in the different periods emerge no less clearly for this.

We have before us a curve – the only one of its kind – of the political
temperature of a nation carrying in its womb a great revolution. In a
backward country with a small proletariat – for in all the enterprises
undergoing factory inspections there were only about 1½ million workers
in 1905, about 2 million in 1917 – the strike movement attains such
dimensions as it never knew before anywhere in the world. With the
weakness of the petty bourgeois democracy, the scatteredness and
political blindness of the peasant movement, the revolutionary strike of
the workers becomes the battering ram which the awakening nation directs
against the walls of absolutism. Participants in political strikes in
1905 numbering 1,843,000 – workers participating in several strikes are
here, of course, counted twice – that number alone would permit us to
put our finger on the revolutionary year in our table, if we knew
nothing else about the Russian political calendar.

Number in thousands of participants
in political strikes

Year

1903

87*

1904

25*

1905

1,843

1906

651

1907

540

1908

93

1909

8

1910

4

1911

8

1912

550

1913

502

1914 (first half)

1,059

1915

156

1916

310

1917 (January-February)

575

* The figures for 1903 and 1904 refer to all strikes,
the economic undoubtedly predominating

For 1904, the first year of the Russo-Japanese war, the factory
inspection indicates in all only 25,000 strikers. In 1905, political and
economic strikes together involved 2,863,000 mean – 115 times more than
in the previous year. This remarkable fact by itself would suggest the
thought that a proletariat, impelled by the course of events to
improvise such unheard-of revolutionary activities, must at whatever
cost produce from its depths an organisation corresponding to the
dimensions of the struggle and the colossal tasks. This organisation was
the soviets – brought into being by the first revolution, and made the
instrument of the general strike and the struggle for power.

Beaten in the December uprising of 1905, the proletariat during the next
two years makes heroic efforts to defend a part of the conquered
positions. These years, as our strike figures show, still belong
directly to the revolution, but they are the years of ebb. The four
following years (1908-11) emerge in our mirror of strike statistics as
the years of victorious counter-revolution. An industrial crisis
coincident with this still further exhausts the proletariat, already
bled white. The depth of the fall is symmetrical with the height of the
rise. National convulsions find their reflection in these simple
figures.

The industrial boom beginning in 1910 lifted the workers to their feet,
and gave a new impulse to their energy. The figures for 1912-14 almost
repeat those for 1905-07, but in the opposite order: not from above
downwards, but from below up. On a new and higher historical basis –
there are more workers now, and they have more experience – a new
revolutionary offensive begins. The first half-year of 1914 clearly
approaches in the number of political strikes the culminating point of
the year of the first revolution. But war breaks out and sharply
interrupts this process. The first war months are marked by political
inertness in the working class, but already in the spring of 1915 the
numbness begins to pass. A new cycle of political strikes opens, a cycle
which in February 1917 will culminate in the insurrection of soldiers
and workers.

The sharp ebbs and flows of the mass struggle had left the Russian
proletariat after a few years almost unrecognisable. Factories which two
or three years ago would strike unanimously over some single arbitrary
police action, today have completely lost their revolutionary colour,
and accept the most monstrous crimes of the authorities without
resistance. Great defeats discourage people for a long time. The
consciously revolutionary elements lose their power over the masses.
Prejudices and superstitions not yet burnt out come back to life. Grey
immigrants from the village during these times dilute the workers’
ranks. Sceptics ironically shake their heads. So its was in the years
1907-11. But molecular processes in the masses are healing the
psychological wounds of defeat. A new turn of events, or an underlying
economic impulse, opens a new political cycle. The revolutionary
elements again find their audience. The struggle reopens on a higher
level.

In order to understand the two chief tendencies in the Russian working
class, it is important to have in mind that Menshevism finally took
shape in the years of ebb and reaction. It relied chiefly upon a thin
layer of workers who had broken with the revolution. Whereas Bolshevism,
cruelly shattered in the period of the reaction, began to rise swiftly
on the crest of a new revolutionary tide in the years before the war.
“The most energetic and audacious element, ready for tireless struggle,
for resistance and continual organisation, is that element, those
organisations, and those people who are concentrated around Lenin.” In
these words the Police Department estimated the work of the Bolsheviks
during the years preceding the war.

In July 1914, while the diplomats were driving the last nail into the
cross designed for the crucifixion of Europe, Petrograd was boiling like
a revolutionary cauldron. The President of the French Republic,
Poincaré, had to lay his wreath on the tomb of Alexander III amid the
last echoes of a street fight and the first murmurs of a patriotic
demonstration.

Would the mass offensive of 1912-14 have led directly to an overthrow of
tzarism if the war had not broken out? It is hardly possible to answer
that question with certainty. The process would inexorably have led to a
revolution, but through what stages would the revolution in those
circumstances have had to go? Would it not have experienced another
defeat? How much time would have been needed by the workers in order to
arouse the peasantry and win the army? In all these directions only
guesses are possible. The war, at any rate, gave the process at first a
backward movement, but only to accelerate it more powerfully in the next
period and guarantee its overwhelming victory.

At the first sound of the drum the revolutionary movement died down. The
more active layers of the workers were mobilised. The revolutionary
elements were thrown from the factories to the front. Severe penalties
were imposed for striking. The workers’ press was swept away. Trade
unions were strangled. Hundreds of thousands of women, boys, peasants,
poured into the workshops. The war – combined with the wreck of the
International – greatly disoriented the workers politically, and made it
possible for the factory administration, then just lifting its head, to
speak patriotically in the name of the factories, carrying with it a
considerable part of the workers, and compelling the more bold and
resolute to keep still and wait. The revolutionary ideas were barely
kept glowing in small and hushed circles. In the factories in those days
nobody dared to call himself “Bolshevik” for fear not only of arrest,
but of a beating from the backward workers.

The Bolshevik faction in the Duma, weak in its personnel, had not risen
at the outbreak of the war to the height of its task. Along with the
Menshevik deputies, it introduced a declaration in which it promised “to
defend the cultural weal of the people against all attacks wheresoever
originating.” The Duma underlined with applause this yielding of a
position. Not one of the Russian organisations or groups of the party
took the openly defeatist position which Lenin came out for abroad. The
percentage of patriots among the Bolsheviks, however, was insignificant.
In contrast to the Narodniks[1] and Mensheviks, the Bolsheviks began in
1914 to develop among the masses a printed and oral agitation against
the war. The Duma deputies soon recovered their poise and renewed their
revolutionary work – about which the authorities were very closely
informed, thanks to a highly developed system of provocation. It is
sufficient to remark that out of seven members of the Petersburg
committee of the party, three, on the eve of the war, were in the employ
of the Secret Service. Thus tzarism played blind man’s buff with the
revolution. In November the Bolshevik deputies were arrested. There
began a general smash-up of the party throughout the country. In
February 1915 the case of the Duma faction was called in the courts. The
deputies conducted themselves cautiously. Kamenev, theoretical
instigator of the factions, stood apart from the defeatist position of
Lenin; so did Petrovsky, the present president of the Central Committee
in the Ukraine. The Police Department remarked with satisfaction that
the severe sentences dealt out to the deputies did not evoke any
movement of protest among the workers.

It seemed as though the war had produced a new working class. To a
considerable extent this was the fact: in Petrograd the personnel of the
workers had been renewed almost forty per cent. The revolutionary
succession had been abruptly broken. All that existed before the war,
including the Duma faction of the Bolsheviks, had suddenly retired to
the background and almost disappeared in oblivion. But under cover of
this quietness and patriotism – and to some extent even monarchism – the
moods of a new explosion were gradually accumulating in the masses.

In August 1915 the tzarist ministers were telling each other that the
workers “are everywhere hunting out treason, betrayal and sabotage in
behalf of the Germans, and are enthusiastic in the search for those
guilty of our unsuccesses at the front.” It is true that in that period
the awakening mass-criticism – in part sincerely and in part for the
sake of defensive coloration – often adopted the standpoint of “defence
of the fatherland.” But that idea was only a point of departure. The
discontent of the workers was digging a deeper and deeper course,
silencing the masters, the Black Hundred workers, the servants of the
administration, permitting the worker-Bolsheviks to raise their heads.

From criticism the masses pass over to action. Their indignation finds
expression first of all in food disturbances, sometimes rising to the
height of local riots. Women, old men and boys, in the market or on the
open square, feel bolder and more independent than the workers on
military duty in the factories. In Moscow in May the movement turns into
a pogrom of Germans, although the participants in this are chiefly the
scum of the town armed under police protection. Nevertheless, the very
possibility of such a pogrom in industrial Moscow proves that the
workers are not yet sufficiently awakened to impose their slogans and
their discipline upon the disturbed small-town people. These food
disorders, spreading over the whole country, broke the war hypnosis and
laid the road to strikes.

The inflow of raw labour power to the factories and the greedy scramble
for war-profits, brought everywhere a lowering of the conditions of
labour, and gave rise to the crudest methods of exploitation. The rise
in the cost of living automatically lowered wages. Economic strikes were
the inevitable mass reflection – stormy in proportion as they had been
delayed. The strikes were accompanied by meetings, adoption of political
resolutions, scrimmages with the police, not infrequently by shots and
casualties.

The struggle arose chiefly in the central textile district. On June 5
the police fire a volley at the weavers in Kostroma: 4 killed, 9
wounded. On August 10 the troops fire on the Ivanovo-Voznesensk workers:
16 killed, 30 wounded. In the movement of the textile workers some
soldiers of a local battalion are involved. Protest strikes in various
parts of the country give answer to the shootings at Ivanovo-Voznesensk.
Parallel to this goes the economic struggle. The textile workers often
march in the front rank.

In comparison with the first half of 1914 this movement, as regards
strength of pressure and clarity of slogans, represents a big step
backward. This is not surprising, since raw masses are to a large extent
being drawn into the struggle, and there has been a complete
disintegration of the guiding layer of the workers. Nevertheless even in
these first strikes of the war the approach of great battles can be
heard. The Minister of Justice, Khvostov, said on the 16th of August:
“If there are at present no armed demonstrations of the workers, it is
only because they have as yet no organisation.” Goremykin expressed
himself more concisely: “The trouble among the workers’ leaders is that
they have no organisation, since it was broken up by the arrest of the
five members of the Duma.” The Minister of the Interior added: “We must
not amnesty the members of the Duma (Bolsheviks) – they are the
organising centre of the movement in its most dangerous form.” These
people at least made no mistake as to who was the real enemy.

While the ministry, even at the moment of its greatest dismay and
readiness for liberal concessions, deemed it necessary as before to
pound the workers’ revolution on the head – i.e. on the Bolsheviks – the
big bourgeoisie was trying to fix up a co-operation with the Mensheviks.
Frightened by the scope of the strike movement, the liberal
industrialists made an attempt to impose patriotic discipline upon the
workers by including their elected representatives in the staff of the
Military Industrial Committees. The Minister of the Interior complained
that it was very difficult to oppose this scheme, fathered by Guchkov.
“The whole enterprise,” he said, “is being carried out under a patriotic
flag, and in the interests of the defence.” We must remark, however,
that even the police avoided arresting the social-patriots, seeing in
them a side partner in the struggle against strikes and revolutionary
“excesses.” It was indeed upon their too great confidence in the
strength of patriotic socialism, that the Secret Service based their
conviction that no insurrection would occur while the war lasted.

In the elections to the Military-Industrial Committees the defencists,
headed by an energetic metal worker, Gvozdev – we shall meet him later
as Minister of Labour in the Coalition Government of the revolution –
turned out to be a minority. They enjoyed the support, however, not only
of the liberal bourgeoisie, but of the bureaucracy, in getting the
better of those who, led by the Bolsheviks, wished to boycott the
committees. They succeeded in imposing a representation in these organs
of industrial patriotism upon the Petersburg proletariat. The position
of the Mensheviks was clearly expressed in a speech one of their
representatives later made to the industrialists in the Committee: “You
ought to demand that the existing bureaucratic power retire from the
scene, yielding its place to you as the inheritors of the present social
structure.” This young political friendship was growing by leaps and
bounds. After the revolution it will bring forth its ripe fruit.

The war produced a dreadful desolation in the underground movement.
After the arrest of the Duma faction the Bolsheviks had no centralised
party organisation at all. The local committees had an episodic
existence, and often had no connections with the workers districts. Only
scattered groups, circles and solitary individuals did anything.
However, the reviving strike movement gave them some spirit and some
strength in the factories. They gradually began to find each other and
build up the district connections. The underground work revived. In the
Police Department they wrote later: “Ever since the beginning of the
war, the Leninists, who have behind them in Russia an overwhelming
majority of the underground social-democratic organisations, have in
their larger centres (such as Petrograd, Moscow, Kharkov, Kiev, Tula,
Kostroma, Vladimir Province, Samara) been issuing in considerable
numbers revolutionary appeals with a demand to stop the war, overthrow
the existing government, and found a republic. And this work has had its
palpable result in workers’ strikes and disorders.”

The traditional anniversary of the march of the workers to the Winter
Palace, which had passed almost unnoticed the year before, produces a
widespread strike on January 9, 1916. The strike movement doubles during
this year. Encounters with the police accompany every big and prolonged
strike. In contact with the troops, the workers conduct themselves with
demonstrative friendliness, and the Secret Police more than once notice
this alarming fact.

The war industries swelled out, devouring all resources around them and
undermining their own foundation. The peacetime branches of production
began to die away. In spite of all plannings, nothing came of the
regulation of industry. The bureaucracy, incapable of taking this
business in hand against the opposition of the powerful
Military-Industrial Committees, at the same time refused to turn over
the regulating role to the bourgeoisie. The chaos increased. Skilled
workers were replaced by unskilled. The coal mines, shops and factories
of Poland were soon lost. In the course of the first year of the war a
fifth part of the industrial strength of the country was cut off. As
much as 50 per cent of production went to supply the needs of the army
and the war – including about 75 per cent of the textile production of
the country. The overloaded transport proved incapable of supplying
factories with the necessary quantity of fuel and raw material. The war
not only swallowed up the whole current national income, but seriously
began to cut into the basic capital of the country.

The industrialists grew less and less willing to grant anything to the
workers, and the government, as usual, answered every strike with severe
repressions. All this pushed the minds of the workers from the
particular to the general, from economics to politics: “We must all
strike at once.” Thus arose the idea of the general strike. The process
of radicalisation of the masses is most convincingly reflected in the
strike statistics. In 1915, two and a half times fewer workers
participated in political strikes than in economic strikes. In 1916,
twice as few. In the first few months of 1917, political strikes
involved six times as many workers as economic. The role of Petrograd is
portrayed in one figure: 72 per cent of the political strikers during
the years of the war fall to her lot!

Many of the old beliefs are burned up in the fires of this struggle. The
Secret Service reports, “with pain,” that if they should react according
to the dictates of the law to “every instance of insolence and open
insult to His Majesty, the number of trials under Article 103 would
reach an unheard-of figure.” Nevertheless the consciousness of the
masses is far behind their action. The terrible pressure of the war and
the national ruin is accelerating the process of struggle to such a
degree that broad masses of the workers, right up to the very
revolution, have not freed themselves from many opinions and prejudices
brought with them from the village or from the petty bourgeois family
circle in the town. This fact will set its stamp on the first stage of
the February revolution.

By the end of 1916 prices are rising by leaps and bounds. To the
inflation and the breakdown of transport, there is added an actual lack
of goods. The demands of the population have been cut down by this time
to one-half. The curve of the workers’ movement rises sharply. In
October the struggle enters its decisive phase, uniting all forms of
discontent in one. Petrograd draws back for the February leap. A wave of
meetings runs through the factories. The topics: food supplies, high
cost of living, war, government. Bolshevik leaflets are distributed;
political strikes begin; improvised demonstrations occur at factory
gates; cases of fraternisation between certain factories and the
soldiers are observed; a stormy protest-strike flares up over the trial
of the revolutionary sailors of the Baltic Fleet. The French ambassador
calls Premier Stürmer’s attention to the fact, become known to him, that
some soldiers have shot at the police. Stürmer quiets the ambassador:
“The repressions will be ruthless.” In November a good-sized group of
workers on military duty are removed from the Petrograd factories and
sent to the front. The year ends in storm and thunder.

Comparing the situation with that in 1905, the director of the Police
Department, Vassiliev, reaches a very uncomforting conclusion: “The mood
of the opposition has gone very far – far beyond anything to be seen in
the broad masses during the above-mentioned period of disturbance.”
Vassiliev rests no hope in the garrison; even the police officers are
not entirely reliable. The Intelligence Department reports a revival of
the slogan of the general strike, the danger of a resurrection of the
terror. Soldiers and officers arriving from the front say of the present
situation: “What is there to wait for? – Why don’t you take and bump off
such-and-such a scoundrel? If we were here, we wouldn’t waste much time
thinking,” etc. Shliapnikov, a member of the Bolshevik Central
Committee, himself a former metal worker, describes how nervous the
workers were in those days: “Sometimes a whistle would be enough, or any
kind of noise – the workers would take it for a signal to stop the
factory.” This detail is equally remarkable both as a political symptom
and as a psychological fact: the revolution is there in the nerves
before it comes out on the street.

The provinces are passing through the same stages, only more slowly. The
growth in massiveness of the movement and in fighting spirit shifts the
centre of gravity from the textile to the metal-workers, from economic
strikes to political, from the provinces to Petrograd. The first two
months of 1917 show 575,000 political strikers, the lion’s share of them
in the capital. In spite of new raids carried out by the police on the
eve of January 9, 150,000 workers went on strike in the capital on that
anniversary of blood. The mood was tense. The metal-workers were in the
lead. The workers all felt that no retreat was possible. In every
factory an active nucleus was forming, oftenest around the Bolsheviks.
Strikes and meetings went on continuously throughout the first two weeks
of February. On the 8th, at the Putilov factory, the police received “a
hail of slag and old iron.” On the 14th, the day the Duma opened, about
90,000 were on strike in Petrograd. Several plants also stopped work in
Moscow. On the 16th, the authorities decided to introduce bread cards in
Petrograd. This novelty rasped the nerves. On the 19th, a mass of people
gathered around the food shops, especially women, all demanding bread. A
day later bakeries were sacked in several parts of the city. These were
the heat lightnings of the revolution, coming in a few days.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Russian proletariat found its revolutionary audacity not only in
itself. Its very position as minority of the nation suggests that it
could not have given its struggle a sufficient scope – certainly not
enough to take its place at the head of the state – if it had not found
a mighty support in the thick of the people. Such a support was
guaranteed to it by the agrarian problem.

The belated half-liberation of the peasants in 1861 had found
agricultural industry almost on the same level as two hundred years
before. The preservation of the old area of communal land – somewhat
filched from during the reform – together with the archaic methods of
land culture, automatically sharpened a crisis caused by the rural
excess population, which was at the same time a crisis in the three-fold
system. The peasantry felt still more caught in a trap because the
process was not taking place in the seventeenth but in the nineteenth
century – that is, in the conditions of an advanced money economy which
made demands upon the wooden plough that could only be met by a tractor.
Here too we see a drawing together of separate stages of the historic
process, and as a result an extreme sharpening of contradictions. The
learned agronomes and economists had been preaching that the old area
with rational cultivation would be amply sufficient – that is to say,
they proposed to the peasant to make a jump to a higher level of
technique and culture without disturbing the landlord, the bailiff, or
the tzar. But no economic régime, least of all an agricultural régime,
the most tardy of all, has ever disappeared before exhausting all its
possibilities. Before feeling compelled to pass over to a more intensive
economic culture, the peasant had to make a last attempt to broaden his
three fields. This could obviously be achieved only at the expense of
non-peasant lands. Choking in the narrowness of his land area, under the
smarting whip of the treasury and the market, the muzhik was inexorably
forced to attempt to get rid of the landlord once for all.

On the eve of the first revolution the whole stretch of arable land
within the limits of European Russia was estimated at 280 million
_dessiatins_.[2] The communal allotments constituted about 140 million.
The crown lands, above 5 million. Church and monastery lands, about 2½
million. Of the privately owned land, 70 million _dessiatins_ belonged
to the 30,000 great landlords, each of whom owned above 500 dessiatins.
This 70 million was about what would have belonged to 10 million peasant
families. The land statistics constitute the finished programme of a
peasant war.

The landlords were not settled with in the first revolution. Not all the
peasants rose. The movement in the country did not coincide with that in
the cities. The peasant army wavered, and finally supplied sufficient
forces for putting down the workers. As soon as the Semenovsky Guard
regiment had settled with the Moscow insurrection, the monarchy
abandoned all thought of cutting down the landed estates, as also its
own autocratic rights.

However, the defeated revolution did not pass without leaving traces in
the village. The government abolished the old land redemption payments
and opened the way to a broader colonisation of Siberia. The frightened
landlords not only made considerable concessions in the matter of
rentals, but also began a large-scale selling of their landed estates.
These fruits of the revolution were enjoyed by the better-off peasants,
who were able to rent and buy the landlords’ land.

However, the broadest gates were opened for the emerging of capitalist
farmers from the peasant class by the law of November 9, 1906, the chief
reform introduced by the victorious counter-revolution. Giving the right
even to a small minority of the peasants of the commune, against the
will of the majority, to cut out from the communal land a section to be
owned independently, the law of November 9 constituted an explosive
capitalist shell directed against the commune. The president of the
Council of Ministers, Stolypin, described the essence of this
governmental policy towards the peasants as “banking on the strong
ones.” This meant: encourage the upper circles of the peasantry to get
hold of the communal land by buying up these “liberated” sections, and
convert these new capitalist farmers into a support for the existing
régime. It was easier to propose such a task, however, than to achieve
it. In this attempt to substitute the kulak[3] problem for the peasant
problem, the counter-revolution was destined to break its neck.

By January 1, 1916, 2½ million home-owners had made good their personal
possession of 17 million dessiatins. Two more million home-owners were
demanding the allotment to them of 14 million dessiatins. This looked
like a colossal success for the reform. But the majority of the
homesteads were completely incapable of sustaining life, and represented
only material for natural selection. At that time when the more backward
landlords and small peasants were selling on a large scale – the former
their estates, the latter their bits of land – there emerged in the
capacity of principal purchaser a new peasant bourgeoisie. Agriculture
entered upon a state of indubitable capitalist boom. The export of
agricultural products from Russia rose between 1908 and 1912 from 1
billion roubles to 1½ billion. This meant that broad masses of the
peasantry had been proletarianised, and the upper circles of the
villages were throwing on the market more and more grain.

To replace the compulsory communal ties of the peasantry, there
developed very swiftly a voluntary co-operation, which succeeded in
penetrating quite deeply into the peasant masses in the course of a few
years, and immediately became a subject of liberal and democratic
idealisation. Real power in the co-operatives belonged, however, only to
the rich peasants, whose interests in the last analysis they served. The
Narodnik intelligentsia, by concentrating its chief forces in peasant
co-operation, finally succeeded in shifting its love for the people on
to good solid bourgeois rails. In this way was prepared, partially at
least, the political bloc of the “anti-capitalist” party of the Social
Revolutionaries with the Kadets, the capitalist party _par excellence_.

Liberalism, although preserving the appearance of opposition to the
agrarian policy of the reaction, nevertheless looked with great hopes
upon this capitalist destruction of the communes. “In the country a very
powerful petty bourgeoisie is arising,” wrote the liberal Prince
Troubetskoy, “in its whole make and essence alien alike to the ideals of
the united nobility and to the socialist dreams.”

But this admirable medal had its other side. There was arising from the
destroyed communes not only a “very powerful bourgeoisie,” but also its
antithesis. The number of peasants selling tracts of land they could not
live on had risen by the beginning of the war to a million, which means
no less than five million souls added to the proletarian population. A
sufficiently explosive material was also supplied by the millions of
peasant-paupers to whom nothing remained but to hang on to their hungry
allotments. In consequence those contradictions kept reproducing
themselves among the peasants which had so early undermined the
development of bourgeois society as a whole in Russia. The new rural
bourgeoisie which was to create a support for the old and more powerful
proprietors, turned out to be as hostilely opposed to the fundamental
masses of the peasantry as the old proprietors had been to the people as
a whole. Before it could become a support to the existing order, this
peasant bourgeoisie had need of some order of its own wherewith to cling
to its conquered positions. In these circumstances it is no wonder that
the agrarian problem continued a sharp one in all the State Dumas.
Everyone felt that the last word had not yet been spoken. The peasant
deputy Petrichenko once declared from the tribune of the Duma: “No
matter how long you debate you won’t create a new planet – that means
that you will have to give us the land.” This peasant was neither a
Bolshevik, nor a Social Revolutionary. On the contrary, he was a Right
deputy, a monarchist.

The agrarian movement, having, like the strike movement of the workers,
died down toward the end of 1907, partially revives in 1908, and grows
stronger during the following years. The struggle, to be sure, is
transferred to a considerable degree within the commune: that is just
what the reaction had figured on politically. There are not infrequent
armed conflicts among peasants during the division of the communal land.
But the struggle against the landlord also does not disappear. The
peasants are more frequently setting fire to the landlord’s manors,
harvest, haystacks, seizing on the way also those individual tracts
which had been cut off against the will of the communal peasants.

The war found the peasantry in this condition. The government carried
away from the country about 10 million workers and about 2 million
horses. The weak homesteads grew still weaker. The number of peasants
who could not sow their fields increased. But in the second year of the
war the middle peasants also began to go under. Peasant hostility toward
the war sharpened from month to month. In October 1916, the Petrograd
Gendarme Administration reported that in the villages they had already
ceased to believe in the success of the war – the report being based on
the words of insurance agents, teachers, traders, etc. “All are waiting
and impatiently demanding: When will this cursed war finally end?” And
this is not all: “Political questions are being talked about everywhere
and resolutions adopted directed against the landlords and merchants.
Nuclei of various organisations are being formed ... As yet there is no
uniting centre, but there is no reason to suppose that the peasants will
unite by way of the co-operatives which are daily growing throughout all
Russia.” There is some exaggeration here. In some things the gendarme
has run ahead a little, but the fundamentals are indubitably correct.

The possessing classes could not foresee that the village was going to
present its bill. But they drove away these black thoughts, hoping to
wriggle out of it somehow. On this theme the inquisitive French
ambassador Paléologue had a chat during the war days with the former
Minister of Agriculture Krivoshein, the former Premier Kokovtsev, the
great landlord Count Bobrinsky, the President of the State Duma
Rodzianko, the great industrialist Putilov, and other distinguished
people. Here is what was unveiled before him in this conversation: In
order to carry into action a radical land reform it would require the
work of a standing army of 300,000 surveyors for no less than fifteen
years; but during this time the number of homesteads would increase to
30 million, and consequently all these preliminary calculations by the
time they were made would prove invalid. To introduce a land reform thus
seemed in the eyes of these landlords, officials and bankers something
like squaring the circle. It is hardly necessary to say that a like
mathematical scrupulousness was completely alien to the peasants. He
thought that first of all the thing to do was to smoke out the landlord,
and then see.

If the village nevertheless remained comparatively peaceful during the
war, that was because its active forces were at the front. The soldiers
did not forget about the land – whenever at least they were not thinking
about death – and in the trenches the muzhik’s thoughts about the future
were saturated with the smell of powder. But all the same the peasantry,
even after learning to handle firearms, could never of its own force
have achieved the agrarian democratic revolution – that is, its own
revolution. It had to have leadership. For the first time in world
history the peasant was destined to find a leader in the person of the
worker. In that lies the fundamental, and you may say the whole
difference between the Russian revolution and all those preceding it.

In England serfdom had disappeared in actual fact by the end of the
fourteenth century – that is, two centuries before it arose in Russia,
and four and a half centuries before it was abolished. The expropriation
of the landed property of the peasants dragged along in England through
one Reformation and two revolutions to the nineteenth century. The
capitalist development, not forced from the outside, thus had sufficient
time to liquidate the independent peasant long before the proletariat
awoke to political life.

In France the struggle with royal absolutism, the aristocracy, and the
princes of the church, compelled the bourgeoisie in various of its
layers, and in several instalments, to achieve a radical agrarian
revolution at the beginning of the eighteenth century. For long after
that an independent peasantry constituted the support of the bourgeois
order, and in 1871 it helped the bourgeoisie put down the Paris Commune.

In Germany the bourgeoisie proved incapable of a revolutionary solution
of the agrarian problem, and in 1848 betrayed the peasants to the
landlords, just as Luther some three centuries before in the peasant
wars had betrayed them to the princes. On the other hand, the German
proletariat was still too weak in the middle of the nineteenth century
to take the leadership of the peasantry. As a result the capitalist
development of Germany got sufficient time, although not so long a
period as in England, to subordinate agriculture, as it emerged from the
uncompleted bourgeois revolution, to its own interests.

The peasant reform of 1861 was carried out in Russia by an aristocratic
and bureaucratic monarchy under pressure of the demands of a bourgeois
society, but with the bourgeoisie completely powerless politically. The
character of this peasant emancipation was such that the forced
capitalistic transformation of the country inevitably converted the
agrarian problem into a problem of revolution. The Russian bourgeois
dreamed of an agrarian evolution on the French plan, or the Danish, or
the American – anything you want, only not the Russian. He neglected,
however, to supply himself in good season with a French history or an
American social structure. The democratic intelligentsia,
notwithstanding its revolutionary past, took its stand in the decisive
hour with the liberal bourgeoisie and the landlord, and not with the
revolutionary village. In these circumstances only the working class
could stand at the head of the peasant revolution.

The law of combined development of backward countries – in the sense of
a peculiar mixture of backward elements with the most modern factors –
here rises before us in its most finished form, and offers a key to the
fundamental riddle of the Russian revolution. If the agrarian problem,
as a heritage from the barbarism of the old Russian history, had been
solved by the bourgeoisie, if it could have been solved by them, the
Russian proletariat could not possibly have come to power in 1917. In
order to realise the Soviet state, there was required a drawing together
and mutual penetration of two factors belonging to completely different
historic species: a peasant war – that is, a movement characteristic of
the dawn of bourgeois development – and a proletarian insurrection, the
movement signalising its decline. That is the essence of 1917.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. _Narodnik_ is a general name for those non-Marxians who had
originally hoped to accomplish the regeneration of Russia by “going to
the people (_narod_),” and out of whom developed the Social
Revolutionary party. The Mensheviks were the right, or so-called
“moderate,” wing of the Marxian or Social Democratic party, whom Lenin
abandoned in 1903. [_Trans._]

2. A dessiatin is 2.702 English acres. [_Trans._]

3. Kulak, the Russian word for fist, is a nickname for rich peasants –
“land-grabbers”, as we might say. [_Trans._]



CHAPTER 4 THE TZAR AND THE TZARINA


 

This book will concern itself least of all with those unrelated
psychological researches which are now so often substituted for social
and historical analysis. Foremost in our field of vision will stand the
great, moving forces of history, which are super-personal in character.
Monarchy is one of them. But all these forces operate through people.
And monarchy is by its very principle bound up with the personal. This
in itself justifies an interest in the personality of that monarch whom
the process of social development brought face to face with a
revolution. Moreover, we hope to show in what follows, partially at
least, just where in a personality the strictly personal ends – often
much sooner than we think – and how frequently the “distinguishing
traits” of a person are merely individual scratches made by a higher law
of development.

Nicholas II inherited from his ancestors not only a giant empire, but
also a revolution. And they did not bequeath him one quality which would
have made him capable of governing an empire or even a province or a
county. To that historic flood which was rolling its billows each one
closer to the gates of his palace, the last Romanov opposed only a dumb
indifference. It seemed as though between his consciousness and his
epoch there stood some transparent but absolutely impenetrable medium.

People surrounding the tzar often recalled after the revolution that in
the most tragic moments of his reigns – at the time of the surrender of
Port Arthur and the sinking of the fleet at Tsushima, and ten years
later at the time of the retreat of the Russian troops from Galicia, and
then two years later during the days preceding his abdication when all
those around him were depressed, alarmed, shaken – Nicholas alone
preserved his tranquillity. He would inquire as usual how many versts he
had covered in his journeys about Russia, would recall episodes of
hunting expeditions in the past, anecdotes of official meetings, would
interest himself generally in the little rubbish of the day’s doings,
while thunders roared over him and lightnings flashed. “What is this?”
asked one of his attendant generals, “a gigantic, almost unbelievable
self-restraint, the product of breeding, of a belief in the divine
predetermination of events? Or is it inadequate consciousness?” The
answer is more than half included in the question. The so-called
“breeding” of the tzar, his ability to control himself in the most
extraordinary circumstances, cannot be explained by a mere external
training; its essence was an inner indifference, a poverty of spiritual
forces, a weakness of the impulses of the will. That mask of
indifference which was called breeding in certain circles, was a natural
part of Nicholas at birth.

The tzar’s diary is the best of all testimony. From day to day and from
year to year drags along upon its pages the depressing record of
spiritual emptiness. “Walked long and killed two crows. Drank tea by
daylight.” Promenades on foot, rides in a boat. And then again crows,
and again tea. All on the borderline of physiology. Recollections of
church ceremonies are jotted down in the same tone as a drinking party.

In the days preceding the opening of the State Duma, when the whole
country was shaking with convulsions, Nicholas wrote: “April 14. Took a
walk in a thin shirt and took up paddling again. Had tea in a balcony.
Stana dined and took a ride with us. Read.” Not a word as to the subject
of his reading. Some sentimental English romance? Or a report from the
Police Department? “April 15: Accepted Witte’s resignation. Marie and
Dmitri to dinner. Drove them home to the palace.”

On the day of the decision to dissolve the Duma, when the court as well
as the liberal circles were going through a paroxysm of fright, the tzar
wrote in his diary: “July 7. Friday. Very busy morning. Half hour late
to breakfast with the officers ... A storm came up and it was very
muggy. We walked together. Received Goremykin. Signed a decree
dissolving the Duma! Dined with Olga and Petia. Read all evening.” An
exclamation point after the coming dissolution of the Duma is the
highest expression of his emotions. The deputies of the dispersed Duma
summoned the people to refuse to pay taxes. A series of military
uprisings followed: in Sveaborg, Kronstadt, on ships, in army units. The
revolutionary terror against high officials was renewed on an unheard-of
scale. The tzar writes: “July 9. Sunday. It has happened! The Duma was
closed today. At breakfast after Mass long faces were noticeable among
many ... The weather was fine. On our walk we met Uncle Misha who came
over yesterday from Gatchina. Was quietly busy until dinner and all
evening. Went padding in a canoe.” It was in a canoe he went paddling –
that is told. But with what he was busy all evening is not indicated. So
it was always.

And further in those same fatal days: “July 14. Got dressed and rode a
bicycle to the bathing beach and bathed enjoyably in the sea.” “July 15.
Bathed twice. It was very hot. Only us two at dinner. A storm passed
over.” “July 19. Bathed in the morning. Received at the farm. Uncle
Vladimir and Chagin lunched with us.” An insurrection and explosions of
dynamite are barely touched upon with a single phrase, “Pretty doings!”
– astonishing in its imperturbable indifference, which never rose to
conscious cynicism.

“At 9:30 in the morning we rode out to the Caspian regiment ... walked
for a long time. The weather was wonderful. Bathed in the sea. After tea
received Lvov and Guchkov.” Not a word of the fact that this unexpected
reception of the two liberals was brought about by the attempt of
Stolypin to include opposition leaders in his ministry. Prince Lvov, the
future head of the Provisional Government, said of that reception at the
time: “I expected to see the sovereign stricken with grief, but instead
of that there came out to meet me a jolly sprightly fellow in a
raspberry-coloured shirt.” The tzar’s outlook was not broader than that
of a minor police official – with this difference, that the latter would
have a better knowledge of reality and be less burdened with
superstitions. The sole paper which Nicholas read for years, and from
which he derived his ideas, was a weekly published on state revenue by
Prince Meshchersky, a vile, bribed journalist of the reactionary
bureaucratic clique, despised even in his own circle. The tzar kept his
outlook unchanged through two wars and two revolutions. Between his
consciousness and events stood always that impenetrable medium –
indifference. Nicholas was called, not without foundation, a fatalist.
It is only necessary to add that his fatalism was the exact opposite of
an active belief in his “star.” Nicholas indeed considered himself
unlucky. His fatalism was only a form of passive self-defence against
historic evolution, and went hand in hand with an arbitrariness, trivial
in psychological motivation, but monstrous in its consequences.

“I wish it and therefore it must be —,” writes Count Witte. “That motto
appeared in all the activities of this weak ruler, who only through
weakness did all the things which characterised his reign – a wholesale
shedding of more or less innocent blood, for the most part without aim.”

Nicholas is sometimes compared with his half-crazy
great-great-grandfather Paul, who was strangled by a camarilla acting in
agreement with his own son, Alexander “the Blessed.” These two Romanovs
were actually alike in their distrust of everybody due to a distrust of
themselves, their touchiness as of omnipotent nobodies, their feeling of
abnegation, their consciousness, as you might say, of being crowned
pariahs. But Paul was incomparably more colourful; there was an element
of fancy in his rantings, however irresponsible. In his descendant
everything was dim; there was not one sharp trait.

Nicholas was not only unstable, but treacherous. Flatterers called him a
charmer, bewitcher, because of his gentle way with the courtiers. But
the tzar reserved his special caresses for just those officials whom he
had decided to dismiss. Charmed beyond measure at a reception, the
minister would go home and find a letter requesting his resignation.
That was a kind of revenge on the tzar’s part for his own nonentity.

Nicholas recoiled in hostility before everything gifted and significant.
He felt at ease only among completely mediocre and brainless people,
saintly fakers, holy men, to whom he did not have to look up. He had his
_amour propre_, indeed it was rather keen. But it was not active, not
possessed of a grain of initiative, enviously defensive. He selected his
ministers on a principle of continual deterioration. Men of brain and
character he summoned only in extreme situations when there was no other
way out, just as we call in a surgeon to save our lives. It was so with
Witte, and afterwards with Stolypin. The tzar treated both with
ill-concealed hostility. As soon as the crisis had passed, he hastened
to part with these counsellors who were too tall for him. This selection
operated so systematically that the president of the last Duma,
Rodzianko, on the 7th of January 1917, with the revolution already
knocking at the doors, ventured to say to the tzar: “Your Majesty, there
is not one reliable or honest man left around you; all the best men have
been removed or have retired. There remain only those of ill repute.”

All the efforts of the liberal bourgeoisie to find a common language
with the court came to nothing. The tireless and noisy Rodzianko tried
to shake up the tzar with his reports, but in vain. The latter gave no
answer either to argument or to impudence, but quietly made ready to
dissolve the Duma. Grand Duke Dmitri, a former favourite of the tzar,
and future accomplice in the murder of Rasputin, complained to his
colleague, Prince Yussupov, that the tzar at headquarters was becoming
every day more indifferent to everything around him. In Dmitri’s opinion
the tzar was being fed some kind of dope which had a benumbing action
upon his spiritual faculties. “Rumours went round,” writes the liberal
historian Miliukov, “that this condition of mental and moral apathy was
sustained in the tzar by an increased use of alcohol.” This was all
fancy or exaggeration. The tzar had no need of narcotics: the fatal
“dope” was in his blood. Its symptoms merely seemed especially striking
on the background of those great events of war and domestic crisis which
led up to the revolution. Rasputin, who was a psychologist, said briefly
of the tzar that he “lacked insides.”

This dim, equable and “well-bred” man was cruel – not with the active
cruelty of Ivan the Terrible or of Peter, in the pursuit of historic
aims – What had Nicholas the Second in common with them? – but with the
cowardly cruelty of the late born, frightened at his own doom. At the
very dawn of his reign Nicholas praised the Phanagoritsy regiment as
“fine fellows” for shooting down workers. He always “read with
satisfaction” how they flogged with whips the bob-haired girl-students,
or cracked the heads of defenceless people during Jewish pogroms. This
crowned black sheep gravitated with all his soul to the very dregs of
society, the Black Hundred hooligans. He not only paid them generously
from the state treasury, but loved to chat with them about their
exploits, and would pardon them when they accidentally got mixed up in
the murder of an opposition deputy. Witte, who stood at the head of the
government during the putting down of the first revolution, has written
in his memoirs: “When news of the useless cruel antics of the chiefs of
those detachments reached the sovereign, they met with his approval, or
in any case his defence.” In answer to the demand of the
governor-general of the Baltic States that he stop a certain
lieutenant-captain, Richter, who was “executing on his own authority and
without trial non-resistant persons,” the tzar wrote on the report: “Ah,
what a fine fellow!” Such encouragements are innumerable. This
“charmer,” without will, without aim, without imagination, was more
awful than all the tyrants of ancient and modern history.

The tzar was mightily under the influence of the tzarina, an influence
which increased with the years and the difficulties. Together they
constituted a kind of unit – and that combination shows already to what
an extent the personal, under pressure of circumstances, is supplemented
by the group. But first we must speak of the tzarina herself.

Maurice Paléologue, the French ambassador at Petrograd during the war, a
refined psychologist for French academicians and janitresses, offers a
meticulously licked portrait of the last tzarina: “Moral restlessness, a
chronic sadness, infinite longing, intermittent ups and downs of
strength, anguishing thoughts of the invisible other world,
superstitions – are not all these traits, so clearly apparent in the
personality of the empress, the characteristic traits of the Russian
people?” Strange as it may seem, there is in this saccharine lie just a
grain of truth. The Russian satirist Saltykov, with some justification,
called the ministers and governors from among the Baltic barons “Germans
with a Russian soul.” It is indubitable that aliens, in no way connected
with the people, developed the most pure culture of the “genuine
Russian” administrator.

But why did the people repay with such open hatred a tzarina who, in the
words of Paléologue, had so completely assimilated their soul? The
answer is simple. In order to justify her new situation, this German
woman adopted with a kind of cold fury all the traditions and nuances of
Russian mediaevalism, the most meagre and crude of all mediaevalisms, in
that very period when the people were making mighty efforts to free
themselves from it. This Hessian princess was literally possessed by the
demon of autocracy. Having risen from her rural corner to the heights of
Byzantine despotism, she would not for anything take a step down. In the
orthodox religion she found a mysticism and a magic adapted to her new
lot. She believed the more inflexibly in her vocation, the more naked
became the foulness of the old régime. With a strong character and a
gift for dry and hard exaltations, the tzarina supplemented the
weak-willed tzar, ruling over him.

On March 17, 1916, a year before the revolution, when the tortured
country was already writhing in the grip of defeat and ruin, the tzarina
wrote to her husband at military headquarters: “You must not give
indulgences, a responsible ministry, etc. ... or anything that _they_
want. This must be your war and your peace, and the honour yours and our
fatherland’s, and not by any means the Duma’s. They have not the right
to say a single word in these matters.” This was at any rate a
thoroughgoing programme. And it was in just this way that she always had
the whip hand over the continually vacillating tzar.

After Nicholas’ departure to the army in the capacity of fictitious
commander-in-chief, the tzarina began openly to take charge of internal
affairs. The ministers came to her with reports as to a regent. She
entered into a conspiracy with a small camarilla against the Duma,
against the ministers, against the staff-generals, against the whole
world – to some extent indeed against the tzar. On December 6, 1916, the
tzarina wrote to the tzar: “... Once you have said that you want to keep
Protopopov, how does he (Premier Trepov) go against you? Bring down your
first on the table. Don’t yield. Be the boss. Obey your firm little wife
and our Friend. Believe in us.” Again three days late: “You know you are
right. Carry your head high. Command Trepov to work with him ... Strike
your fist on the table.” Those phrases sound as though they were made
up, but they are taken from authentic letters. Besides, you cannot make
up things like that.

On December 13 the tzarina suggested to the tzar: “Anything but this
responsible ministry about which everybody has gone crazy. Everything is
getting quiet and better, but people want to feel your hand. How long
they have been saying to me, for whole years, the same thing: ’Russia
loves to feel the whip.’ That is _their_ nature!” This orthodox Hessian,
with a Windsor upbringing and a Byzantine crown on her head, not only
“incarnates” the Russian soul, but also organically despises it. _Their_
nature demands the whip – writes the Russian tzarina to the Russian tzar
about the Russian people, just two months and a half before the monarchy
tips over into the abyss.

In contrast to her force of character, the intellectual force of the
tzarina is not higher, but rather lower than her husband’s. Even more
than he, she craves the society of simpletons. The close and
long-lasting friendship of the tzar and tzarina with their
lady-in-waiting Vyrubova gives a measure of the spiritual stature of
this autocratic pair. Vyrubova has described herself as a fool, and this
is not modesty. Witte, to whom one cannot deny an accurate eye,
characterised her as “a most commonplace, stupid, Petersburg young lady,
homely as a bubble in the biscuit dough.” In the society of this person,
with whom elderly officials, ambassadors and financiers obsequiously
flirted, and who had just enough brains not to forget about her own
pockets, the tzar and tzarina would pass many hours, consulting her
about affairs, corresponding with her and about her. She was more
influential than the State Duma, and even than the ministry.

But Vyrubova herself was only an instrument of “The Friend,” whose
authority superseded all three. “... This is my _private_ opinion,”
writes the tzarina to the tzar, “I will find out what our Friend
thinks.” The opinion of the “Friend” is not private, it decides. “... I
am firm,” insists the tzarina a few weeks later, “but listen to me,
_i.e. this means_ our Friend, and trust in everything ... I suffer for
you as for a gentle soft-hearted child – who needs guidance, but listens
to bad counsellors, while a man sent by God is telling him what he
should do.”

The Friend sent by God was Gregory Rasputin.

“... The prayers and the help of our Friend – then all will be well.”

“If we did not have Him, all would have been over long ago. I am
absolutely convinced of that.”

Throughout the whole reign of Nicholas and Alexandra soothsayers and
hysterics were imported for the court not only from all over Russia, but
from other countries. Special official purveyors arose, who would gather
around the momentary oracle, forming a powerful Upper Chamber attached
to the monarch. There was no lack of bigoted old women with the title of
countess, nor of functionaries weary of doing nothing, nor of financiers
who had entire ministries in their hire. With a jealous eye on the
unchartered competition of mesmerists and sorcerers, the high priesthood
of the Orthodox Church would hasten to pry their way into the holy of
holies of the intrigue. Witte called this ruling circle, against which
he himself twice stubbed his toe, “the leprous court camarilla.”

The more isolated the dynasty became, and the more unsheltered the
autocrat felt, the more he needed some help from the other world.
Certain savages, in order to bring good weather, wave in the air a
shingle on a string. The tzar and tzarina used shingles for the greatest
variety of purposes. In the tzar’s train there was a whole chapel full
of large and small images, and all sorts of fetiches, which were brought
to bear, first against the Japanese, then against the German artillery.

The level of the court circle really had not changed much from
generation to generation. Under Alexander II, called the “Liberator,”
the grand dukes had sincerely believed in house spirits and witches.
Under Alexander III it was no better, only quieter. The “leprous
camarilla” had existed always, changed only its personnel and its
method. Nicholas II did not create, but inherited from his ancestors,
this court atmosphere of savage mediaevalism. But the country during
these same decades had been changing, its problems growing more complex,
its culture rising to a higher level. The court circle was thus left far
behind.

Although the monarchy did under compulsion make concessions to the new
forces, nevertheless inwardly it completely failed to become modernised.
On the contrary it withdrew into itself. Its spirit of mediaevalism
thickened under the pressure of hostility and fear, until it acquired
the character of a disgusting nightmare overhanging the country.

Towards November 1905 – that is, at the most critical moment of the
first revolution – the tzar writes in his diary: “We got acquainted with
a man of God, Gregory, from the Tobolsk province.” That was Rasputin – a
Siberian peasant with a bald scar on his head, the result of a beating
for horse-stealing. Put forward at an appropriate moment, this “Man of
God” soon found official helpers – or rather they found him – and thus
was formed a new ruling class which got a firm hold of the tzarina, and
through her of the tzar.

From the winter of 1913-14 it was openly said in Petersburg society that
all high appointments, posts and contracts depended upon the Rasputin
clique. The “Elder” himself gradually turned into a state institution.
He was carefully guarded, and no less carefully sought after by the
competing ministers. Spies of the Police Department kept a diary of his
life by hours, and did not fail to report how on a visit to his home
village of Pokrovsky he got into a drunken and bloody fight with his own
father on the street. On the same day that this happened – September 9,
1915 – Rasputin sent two friendly telegrams, one to Tzarskoe Selo, to
the tzarina, the other to headquarters to the tzar. In epic language the
police spies registered from day to day the revels of the Friend. “He
returned today 5 o’clock in the morning completely drunk.” “On the night
of the 25-26th the actress V. spent the night with Rasputin.” “He
arrived with Princess D. (the wife of a gentleman of the bedchamber of
the Tzar’s court) at the Hotel Astoria.”...And right beside this: “Came
home from Tzarskoe Selo about 11 o’clock in the evening.” “Rasputin came
home with Princess Sh- very drunk and together they went out
immediately.” In the morning or evening of the following day a trip to
Tzarskoe Selo. To a sympathetic question from the spy as to why the
Elder was thoughtful, the answer came: “Can’t decide whether to convoke
the Duma or not.” And then again: “He came home at 5 in the morning
pretty drunk.” Thus for months and years the melody was played on three
keys: “Pretty drunk,” “Very drunk,” and “Completely drunk.” These
communications of state importance were brought together and
countersigned by the general of gendarmes, Gorbachev.

The bloom of Raputin’s influence lasted six years, the last years of the
monarchy. “His life in Petrograd,” says Prince Yussupov, who
participated to some extent in that life, and afterward killed Rasputin,
“became a continual revel, the durnken debauch of a galley slave who had
come into an unexpected fortune.” “I had at my disposition,” wrote the
president of the Duma, Rodzianko, “a whole mass of letters from mothers
whose daughters had been dishonoured by this insolent rake.”
Nevertheless the Petrograd metropolitan, Pitirim, owed his position to
Rasputin, as also the almost illiterate Archbishop Varnava. The Procuror
of the Holy Synod, Sabler, was long sustained by Rasputin; and Premier
Kokovtsev was removed at his wish, having refused to receive the
“Elder.” Rasputin appointed Stürmer President of the Council of
Ministers, Protopopov Minister of the Interior, the new Procuror of the
Synod, Raev, and many others. The ambassador of the French republic,
Paléologue, sought an interview with Rasputin, embraced him and cried,
“_Voilà, un véritable illuminé!_” hoping in this way to win the heart of
the tzarina to the cause of France. The Jew Simanovich, financial agent
of the “Elder,” himself under the eye of the Secret Police as a
nightclub gambler and usurer – introduced into the Ministry of Justice
through Rasputin the completely dishonest creature Dobrovolsky.

“Keep by you the little list,” writes the tzarina to the tzar, in regard
to new appointments. “Our friend has asked that you talk all this over
with Protopopov.” Two days later: “Our friend says that Stürmer may
remain a few days longer as President of the Council of Ministers.” And
again: “Protopopov venerates our friend and will be blessed.”

On one of those days when the police spies were counting up the number
of bottles and women, the tzarina grieved in a letter to the tzar: “They
accuse Rasputin of kissing women, etc. Read the apostles; they kissed
everybody as a form of greeting.” This reference to the apostles would
hardly convince the police spies. In another letter the tzarina goes
still farther. “During vespers I thought so much about our friend,” she
writes, “how the Scribes and Pharisees are persecuting Christ pretending
that they are so perfect ... yes, in truth no man is a prophet in his
own country.”

The comparison of Rasputin and Christ was customary in that circle, and
by no means accidental. The alarm of the royal couple before the
menacing forces of history was too sharp to be satisfied with an
impersonal God and the futile shadow of a Biblical Christ. They needed a
second coming of “the Son of Man.” In Rasputin the rejected and
agonising monarchy found a Christ in its own image.

“If there had been no Rasputin,” said Senator Tagantsev, a man of the
old régime, “it would have been necessary to invent one.” There is a
good deal more in these words than their author imagined. If by the word
_hooliganism_ we understand the extreme expression of those anti-social
parasite elements at the bottom of society, we may define Rasputinism as
a crowned hooliganism at its very top.



CHAPTER 5 THE IDEA OF A PALACE REVOLUTION


 

Why did not the ruling classes, who were trying to save themselves from
a revolution, attempt to get rid of the tzar and his circle? They wanted
to, but they did not dare. They lacked both resolution and belief in
their cause. The idea of a palace revolution was in the air up to the
very moment when it was swallowed up in a state revolution. We must
pause upon this in order to get a clearer idea of the inter-relations,
just before the explosion, of the monarchy, the upper circles of the
nobility, the bureaucracy and the bourgeoisie.

The possessing classes were completely monarchist, by virtue of
interests, habits and cowardice. But they wanted a monarchy without
Rasputin. The monarchy answered them: Take me as I am. In response to
demands for a decent ministry, the tzarina sent to the tzar at
headquarters an apple from the hands of Rasputin, urging that he eat it
in order to strengthen his will. “Remember,” she adjured, “that even
Monsieur Philippe (a French charlatan-hypnotist) said that you must not
grant a constitution, as that would mean ruin to you and Russia ...” “Be
Peter the Great, Ivan the Terrible, Emperor Paul – crush them all under
your feet!”

What a disgusting mixture of fright, superstition and malicious
alienation from the country! To be sure, it might seem that on the
summits the tzar’s family could not be quite alone. Rasputin indeed was
always surrounded with a galaxy of grand ladies, and in general
shamanism flourishes in an aristocracy. But this mysticism of fear does
not unite people, it divides them. Each saves himself in his own way.
Many aristocratic houses have their competing saints. Even on the
summits of Petrograd society the tzar’s family was surrounded as though
plague-stricken, with a quarantine of distrust and hostility.
Lady-in-waiting Vyrubova remembers: “I was aware and felt deeply in all
those around us a malice toward those whom I revered, and I felt that
this malice would assume terrible dimensions.”

Against the purple background of the war, with the roar of underground
tremors clearly audible, the privileged did not for one moment renounce
the joys of life; on the contrary, they devoured them greedily. Yet more
and more often a skeleton would appear at their banquets and shake the
little bones of his fingers. It began to seem to them that all their
misery lay in the disgusting character of “Alix,” in the treacherous
weakness of the tzar, in that greedy fool Vyrubova, and in the Siberian
Christ with a scar on his skull. Waves of unendurable foreboding swept
over the ruling class, contracting it with spasms from the periphery to
the centre, and more and more isolating the hated upper circle at
Tzarskoe Selo. Vyrubova has pretty clearly expressed the feelings of the
upper circle at that time in her, generally speaking, very lying
reminiscences: “... For the hundredth time I asked myself what has
happened to Petrograd society. Are they all spiritually sick, or have
they contracted some epidemic which rages in war time? It is hard to
understand, but the fact is, all were in an abnormally excited
condition.” To the number of those out of their heads belonged the whole
copious family of the Romanovs, the whole greedy, insolent and
universally hated pack of grand dukes and grand duchesses. Frightened to
death, they were trying to wriggle out of the ring narrowing around
them. They kowtowed to the critical aristocracy, gossiped about the
royal pair, and egged on both each other and all those around them. The
august uncles addressed the tzar with letters of advice in which between
the lines of respect was to be heard a snarl and a grinding of teeth.

Protopopov, some time after the October revolution, colourfully if not
very learnedly characterised the mood of the upper circles: “Even the
very highest classes became _frondeurs_ before the revolution: in the
grand salons and clubs the policy of the government received harsh and
unfriendly criticism. The relations which had been formed in the tzar’s
family were analysed and talked over. Little anecdotes were passed
around about the head of the state. Verses were composed. Many grand
dukes openly attended these meetings, and their presence gave a special
authority in the eyes of the public to tales that were caricatures and
to malicious exaggerations. A sense of the danger of this sport did not
awaken till the last moment.”

These rumours about the court camarilla were especially sharpened by the
accusation of Germanophilism and even of direct connections with the
enemy. The noisy and not very deep Rodzianko definitely stated: “The
connection and the analogy of aspirations is so logically obvious that I
at least have no doubt of the co-operation of the German Staff and the
Rasputin circle: nobody can doubt it.” The bare reference to a “logical”
obviousness greatly weakens the categorical tone of this testimony. No
evidence of a connection between the Rasputinists and the German Staff
was discovered after the revolution. It was otherwise with the so-called
“Germanophilism.” This was not a question, of course, of the national
sympathies and antipathies of the German tzarina, Premier Stürmer,
Countess Kleinmichel, Minister of the Court Count Frederiks, and other
gentlemen with German names. The cynical memoirs of the old
_intriguante_ Kleinmichel demonstrate with remarkable clearness how a
supernational character distinguished the aristocratic summits of all
the countries of Europe, bound together as they were by ties of birth,
inheritance, scorn for all those beneath them, and last but not least,
cosmopolitan adultery in ancient castles, at fashionable watering
places, and in the courts of Europe. Considerably more real were the
organic antipathies of the court household to the obsequious lawyers of
the French Republic, and the sympathy of the reactionaries – whether
bearing Teuton or Slavic family names – for the genuine Russian soul of
the Berlin régime which had so often impressed them with its waxed
mustachios, its sergeant-major manner and self-confident stupidity.

But that was not the decisive factor. The danger arose from the very
logic of the situation, for the court could not help seeking salvation
in a separate peace, and this the more insistently the more dangerous
the situation became. Liberalism in the person of its leaders was
trying, as we shall see, to reserve for itself the chance of making a
separate peace in connection with the prospect of its own coming to
power. But for just this reason it carried on a furious chauvinist
agitation, deceiving the people and terrorising the court. The camarilla
did not dare show its real face prematurely in so ticklish a matter, and
was even compelled to counterfeit the general patriotic tone, at the
same time feeling out the ground for a separate peace.

General Kurlov, a former chief of police belonging to the Rasputin
camarilla, denies, of course, in his reminiscences any German connection
or sympathies on the part of his protector, but immediately adds: “We
cannot blame Stürmer for his opinion that the war with Germany was the
greatest possible misfortune for Russia and that it had no serious
political justification.” It is hardly possible to forget that while
holding this interesting opinion Stürmer was the head of the government
of a country waging war against Germany. The tzarist Minister of the
Interior, Protopopov, just before he entered the government, had been
conducting negotiations in Stockholm with the German diplomat Warburg
and had reported them to the tzar. Rasputin himself, according to the
same Kurlov, “considered the war with Germany a colossal misfortune for
Russia.” And finally the empress wrote to the tzar on April 5, 1916:
“... They dare not say that He has anything in common with the Germans.
He is good and magnanimous toward all, like Christ. No matter to what
religion a man may belong: that is the way a good Christian ought to
be.” To be sure, this good Christian who was almost always intoxicated
might quite possibly have been made up to, not only by sharpers, usurers
and aristocratic princesses, but by actual spies of the enemy.
“Connections” of this kind are not inconceivable. But the oppositional
patriots posed the matter more directly and broadly: they directly
accused the tzarina of treason. In his memoirs, written considerably
later, General Denikin testifies: “In the army there was loud talk,
unconstrained both in time and place, as to the insistent demands of the
empress for a separate peace, her treachery in the matter of
Field-Marshal Kitchener, of whose journey she was supposed to have told
the Germans, etc. ... This circumstance played a colossal role in
determining the mood of the army in its attitude to the dynasty and the
revolution.” The same Denikin relates how after the revolution General
Alexeiev, to a direct question about the treason of the empress,
answered, “vaguely and reluctantly,” that in going over the papers they
had found in the possession of the tzarina a chart with a detailed
designation of troops on the whole front, and that upon him, Alexeiev,
this had produced a depressing effect. “Not another word,” significantly
adds Denikin. “He changed the subject.” Whether the tzarina had the
mysterious chart or not, the luckless generals were obviously not
unwilling to shoulder off upon her the responsibility for their own
defeat. The accusation of treason against the court undoubtedly crept
through the army chiefly from above downward – starting with that
incapable staff.

But if the tzarina herself, to whom the tzar submitted in everything,
was betraying to Wilhelm the military secrets and even the heads of the
Allied chieftains, what remained but to make an end of the royal pair?
And since the head of the army and of the anti-German party was the
Grand Duke Nikolai Nikolaievich, was he not as a matter of duty chosen
for the role of supreme patron of a palace revolution? That was the
reason why the tzar, upon the insistence of Rasputin and the tzarina,
removed the grand duke and took the chief command into his own hands.
But the tzarina was afraid even of a meeting between the nephew and the
uncle in turning over the command. “Sweetheart, try to be cautious,” she
writes to the tzar at headquarters, “and don’t let Nikolasha catch you
in any kind of promises or anything else – remember that Gregory saved
you from him and from his bad people ... remember in the name of Russia
what they wanted to do, oust you (this is not gossip – Orloff had all
the papers ready), and put me in a monastery.”

The tzar’s brother Michael said to Rodzianko: “The whole family knows
how harmful Alexandra Feodorovna is. Nothing but traitors surround her
and my brother. All honest people have left. But what’s to be done in
such a situation?” That is it exactly: what is to be done?

The Grand Duchess Maria Pavlovna insisted in the presence of her sons
that Rodzianko should take the initiative in “removing the tzarina.”
Rodzianko suggested that they consider the conversation as not having
taken place, as otherwise in loyalty to his oath he should be obliged to
report to the tzar that the grand duchess had suggested to the President
of the Duma that he destroy the tzarina. Thus the ready-witted Lord
Chamberlain reduced the question of murdering the tzarina to a
pleasantry of the drawing room.

At times the ministry itself came into sharp opposition to the tzar. As
early as 1915, a year and a half before the revolution, at the sittings
of the government, talk went on openly which even now seems
unbelievable. The War Minister Polivanov: “Only a policy of conciliation
toward society can save the situation. The present shaky dykes will not
avert a catastrophe.” The Minister of Marine Grigorovich: “It’s no
secret that the army does not trust us and is awaiting a change.” The
Minister of Foreign Affairs Sazonov: “The popularity of the tzar and his
authority in the eyes of the popular mass is considerably shaken.” The
Minister of the Interior Prince Sherbatov: “All of us together are unfit
for governing Russia in the situation that is forming ... We must have
either a dictatorship or a conciliatory policy” (Session of August 21,
1915). Neither of these measures could now be of help; neither was now
attainable. The tzar could not make up his mind to a dictatorship; he
rejected a conciliatory policy, and did not accept the resignation of
the ministers who considered themselves unfit. The high official who
kept the record makes a short commentary upon these ministerial
speeches: evidently we shall have to hang from a lamp-post.

With such feelings prevailing it is no wonder that even in bureaucratic
circles they talked of the necessity of a palace uprising as the sole
means of preventing the advancing revolution. “If I had shut my eyes,”
remembers one of the participants of these conversations, “I might have
thought that I was in the company of desperate revolutionists.”

A colonel of gendarmes making a special investigation of the army in the
south of Russia painted a dark picture in his report: Thanks to
propaganda chiefly relating to the Germanophilism of the empress and the
tzar, the army is prepared for the idea of a palace revolution.
“Conversations to this effect are openly carried on in officers’
meetings and have not met the necessary opposition on the part of the
high command.” Protopopov on his part testifies that “a considerable
number of people in the high commanding staff sympathised with the idea
of a coup d’état: certain individuals were in touch with and under the
influence of the chief leaders of the so-called Progressive Bloc.”

The subsequently notorious Admiral Kolchak testified before the Soviet
Investigation Commission after his troops were routed by the Red Army
that he had connections with many oppositional members of the Duma whose
speeches he welcomed, since “his attitude to the powers existing before
the revolution was adverse.” As to the plan for a palace revolution,
however, Kolchak was not informed.

After the murder of Rasputin and the subsequent banishment of grand
dukes, high society talked still louder of the necessity of a palace
revolution. Prince Yussupov tells how when the Grand Duke Dmitry was
arrested at the palace the officers of several regiments came up and
proposed plans for decisive action, “to which he, of course, could not
agree.”

The Allied diplomats – in any case, the British ambassador – were
considered accessories to the plot. The latter, doubtless upon the
initiative of the Russian liberals, made an attempt in January 1917 to
influence Nicholas, having secured the preliminary sanction of his
government. Nicholas attentively and politely listened to the
ambassador, thanked him, and – spoke of other matters. Protopopov
reported to Nicholas the relations between Buchanan and the chief
leaders of the Progressive Bloc, and suggested that the British
Ambassador be placed under observation. Nicholas did not seem to approve
of the proposal, finding the watching of an ambassador “inconsistent
with international tradition.” Meanwhile Kurlov has no hesitation in
stating that “the Intelligence Service remarks daily the relations
between the leader of the Kadet Party Miliukov and the British
Ambassador.” International traditions, then, had not stood in the way at
all. But their transgression helped little: even so, a palace conspiracy
was never discovered.

Did it in reality exist? There is nothing to prove this. It was a little
too broad, that “conspiracy.” It included too many and too various
circles to _be_ a conspiracy. It merely hung in the air as a mood of the
upper circles of Petrograd society, as a confused idea of salvation, or
a slogan of despair. But it did not thicken down to the point of
becoming a practical plan.

The upper nobility in the eighteenth century had more than once
introduced practical corrections into the succession by imprisoning or
strangling inconvenient emperors: this operation was carried out for the
last time on Paul in 1801. It is impossible to say, therefore, that a
palace revolution would have transgressed the traditions of the Russian
monarchy. On the contrary, it had been a steady element in those
traditions. But the aristocracy had long ceased to feel strong at heart.
It surrendered the honour of strangling the tzar and tzarina to the
bourgeoisie. But the leaders of the latter showed little more
resolution.

Since the revolution references have been made more than once to the
liberal capitalists Guchkov and Tereshchenko, and to General Krymov who
was close to them, as the nucleus of the conspirators. Guchkov and
Tereshchenko themselves have confirmed this, but indefinitely. The
former volunteer in the army of the Boers against England, the duelist
Guchkov, a liberal with spurs, must have seemed to “social opinion” in a
general way the most suitable figure for a conspiracy. Surely not the
wordy Professor Miliukov! Guchkov undoubtedly recurred more than once in
his thoughts to the short and sharp blow in which one regiment of the
guard would replace and forestall the revolution. Witte in his memoirs
had already told on Guchkov, whom he hated, as an admirer of the Young
Turk methods of disposing of an inconvenient sultan. But Guchkov, having
never succeeded in his youth in displaying his young Turkish audacity,
had had time to grow much older. And more important, this henchman of
Stolypin could not help but see the difference between Russian
conditions and the old Turkish conditions, could not fail to ask
himself: Will not the palace revolution, instead of a means for
preventing a real revolution, turn out to be the last jar that looses
the avalanche? May not the cure prove more ruinous than the disease?

In the literature devoted to the February revolution the preparation of
a palace revolution is spoken of as a firmly established fact. Miliukov
puts it thus: “Its realisation was already on the way in February.”
Denikin transfers its realisation to March. Both mention a “plan” to
stop the tzar’s train in transit, demand an abdication, and in case of
refusal, which was considered inevitable, carry out a “physical removal”
of the tzar. Miliukov adds that, foreseeing a possible revolution, the
heads of the Progressive Bloc, who did not participate in the plot, and
were not “accurately” informed of its preparation, talked over in narrow
circle how best to make use of the coup d’état in case of success.
Certain Marxian investigations of recent years also take on faith the
story of the practical preparation of a coup d’état. By that example we
may learn how easily and firmly legends win a place in historical
science.

As chief evidence of the plot they not infrequently advance a certain
colourful tale of Rodzianko, which testifies to the very fact that there
was no plot. In January 1917 General Krymov arrived from the front and
complained before members of the Duma that things could not continue
longer as they were: “If you decide upon this extreme measure
(replacement of the tzar) we will support you.” _If_ you decide! The
Octobrist Shidlovsky angrily exclaimed: “There is no need to pity or
spare him when he is ruining Russia.” In the noisy argument these real
or imaginary words of Brussilov are also reported: “If it is necessary
to choose between the tzar and Russia, I side with Russia.” _If_ it is
necessary! The young millionaire Tereshchenko spoke as an inflexible
tzaricide. The Kadet Shingarev spoke: “The General is right, an overturn
is necessary ... _but who will resolve upon it?_” That is just the
question: who will resolve upon it? Such is the essence of the testimony
of Rodzianko, who himself spoke against an overturn. In the course of
the few following weeks the plan apparently did not move forward an
inch. They conversed about stopping the tzar’s train, but it is quite
unknown who was to carry out that operation.

Russian liberalism, when it was younger, had supported the revolutionary
terrorists with money and sympathy in the hope that they would drive the
monarchy into its arms with their bombs. None of those respected
gentlemen was accustomed to risk his own head. But all the same the
chief role was played not by personal but by class fear: Things are bad
now – they reasoned – but they might get worse. In any case, if Guchkov,
Tereshchenko and Krymov had seriously moved toward a coup d’état – that
is, practically prepared it, mobilising the necessary forces and means –
that would have been established definitely and accurately after the
revolution. For the participants, especially the active young men of
whom not a few would have been needed, would have had no reason to keep
mum about the “almost” accomplished deed. After February this would only
have assured them a career. However, there were no revelations. It is
quite obvious that the affair never went any farther with Krymov and
Guchkov than patriotic sighs over wine and cigars. The light-minded
_frondeurs_ of the aristocracy, like the heavyweight oppositionists of
the plutocracy, could not find the heart to amend by action the course
of an unpropitious providence.

In May 1917 one of the most eloquent and empty liberals, Maklakov, will
cry out at a private conference of that Duma which the revolution will
sweep away along with the monarchy: “If posterity curses this revolution
they will curse us for having been unable to prevent it in time with a
revolution from above!” Still later, when he is already in exile,
Kerensky, following Maklakov will lament: “Yes, enfranchised Russia was
too slow with its timely coup d’état from above (of which they talked so
much, and for which they prepared [?] so much) – she was too slow to
forestall the spontaneous explosion of the state.”

These two exclamations complete the picture of how, even after the
revolution had unleashed its unconquerable forces, educated nincompoops
continued to think that it could have been forestalled by a “timely”
change of dynastic figure-heads.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The determination was lacking for a “big” palace revolution. But out of
it there arose a plan for a small one. The liberal conspirators did not
dare to remove the chief actor of the monarchy, but the grand dukes
decided to remove its prompter. In the murder of Rasputin they saw the
last means of saving the dynasty.

Prince Yussupov, who was married to a Romanov, drew into the affair the
Grand Duke Dmitry Pavlovich and the monarchist deputy Purishkevich. They
also tried to involve the liberal Maklakov, obviously to give the murder
an “all-national” character. The celebrated lawyer wisely declined,
supplying the conspirators however with poison – a rather stylistic
distinction! The conspirators judged, not without foundation, that a
Romanov automobile would facilitate the removal of the body after the
murder. The grand ducal coat-of-arms had found its use at last. The rest
was carried out in the manner of a moving picture scenario designed for
people of bad taste. On the night of the 16-17th of December, Rasputin,
coaxed in to a little party, was murdered in Yussopov’s maisonette.

The ruling classes, with the exception of a narrow camarilla and the
mystic worshippers, greeted the murder of Rasputin as an act of
salvation. The grand duke, placed under house arrest, his hands,
according to the tzar’s expression, stained with the blood of a muzhik –
although a Christ, still a muzhik! – was visited with sympathy by all
the members of the imperial household then in Petersburg. The tzarina's
own sister, widow of the Grand Duke Sergei, telegraphed that she was
praying for the murderers and calling down blessings on their patriotic
act. The newspapers, until they were forbidden to mention Rasputin,
printed ecstatic articles. In the theatres people tried to demonstrate
in honour of the murderers. Passers-by congratulated one another in the
streets. “In private houses, in officers’ meetings, in restaurants,”
relates Prince Yussupov, “they drank to our health; the workers in the
factories cried _Hurrah_ for us.” We may well concede that the workers
did not grieve when they learned of the murder of Rasputin, but their
cries of Hurrah! had nothing in common with the hope for a rebirth of
the dynasty. The Rasputin camarilla dropped out of sight and waited.
They buried Rasputin in secrecy from the whole world – the tzar, the
tzarina, the tzar’s daughters and Vyrubova. Around the body of the Holy
Friend, the former horse thief murdered by grand dukes, the tzar’s
family must have seemed outcast even to themselves. However, even after
he was buried Rasputin did not find peace. Later on, when Nicholas and
Alexandra Romanov were under house arrest, the soldiers of Tzarskoe Selo
dug up the grave and opened the coffin. At the head of the murdered man
lay an icon with the signatures: Alexandra, Olga, Tatiana, Maria,
Anastasia, Ania. The Provisional Government for some reason sent an
emissary to bring the body to Petrograd. A crowd resisted, and the
emissary was compelled to burn the body on the spot.

After the murder of its “Friend” the monarchy survived in all ten weeks.
But this short space of time was still its own. Rasputin was no longer,
but his shadow continued to rule. Contrary to all the expectations of
the conspirators, the royal pair began after the murder to promote with
special determination the most scorned members of the Rasputin clique.
In revenge for Rasputin, a notorious scoundrel was named Minister of
Justice. A number of grand dukes were banished from the capital. It was
rumoured that Protopopov took up spiritualism, calling up the ghost of
Rasputin. The noose of hopelessness was drawing tighter.

The murder of Rasputin played a colossal role, but a very different one
from that upon which its perpetrators and inspirers had counted. It did
not weaken the crisis, but sharpened it. People talked of the murder
everywhere: in the palaces, in the staffs, at the factories, and in the
peasant’s huts. The inference drew itself: even the grand dukes have no
other recourse against the leprous camarilla except poison and the
revolver. The poet Blok wrote of the murder of Rasputin: “The bullet
which killed him reached the very heart of the ruling dynasty.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Robespierre once reminded the Legislative Assembly that the opposition
of the nobility, by weakening the monarchy, had roused the bourgeoisie,
and after them the popular masses. Robespierre gave warning at the same
time that in the rest of Europe the revolution could not develop so
swiftly as in France, for the privileged classes of other countries,
taught by the experience of the French nobility, would not take the
revolutionary initiative. In giving this admirable analysis, Robespierre
was mistaken only in his assumption that with its oppositional
recklessness the French nobility had given a lesson once for all to
other countries. Russia proved again, both in 1905 and yet more in 1917,
that a revolution directed against an autocratic and half-feudal régime,
and consequently against a nobility, meets in its first step an
unsystematic and inconsistent but nevertheless very real co-operation
not only from the rank and file nobility, but also from its most
privileged upper circles, including here even members of the dynasty.
This remarkable historic phenomenon may seem to contradict the class
theory of society, but in reality it contradicts only its vulgar
interpretation.

A revolution breaks out when all the antagonisms of a society have
reached their highest tensions. But this makes the situation unbearable
even for the classes of the old society – that is, those who are doomed
to break up. Although I do not want to give a biological analogy more
weight than it deserves, it is worth remarking that the natural act of
birth becomes at a certain moment equally unavoidable both for the
maternal organism and for the offspring. The opposition put up by the
privileged classes expresses the incompatibility of their traditional
social position with the demands of the further existence of society.
Everything seems to slip out of the hands of the ruling bureaucracy. The
aristocracy finding itself in the focus of a general hostility lays the
blame upon the bureaucracy, the latter blames the aristocracy, and then
together, or separately, they direct their discontent against the
monarchical summit of their power.

Prince Sherbatov, summoned into the ministry for a time from his service
in the hereditary institutions of the nobility, said: “Both Samarin and
I are former heads of the nobility in our provinces. Up till now nobody
has ever considered us as Lefts and we do not consider ourselves so. But
we can neither of us understand a situation in a state where the monarch
and his government find themselves in radical disagreement with all
reasonable (we are not talking here of revolutionary intrigue) society –
with the nobility, the merchants, the cities, the zemstvos, and even the
army. If those above do not want to listen to our opinion, it is our
duty to withdraw.”

The nobility sees the cause of all its misfortunes in the fact that the
monarchy is blind or has lost its reason. The privileged caste cannot
believe that no policy whatever is possible which would reconcile the
old society with the new. In other words, the nobility cannot accept its
own doom and converts its death-weariness into opposition against the
most sacred power of the old régime, that is, the monarchy. The
sharpness and irresponsibility of the aristocratic opposition is
explained by history’s having made spoiled children of the upper circles
of the nobility, and by the unbearableness to them of their own fears in
face of revolution. The unsystematic and inconsistent character of the
noble discontent is explained by the fact that it is the opposition of a
class which has no future. But as a lamp before it goes out flares up
with a bright although smoky light, so the nobility before disappearing
gives out an oppositional flash, which performs a mighty service for its
mortal enemy. Such is the dialectic of this process, which is not only
consistent with the class theory of society, but can only by this theory
be explained.



CHAPTER 6 THE DEATH AGONY OF THE MONARCHY


 

The dynasty fell by shaking, like rotten fruit, before the revolution
even had time to approach its first problems. Our portrayal of the old
ruling class would remain incomplete if we did not try to show how the
monarchy met the hour of its fall.

The czar was at headquarters at Moghilev, having gone there not because
he was needed, but in flight from the Petrograd disorders. The court
chronicler, General Dubensky, with the czar at headquarters, noted in
his diary: “A quiet life begins here. Everything will remain as before.
Nothing will come of his (the czar’s) presence. Only accidental external
causes will change anything ...” On February 24, the czarina wrote
Nicholas at headquarters, in English as always: “I hope that Duma man
Kedrinsky (she means Kerensky) will be hung for his horrible speeches –
it is necessary (war time law) and it will be an example. All are
thirsting and beseeching that you show your firmness.” On February 25, a
telegram came from the Minister of War that strikes were occurring in
the capital, disorders beginning among the workers, but measures had
been taken and there was nothing serious. In a word: “It isn’t the first
time, and won’t be the last!”

The czarina, who had always taught the czar not to yield, here too tried
to remain firm. On the 26th, with an obvious desire to hold up the shaky
courage of Nicholas, she telegraphs him: “It is calm in the city.” But
in her evening telegram she has to confess: “Things are not going at all
well in the city.” In a letter she says: “You must say to the workers
that they must not declare strikes, if they do, they will be sent to the
front as a punishment. There is no need at all of shooting. Only order
is needed, and not to let them cross the bridges.” Yes, only a little
thing is needed, _only_ order! But the chief thing is not to admit the
workers into the city – let them choke in the raging impotence of their
suburbs.

On the morning of the 27th, General Ivanov moves from the front with the
Battalion of St. George, entrusted with dictatorial powers – which he is
to make public, however, only upon occupying Tsarskoe Selo. “It would be
hard to imagine a more unsuitable person.” General Denikin will recall
later, himself having taken a turn at military dictatorship, “a flabby
old man, meagerly grasping the political situation, possessing neither
strength, nor energy, nor will, nor austerity.” The choice fell upon
Ivanov through memories of the first revolution. Eleven years before
that he had subdued Kronstadt. But those years had left their traces;
the subduers had grown flabby, the subdued, strong. The northern and
western fronts were ordered to get ready troops for the march on
Petrograd; evidently everybody thought there was plenty of time ahead.
Ivanov himself assumed that the affair would be ended soon and
successfully; he even remembered to send out an adjutant to buy
provisions in Moghilev for his friends in Petrograd.

On the morning of February 27, Rodzianko sent the czar a new telegram,
which ended with the words: “The last hour has come when the fate of the
fatherland and the dynasty is being decided.” The czar said to his
Minister of the Court, Frederiks: “Again that fat-bellied Rodzianko has
written me a lot of nonsense, which I won’t even bother to answer.” But
no. It was not nonsense. He will have to answer.

About noon of the 27th, headquarters received a report from Khabalov of
the mutiny of the Pavlovsky, Volynsky, Litovsky and Preobrazhensky
regiments, and the necessity of sending reliable troops from the front.
An hour later from the War Ministry came a most reassuring telegram:
“The disorders which began this morning in certain military units are
being firmly and energetically put down by companies and battalions
loyal to their duty ... I am firmly convinced of an early restoration of
tranquillity.” However, a little after seven in the evening, the same
minister, Belyaev, is reporting that “We are not succeeding in putting
down the military rebellion with the few detachments that remain loyal
to their duty,” and requesting a speedy dispatch of really reliable
troops – and that too in sufficient numbers “for simultaneous activity
in different parts of the city.”

The Council of Ministers deemed this a suitable day to remove from their
midst the presumed cause of all misfortunes – the half-crazy Minister of
the Interior Protopopov. At the same time General Khabalov issued an
edict – prepared in secrecy from the government – declaring Petrograd,
on His Majesty’s orders, under martial law. So here too was an attempt
to mix hot with cold – hardly intentional, however, and anyway of no
use. They did not even succeed in pasting up the declaration of martial
law through the city: the burgomaster, Balka, could find neither paste
nor brushes. Nothing would stick together for those functionaries any
longer; they already belonged to the kingdom of shades.

The principal shade of the last czarist ministry was the seventy-year
old Prince Golytsin, who had formerly conducted some sort of
eleemosynary institutions of the czarina, and had been advanced by her
to the post of head of the government in a period of war and revolution.
When friends asked this “good-natured Russian squire, this old weakling”
– as the liberal Baron Nolde described him – why he accepted such a
troublesome position, Golytsin answered: “So as to have one more
pleasant recollection.” This aim, at any rate, he did not achieve. How
the last czarist government felt in those hours is attested by Rodzianko
in the following tale: With the first news of the movement of a crowd
toward the Mariinsky Palace, where the Ministry was in session, all the
lights in the building were immediately put out. (The government wanted
only one thing – that the revolution should not notice it.) The rumour,
however, proved false; the attack did not take place; and when the
lights were turned on, one of the members of the czarist government was
found “to his own surprise” under the table. What kind of recollections
he was accumulating there has not been established.

But Rodzianko’s own feelings apparently were not at their highest point.
After a long but vain hunt for the government by telephone, the
President of the Duma tries again to ring up Prince Golytsin. The latter
answers him: “I beg you not to come to me with anything further, I have
resigned.” Hearing this news, Rodzianko, according to his loyal
secretary, sank heavily in an armchair and covered his face with both
hands.

“My God, how horrible! ... Without a government ... Anarchy ... Blood
...” and softly wept. At the expiring of the senile ghost of the czarist
power Rodzianko felt unhappy, desolate, orphaned. How far he was at that
moment from the thought that tomorrow he would have to “head” a
revolution!

The telephone answer of Golytsin is explained by the fact that on the
evening of the 27th the Council of Ministers had definitely acknowledged
itself incapable of handling the situation, and proposed to the czar to
place at the head of the government a man enjoying general confidence.
The czar answered Golytsin: “In regard to changes in the personal staff
in the present circumstances, I consider that inadmissible. Nicholas.”
Just what circumstances was he waiting for? At the same time the czar
demanded that they adopt “the most decisive measures” for putting down
the rebellion. That was easier said than done.

On the next day, the 28th, even the untamable czarina at last loses
heart. “Concessions are necessary,” she telegraphs Nicholas. “The
strikes continue; many troops have gone over to the side of the
revolution. Alex.”

It required an insurrection of the whole guard, the entire garrison, to
compel this Hessian zealot of autocracy to agree that “concessions are
necessary.” Now the czar also begins to suspect that the “fat-bellied
Rodzianko” had not telegraphed nonsense. Nicholas decides to join his
family. It is possible that he is a little gently pushed from behind by
the generals of the staff, too, who are not feeling quite comfortable.

The czar’s train travelled at first without mishap. Local chiefs and
governors came out as usual to meet him. Far from the revolutionary
whirlpool, in his accustomed royal car, surrounded by the usual suite,
the czar apparently again lost a sense of the close coming crisis. At
three o’clock on the 28th, when the events had already settled his fate,
he sent a telegram to the czarina from Vyazma: “Wonderful weather. Hope
you are well and calm. Many troops sent from the front. With tender
love. Niki.” Instead of the concessions, upon which even the czarina is
insisting, the tenderly loving czar is sending troops from the front.
But in spite of that “wonderful weather,” in just a few hours the czar
will stand face to face with the revolutionary storm. His train went as
far as the Visher station. The railroad workers would not let it go
farther: “The bridge is damaged.” Most likely this pretext was invented
by the courtiers themselves in order to soften the situation. Nicholas
tried to make his way, or they tried to get him through, by way of
Bologoe on the Nikolaevsk railroad; but here too the workers would not
let the train pass. This was far more palpable than all the Petrograd
telegrams. The czar had broken away from headquarters, and could not
make his way to the capital. With its simple railroad “pawns” the
revolution had cried “check” to the king!

The court historian Dubensky, who accompanied the czar in his train,
writes in his diary: “Everybody realises that this midnight turn at
Visher is a historical night ... To me it is perfectly clear that the
question of a constitution is settled; it will surely be introduced ...
Everybody is saying that it is only necessary to strike a bargain with
them, with the members of the Provisional Government.” Facing a lowered
semaphore, behind which mortal danger is thickening, Count Frederiks,
Prince Dolgoruky, Count Leuchtenberg, all of them, all those high lords,
are now for a constitution. They no longer think of struggling. It is
only necessary to strike a bargain, that is, try to fool them again as
in 1905.

While the train was wandering and finding no road, the czarina was
sending the czar telegram after telegram, appealing to him to return as
soon as possible. But her telegrams came back to her from the office
with the inscription in blue pencil: “Whereabouts of the addressee
unknown.” The telegraph clerks were unable to locate the Russian czar.

The regiments marched with music and banners to the Tauride Palace. A
company of the Guards marched under the command of Cyril Vladimirovich,
who had quite suddenly, according to Countess Kleinmichel, developed a
revolutionary streak. The sentries disappeared. The intimates were
abandoning the palace. “Everybody was saving himself who could,” relates
Vyrubova. Bands of revolutionary soldiers wandered about the palace and
with eager curiosity looked over everything. Before they had decided up
above what should be done, the lower ranks were converting the palace of
the czar into a museum.

The czar – his location unknown – turns back to Pskov, to the
headquarters of the northern front, commanded by the old General Ruszky.
In the czar’s suite one suggestion follows another. The czar
procrastinates. He is still reckoning in days and weeks, while the
revolution is keeping its count in minutes.

The poet Blok characterised the czar during the last months of the
monarchy as follows: “Stubborn, but without will; nervous, but
insensitive to everything; distrustful of people, taut and cautious in
speech, he was no longer master of himself. He had ceased to understand
the situation, and did not take one clearly conscious step, but gave
himself over completely into the hands of those whom he himself had
placed in power.” And how much these traits of tautness and lack of
will, cautiousness and distrust, were to increase during the last days
of February and first days of March!

Nicholas finally decided to send – and nevertheless evidently did not
send – a telegram to the hated Rodzianko stating that for the salvation
of the fatherland he appointed him to form a new ministry, reserving,
however, the ministries of foreign affairs, war and marine for himself.
The czar still hoped to bargain with “them”: the “many troops,” after
all, were on their way to Petrograd.

General Ivanov actually arrived without hindrance at Tsarskoe Selo:
evidently the railroad workers did not care to come in conflict with the
Battalion of St. George. The general confessed later that he had three
or four times found it necessary on the march to use fatherly influence
with the lower ranks, who were impudent to him: he made them get down on
their knees. Immediately upon the arrival of the “dictator” in Tsarskoe
Selo, the local authorities informed him that an encounter between the
Battalion of St. George and the troops would mean danger to the czar’s
family. They were simply afraid for themselves, and advised the dictator
to go back without detraining.

General Ivanov telegraphed to the other “dictator,” Khabalov, in
Petrograd ten questions, to which he received succinct answers: We will
quote them in full, for they deserve it:

  --------------------- ---------------------
  IVANOV’S QUESTIONS:   KHABALOV’S REPLIES:
  --------------------- ---------------------

  --------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  1. How many troops are in order and how many are misbehaving?   1. I have at my disposal in the Admiralty building four companies of the Guard, five squadrons of cavalry and Cossacks, and two batteries the rest of the troops have gone over to the revolutionists, or by agreement with them are remaining neutral. Soldiers are wandering through the towns singly or in bands disarming officers.
  --------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

  ----------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  2. Which railroad stations are guarded?   2. All the stations are in the hands of the revolutionists and strictly guarded by them.
  ----------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

  -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  3. In what parts of the city is order preserved?   3. The whole city is in the hands of the revolutionists. The telephone is not working, there is no communication between different parts of the city.
  -------------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

  -------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------
  4. What authorities are governing the different parts of the city?   4. I cannot answer this question.
  -------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------

  ------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------------------
  5. Are all the ministries functioning properly?   5. The ministers have been arrested by the revolutionists.
  ------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------------------

  ------------------------------------------------------------------- --------------------
  6. What police forces are at your disposal at the present moment?   6. None whatever .
  ------------------------------------------------------------------- --------------------

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------ -----------------
  7. What technical and supply institutions of the War Department are now in your control?   7. I have none.
  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------ -----------------

  -------------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  8. What quantity of provisions at is at your disposal?   8. There are no provisions my disposal. In the city on February 5 there were 5,600,000 pounds of flour in store.
  -------------------------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

  -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
  9. Have many weapons, artillery and military stores have fallen into the hands of the mutineers?   9. All the artillery establishments are in the hands of the revolutionists.
  -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------

  -------------------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  10. What military forces and the staffs are in your control?   10. The chief of the Staff of District is in my personal control. With the other district administrations I have no connections.
  -------------------------------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Having received this unequivocal illumination as to the situation,
General Ivanov “agreed” to turn back his echelon without detraining to
the station “Dno.”[1] “Thus,” concludes one of the chief personages of
the staff, General Lukomsky, “nothing came of the expedition of General
Ivanov with dictatorial powers but a public disgrace.”

That disgrace, incidentally, was a very quiet one, sinking unnoticed in
the billowing events. The dictator, we may suppose, delivered the
provisions to his friends in Petrograd, and had a long chat with the
czarina. She referred to her self-sacrificing work in the hospitals, and
complained of the ingratitude of the army and the people.

During this time news was arriving at Pskov by way of Moghilev, blacker
and blacker. His Majesty’s own bodyguard, in which every soldier was
known by name and coddled by the royal family, turned up at the State
Duma asking permission to arrest those officers who had refused to take
part in the insurrection. Vice-Admiral Kurovsky reported that he found
it impossible to take any measures to put down the insurrection at
Kronstadt, since he could not vouch for the loyalty of a single
detachment. Admiral Nepenin telegraphed that the Baltic Fleet had
recognised the Provisional Committee of the State Duma. The Moscow
commander-in-chief, Mrozovsky, telegraphed: “A majority of the troops
have gone over with artillery to the revolutionists. The whole town is
therefore in their hands. The burgomaster and his aide have left the
city hall.” _Have left_ means that they fled.

All this was communicated to the czar on the evening of March 1. Deep
into the night they coaxed and argued about a responsible ministry.
Finally, at two o’clock in the morning the czar gave his consent, and
those around him drew a sigh of relief. Since they took it for granted
that this would settle the problem of the revolution, an order was
issued at the same time that the troops which had been sent to Petrograd
to put down the insurrection should return to the front. Ruszky hurried
at dawn to convey the good news to Rodzianko. But the czar’s clock was
way behind. Rodzianko in the Tauride Palace, already buried under a pile
of democrats, socialists, soldiers, workers’ deputies, replied to
Ruszky: “Your proposal is not enough; it is now a question of the
dynasty itself ... Everywhere the troops are taking the side of the
Duma, and the people are demanding an abdication in favour of the Heir
with Mikhail Alexandrovich as regent.” Of course the troops never
thought of demanding either the Heir or Mikhail Alexandrovich. Rodzianko
merely attributed to the troops and the people that slogan upon which
the Duma was still hoping to stop the revolution. But in either case the
czar’s concession had come too late: “The anarchy has reached such
proportions that I (Rodzianko) was this night compelled to appoint a
Provisional Government. Unfortunately, the edict has come too late ...”
These majestic words bear witness that the President of the Duma had
succeeded in drying the tears shed over Golytsin. The czar read the
conversation between Rodzianko and Ruszky, and hesitated, read it over
again, and decided to wait. But now the military chiefs had begun to
sound the alarm: the matter concerned them too a little!

General Alexeiev carried out during the hours of that night a sort of
plebiscite among the commanders-in-chief at the fronts. It is a good
thing present-day revolutions are accomplished with the help of the
telegraph, so that the very first impulses and reactions of those in
power are preserved to history on the tape. The conversations of the
czarist field-marshals on the night of March 1-2 are an incomparable
human document. Should the czar abdicate or not? The commander-in-chief
of the western front, General Evert, consented to give his opinion only
after Generals Ruszky and Brussilov had expressed themselves. The
commander-in-chief of the Roumanian front, General Sakharov, demanded
that before he express himself the conclusions of all the other
commanders-in-chief should be communicated to him. After long delays
this valiant chieftain announced that his warm love for the monarch
would not permit his soul to reconcile itself with an acceptance of the
“base suggestion”; nevertheless, “with sobs” he advised the czar to
abdicate in order to avoid “still viler pretensions.” Adjutant-General
Evert quite reasonably explained the necessity for capitulation: “I am
taking all measures to prevent information as to the present situation
in the capital from penetrating the army, in order to protect it against
indubitable disturbances. No means exist for putting down the revolution
in the capitals.” Grand Duke Nikolai Nikolaievich on the Caucasian front
beseeched the czar on bended knee to adopt the “supermeasure” and
renounce the throne. A similar prayer came from Generals Alexeiev and
Brussilov and Admiral Nepenin. Ruszky spoke orally to the same effect.
The generals respectfully presented seven revolver barrels to the temple
of the adored monarch. Fearing to let slip the moment for reconciliation
with the new power, and no less fearing their own troops, these military
chieftains, accustomed as they were to surrendering positions, gave the
czar and the High Commander-in-Chief a quite unanimous counsel: Retire
without fighting. This was no longer distant Petrograd against which, as
it seemed, one might send troops; this was the front from which the
troops had to be borrowed.

Having listened to this suggestively circumstanced report, the czar
decided to abdicate the throne which he no longer possessed. A telegram
to Rodzianko suitable to the occasion was drawn up: “There is no
sacrifice that I would not make in the name of the real welfare and
salvation of my native mother Russia. Thus I am ready to abdicate the
throne in favour of my son, and in order that he may remain with me
until he is of age, under the regency of my brother, Mikhail
Alexandrovich. Nicholas.” This telegram too, however, was not
despatched, for news came from the capital of the departure for Pskov of
the deputies Guchkov and Shulgin. This offered a new pretext to postpone
the decision. The czar ordered the telegram returned to him. He
obviously dreaded to sell too cheap, and still hoped for comforting news
– or more accurately, hoped for a miracle. Nicholas received the two
deputies at twelve o’clock midnight March 2-3. The miracle did not come,
and it was impossible to evade longer. The czar unexpectedly announced
that he could not part with his son – what vague hopes were then
wandering in his head? – and signed an abdication in favour of his
brother. At the same time edicts to the Senate were signed, naming
Prince Lvov President of the Council of Ministers, and Nikolai
Nikolaievich Supreme Commander-in-Chief. The family suspicions of the
czarina seemed to have been justified: the hated “Nikolasha” came back
to power along with the conspirators. Guchkov apparently seriously
believed that the revolution would accept the Most August War Chief. The
latter also accepted his appointment in good faith. He even tried for a
few days to give some kind of orders and make appeals for the fulfilment
of patriotic duty. However the revolution painlessly removed him.

In order to preserve the appearance of a free act, the abdication was
dated three o’clock in the afternoon, on the pretence that the original
decision of the czar to abdicate had taken place at that hour. But as a
matter of fact that afternoon’s “decision,” which gave the sceptre to
his son and not to his brother, had been taken back in anticipation of a
more favourable turn of the wheel. Of that, however, nobody spoke out
loud. The czar made a last effort to save his face before the hated
deputies, who upon their part permitted this falsification of a historic
act – this deceiving of the people. The monarchy retired from the scene
preserving its usual style; and its successors also remained true to
themselves. They probably even regarded their connivance as the
magnanimity of a conqueror to the conquered.

Departing a little from the phlegmatic style of his diary, Nicholas
writes on March 2: “This morning Ruszky came and read me a long
conversation over the wire with Rodzianko. According to his words the
situation in Petrograd is such that a ministry of the members of the
State Duma will be powerless to do anything, for it is being opposed by
the social-democratic party in the person of a workers’ committee. My
abdication is necessary. Ruszky transmitted this conversation to
Alexeiev at headquarters and to all the commanders-in-chief. Answers
arrived at 12.30. To save Russia and keep the army at the front, I
decided upon this step. I agreed, and they sent from headquarters the
text of an abdication. In the evening came Guchkov and Shulgin from
Petrograd, with whom I talked it over and gave them the document amended
and signed. At 1 o’clock in the morning I left Pskov with heavy
feelings; around me treason, cowardice, deceit.”

The bitterness of Nicholas was, we must confess, not without foundation.
It was only as short a time ago as February 28, that General Alexeiev
had telegraphed to all the commanders-in-chief at the front: “Upon us
all lies a sacred duty before the sovereign and the fatherland to
preserve loyalty to oath and duty in the troops of the active army.” Two
days later Alexeiev appealed to these same commanders-in-chief to
violate their “loyalty to oath and duty.” In all the commanding staff
there was not found one man to take action in behalf of his czar. They
all hastened to transfer to the ship of the revolution, firmly expecting
to find comfortable cabins there. Generals and admirals one and all
removed the czarist braid and put on the red ribbon. There was news
subsequently of one single righteous soul, some commander of a corps,
who died of heart failure taking the new oath. But it is not established
that his heart failed through injured monarchist feelings, and not
through other causes. The civil officials naturally were not obliged to
show more courage than the military – each one was saving himself as he
could.

But the clock of the monarchy decidedly did not coincide with the
revolutionary clocks. At dawn of March 3, Ruszky was again summoned to
the direct wire from the capital: Rodzianko and Prince Lvov were
demanding that he hold up the czar’s abdication, which had again proved
too late. The installation of Alexei – said the new authorities
evasively – might perhaps be accepted – by whom? – but the installation
of Mikhail was absolutely unacceptable. Ruszky with some venom expressed
his regret that the deputies of the Duma who had arrived the night
before had not been sufficiently informed as to the aims and purposes of
their journey. But here too the deputies had their justification.
“Unexpectedly to us all there broke out such a soldiers’ rebellion as I
never saw the like of,” explained the Lord Chamberlain to Ruszky, as
though he had done nothing all his life but watch soldiers’ rebellions.
“To proclaim Mikhail emperor would pour oil on the fire and there would
begin a ruthless extermination of everything that can be exterminated.”
How it whirls and shakes and bends and contorts them all!

The generals silently swallowed this new “vile pretension” of the
revolution. Alexeiev alone slightly relieved his spirit in a telegraphic
bulletin to the commanders-in-chief: “The left parties and the workers’
deputies are exercising a powerful pressure upon the President of the
Duma, and there is no frankness or sincerity in the communications of
Rodzianko.” The only thing lacking to the generals in those hours was
sincerity

But at this point the czar again changed his mind. Arriving in Moghilev
from Pskov, he handed to his former chief-of-staff, Alexeiev, for
transmission to Petrograd, a sheet of paper with his consent to the
handing over of the sceptre to his son. Evidently he found this
combination in the long run more promising. Alexeiev, according to
Denikin’s story, went away with the telegram and ... did not send it. He
thought that those two manifestos which had already been published to
the army and the country were enough. The discord arose from the fact
that not only the czar and his counsellors, but also the Duma liberals,
were thinking more slowly than the revolution.

Before his final departure from Moghilev on March 8, the czar, already
under formal arrest, wrote an appeal to the troops ending with these
words: “Whoever thinks now of peace, whoever desires it, that man is a
traitor to the fatherland, its betrayer.” This was in the nature of a
prompted attempt to snatch out of the hands of liberalism the accusation
of Germanophilism. The attempt had no result: they did not even dare
publish the appeal.

Thus ended a reign which had been a continuous chain of ill luck,
failure, misfortune, and evil-doing, from the Khodynka catastrophe
during the coronation, through the shooting of strikers and revolting
peasants, the Russo-Japanese war, the frightful putting-down of the
revolution of 1905, the innumerable executions, punitive expeditions and
national pogroms and ending with the insane and contemptible
participation of Russia in the insane and contemptible world war.

Upon arriving at Tsarskoe Selo, where he and his family were confined in
the palace, the czar, according to Vyrubova, softly said: “There is no
justice among men.” But those very words irrefutably testify that
historic justice, though it comes late, does exist.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The similarity of the Romanov couple to the French royal pair of the
epoch of the Great Revolution is very obvious. It has already been
remarked in literature, but only in passing and without drawing
inferences. Nevertheless it is not at all accidental, as appears at the
first glance, but offers valuable material for an inference.

Although separated from each other by five quarter centuries, the czar
and the king were at certain moments like two actors playing the same
role. A passive, patient, but vindictive treachery was the distinctive
trait of both – with this difference, that in Louis it was disguised
with a dubious kindliness, in Nicholas with affability. They both make
the impression of people who are overburdened by their job, but at the
same time unwilling to give up even a part of those rights of which they
are unable to make any use. The diaries of both, similar in style or
lack of style, reveal the same depressing spiritual emptiness.

The Austrian woman and the Hessian German form also a striking symmetry.
Both queens stand above their kings, not only in physical but also in
moral growth. Marie Antoinette was less pious than Alexandra Feodorovna,
and unlike the latter was passionately fond of pleasures. But both alike
scorned the people, could not endure the thought of concessions, alike
mistrusted the courage of their husbands, looking down upon them –
Antoinette with a shade of contempt, Alexandra with pity.

When the authors of memoirs, approaching the Petersburg court of their
day, assure us that Nicholas II, had he been a private individual, would
have left a good memory behind him, they merely reproduce the long-ago
stereotyped remarks about Louis XVI, not enriching in the least our
knowledge either of history or of human nature.

We have already seen how Prince Lvov became indignant when, at the
height of the tragic events of the first revolution, instead of a
depressed czar, he found before him a “_jolly, sprightly little man_ in
a raspberry-coloured shirt.” Without knowing it, the prince merely
repeated the comment of Governor Morris writing in Washington in 1790
about Louis: “What will you have from a creature who, situated as he is,
eats and drinks and sleeps well, and laughs and is as merry a grig as
lives?”

When Alexandra Feodorovna, three months before the fall of the monarchy,
prophesies: “All is coming out for the best, the dreams of our Friend
mean so much!” she merely repeats Marie Antoinette, who one month before
the overthrow of the royal power wrote: “I feel a liveliness of spirit,
and something tells me that we shall soon be happy and safe.” They both
see rainbow dreams as they drown.

Certain elements of similarity of course are accidental, and have the
interest only of historic anecdotes. Infinitely more important are those
traits of character which have been grafted, or more directly imposed,
on a person by the mighty force of conditions, and which throw a sharp
light on the interrelation of personality and the objective factors of
history.

“He did not know how to wish: that was his chief trait of character,”
says a reactionary French historian of Louis. Those words might have
been written of Nicholas: neither of them knew how to wish, but both
knew how to not wish. But what really could be “wished” by the last
representatives of a hopelessly lost historic cause? “Usually he
listened, smiled, and rarely decided upon anything. His first word was
usually _No_.” Of whom is that written? Again of Capet. But if this is
so, the manners of Nicholas were an absolute plagiarism. They both go
toward the abyss “with the crown pushed down over their eyes.” But would
it after all be easier to go to an abyss, which you cannot escape
anyway, with your eyes open? What difference would it have made, as a
matter of fact, if they had pushed the crown way back on their heads?

Some professional psychologist ought to draw up an anthology of the
parallel expressions of Nicholas and Louis, Alexandra and Antoinette,
and their courtiers. There would be no lack of material, and the result
would be a highly instructive historic testimony in favour of the
materialist psychology. Similar (of course, far from identical)
irritations in similar conditions call out similar reflexes; the more
powerful the irritation, the sooner it overcomes personal peculiarities.
To a tickle, people react differently, but to a red-hot iron, alike. As
a steam-hammer converts a sphere and a cube alike into sheet metal, so
under the blow of too great and inexorable events resistances are
smashed and the boundaries of “individuality” lost.

Louis and Nicholas were the last-born of a dynasty that had lived
tumultuously. The well-known equability of them both, their tranquillity
and “gaiety ” in difficult moments, were the well-bred expression of a
meagerness of inner powers, a weakness of the nervous discharge, poverty
of spiritual resources. Moral castrates, they were absolutely deprived
of imagination and creative force. They had just enough brains to feel
their own triviality, and they cherished an envious hostility toward
everything gifted and significant. It fell to them both to rule a
country in conditions of deep inner crisis and popular revolutionary
awakening. Both of them fought off the intrusion of new ideas, and the
tide of hostile forces. Indecisiveness, hypocrisy, and lying were in
both cases the expression, not so much of personal weakness, as of the
complete impossibility of holding fast, to their hereditary positions.

And how was it with their wives? Alexandra, even more than Antoinette,
was lifted to the very heights of the dreams of a princess, especially
such a rural one as this Hessian, by her marriage with the unlimited
despot of a powerful country. Both of them were filled to the brim with
the consciousness of their high mission: Antoinette more frivolously,
Alexandra in a spirit of Protestant bigotry translated into the Slavonic
language of the Russian Church. An unlucky reign and a growing
discontent of the people ruthlessly destroyed the fantastic world which
these two enterprising but nevertheless chickenlike heads had built for
themselves. Hence the growing bitterness, the gnawing hostility to an
alien people that would not bow before them; the hatred toward ministers
who wanted to give even a little consideration to that hostile world, to
the country; hence their alienation even from their own court, and their
continued irritation against a husband who had not fulfilled the
expectations aroused by him as a bridegroom.

Historians and biographers of the psychological tendency not
infrequently seek and find something purely personal and accidental
where great historical forces are refracted through a personality. This
is the same fault of vision as that of the courtiers who considered the
last Russian czar born “unlucky.” He himself believed that he was born
under an unlucky star. In reality his ill-luck flowed from the
contradictions between those old aims which he inherited from his
ancestors and the new historic conditions in which he was placed. When
the ancients said that Jupiter first makes mad those whom he wishes to
destroy, they summed up in superstitious form a profound historic
observation. In the saying of Goethe about reason becoming nonsense –
“_Vernunft wird Unsinn_” – this same thought is expressed about the
impersonal Jupiter of the historical dialectic, which withdraws “reason
” from historic institutions that have outlived themselves and condemns
their defenders to failure. The scripts for the rôles of Romanov and
Capet were prescribed by the general development of the historic drama;
only the nuances of interpretation fell to the lot of the actors. The
ill-luck of Nicholas, as of Louis, had its roots not in his personal
horoscope, but in the historical horoscope of the bureaucratic-caste
monarchy. They were both, chiefly and above all, the last-born offspring
of absolutism. Their moral insignificance, deriving from their dynastic
epigonism, gave the latter an especially malignant character.

You might object: if Alexander III had drunk less he might have lived a
good deal longer, the revolution would have run into a very different
make of czar, and no parallel with Louis XVI would have been possible.
Such an objection, however, does not refute in the least what has been
said above. We do not at all pretend to deny the significance of the
personal in the mechanics of the historic process, nor the significance
in the personal of the accidental. We only demand that a historic
personality, with all its peculiarities, should not be taken as a bare
list of psychological traits, but as a living reality grown out of
definite social conditions and reacting upon them. As a rose does not
lose its fragrance because the natural scientist points out upon what
ingredients of soil and atmosphere it is nourished, so an exposure of
the social roots of a personality does not remove from it either its
aroma or its foul smell.

The consideration advanced above about a possible long life of Alexander
III is capable of illuming this very problem from another side. Let us
assume that this Alexander III had not become mixed up in 1904 in a war
with Japan. This would have delayed the first revolution. For how long?
It is possible that the “revolution of 1905” – that is, the first test
of strength, the first breach in the system of absolutism – would have
been a mere introduction to the second, republican, and the third,
proletarian revolution. Upon this question more or less interesting
guesses are possible, but it is indubitable in any case that the
revolution did not result from the character of Nicholas II, and that
Alexander III would not have solved its problem. It is enough to
remember that nowhere and never was the transition from the feudal to
the bourgeois régime made without violent disturbances. We saw this only
yesterday in China; today we observe it again in India. The most we can
say is that this or that policy of the monarchy, this or that
personality of the monarch, might have hastened or postponed the
revolution and placed a certain imprint on its external course.

With what angry and impotent stubbornness charisma tried to defend
itself in those last months, weeks and days, when the game was
hopelessly lost! If Nicholas himself lacked the will the lack was made
up by the czarina. Rasputin was an instrument of the action of a clique
which rabidly fought for self-preservation. Even on this narrow scale
the personality of the czar merges in a group which represents the
coagulum of the past and its last convulsion. The “policy” of the upper
circles at Tsarskoe Selo, face to face with the revolution, were but the
reflexes of a poisoned and weak beast of prey. If you chase a wolf over
the steppe in an automobile, the beast gives out at last and lies down
impotent. But attempt to put a collar on him and he will try to tear you
to pieces, or at least wound you. And indeed what else can he do in the
circumstances?

The liberals imagined there was something else he might do. Instead of
coming to an agreement with the enfranchised bourgeoisie in good season,
and thus preventing the revolution – such is liberalism’s act of
accusation against the last czar – Nicholas stubbornly shrank from
concessions, and even in the last days when already under the knife of
destiny, when every minute was to be counted, still kept on
procrastinating, bargaining with fate, and letting slip the last
possibilities. This all sounds convincing. But how unfortunate that
liberalism, knowing so accurately how to save the monarchy, did not know
how to save itself!

It would be absurd to maintain that czarism never and in no
circumstances made concessions. It made them when they were demanded by
the necessity of self-preservation. After the Crimean defeat, Alexander
II carried out the semi-liberation of the peasants and a series of
liberal reforms in the sphere of land administration, courts, press,
educational institutions, etc. The czar himself expressed the guiding
thought of this reformation: to free the peasants from _above_ lest they
free themselves from _below_. Under the drive of the first revolution
Nicholas II granted a semi-constitution. Stolypin scrapped the peasant
communes in order to broaden the arena of the capitalist forces. For
czarism, however, all these reforms had a meaning only in so far as the
partial concession preserved the whole – that is, the foundations of a
caste society and the monarchy itself. When the consequences of the
reform began to splash over those boundaries the monarchy inevitably
beat a retreat. Alexander II in the second half of his reign stole back
the reforms of the first half. Alexander III went still farther on the
road of counter-reform. Nicholas II in October 1905 retreated before the
revolution, and then afterward dissolved the Dumas created by it, and as
soon as the revolution grew weak, made his _coup d’état_. Throughout
three-quarters of a century – if we begin with the reform of Alexander
II – there developed a struggle of historic forces, now underground, now
in the open, far transcending the personal qualities of the separate
czars, and accomplishing the overthrow of the monarchy. Only within the
historic framework of this process can you find a place for individual
czars, their characters, their “biographies.”

Even the most despotic of autocrats is but little similar to a “free”
individuality laying its arbitrary imprint upon events. He is always the
crowned agent of the privileged classes which are forming society in
their own image. When these classes have not yet fulfilled their
mission, then the monarchy is strong and self-confident. Then it has in
its hands a reliable apparatus of power and an unlimited choice of
executives – because the more gifted people have not yet gone over into
the hostile camp. Then the monarch, either personally, or through the
mediation of a powerful favourite, may become the agent of a great and
progressive historic task. It is quite otherwise when the sun of the old
society is finally declining to the west. The privileged classes are now
changed from organisers of the national life into a parasitic growth;
having lost their guiding function, they lose the consciousness of their
mission and all confidence in their powers. Their dissatisfaction with
themselves becomes a dissatisfaction with the monarchy; the dynasty
becomes isolated; the circle of people loyal to the death narrows down;
their level sinks lower; meanwhile the dangers grow; new force are
pushing up; the monarchy loses its capacity for any kind of creative
initiative; it defends itself, it strikes back, it retreats; its
activities acquire the automatism of mere reflexes. The semi Asiatic
despotism of the Romanovs did not escape this fate.

If you take the czarism in its agony, in a vertical section, so to
speak, Nicholas is the axis of a clique which has its roots in the
hopelessly condemned past. In a horizontal section of the historic
monarchy, Nicholas is the last link in a dynastic chain. His nearest
ancestors, who also in their day were merged in family, caste and
bureaucratic collectivity – only a broader one – tried out various
measures and methods of government in order to protect the old social
régime against the fate advancing upon it. But nevertheless they passed
it on to Nicholas a chaotic empire already carrying the matured
revolution in its womb. If he had any choice left, it was only between
different roads to ruin.

Liberalism was dreaming of a monarchy on the British plan. But was
parliamentarism born on the Thames by a peaceful evolution? Was it the
fruit of the “free” foresight of a single monarch? No, it was deposited
as the result of a struggle that lasted for ages, and in which one of
the kings left his head at the crossroads.

The historic-psychological contrast mentioned above between the Romanovs
and the Capets can, by the way, be aptly extended to the British royal
pair of the epoch of the first revolution. Charles I revealed
fundamentally the same combination of traits with which memoirists and
historians have endowed Louis XVI and Nicholas II. “Charles, therefore,
remained passive,” writes Montague, “yielded where he could not resist,
betrayed how unwillingly he did so, and reaped no popularity, no
confidence.” “He was not a stupid man,” says another historian of
Charles Stuart, “but he lacked firmness of character ... His evil fate
was his wife, Henrietta, a Frenchwoman, sister of Louis XIII, saturated
even more than Charles with the idea of absolutism.” We will not detail
the characteristics of this third – chronologically first – royal pair
to be crushed by a national revolution. We will merely observe that in
England the hatred was concentrated above all on the queen, as a
Frenchwoman and a papist, whom they accused of plotting with Rome,
secret connections with the Irish rebels, and intrigues at the French
court.

But England had, at any rate, ages at her disposal. She was the pioneer
of bourgeois civilisation; she was not under the yoke of other nations,
but on the contrary held them more and more under her yoke. She
exploited the whole world. This softened the inner contradictions,
accumulated conservatism, promoted an abundance and stability of fatty
deposits in the form of a parasitic caste, in the form of a squirearchy,
a monarchy, House of Lords, and the state church. Thanks to this
exclusive historic privilege of development possessed by bourgeois
England, conservatism combined with elasticity passed over from her
institutions into her moral fibre. Various continental Philistines, like
the Russian professor Miliukov, or the Austro-Marxist Otto Bauer, have
not to this day ceased going into ecstasies over this fact. But exactly
at the present moment, when England, hard pressed throughout the world,
is squandering the last resources of her former privileged position, her
conservatism is losing its elasticity, and even in the person of the
Labourites is turning into stark reactionism. In the face of the Indian
revolution the “socialist” MacDonald will find no other methods but
those with which Nicholas II opposed the Russian revolution. Only a
blind man could fail to see that Great Britain is headed for gigantic
revolutionary earthquake shocks, in which the last fragments of her
conservatism, her world domination, her present state machine, will go
down without a trace. MacDonald is preparing these shocks no less
successfully than did Nicholas II in time, and no less blindly. So here
too, as we see, is no poor illustration of the problem of the role of
the “free” personality in history.

But how could Russia with her belated development, coming along at the
tail end of the European nations, with her meagre economic foundation
underfoot, how could she develop an “elastic conservatism” of social
forms – and develop it for the special benefit of professorial
liberalism and its leftward shadow, reformist socialism? Russia was too
far behind. And when world imperialism once took her in its grip, she
had to pass through her political history in too brief a course. If
Nicholas had gone to meet liberalism and replaced one with Miliukov, the
development of events would have differed a little in form, not in
substance. Indeed it was just in this way that Louis behaved in the
second stage of the revolution, summoning Gironde to power: this did not
save Louis himself from the guillotine, nor after him the Gironde. The
accumulating social contradictions were bound to break through to the
surface, breaking through to carry out their work of purgation. Before
the pressure of the popular masses, who had at last brought into the
open arena their misfortunes, their pains, intentions, passions, hopes,
illusions and aims, the high-up combination of the monarchy with
liberalism had only an episodic significance. They could exert, to be
sure, an influence on the order of events, maybe upon the number of
actions, but not at all upon development of the drama nor its momentous
climax.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. The name of this station is also the Russian word meaning “bottom.”
[_Trans._]



CHAPTER 7 FIVE DAYS (FEBRUARY 23-27, 1917)


 

The 23rd of February was International Woman’s Day. The
social-democratic circles had intended to mark this day in a general
manner: by meetings, speeches, leaflets. It had not occurred to anyone
that it might become the first day of the revolution. Not a single
organisation called for strikes on that day. What is more, even a
Bolshevik organisation, and a most militant one – the Vyborg borough
committee, all workers – was opposing strikes. The temper of the masses,
according to Kayurov, one of the leaders in the workers’ district, was
very tense; any strike would threaten to turn into an open fight. But
since the committee thought the time unripe for militant action – the
party not strong enough and the workers having too few contacts with the
soldiers – they decided not to call for strikes but to prepare for
revolutionary action at some indefinite time in the future. Such was the
course followed by the committee on the eve of the 23rd of February, and
everyone seemed to accept it. On the following morning, however, in
spite of all directives, the women textile workers in several factories
went on strike, and sent delegates to the metal workers with an appeal
for support. “With reluctance,” writes Kayurov, “the Bolsheviks agreed
to this, and they were followed by the workers – Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries. But once there is a mass strike, one must call
everybody into the streets and take the lead.” Such was Kayurov’s
decision, and the Vyborg committee had to agree to it. “The idea of
going into the streets had long been ripening among the workers; only at
that moment nobody imagined where it would lead.” Let us keep in mind
this testimony of a participant, important for understanding the
mechanics of the events.

It was taken for granted that in case of a demonstration the soldiers
would be brought out into the streets against the workers. What would
that lead to? This was wartime; the authorities were in no mood for
joking. On the other hand, a “reserve” soldier in wartime is nothing
like an old soldier of the regular army. Is he really so formidable? In
revolutionary circles they had discussed this much, but rather
abstractly. For no one, positively no one – we can assert this
categorically upon the basis of all the data – then thought that
February 23 was to mark the beginning of a decisive drive against
absolutism The talk was of a demonstration which had indefinite, but in
any case limited, perspectives.

Thus the fact is that the February revolution was begun from below,
overcoming the resistance of its own revolutionary organisations, the
initiative being taken of their own accord by the most oppressed and
downtrodden part of the proletariat – the women textile workers, among
them no doubt many soldiers’ wives. The overgrown breadlines had
provided the last stimulus. About 90,000 workers, men and women, were on
strike that day. The fighting mood expressed itself in demonstrations,
meetings, encounters with the police. The movement began in the Vyborg
district with its large industrial establishments; thence it crossed
over to the Petersburg side. There were no strikes or demonstrations
elsewhere, according to the testimony of the secret police. On that day
detachments of troops were called in to assist the police – evidently
not many of them – but there were no encounters with them. A mass of
women, not all of them workers, flocked to the municipal duma demanding
bread. It was like demanding milk from a he-goat. Red banners appeared
in different parts of the city, and inscriptions on them showed that the
workers wanted bread, but neither autocracy nor war. Woman’s Day passed
successfully, with enthusiasm and without victims. But what it concealed
in itself, no one had guessed even by nightfall.

On the following day the movement not only fails to diminish, but
doubles. About one-half of the industrial workers of Petrograd are on
strike on the 24th of February. The workers come to the factories in the
morning; instead of going to work they hold meetings; then begin
processions toward the centre. New districts and new groups of the
population are drawn into the movement. The slogan “Bread!” is crowded
out or obscured by louder slogans: “Down with autocracy!” “Down with the
war!” Continuous demonstrations on the Nevsky[1] – first compact masses
of workmen singing revolutionary songs, later a motley crowd of city
folk interspersed with the blue caps of students. “The promenading crowd
was sympathetically disposed toward us, and soldiers in some of the
war-hospitals greeted us by waving whatever was at hand.” How many
clearly realised what was being ushered in by this sympathetic waving
from sick soldiers to demonstrating workers? But the Cossacks
constantly, though without ferocity, kept charging the crowd. Their
horses were covered with foam. The mass of demonstrators would part to
let them through, and close up again. There was no fear in the crowd.
“The Cossacks promise not to shoot,” passed from mouth to mouth.
Apparently some of the workers had talks with individual Cossacks.
Later, however, cursing, half-drunken dragoons appeared on the scene.
They plunged into the crowd, began to strike at heads with their lances.
The demonstrators summoned all their strength and stood fast. “They
won’t shoot.” And in fact they didn’t.

A liberal senator was looking at the dead street-cars – or was that on
the following day and his memory failed him? – some of them with broken
windows, some tipped over on the tracks, and was recalling the July days
of 1914 on the eve of the war. “It seemed that the old attempt was being
renewed.” The senator’s eyes did not deceive him; the continuity is
clear. History was picking up the ends of the revolutionary threads
broken by the war, and tying them in a knot.

Throughout the entire day, crowds of people poured from one part of the
city to another. They were persistently dispelled by the police, stopped
and crowded back by cavalry detachments and occasionally by infantry.
Along with shouts of “Down with the police!” was heard oftener and
oftener a “Hurrah!” addressed to the Cossacks. That was significant.
Toward the police the crowd showed ferocious hatred. They routed the
mounted police with whistles, stones, and pieces of ice. In a totally
different way the workers approached the soldiers. Around the barracks,
sentinels, patrols and lines of soldiers stood groups of working men and
women exchanging friendly words with the army men. This was a new stage,
due to the growth of the strike and the personal meeting of the worker
with the army. Such a stage is inevitable in every revolution. But it
always seems new, and does in fact occur differently every time: those
who have read and written about it do not recognise the thing when they
see it.

In the State Duma that day they were telling how an enormous mass of
people had flooded Znamensky Square and all Nevsky Prospect, and the
adjoining streets and that a totally unprecedented phenomenon was
observed: the Cossacks and the regiments with bands were being greeted
by revolutionary and not patriotic crowds with shouts of “Hurrah!” To
the question, “What does it all mean?” the first person accosted in the
crowd answered the deputy: “A policeman struck a woman with a knout; the
Cossacks stepped in and drove away the police.” Whether it happened in
this way or another, will never be verified. But the crowd believed that
it was so, that this was possible. The belief had not fallen out of the
sky; it arose from previous experience, and was therefore to become an
earnest of victory.

The workers at the Erikson, one of the foremost mills in the Vyborg
district, after a morning meeting came out on the Sampsonievsky
Prospect, a whole mass, 2,500 of them, and in a narrow place ran into
the Cossacks. Cutting their way with the breasts of their horses, the
officers first charged through the crowd. Behind them, filling the whole
width of the Prospect galloped the Cossacks. Decisive moment! But the
horsemen, cautiously, in a long ribbon, rode through the corridor just
made by the officers. “Some of them smiled,” Kayurov recalls, “and one
of them gave the workers a good wink.” This wink was not without
meaning. The workers were emboldened with a friendly, not hostile, kind
of assurance, and slightly infected the Cossacks with it. The one who
winked found imitators. In spite of renewed efforts from the officers,
the Cossacks, without openly breaking discipline, failed to force the
crowd to disperse, but flowed through it in streams. This was repeated
three or four times and brought the two sides even closer together.
Individual Cossacks began to reply to the workers’ questions and even to
enter into momentary conversations with them. Of discipline there
remained but a thin transparent shell that threatened to break through
any second. The officers hastened to separate their patrol from the
workers, and, abandoning the idea of dispersing them, lined the Cossacks
out across the street as a barrier to prevent the demonstrators from
getting to the centre. But even this did not help: standing stock-still
in perfect discipline, the Cossacks did not hinder the workers from
“diving” under their horses. The revolution does not choose its paths:
it made its first steps toward victory under the belly of a Cossack’s
horse. A remarkable incident! And remarkable the eye of its narrator –
an eye which took an impression of every bend in the process. No wonder,
for the narrator was a leader; he was at the head of over two thousand
men. The eye of a commander watching for enemy whips and bullets looks
sharp.

It seems that the break in the army first appeared among the Cossacks,
those age-old subduers and punishers. This does not mean, however, that
the Cossacks were more revolutionary than others. On the contrary, these
solid property owners, riding their own horses, highly valuing their
Cossack peculiarities, scorning the plain peasants, mistrustful of the
workers, had many elements of conservatism. But just for this reason the
changes caused by the war were more sharply noticeable in them. Besides,
they were always being pulled around, sent everywhere, driven against
the people, kept in suspense – and they were the first to be put to the
test. They were sick of it, and wanted to go home. Therefore they
winked: “Do it, boys, if you know how – we won’t bother you!” All these
things, however, were merely very significant symptoms. The army was
still the army, it was bound with discipline, and the threads were in
the hands of the monarchy. The worker mass was unarmed. The leaders had
not yet thought of the decisive crisis.

On the calendar of the Council of Ministers that day there stood, among
other questions, the question of disorders in the capital. Strikes?
Demonstrations? This isn’t the first time. Everything is provided for.
Directions have been issued. Return to the order of business. And what
were the directions? In spite of the fact that on the 23rd and 24th
twenty-eight policemen were beaten up – persuasive exactness about the
number! – the military commander of the district, General Khabalov,
almost a dictator, did not resort to shooting. Not from
kind-heartedness: everything was provided for and marked down in
advance, even the time for the shooting.

The revolution caught them unawares only with regard to the exact
moment. Generally speaking, both sides, the revolutionary and the
governmental, were carefully preparing for it, had been preparing for
years, had always been preparing. As for the Bolsheviks, all their
activity since 1905 was nothing but preparation for a second revolution.
And the activities of the government, an enormous share of them, were
preparations to put down the new revolution. In the fall of 1916 this
part of the government’s work had assumed an aspect of particularly
careful planning. A commission under Khabalov’s chairmanship had
completed by the middle of January 1917 a very exact plan for crushing a
new insurrection. The city was divided into six police districts, which
in turn were subdivided into _rayons_. The commander of the reserve
guard units, General Chebykin, was placed at the head of all the armed
forces. Regiments were assigned to different _rayons_. In each of the
six police districts, the police, the gendarmes and the troops were
united under the command of special staff officers. The Cossack cavalry
was at the disposal of Chebykin himself for larger-scale operations. The
order of action was planned as follows: first the police act alone, then
the Cossacks appear on the scene with whips, and only in case of real
necessity the troops go into action with rifles and machine-guns. It was
this very plan, developed out of the experience of 1905, that was put
into operation in the February days. The difficulty lay not in lack of
foresight, nor defects of the plan itself, but in the human material.
Here the whole thing threatened to hang fire.

Formally the plan was based on the entire garrison, which comprised one
hundred and fifty thousand soldiers, but in reality only some ten
thousand came into the count. Besides the policemen, numbering three and
a half thousand, a firm hope was placed in the military training
schools. This is explained by the make up of the Petrograd garrison
which at that time consisted almost exclusively of reserve units,
primarily of the fourteen reserve battalions attached to the regiments
of the Guard which were then at the front. In addition to that, the
garrison comprised one reserve infantry regiment, a reserve bicycle
battalion, a reserve armoured car division, small units of sappers and
artillerymen and two regiments of Don Cossacks. That was a great many –
it was too many. The swollen reserve units were made up of a human mass
which had either escaped training almost entirely, or succeeded in
getting free of it. But for that matter, substantially the same thing
was true of the entire army.

Khabalov meticulously adhered to the plan he had worked out. On the
first day, the 23rd, the police operated alone. On the 24th, for the
most part the cavalry was led into the streets, but only to work with
whip and lance. The use of infantry and firearms was to depend on the
further development of events. But events came thick and fast.

On the 25th, the strike spread wider. According to the government’s
figures, 240,000 workers participated that day. The most backward layers
are following up the vanguard. Already a good number of small
establishments are on strike. The streetcars are at a stand. Business
concerns are closed. In the course of the day students of the higher
schools join the strike. By noon tens of thousands of people pour into
the Kazan cathedral and the surrounding streets. Attempts are made to
organise street meetings; a series of armed encounters with the police
occurs. Orators address the crowds around the Alexander III monument.
The mounted police open fire. A speaker falls wounded. Shots from the
crowd kill a police inspector, wound the chief of police and several
other policemen. Bottles, petards and hand grenades are thrown at the
gendarmes. The war has taught this art. The soldiers show indifference,
at times hostility, to the police. It spreads excitedly through the
crowd that when the police opened fire by the Alexander III monument,
the Cossacks let go a volley at the horse “Pharaohs” (such was the
nickname of the police) and the latter had to gallop off. This
apparently was not a legend circulated for self-encouragement, since the
incident, although in different versions, is confirmed from several
sources.

A worker-Bolshevik, Kayurov, one of the authentic leaders in those days,
relates how at one place, within sight of a detachment of Cossacks, the
demonstrators scattered under the whips of the mounted police, and how
he, Kayurov, and several workers with him, instead of following the
fugitives, took off their caps and approached the Cossacks with the
words: “Brothers – Cossacks, help the workers in a struggle for their
peaceable demands; you see how the Pharaohs treat us, hungry workers.
Help us!” This consciously humble manner, those caps in their hands –
what an accurate psychological calculation! Inimitable gesture! The
whole history of street fights and revolutionary victories swarms with
such improvisations. But they are drowned without a trace in the abyss
of great events – the shell remains to the historian, the
generalisation. “The Cossacks glanced at each other in some special
way,” Kayurov continues, “and we were hardly out of the way before they
rushed into the fight.” And a few minutes later, near the station gate,
the crowd were tossing in their arms a Cossack who before their eyes had
slaughtered a police inspector with his sabre.

Soon the police disappear altogether – that is, begin to act secretly.
Then the soldiers appear “bayonets lowered. Anxiously the workers ask
them: “Comrades, you haven’t come to help the police?” A rude “Move
along!” for answer. Another attempt ends the same way. The soldiers are
sullen. A worm is gnawing them, and they cannot stand it when a question
hits the very centre of the pain.

Meanwhile disarmament of the Pharaohs becomes a universal slogan. The
police are fierce, implacable, hated and hating foes. To win them over
is out of the question. Beat them up and kill them. It is different with
the soldiers: the crowd makes every effort to avoid hostile encounters
with them; on the contrary, seeks ways to dispose them in its favour,
convince, attract, fraternise, merge them in itself. In spite of the
auspicious rumours about the Cossacks, perhaps slightly exaggerated, the
crowd’s attitude toward the mounted men remains cautious. A horseman
sits high above the crowd; his soul is separated from the soul of the
demonstrator by the four legs of his beast. A figure at which one must
gaze from below always seems more significant, more threatening. The
infantry are beside one on the pavement – closer, more accessible. The
masses try to get near them, look into their eyes, surround them with
their hot breath. A great role is played by women workers in the
relationship between workers and soldiers. They go up to the cordons
more boldly than men, take hold of the rifles, beseech, almost command:
“Put down your bayonets – join us.” The soldiers are excited, ashamed,
exchange anxious glances, waver; someone makes up his mind first, and
the bayonets rise guiltily above the shoulders of the advancing crowd.
The barrier is opened, a joyous and grateful “Hurrah!” shakes the air.
The soldiers are surrounded. Everywhere arguments, reproaches, appeals –
the revolution makes another forward step.

Nicholas from headquarters sent Khabalov a telegraphic command to put an
end to the disorders “tomorrow.” The czar’s will fell in with the next
step in Khabalov’s “plan,” and the telegram served merely as an extra
stimulus. Tomorrow the troops will say their say. Isn’t it too late? You
can’t tell yet. The question is posed, but far from answered. The
indulgence of the Cossacks, the wavering of certain infantry lines –
these are but much-promising episodes repeated by the thousand voiced
echo of the sensitive street. Enough to inspire the revolutionary crowd,
but too little for victory. Especially since there are episodes of an
opposite kind. In the afternoon a detachment of dragoons, supposedly in
response to revolver shots from the crowd, first opened fire on the
demonstrators near Gostinny Dvor. According to Khabalov’s report to
headquarters three were killed and ten wounded. A serious warning! At
the same time Khabalov issued a threat that all workers registered in
the draft would be sent to the front if they did not go to work before
the 28th. The general issued a three-day ultimatum – that is, he gave
the revolution more time than it needed to overthrow Khabalov and the
monarchy into the bargain. But that will become known only after the
victory. On the evening of the 25th nobody guessed what the next day had
in its womb.

Let us try to get a clearer idea of the inner logic of the movement. On
February 23, under the flag of “Woman’s Day,” began the long-ripe and
long-withheld uprising of the Petrograd working masses. The first step
of the insurrection was the strike. In the course of three days it
broadened and became practically general. This alone gave assurance to
the masses and carried them forward. Becoming more and more aggressive,
the strike merged with the demonstrations, which were bringing the
revolutionary mass face to face with the troops. This raised the problem
as a whole to the higher level where things are solved by force of arms.
The first days brought a number of individual successes, but these were
more symptomatic than substantial.

A revolutionary uprising that spreads over a number of days can develop
victoriously only in case it ascends step by step, and scores one
success after another. A pause in its growth is dangerous; a prolonged
marking of time, fatal. But even successes by themselves are not enough;
the masses must know about them in time, and have time to understand
their value. It is possible to let slip a victory at the very moment
when it is within arm’s reach. This has happened in history.

The first three days were days of uninterrupted increase in the extent
and acuteness of the strife. But for this very reason the movement had
arrived at a level where mere symptomatic successes were not enough. The
entire active mass of the people had come out on the streets. It was
settling accounts with the police successfully and easily. In the last
two days the troops had been drawn into the events – on the second day,
cavalry, on the third, the infantry too. They barred the way, pushed and
crowded back the masses, sometimes connived with them, but almost never
resorted to firearms. Those in command were slow to change their plan,
partly because they under-estimated what was happening – the faulty
vision of the reaction supplemented that of the leaders of the
revolution – partly because they lacked confidence in the troops. But
exactly on the third day, the force of the developing struggle, as well
as the czar’s command, made it necessary for the government to send the
troops into action in dead earnest. The workers understood this,
especially their advance ranks; the dragoons had already done some
shooting the day before. Both sides now faced the issue unequivocally.

On the night of the 26th about a hundred people were arrested in
different parts of the city – people belonging to various revolutionary
organisations, and among them five members of the Petrograd Committee of
the Bolsheviks. This also meant that the government were taking the
offensive. What will happen today? In what mood will the workers wake up
after yesterday’s shooting? And most important: what will the troops
say? The sun of February 26 came up in a fog of uncertainty and acute
anxiety.

In view of the arrest of the Petrograd Committee, the guidance of the
entire work in the city fell into the hands of the Vyborg _rayon_. Maybe
this was just as well. The upper leadership in the party was hopelessly
slow. Only on the morning of the 25th, the, Bureau of the Bolshevik
Central Committee at last decided to issue a handbill calling for an
all-Russian General strike. At the moment of issue, if indeed it ever
did issue, the general strike in Petrograd was facing an armed uprising.
The leaders were watching the movement from above; they hesitated, they
lagged – in other words, they did not lead. They dragged after the
movement.

The nearer one comes to the factories, the greater the decisiveness.
Today however, the 26th, there is anxiety even in the _rayons_. Hungry,
tired, chilled, with a mighty historic responsibility upon their
shoulders, the Vyborg leaders gather outside the city limits, amid
vegetable gardens, to exchange impressions of the day and plan the
course ... of what? Of a new demonstration? But where will an unarmed
demonstration lead, now the government has decided to go the limit? This
question bores into their minds. “One thing seems evident: the
insurrection is dissolving.” Here we recognise the voice of Kayurov,
already familiar to us, and at first it seems hardly his voice. The
barometer falls so low before the storm.

In the hours when hesitation seized even those revolutionists closest to
the mass, the movement itself had gone much farther than its
participants realised. Even the day before, towards evening of the 25th,
the Vyborg side was wholly in the hands of the insurrection. The police
stations were wrecked, individual officers had been killed, and the
majority had fled. The city headquarters had completely lost contact
with the greater part of the capital. On the morning of the 26th it
became evident that not only the Vyborg side, but also Peski almost up
to Liteiny Prospect, was in control of the insurrection. At least so the
police reports defined the situation. And it was true in a sense,
although the revolutionists could hardly realise it: the police in so
many cases abandoned their lairs before there was any threat from the
workers. But even aside from that, ridding the factory districts of the
police could not have decisive significance in the eyes of the workers:
the troops had not yet said their final word. The uprising is
“dissolving,” thought the boldest of the bold. Meanwhile it was only
beginning to develop.

The 26th of February fell on a Sunday; the factories were closed, and
this prevented measuring the strength of the mass pressure in terms of
the extent of the strike. Moreover the workers could not assemble in the
factories, as they had done on the preceding days, and that hindered the
demonstrations. In the morning the Nevsky was quiet. In those hours the
czarina telegraphed the czar: “The city is calm.”

But this calmness does not last long. The workers gradually concentrate,
and move from all suburbs to the centre. They are stopped at the
bridges. They flock across the ice: it is only February and the Neva is
one solid bridge of ice. The firing at their crowds on the ice is not
enough to stop them. They find the city transformed. Posses, cordons,
horse-patrols everywhere. The approaches to the Nevsky are especially
well guarded. Every now and then shots ring out from ambush. The number
of killed and wounded grows. Ambulances dart here and there. You cannot
always tell who is shooting and where the shots come from. One thing is
certain: after their cruel lesson, the police have decided not to expose
themselves again. They shoot from windows, through balcony doors, from
behind columns, from attics. Hypotheses are formed, which easily become
legends. They say that in order to intimidate the demonstrators, many
soldiers are disguised in police uniforms. They say that Protopopov has
placed numerous machine-gun nests in the garrets of houses. A commission
created after the revolution did not discover such nests, but this does
not mean that there were none. However, the police on this day occupy a
subordinate place. The troops come decisively into action. They are
given strict orders to shoot, and the soldiers, mostly training squads –
that is, non-commissioned officers’ regimental schools – do shoot.
According to the official figures, on this day about forty are killed
and as many wounded, not counting those led or carried away by the
crowd. The struggle arrives at a decisive stage. Will the mass ebb
before the lead and flow back to its suburbs? No, it does not ebb. It is
bound to have its own.

Bureaucratic, bourgeois, liberal Petersburg was in a fright. On that day
Rodzianko, the President of the State Duma, demanded that reliable
troops be sent from the front; later he “reconsidered” and recommended
to the War Minister Belyaev that the crowds be dispersed, not with lead,
but with cold water out of a firehose. Belyaev, having consulted General
Khabalov, answered that a dowse of water would produce precisely the
opposite effect “because it excites.” Thus in the liberal and
bureaucratic upper circles they discussed the relative advantages of hot
and cold douches for the people in revolt. Police reports for that day
testify that the firehose was inadequate: “In the course of the
disorders it was observed as a general phenomenon, that the rioting mobs
showed extreme defiance towards the military patrols, at whom, when
asked to disperse, they threw stones and lumps of ice dug up from the
street. When preliminary shots were fired into the air, the crowd not
only did not disperse but answered these volleys with laughter. Only
when loaded cartridges were fired into the very midst of the crowd, was
it found possible to disperse the mob, the participants in which,
however, would most of them hide in the yards of nearby houses, and as
soon as the shooting stopped come out again into the street.” This
police report shows that the temperature of the masses had risen very
high. To be sure, it is hardly probable that the crowd would have begun
of itself to bombard the troops – even the training squads – with stones
and ice: that would too much contradict the psychology of the
insurrectionary masses, and the wise strategy they had shown with regard
to the army. For the sake of supplementary justification for mass
murders, the colours in the report are not exactly what they were, and
are not laid on the way they were, in actual fact. But the essentials
are reported truly and with remarkable vividness: the masses will no
longer retreat, they resist with optimistic brilliance, they stay on the
street even after murderous volleys, they cling, not to their lives, but
to the pavement, to stones, to pieces of ice. The crowd is not only
bitter, but audacious. This is because, in spite of the shooting, it
keeps its faith in the army. It counts on victory and intends to have it
at any cost.

The pressure of the workers upon the army is increasing – countering the
pressure from the side of the authorities. The Petrograd garrison comes
into the focus of events. The expectant period, which has lasted almost
three days, during which it was possible for the main mass of the
garrison to keep up friendly neutrality toward the insurrection, has
come to an end. “Shoot the enemy!” the monarchy commands. “Don’t shoot
your brothers and sisters!” cry the workers. And not only that: “Come
with us!” Thus in the streets and squares, by the bridges, at the
barrack-gates, is waged a ceaseless struggle now dramatic, now
unnoticeable – but always a desperate struggle, for the heart of the
soldier. In this struggle, in these sharp contacts between working men
and women and the soldiers, under the steady crackling of rifles and
machine-guns, the fate of the government, of the war, of the country, is
being decided.

The shooting of demonstrators increased the uncertainty among the
leaders. The very scale of the movement began to seem dangerous. Even at
the meeting of the Vyborg committee on the evening of the 26th – that
is, twelve hours before the victory – arose discussions as to whether it
was not time to end the strike. This may seem astonishing. But remember,
it is far easier to recognise victory the day after, than the day
before. Besides, moods change frequently under the impact of events and
the news of them. Discouragement quickly gives way to a flow of
enthusiasm. Kayurovs and Chugurins have plenty of personal courage, but
at moments a feeling of responsibility for the masses clutches them.
Among the rank-and-file workers there were fewer oscillations. Reports
about their moods were made to the authorities by a well informed agent
in the Bolshevik organisation, Shurkanov. “Since the army units have not
opposed the crowd,” wrote this provocateur, “and in individual cases
have even taken measures paralysing the initiative of the police
officers, the masses have got a sense of impunity, and now, after two
days of unobstructed walking the streets, when the revolutionary circles
have advanced the slogans “Down with war” and “Down with the autocracy!”
the people have become convinced that the revolution has begun, that
success is with the masses, that the authorities are powerless to
suppress the movement because the troops are with it, that a decisive
victory is near, since the troops will soon openly join the side of the
revolutionary forces, that the movement begun will not subside, but will
ceaselessly grow to a complete victory and a state revolution.” A
characterisation remarkable for compactness and clarity! The report is a
most valuable historic document. This did not, of course, prevent the
victorious workers from executing its author.

These provocateurs, whose number was enormous, especially in Petrograd,
feared, more than anyone else did, the victory of the revolution. They
followed a policy of their own: in the Bolshevik conferences Shurkanov
defended the most extreme actions; in his reports to the secret police
he suggested the necessity of a decisive resort to firearms. It is
possible that with this aim, Shurkanov tried even to exaggerate the
aggressive confidence of the workers. But in the main he was right –
events would soon confirm his judgement.

The leaders in both camps guessed and vacillated, for not one of them
could estimate _a priori_ the relation of forces. External indications
ceased absolutely to serve as a measure. Indeed one of the chief
features of a revolutionary crisis consists in this sharp contradiction
between the present consciousness and the old forms of social
relationship. A new relation of forces was mysteriously implanting
itself in the consciousness of the workers and soldiers. It was
precisely the government’s offensive, called forth by the previous
offensive of the revolutionary masses, which transformed the new
relation of forces from a potential to an active state. The worker
looked thirstily and commandingly into the eyes of the soldier, and the
soldier anxiously and diffidently looked away. This meant that, in a
way, the soldier could no longer answer for himself. The worker
approached the soldier more boldly. The soldier sullenly, but without
hostility – guiltily rather – refused to answer. Or sometimes now more
and more often – he answered with pretended severity in order to conceal
how anxiously his heart was beating in his breast. Thus the change was
accomplished. The soldier was clearly shaking off his soldiery. In doing
so he could not immediately recognise himself. The authorities said that
the revolution intoxicated the soldier. To the soldier it seemed, on the
contrary, that he was sobering up from the opium of the barracks. Thus
the decisive day was prepared – the 27th of February.

However, on the eve of that day an incident occurred which in spite of
its episodic nature paints with a new colour all the events of the 26th.
Towards evening the fourth company of the Pavlovsky regiment of the
Imperial Guard mutinied. In the written report of a police inspector the
cause of the mutiny is categorically stated: “Indignation against the
training squad of the same regiment which, while on duty in the Nevsky,
fired on the crowd.” Who informed the fourth company of this? A record
has been accidentally preserved. About two o’clock in the afternoon, a
handful of workers ran up to the barracks of the Pavlovsky regiment.
Interrupting each other, they told about a shooting on the Nevsky. “Tell
your comrades that the Pavlovtsi, too, are shooting at us – we saw
soldiers in your uniform on the Nevsky.” That was a burning reproach, a
flaming appeal. “All looked distressed and pale.”

The seed fell not upon the rock. By six o’clock the fourth company had
left the barracks without permission under the command of a
non-commissioned officer – Who was he? His name is drowned forever among
hundreds and thousands of equally heroic names – and marched to the
Nevsky to recall its training squad. This was not a mere soldiers’
mutiny over wormy meat; it was an act of high revolutionary initiative.
On their way down, the company had an encounter with a detachment of
mounted police. The soldiers opened fire. One policeman and one horse
were killed; another policeman and another horse were wounded. The
further path of the mutineers in the hurricane of the streets is
unknown. The company returned to the barracks and aroused the entire
regiment. But their arms had been hidden. According to some sources,
they nevertheless got hold of thirty rifles. They were soon surrounded
by the Preobrazhentsi. Nineteen Pavlovtsi were arrested and imprisoned
in the fortress; the rest surrendered. According to other information,
the officers on that evening found twenty-one soldiers with rifles
missing. A dangerous leak! These twenty-one soldiers would be seeking
allies and defenders all night long. Only the victory of the revolution
could save them. The workers would surely learn from them what had
happened. This was not a bad omen for tomorrow’s battles.

Nabokov, one of the most prominent liberal leaders, whose truthful
memoirs seem at times to be the very diary of his party and of his
class, was returning home from a visit at one o’clock in the morning
along the dark and watchful streets. He was “perturbed and filled with
dark forebodings.” It is possible that at one of the crossings he met a
fugitive Pavlovetz. Both hurried past: they had nothing to say to each
other. In the workers’ quarters and the barracks some kept watch or
conferred, others slept the half-sleep of the bivouac, or dreamed
feverishly about tomorrow. Here the fugitive Pavlovetz found shelter.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

How scant are the records of the mass fighting in the February days –
scant even in comparison with the slim records of the October fights. In
October the party directed the insurrection from day to day; in its
articles, proclamations, and reports, at least the external continuity
of the struggle is recorded. Not so in February. The masses had almost
no leadership from above. The newspapers were silenced by the strike.
Without a look back, the masses made their own history. To reconstruct a
living picture of the things that happened in the streets, is almost
unthinkable. It would be well if we could recreate at least the general
continuity and inner order of events.

The government, which had not yet lost hold of the machinery of power,
observed the events on the whole even less ably than the left parties,
which, as we know, were far from brilliant in this direction. After the
“successful” shootings of the 26th, the ministers took heart for an
instant. At dawn of the 27th Protopopov reassuringly reported that,
according to information received, “part of the workers intend to return
to work.” But the workers never thought of going back to the shops.
Yesterday’s shootings and failures had not discouraged the masses. How
explain this? Apparently the losses were out-balanced by certain gains.
Pouring through the streets, colliding with the enemy, pulling at the
arms of soldiers, crawling under horses’ bellies, attacking, scattering,
leaving their corpses on the crossings, grabbing a few firearms,
spreading the news, catching at rumours, the insurrectionary mass
becomes a collective entity with numberless eyes, ears and antennae. At
night, returning home from the arena of struggle to the workers’
quarter, it goes over the impressions of the day, and sifting away what
is petty and accidental, casts its own thoughtful balance. On the night
of the 27th, this balance was practically identical with the report made
to the authorities by the provocateur, Shurkanov.

In the morning the workers streamed again to the factories, and in open
meetings resolved to continue the struggle. Especially resolute, as
always, were the Vyborgtsi. But in other districts too these morning
meetings were enthusiastic. To continue the struggle! But what would
that mean to day? The general strike had issued in revolutionary
demonstrations by immense crowds, and the demonstrations had led to a
collision with the troops. To continue the struggle to day would mean to
summon an armed insurrection. But nobody had formulated this summons. It
had grown irresistibly out of the events, but it was never placed on the
order of the day by a revolutionary party.

The art of revolutionary leadership in its most critical moments
consists nine-tenths in knowing how to sense the mood of the masses –
just as Kayurov detected the movement of the Cossackís eyebrow, though
on a larger scale. An unexcelled ability to detect the mood of the
masses was Lenin’s great power. But Lenin was not in Petrograd. The
legal and semi-legal “socialistic” staffs, Kerensky, Cheidze, Skobelev,
and all those who circled around them, pronounced warnings and opposed
the movement. But even the central Bolshevik staff, composed of
Shliapnikov, Zalutsky and Molotov was amazing in its helplessness and
lack of initiative. In fact, the districts and barracks were left to
themselves. The first proclamation to the army was released only on the
26th by one of the Social Democratic organisations close to the
Bolsheviks. This proclamation, rather hesitant in character – not even
containing an appeal to come over to the people – was distributed
throughout all the city districts on the morning of the 27th. “However,”
testifies Yurenev, the leader of this organisation, “the tempo of the
revolutionary events was such that our slogans were already lagging
behind it. By the time the leaflets had penetrated into the thick of the
troops, the latter had already come over.” As for the Bolshevik centre –
Shliapnikov, at the demand of Chugurin, one of the best worker-leaders
of the February days, finally wrote an appeal to the soldiers on the
morning of the 27th. Was it even published? At best it might have come
in at the finish. It could not possibly have influenced the events of
February 27. We must lay it down as a general rule for those days that
the higher the leaders, the further they lagged behind.

But the insurrection, not yet so named by anyone, took its own place on
the order of the day. All the thoughts of the workers were concentrated
on the army. “Don’t you think we can get them started?” Today haphazard
agitation would no longer do. The Vyborg section staged a meeting near
the barracks of the Moscow regiment. The enterprise proved a failure. Is
it difficult for some officer or sergeant major to work the handle of a
machine gun? The workers were scattered by cruel fire. A similar attempt
was made at the barracks of Reserve regiment. And there too: officers
with machine guns interfered between the workers and soldiers. The
leaders of the workers fumed, looked for firearms, demanded them from
the party. And the answer was: “The soldiers have the firearms, go get
them.” That they knew themselves. But how to get them? Isn’t everything
going to collapse all at once to day? Thus came on the critical point of
the struggle. Either the machine gun will wipe out the insurrection, or
the insurrection will capture the machine gun.

In his recollections, Shliapnikov, the chief figure in the Petrograd
centre of the Bolsheviks, tells how he refused the demands of the
workers for firearms – or even revolvers – sending them to the barracks
to get them. He wished in this way to avoid bloody clashes between
workers and soldiers, staking everything on agitation – that is, on the
conquest of the soldiers by work and example. We know of no other
testimony which confirms or refutes this statement of a prominent leader
of those days – a statement which testifies to side-stepping rather than
foresight. It would be simpler to confess that the leaders had no
firearms.

There is no doubt that the fate of every revolution at a certain point
is decided by a break in the disposition of the army. Against a
numerous, disciplined, well-armed and ably led military force, unarmed
or almost unarmed masses of the people cannot possibly gain a victory.
But no deep national crisis can fail to affect the army to some extent.
Thus along with the conditions of a truly popular revolution there
develops a possibility – not, of course, a guarantee – of its victory.
However, the going over of the army to the insurrection does not happen
of itself, nor as a result of mere agitation. The army is heterogeneous,
and its antagonistic elements are held together by the terror of
discipline. On the very eve of the decisive hour, the revolutionary
soldiers do not know how much power they have, or what influence they
can exert. The working masses, of course, are also heterogeneous. But
they have immeasurably more opportunity for testing their ranks in the
process of preparation for the decisive encounter. Strikes, meetings,
demonstrations, are not only acts in the struggle, but also measures of
its force. The whole mass does not participate in the strike. Not all
the strikers are ready to fight. In the sharpest moments the most daring
appear in the streets. The hesitant, the tired, the conservative, sit at
home. Here a revolutionary selection takes place of itself; people are
sifted through the sieve of events. It is otherwise with the army. The
revolutionary soldiers – sympathetic, wavering or antagonistic – are all
tied together by a compulsory discipline whose threads are held, up to
the last moment, in the officer’s fist. The soldiers are told off daily
into first and second files, but how are they to be divided into
rebellious and obedient?

The psychological moment when the soldiers go over to the revolution is
prepared by a long molecular process, which, like other processes of
nature, has its point of climax. But how determine this point? A
military unit may be wholly prepared to join the people, but may not
receive the needed stimulus. The revolutionary leadership does not yet
believe in the possibility of having the army on its side, and lets slip
the victory. After this ripened but unrealised mutiny, a reaction may
seize the army. The soldiers lose the hope which flared in their
breasts; they bend their necks again to the yoke of discipline, and in a
new encounter with the workers, especially at a distance, will stand
opposed to the insurrection. In this process there are many elements
imponderable or difficult to weigh, many crosscurrents, collective
suggestions and autosuggestions. But out of this complicated web of
material and psychic forces one conclusion emerges with irrefutable
clarity: the more the soldiers in their mass are convinced that the
rebels are really rebelling – that this is not a demonstration after
which they will have to go back to the barracks and report, that this is
a struggle to the death, that the people may win if they join them, and
that this winning will not only guarantee impunity, but alleviate the
lot of all – the more they realise this, the more willing they are to
turn aside their bayonets, or go over with them to the people. In other
words, the revolutionists can create a break in the soldiers’ mood only
if they themselves are actually ready to seize the victory at any price
whatever, even the price of blood. And the highest determination never
can, or will, remain unarmed.

The critical hour of contact between the pushing crowd and the soldiers
who bar their way has its critical minute. That is when the grey barrier
has not yet given way, still holds together shoulder to shoulder, but
already wavers, and the officer, gathering his last strength of will,
gives the command: “Fire!” The cry of the crowd, the yell of terror and
threat, drowns the command, but not wholly. The rifles waver. The crowd
pushes. Then the officer points the barrel of his revolver at the most
suspicious soldier. From the decisive minute now stands out the decisive
second. The death of the boldest soldier, to whom the others have
involuntarily looked for guidance, a shot into the crowd by a corporal
from the dead man’s rifle, and the barrier closes, the guns go off of
themselves, scattering the crowd into the alleys and backyards. But how
many times since 1905 it has happened otherwise! At the critical moment,
when the officer is ready to pull the trigger, a shot from the crowd –
which has its Kayurovs and Chugurins – forestalls him. This decides not
only the fate of the street skirmish, but perhaps the whole day, or the
whole insurrection.

The task which Shliapnikov set himself of protecting the workers from
hostile clashes with the troops by not giving firearms to the
insurrectionists, could not in any case be carried out. Before it came
to these clashes with the troops, innumerable clashes had occurred with
the police. The street fighting began with the disarming of the hated
Pharaohs, their revolvers passing into the hands of the rebels. The
revolver by itself is a weak, almost toy-like weapon against the
muskets, rifles, machine guns and cannon of the enemy. But are these
weapons genuinely in the hands of the enemy? To settle this question the
workers demanded arms. It was a psychological question. But even in an
insurrection psychic processes are inseparable from material ones. The
way to the soldier’s rifle leads through the revolver taken from the
Pharaoh.

The feelings of the soldiers in those hours were less active than those
of the workers, but not less deep. Let us recall again that the garrison
consisted mainly of reserve battalions many thousands strong, destined
to fill up the ranks of those at the front. These men, most of them
fathers of families, had the prospect of going to the trenches when the
war was lost and the country ruined. They did not want war, they wanted
to go home to their farms. They knew well enough what was going on at
court, and had not the slightest feeling of attachment to the monarchy.
They did not want to fight with the Germans, and still less with the
Petrograd workers. They hated the ruling class of the capital, who had
been having a good time during the war. Among them were workers with a
revolutionary past, who knew how to give a generalised expression to all
these moods.

To bring the soldiers from a deep but as yet hidden revolutionary
discontent to overt mutinous action – or, at least, first to a mutinous
refusal to act – that was the task. On the third day of the struggle the
soldiers totally ceased to be able to maintain a benevolent neutrality
toward the insurrection. Only accidental fragments of what happened in
those hours along the line of contact between workers and soldiers have
come down to us. We heard how yesterday the workers complained
passionately to the Pavlovsky regiment about the behaviour of its
training squad. Such scenes, conversations, reproaches, appeals, were
occurring in every corner of the city. The soldiers had no more time for
hesitation. They were compelled to shoot yesterday, and they would be
again to day. The workers will not surrender or retreat; under fire they
are still holding their own. And with them their women – wives, mothers,
sisters, sweethearts. Yes, and this is the very hour they had so often
whispered about: “If only we could all get together ...” And the moment
of supreme agony, in the unbearable fear of the coming day, the choking
hatred of those who are imposing upon them the executioner’s role, there
ring out in the barrack room the first voices of open indignation, and
in those voices – to be forever nameless – the whole army with relief
and rapture recognises itself. Thus dawned upon the earth the day of
destruction of the Romanov monarchy.

At a morning conference in the home of the indefatigable Kayurov, where
over forty shop and factory representatives had assembled, a majority
spoke for continuing the movement. A majority, but not all. Too bad we
cannot establish what majority, but in those hours there was no time for
records. Anyway, the decision was belated. The meeting was interrupted
by the intoxicating news of the soldiers’ insurrection and the opening
of the gaols. Shurkanov kissed all those present. A kiss of Judas, but
not, fortunately, to be followed by a crucifixion.

One after another, from early morning, the Reserve Guard battalions
mutinied before they were led out of the barracks, continuing what the
4th Company of the Pavlovsky regiment had begun the day before. In the
documents, records, memoirs, this grandiose event of human history has
left but a pale, dim imprint. The oppressed masses, even when they rise
to the very heights of creative action, tell little of themselves and
write less. And the overpowering rapture of the victory later erases
memory’s work. Let us take up what records there are.

The soldiers of the Volynsky regiment were the first to revolt. As early
as seven o’clock in the morning a battalion commander disturbed Khabalov
with a telephone call and this threatening news: the training squad –
that is, the unit especially relied on to put down the insurrection –
had refused to march out, its commander was killed, or had shot himself
in front of the troops. The latter version, by the way, was soon
rejected. Having burned their bridges behind them, the Volintzi hastened
to broaden the base of the insurrection. In that lay their only
salvation. They rushed into the neighbouring barracks of the Litovsky
and Preobrazhensky regiments “calling out” the soldiers, as strikers go
from factory to factory calling out the workers. Some time after,
Khabalov received a report that the Volynsky regiment had not only
refused to surrender their rifles when ordered by the general, but
together with the Litovsky and Preobrazhensky regiments – and what is
even more alarming, “having joined the workers” – had wrecked the
barracks of the political police. This meant that yesterday’s experiment
of the Pavlovtsi had not been in vain: the insurrection had found
leaders, and at the same time a plan of action.

In the early hours of the 27th, the workers thought the solution of the
problem of the insurrection infinitely more distant than it really was.
It would be truer to say that they saw the problem as almost entirely
ahead of them, when it was really, nine-tenths behind. The revolutionary
pressure of the workers on the barracks fell in with the existing
revolutionary movement of the soldiers to the streets. During the day
these two mighty currents united to wash out clean and carry away the
walls, the roof, and later the whole groundwork of the old structure.

Chugurin was among the first to appear at the Bolshevik headquarters, a
rifle in his hands, a cartridge belt over his shoulder, “all spattered
up, but beaming and triumphant.” Why shouldn’t he beam? Soldiers with
rifles in their hands are coming over to us! In some places the workers
had succeeded in uniting with the soldiers, penetrating the barracks and
receiving rifles and cartridges. The Vyborgtsi[2] together with the most
daring of the soldiers, outlined a plan of action: seize the police
stations where the armed police have entrenched themselves; disarm all
policemen; free the workers held in the police stations, and the
political prisoners in the gaols; rout the government troops in the city
proper; unite with the still inactive troops and with the workers of
other districts.

The Moscow regiment joined the uprising not without inner struggle.
Amazing that there was so little struggle among the regiments. The
monarchist command impotently fell away from the soldier mass, and
either hid in the cracks or hastened to change its colours. “At two
o’clock,” remembers Korolev, a worker from the “Arsenal” factory, “when
the Moscow regiment marched out, we armed ourselves ... We took a
revolver and rifle apiece, picked out a group of soldiers who came up
(some of them asked us to take command and tell them what to do), and
set out for Tikhvinskaia street to shoot up the police station.” The
workers, it seems, did not have a moment’s trouble telling the soldiers
“what to do.”

One after another came the joyful reports of victories. Our own armoured
cars have appeared! With red flags flying, they are spreading terror
through the districts to all who have not yet submitted. Now it will no
longer be necessary to crawl under the belly of a Cossack’s horse. The
revolution is standing up to its full height.

Toward noon Petrograd again became the field of military action; rifles
and machine guns rang out everywhere. It was not easy to tell who was
shooting or where. One thing was clear: the past and the future were
exchanging shots. There was much casual firing; young boys were shooting
off revolvers unexpectedly acquired. The arsenal was wrecked. “They say
that several tens of thousands of Brownings alone were carried off” From
the burning buildings of the District Court and the police stations
pillars of smoke rolled to the sky. At some points clashes and
skirmishes thickened into real battles. On Sampsonievsky boulevard the
workers came up to a barrack occupied by the bicycle men, some of whom
crowded into the gate.” Why don’t you get on the move, comrades?” The
soldiers smiled “not a good smile,” one of the participants testifies
and remained silent, while the officers rudely commanded the workers to
move on. The bicyclists, along with the cavalry, proved to be the most
conservative part of the army in the February, as in the October
revolution. A crowd of workers and revolutionary soldiers soon gathered
round the fence. “We must pull out the suspicious battalion!” Someone
reported that the armoured cars had been sent for; perhaps there was no
other way of getting these bicyclists, who had set up the machine guns.
But it is hard for a crowd to wait; it is anxiously impatient, and quite
right in its impatience. Shots rang out from both sides. But the board
fence stood in the way, dividing the soldiers from the revolution. The
attackers decided to break down the fence. They broke down part of it
and set fire to the rest. About twenty barracks came into view. The
bicyclists were concentrated in two or three of them. The empty barracks
were set fire to at once. Six years later Kayurov would recall: “The
flaming barracks and the wreckage of the fence around them, the fire of
machine guns and rifles, the excited faces of the besiegers, a truck
load of armed revolutionists dashing up, and finally an armoured car
arriving with its gleaming gun mouths, made a memorable and magnificent
picture.” This was the old czarist, feudal, priestly, police Russia
burning down, barracks and fences and all, expiring in fire and smoke,
spewing out its soul with the cough of machine-gun shots. No wonder
Kayurov, and tens, hundreds, thousands of Kayurovs, rejoiced! The
arriving armoured car fired several shells at the barracks where the
bicyclists and officers were barricaded. The commander was killed. The
officers, tearing off their epaulets and other insignia, fled through
the vegetable gardens adjoining the barracks; the rest gave themselves
up. This was probably the biggest encounter of the day.

The military revolt had meanwhile become epidemic. Only those did not
mutiny that day who did not get around to it. Toward evening the
Semenovsky regiment joined in, a regiment notorious for its brutal
putting down of the Moscow uprising of 1905. Eleven years had not passed
in vain. Together with the chasseurs, the Semenovtsi late at night
“called out” the Izmailovtsi, whom the command were holding locked up in
their barracks. This regiment, which on December 3, 1905 had surrounded
and arrested the first Petrograd soviet, was even now considered one of
the most backward.

The czarist garrison of the capital, numbering 150,000 soldiers, was
dwindling, melting, disappearing. By night it no longer existed.

After the morning’s news of the revolt of the regiments, Khabalov still
tried to offer resistance, sending against the revolution a composite
regiment of about a thousand men with the most drastic orders. But the
fate of that regiment has become quite a mystery. “Something impossible
begins to happen on that day,” the incomparable Khabalov relates after
the revolution, “... the regiment starts, starts under a brave, a
resolute officer (meaning Colonel Kutyepov), but ... there are no
results.” Companies sent after that regiment also vanished, leaving no
trace. The general began to draw up reserves on Palace Square, “but
there were no cartridges and nowhere to get them.” This is taken from
Khabalov’s authentic testimony before the Commission of Inquiry of the
Provisional Government. What became of the punitive regiments? It is not
hard to guess that as soon as they marched out they were drowned in the
insurrection. Workers, women, youths, rebel soldiers, swarmed around
Khabalov’s troops on all sides, either considering the regiment their
own or striving to make it so, and did not let them move any way but
with the multitude. To fight with this thick swarming, inexhaustible,
all-penetrating mass, which now feared nothing, was as easy as to fence
in dough.

Together with reports of more and more military revolts, came demands
for reliable troops to put down the rebels, to defend the telephone
building, the Litovsky Castle, the Mariinsky Palace, and other even more
sacred places. Khabalov demanded by telephone that loyal troops be sent
from Kronstadt, but the commandant replied that he himself feared for
the fortress. Khabalov did not yet know that the insurrection had spread
to the neighbouring garrisons. The general attempted, or pretended to
attempt, to convert the Winter Palace into a redoubt, but the plan was
immediately abandoned as unrealisable, and the last handful of “loyal”
troops was transferred to the Admiralty. Here at last the dictator
occupied himself with a most important and urgent business – he printed
for publication the last two governmental decrees on the retirement of
Protopopov “owing to illness,” and on the state of siege in Petrograd.
With the latter he really had to hurry, for several hours later
Khabalov’s army lifted the “siege” and departed from the Admiralty for
their homes. It was due only to ignorance that the revolution had not
already on the evening of the 27th arrested this formidably empowered
but not at all formidable general. This was done without any
complications the next day.

Can it be that that was the whole resistance put up by the redoubtable
Russian Empire in the face of mortal danger? Yet that was about all – in
spite of its great experience in crushing the people and its
meticulously elaborated plans. When they came to themselves later, the
monarchists explained the case of the February victory of the people by
the peculiar character of the Petrograd garrison. But the whole further
course of the revolution refutes this explanation. True, at the
beginning of the fatal year, the camarilla had already suggested to the
czar the advisability of renovating the garrison. The czar had easily
allowed himself to be persuaded that the cavalry of the Guard,
considered especially loyal, “had been under fire long enough” and had
earned a rest in its Petrograd barracks. However, after respectful
representations from the front, the czar agreed that four regiments of
the cavalry Guard should be replaced by three crews of the naval Guard.
According to Protopopov’s version, this replacement was made by the
command without the czar’s consent, and with treacherous design: “...
The sailors are recruited from among the workers and constitute the most
revolutionary element of the forces.” But this is sheer nonsense. The
highest officers of the Guard, and particularly the cavalry, were simply
cutting out too good a career for themselves at the front to want to
come back. Besides that, they must have thought with some dread of the
punitive functions to be allotted to them. In these they would be at the
head of troops totally different after their experience at the front
from what they used to be on the parade grounds of the capital. As
events at the front soon proved, the horse Guard at this time no longer
differed from the rest of the cavalry, and the naval Guard, which was
transferred to the capital, did not play an active part in the February
revolution. The whole truth is that the fabric of the régime had
completely decayed; there was not a live thread left.

During the 27th of February the crowd liberated without bloodshed from
the many gaols of the capital, all political prisoners – among them the
patriotic group of the Military and Industrial Committee, which had been
arrested on the 26th of January, and the members of the Petrograd
Committee of the Bolsheviks, seized by Khabalov forty hours earlier. A
political division occurred immediately outside the prison gates. The
Menshevik-patriots set out for the Duma, where functions and places were
to be assigned; the Bolsheviks marched to the districts, to the workers
and soldiers, to finish with them the conquest of the capital. The enemy
must have no time to breathe. A revolution, more than any other
enterprise, has to be carried through to the end.

It is impossible to say who thought of leading the mutinous troops to
the Tauride Palace. This political line of march was dictated by the
whole situation. Naturally all the elements of radicalism not bound up
with the masses gravitated toward the Tauride Palace as the centre of
oppositional information. Quite probably these elements, having
experienced on the 27th a sudden injection of vital force, became the
guides of the mutinous soldiers. This was an honourable role and now
hardly a dangerous one. In view of its location, Potemkin’s palace was
well fitted to be the centre of the revolution. The Tauride is separated
by just one street from the whole military community, containing the
barracks of the Guard and a series of military institutions. It is true
that for many years this part of the city was considered both by the
government and the revolutionists to be the military stronghold of the
monarchy. And so it was. But now everything had changed. The soldiers’
rebellion had begun in the Guard sector. The mutinous troops had only to
cross the street in order to reach the park of the Tauride Palace, which
in turn was only one block from the Neva River. And beyond the Neva lies
the Vyborg district, the very cauldron of the revolution. The workers
need only cross Alexander’s Bridge, or if that is up, walk over the ice
of the river, to reach the Guards’ barracks or the Tauride Palace. Thus
the heterogeneous, and in its origins contradictory, north east triangle
of Petrograd – the Guards, Potemkin’s palace, and the giant factories –
closely interlocked –became the field of action of the revolution.

In the Tauride Palace various centres are already created, or at least
sketched out – among them the field staff of the insurrection. It has no
very serious character. The revolutionary officers – that is, those
officers who had somehow or other, even though by mistake, got connected
with the revolution in the past, but who have safely slept through the
insurrection – hasten after the victory to call attention to themselves,
or upon summons from others arrive “to serve the revolution.” They
survey the situation with profound thought and pessimistically shake
their heads. These tumultuous crowds of soldiers, often unarmed, are
totally unfit for battle. No artillery, no machine guns, no
communications, no commanders. One strong regiment is all the enemy
needs! To be sure, just now the revolutionary crowds prevent any planned
manoeuvres in the streets. But the workers will go home for the night,
the residents will quiet down, the town will be emptied. If Khabalov
were to strike with a strong regiment at the barracks, he might become
master of the situation. This idea, by the way, will meet us in
different versions throughout all the stages of the revolution. “Give me
a strong regiment,” gallant colonels will more than once exclaim to
their friends, “and in two seconds I will clean up all this mess!” And
some of them, as we shall see, will make the attempt. But they will all
have to repeat Khabalov’s words: “The regiment starts, starts under a
brave officer, but ... there are no results.”

Yes, and how could there be results? The most reliable of all possible
forces had been the police and the gendarmes, and the training squads of
certain regiments. But these proved as pitiful before the assault of the
real masses as the Battalion of St. George and the officers’ training
schools were to prove eight months later in October. Where could the
monarchy get that salvation regiment, ready and able to enter a
prolonged and desperate duel with a city of two million? The revolution
seems defenceless to these verbally so enterprising colonels, because it
is still terrifically chaotic. Everywhere aimless movements, conflicting
currents, whirlpools of people, individuals astounded as though suddenly
gone deaf, unfastened trench coats, gesticulating students, soldiers
without rifles, rifles without soldiers, boys firing into the air, a
thousand-voiced tumult, hurricanes of wild rumour, false alarms, false
rejoicing. Enough, you would think, to lift a sword over all that chaos,
and it would scatter apart and leave never a trace. But that is a crude
error of vision. It is only seeming chaos. Beneath it is proceeding an
irresistible crystallisation of the masses around new axes. These
innumerable crowds have not yet clearly defined what they want, but they
are saturated with an acid hatred of what they do not want. Behind them
is an irreparable historic avalanche. There is no way back. Even if
there were someone to scatter them, they would be gathering again in an
hour, and the second flood would be more furious and bloodier than the
first. After the February days the atmosphere of Petrograd becomes so
red hot that every hostile military detachment arriving in that mighty
forge, or even coming near to it, scorched by its breath, is
transformed, loses confidence, becomes paralysed, and throws itself upon
the mercy of the victor without a struggle. Tomorrow General Ivanov,
sent from the front by the czar with a battalion of the. Knights of St.
George, will find this out. In five months the same fate will befall
General Kornilov, and in eight months it will happen to Kerensky.

On the streets in the preceding days the Cossacks had seemed the most
open to persuasion; it was because they were the most abused. But when
it came to the actual insurrection, the cavalry once more justified its
conservative reputation and lagged behind the infantry. On the 27th, it
was still preserving the appearance of watchful neutrality. Though
Khabalov no longer relied upon it, the revolution still feared it.

The fortress of Peter and Paul, which stands on an island in the Neva
opposite the Winter Palace and the palaces of the grand dukes, remained
a puzzle. Behind its walls the garrison of the fortress was, or seemed
to be, a little world completely shielded from outside influences. The
fortress had no permanent artillery except for that antiquated cannon
which daily announced the noon hour to Petrograd. But today field guns
are set up on the walls and aimed at the bridge. What are they getting
ready for? The Tauride staff has worried all night what to do about the
fortress, and in the fortress they were worrying what will the
revolution do with us? By morning the puzzle is solved: “On condition
that officers remain inviolable,” the fortress will surrender to the
Tauride Palace. Having analysed the situation – not so difficult a thing
to do – the officers of the fort hastened to forestall the inevitable
march of events.

Towards evening of the 27th, a stream of soldiers, workers, students and
miscellaneous people flows toward the Tauride Palace. Here they hope to
find those who know everything – to get information and instructions.
From all sides ammunition is being carried by armfuls into the palace,
and deposited in a room that has been converted into an arsenal. At
nightfall, the revolutionary staff settles down to work. It sends out
detachments to guard the railway stations, and despatches reconnoitring
squads wherever danger lurks. The soldiers carry out eagerly and without
a murmur, although very unsystematically, the orders of the new
authorities. But they always demand a written order. The initiative in
this probably came from the fragments of the military staff which had
remained with the troops, or from the military clerks. But they were
right; it is necessary to bring order immediately into the chaos. The
staff, as well as the new born Soviet, had as yet no seals. The
revolution has still to fit itself out with the implements of
bureaucratic management. In time this will be done – alas, too well.

The revolution begins a search for enemies. Arrests are made all over
the city – “arbitrarily,” as the liberals will say reproachfully later.
But the whole revolution is arbitrary. Streams of people are brought
into the Tauride under arrest – such people as the Chairman of the State
Council, ministers, policemen, secret service men, the “pro-German”
countess, whole broods of gendarme officers. Several statesmen, such as
Protopopov, will come of their own volition to be arrested: it is safer
so. “The walls of the chamber which had resounded to hymns in praise of
absolutism, now heard but sobbing and sighs,” the countess will
subsequently relate. “An arrested general sank down exhausted on a
nearby chair. Several members of the Duma kindly offered me a cup of
tea. Shaken to the depths of his soul, the general was saying excitedly:
Countess, we are witnessing the death of a great country.”

Meanwhile, the great country, which had no intention of dying, marched
by these people of the past, stamping its boots, clanging the butts of
its rifles, rending the air with its shouts, and stepping all over their
feet. A revolution is always distinguished by impoliteness, probably
because the ruling classes did not take the trouble in good season to
teach the people fine manners.

The Tauride became the temporary field headquarters, governmental
centre, arsenal, and prison-fortress of the revolution, which had not
yet wiped the blood and sweat from its face. Into this whirlpool some
enterprising enemies also made their way. A disguised captain of
gendarmes was accidentally discovered taking down notes in a corner –
not for history, but for the court-martials. The soldiers and workers
wanted to end him right there. But people from the “staff” interfered,
and easily led the gendarme out of the crowd. The revolution was then
still good-natured, trustful and kind-hearted. It will become ruthless
only after a long series of treasons, deceits and bloody trials.

The first night of the triumphant revolution was full of alarms. The
improvised commissars of the railway terminals and other points, most of
them chosen haphazard from the intelligentsia through personal
connection, upstarts and chance acquaintances of the revolution –
non-commissioned officers, especially of worker origin, would have been
more useful – got nervous, saw danger on all sides, nagged the soldiers
and ceaselessly telephoned to the Tauride asking for reinforcements. But
in the Tauride too they were nervous. They were telephoning. They were
sending out reinforcements which for the most part did not arrive.
“Those who receive orders,” said a member of the Tauride night staff,
“do not execute them; those who act, act without orders.”

The workers’ districts act without orders. The Revolutionary chiefs who
have led out their factories, seized the police stations, “called out”
the soldiers and wrecked the strongholds of the counter-revolution, do
not hurry to the Tauride Palace, to the staffs, to the administrative
centres. On the contrary, they jerk their heads in that direction with
irony and distrust: “Those brave boys are getting in early to divide the
game they didn’t kill – before it’s even killed.” Worker-Bolsheviks, as
well as the best workers of the other Left parties, spend their days on
the streets, their nights in the district headquarters, keeping in touch
with the barracks and preparing tomorrow’s work. On the first night of
victory they continue, and they enlarge, the same work they have been at
for the whole five days and nights. They are the young bones of the
revolution, still soft, as all revolutions are in the first days.

On the 27th, Nabokov, already known to us as a member of the Kadet
centre, and at that time working – a legalised deserter – at General
Headquarters, went to his office as usual and stayed until three
o’clock, knowing nothing of the events. Toward evening shots were heard
on the Morskaia. Nabokov listened to them from his apartment. Armoured
cars dashed along, individual soldiers and sailors ran past, sidling
along the wall. The respected liberal observed them from the side
windows of his vestibule. “The telephone continued to function, and my
friends, I remember, kept me in touch with what was going on during the
day. At the usual time we went to bed.” This man will soon become one of
the inspirators of the revolutionary (!) Provisional Government,
occupying the position of General Administrator. Tomorrow an unknown old
man will approach him on the street – a book-keeper, perhaps, or a
teacher – bow low and remove his hat, and say to him: “Thank you for all
that you have done for the people.” Nabokov, with modest pride, will
relate the incident himself.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Nevsky Prospect, the main avenue of the city. [_Trans._]

2. Vyborgtsi means the men of the Vyborg district – the workers – just
as Pavlovtsi means men of the Pavlovsky regiment. In the singular,
Pavlovets. [_Trans._]



CHAPTER 8 WHO LED THE FEBRUARY INSURRECTION?


 

Lawyers and journalists belonging to the classes damaged by the
revolution wasted a good deal of ink subsequently trying to prove that
what happened in February was essentially a petticoat rebellion, backed
up afterwards by a soldiers’ mutiny and given out for a revolution.
Louis XVI in his day also tried to think that the capture of the
Bastille was a rebellion, but they respectfully explained to him that it
was a revolution. Those who lose by a revolution are rarely inclined to
call it by its real name. For that name, in spite of the efforts of
spiteful reactionaries, is surrounded in the historic memory of mankind
with a halo of liberation from all shackles and all prejudices. The
privileged classes of every age, as also their lackeys, have always
tried to declare the revolution which overthrew them, in contrast to
past revolutions, a mutiny, a riot, a revolt of the rabble. Classes
which have outlived themselves are not distinguished by originality.

Soon after the 27th of February attempts were also made to liken the
revolution to the military _coup d’état_ of the Young Turks, of which,
as we know, they had been dreaming not a little in the upper circles of
the Russian bourgeoisie. This comparison was so hopeless, however, that
it was seriously opposed even in one of the bourgeois papers.
Tugan-Baranovsky, an economist who had studied Marx in his youth, a
Russian variety of Sombart, wrote on March 10 in the _Birzhevoe
Vedomosti_: “The Turkish revolution consisted in a victorious uprising
of the army, prepared and carried out by the leaders of the army; the
soldiers were merely obedient executives of the plans of their officers.
But the regiments of the Guard which on February 27 overthrew the
Russian throne, came without their officers. Not the army but the
workers began the insurrection; not the generals but the soldiers came
to the State Duma. The soldiers supported the workers not because they
were obediently fulfilling the commands of their officers, but because
... they felt themselves blood brothers of the workers as a class
composed of toilers like themselves. The peasants and the workers –
those are the two social classes which made the Russian revolution.”

These words require neither correction, nor supplement. The further
development of the revolution sufficiently confirmed and reinforced
their meaning. In Petrograd the last day of February was the first day
after the victory: a day of raptures, embraces, joyful tears, voluble
outpourings; but at the same time a day of final blows at the enemy.
Shots were still crackling in the streets. It was said that Protopopov’s
Pharaohs, not informed of the people’s victory, were still shooting from
the roofs. From below they were firing into attics, false windows and
belfries where the armed phantoms of czarism might still be lurking.
About four o’clock they occupied the Admiralty where the last remnants
of what was formerly the state power had taken refuge. Revolutionary
organisations and improvised groups were making arrests throughout the
town. The Schlusselburg hard-labour prison was taken without a shot.
More and more regiments were joining the revolution, both in the capital
and in the environs.

The overturn in Moscow was only an echo of the insurrection in
Petrograd. The same moods among the workers and soldiers, but less
clearly expressed. A slightly more leftward tendency among the
bourgeoisie. A still greater weakness among revolutionary organisations
than in Petrograd. When events began on the Neva, the Moscow radical
intelligentsia called a conference on the question what to do, and came
to no conclusion. Only on the 27th of February strikes began in shops
and factories of Moscow, and then demonstrations. The officers told the
soldiers in the barracks that a rabble was rioting in the streets and
they must be put down. “But by this time” relates the soldier Shishilin,
“the soldiers understood the word rabble in the opposite sense.” Towards
two o’clock there arrived at the building of the city duma many soldiers
of various regiments inquiring how to join the revolution. On the next
day the strikes increased. Crowds flowed toward the duma with flags. A
soldier of an automobile company, Muralov, old Bolshevik, an
agriculturist, a good-natured and courageous giant, brought to the duma
the first complete and disciplined military detachment, which occupied
the wireless station and other points. Eight months later Muralov, will
be in command of the troops of the Moscow military district.

The prisons were opened. The same Muralov was driving an automobile
truck filled with freed political prisoners: a police officer with his
hand at his vizor asked the revolutionist whether it was advisable to
let out the Jews also. Dzerzhinsky, just liberated from a hard labour
prison and without changing his prison dress, spoke in the duma building
where a soviet of deputies was already formed. The artillerist Dorofeev
relates how on March 1 workers from the Siou candy factory came with
banners to the barracks of an artillery brigade to fraternise with the
soldiers, and how many could not contain their joy, and wept. There were
cases of sniping in the town, but in general neither armed encounters
nor casualties: Petrograd answered for Moscow.

In a series of provincial cities the movement began only on March 1,
after the revolution was already achieved even in Moscow. In Tver the
workers went from their work to the barracks in a procession and having
mixed with the soldiers marched through the streets of the city. At that
time they were still singing the _Marseillaise_, not the
_International_. In Nizhni-Novgorod thousands of workers gathered round
the city duma building, which in a majority of the cities played the
role of the Tauride Palace. After a speech from the mayor the workers
marched off with red banners to free the politicals from the jails. By
evening, eighteen out of the twenty-one military divisions of the
garrison had voluntarily came over to the revolution. In Samara and
Saratov meetings were held, soviets of workers’ deputies organised. In
Kharkov the chief of police, having gone to the railroad station and got
news of the revolution, stood up in his carriage before an excited crowd
and, lifting his hat, shouted at the top of his lungs: “Long live the
revolution. Hurrah!” The news came to Ekaterinoslav from Kharkov. At the
head of the demonstration strode the assistant chief of police, carrying
in his hand a long sabre as in the grand parades on saints’ days. When
it became finally clear that the monarchy could not rise, they began
cautiously to remove the czar’s portraits from the government
institutions and hide them in the attics. Anecdotes about this, both
authentic and imaginary, were much passed around in liberal circles,
where they had not yet lost a taste for the jocular tone when speaking
of the revolution. The workers, and the soldier barracks as well, took
the events in a very different way. As to a series of other provincial
cities (Pskov, Orel, Rybinsk, Penza, Kazan, Czaritsyn, and others), the
_Chronicle_ remarks under date of March 2: “News came of the uprising
and the population joined the revolution.” This description,
notwithstanding its summary character, tells with fundamental truth what
happened.

News of the revolution trickled into the villages from the nearby
cities, partly through the authorities, but chiefly through the markets,
the workers, the soldiers on furlough. The villages accepted the
revolution more slowly and less enthusiastically than the cities, but
felt it no less deeply. For them it was bound up with the question of
war and land.

It would be no exaggeration to say that Petrograd achieved the February
revolution. The rest of the country adhered to it. There was no struggle
anywhere except in Petrograd. There were not to be found anywhere in the
country any groups of the population, any parties, institutions, or
military units which were ready to put up a fight for the old régime.
This shows how ill-founded was the belated talk of the reactionaries to
the effect that if there had been cavalry of the Guard in the Petersburg
garrison, or if Ivanov had brought a reliable brigade from the front,
the fate of the monarchy would have been different. Neither at the front
nor at the rear was there a brigade or regiment to be found which was
prepared to do battle for Nicholas II.

The revolution was carried out upon the initiative and by the strength
of one city, constituting approximately about ¹/75 of the population of
the country. You may say, if you will, that this most gigantic
democratic act was achieved in a most undemocratic manner. The whole
country was placed before a _fait accompli_. The fact that a Constituent
Assembly was in prospect does not alter the matter, for the dates and
methods of convoking this national representation were determined by
institutions which issued from the victorious insurrection of Petrograd.
This casts a sharp light on the question of the function of democratic
forms in general, and in a revolutionary epoch in particular.
Revolutions have always struck such blows at the judicial fetishism of
the popular will, and the blows have been more ruthless the deeper,
bolder and more democratic the revolutions.

It is often said, especially in regard to the great French revolution,
that the extreme centralisation of a monarchy subsequently permits the
revolutionary capital to think and act for the whole country. That
explanation is superficial. If revolutions reveal a centralising
tendency, this is not in imitation of overthrown monarchies, but in
consequence of irresistible demands of the new society, which cannot
reconcile itself to particularism. If the capital plays as dominating a
role in a revolution as though it concentrated in itself the will of the
nation, that is simply because the capital expresses most clearly and
thoroughly the fundamental tendencies of the new society. The provinces
accept the steps taken by the capital as their own intentions already
materialised. In the initiatory role of the centres there is no
violation of democracy, but rather its dynamic realisation. However, the
rhythm of this dynamic has never in great revolutions coincided with the
rhythm of formal representative democracy. The provinces adhere to the
activity of the centre, but belatedly. With the swift development of
events characteristic of a revolution this produces sharp crises in
revolutionary parliamentarism, which cannot be resolved by the methods
of democracy. In all genuine revolutions the national representation has
invariably come into conflict with the dynamic force of the revolution,
whose principal seat has been the capital. It was so in the seventeenth
century in England, in the eighteenth in France, in the twentieth in
Russia. The role of the capital is determined not by the tradition of a
bureaucratic centralism, but by the situation of the leading
revolutionary class, whose vanguard is naturally concentrated in the
chief city; this is equally true for the bourgeoisie and the
proletariat.

When the February victory was fully confirmed, they began to count up
the victims. In Petrograd they counted 1,443 killed and wounded, 869 of
them soldiers, and 60 of these officers. By comparison with the victims
of any battle in the Great Slaughter these figures are suggestively
tiny. The liberal press declared the February revolution bloodless. In
the days of general salubrity and mutual amnesty of the patriotic
parties, nobody took the trouble to establish the truth. Albert Thomas,
a friend of everything victorious, even a victorious insurrection wrote
at that time about the “sunniest, most holiday-like, most bloodless
Russian revolution.” To be sure, he was hopeful that this revolution
would remain at the disposal of the French Bourse. But after all Thomas
did not invent this habit. On the 27th of June 1789, Mirabeau exclaimed:
“How fortunate that this great revolution will succeed without
evil-doing and without tears! ... History has too long been telling us
only of the actions of beasts of prey ... We may well hope that we are
beginning the history of human beings.” When all the three estates were
united in the National Assembly the ancestors of Albert Thomas wrote:
“The revolution is ended. It has not cost a drop of blood.” We must
acknowledge, however, that at that period blood had really not yet
flowed. Not so in the February days. Nevertheless the legend of a
bloodless revolution stubbornly persisted, answering the need of the
liberal bourgeois to make things look as though the power had come to
him of its own accord.

Although the February revolution was far from bloodless still one cannot
but be amazed at the insignificant number of victims, not only at the
moment of revolution but still more in the first period after it. This
revolution, we must remember was a paying-back for oppression,
persecution, taunts, vile blows, suffered by the masses of the Russian
people throughout the ages! The sailors and soldiers did in some places,
to be sure take summary revenge upon the most contemptible torturer in
the person of their officers, but the number of these acts of settlement
was at first insignificant in comparison with the number of the old
bloody insults. The masses shook off their good-naturedness only a good
while later, when they were convinced that the ruling classes wanted to
drag everything back and appropriate to themselves a revolution not
achieved by them, just as they had always appropriated the good things
of life not produced by themselves.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Tugan-Baranovsky is right when he says that the February revolution was
accomplished by workers and peasants – the latter in the person of the
soldiers. But there still remains the great question: Who led the
revolution? Who raised the workers to their feet? Who brought the
soldiers into the streets? After the victory these questions became a
subject of party conflict. They were solved most simply by the universal
formula: Nobody led the revolution, it happened of itself. The theory of
“spontaneousness” fell in most opportunely with the minds not only of
all those gentlemen who had yesterday been peacefully governing,
judging, convicting, defending, trading, or commanding, and today were
hastening to make up to the revolution, but also of many professional
politicians and former revolutionists, who having slept through the
revolution wished to think that in this they were not different from all
the rest.

In his curious _History of the Russian Disorders_, General Denikin,
former commander of the White Army, says of the 27th of February: “On
that decisive day there were no leaders, there were only the elements.
In their threatening current there were then visible neither aims, nor
plans, nor slogans.” The learned historian Miliukov delves no deeper
than this general with a passion for letters. Before the revolution the
liberal leader had declared every thought of revolution a suggestion of
the German Staff. But the situation was more complicated after a
revolution which had brought the liberals to power. Miliukov’s task was
now not to dishonour the revolution with a Hohenzollern origin, but on
the contrary to withhold the honour of its initiation from
revolutionists. Liberalism therefore has whole-heartedly fathered the
theory of a spontaneous and impersonal revolution. Miliukov
sympathetically cites the semi-liberal, semi-socialist Stankevich, a
university instructor who became Political Commissar at the headquarters
of the Supreme Command: “The masses moved of themselves, obeying some
unaccountable inner summons ...” writes Stankevich of the February days.
“With what slogans did the soldiers come out? Who led them when they
conquered Petrograd, when they burned the District Court? Not a
political idea, not a revolutionary slogan, not a conspiracy, and not a
revolt, but a spontaneous movement suddenly consuming the entire old
power to the last remnant.” Spontaneousness here acquires almost mystic
character.

This same Stankevich offers a piece of testimony in the highest degree
valuable: “At the end of January, I happened in a very intimate circle
to meet with Kerensky ... To the possibility of a popular uprising they
all took a definitely negative position, fearing lest a popular mass
movement once aroused might get into an extreme leftward channel and
this would create vast difficulties in the conduct of the war.” The
views of Kerensky’s circle in nowise essentially differed from those of
the Kadets. The initiative certainly did not come from there. “The
revolution fell like thunder out of the sky,” says the president of the
Social Revolutionary Party, Zenzinov. “Let us be frank: it arrived
joyfully unexpected for us too, revolutionists who had worked for it
through long years and waited for it always.”

It was not much better with the Mensheviks. One of the journalists of
the bourgeois emigration tells about his meeting in a tramcar on
February 21 with Skobelev, a future minister of the revolutionary
government: “This Social Democrat, one of the leaders of the movement,
told me that the disorders had the character of plundering which it was
necessary to put down. This did not prevent Skobelev from asserting a
month later that he and his friends had made the revolution.” The
colours here are probably laid on a little thick, but fundamentally the
position of the legal Social Democrats, the Mensheviks, is conveyed
accurately enough.

Finally, one of the most recent leaders of the left wing of the Social
Revolutionaries, Mstislavsky, who subsequently went over to the
Bolsheviks, says of the February uprising: “The revolution caught us,
the party people of those days, like the foolish virgins of the Bible,
napping.” It does not matter how much they resembled the virgins, but it
is true they were all fast asleep.

How was it with the Bolsheviks? This we have in part already seen. The
principal leaders of the underground Bolshevik organisation were at that
time three men: the former workers Shliapnikov and Zalutsky, and the
former student Molotov. Shliapnikov, having lived for some time abroad
and in close association with Lenin, was in a political sense the most
mature and active of these three who constituted the Bureau of the
Central Committee. However, Shliapnikov’s own memoirs best of all
confirm the fact that the events were too much for the trio. Up to the
very last hour these leaders thought that it was a question of a
revolutionary manifestation, one among many, and not at all of an armed
insurrection. Our friend Kayurov, one of the leaders of the Vyborg
section, asserts categorically: “Absolutely no guiding initiative from
the party centres was felt ... the Petrograd Committee had been arrested
and the representative of the Central Committee, Comrade Shliapnikov,
was unable to give any directives for the coming day.”

The weakness of the underground organisations was a direct result of
police raids, which had given exceptional results amid the patriotic
moods at the beginning of the war. Every organisation, the revolutionary
included, has a tendency to fall behind its social basis. The
underground organisation of the Bolsheviks at the beginning of 1917 had
not yet recovered from its oppressed and scattered condition, whereas in
the masses the patriotic hysteria had been abruptly replaced by
revolutionary indignation.

In order to get a clear conception of the situation in the sphere of
revolutionary leadership it is necessary to remember that the most
authoritative revolutionists, the leaders of the left parties, were
abroad, and, some of them, in prison and exile. The more dangerous a
party was to the old régime, the more cruelly beheaded it appeared at
the moment of revolution. The Narodniks had a Duma faction headed by the
non-party radical Kerensky. The official leader of the
Social-Revolutionaries, Chernov, was abroad. The Mensheviks had a party
faction in the Duma headed by Cheidze and Skobelev; Martov was abroad;
Dan and Tseretelli, in exile. A considerable number of socialistic
intellectuals with a revolutionary past were grouped around these left
factions – Narodnik and Menshevik. This constituted a kind of political
staff, but one which was capable of coming to the front only after the
victory. The Bolsheviks had no Duma faction: their five worker-deputies,
in whom the czarist government had seen the organising centre of the
revolution, had been arrested during the first few months of the war.
Lenin was abroad, Zinoviev with him; Kamenev was in exile; in exile
also, the then little known practical leaders: Sverdlov, Rykov, Stalin.
The Polish social-democrat, Dzerzhinsky, who did not yet belong to the
Bolsheviks, was at hard labour. The leaders accidentally present, for
the very reason that they had been accustomed to act under
unconditionally authoritative supervisors, did not consider themselves
and were not considered by others capable of playing a guiding role in
revolutionary events.

But if the Bolshevik Party could not guarantee the insurrection an
authoritative leadership, there is no use talking of other
organisations. This fact has strengthened the current conviction as to
the spontaneous character of the February revolution. Nevertheless the
conviction is deeply mistaken, or at least meaningless.

The struggle in the capital lasted not an hour, or two hours, but five
days. The leaders tried to hold it back; the masses answered with
increased pressure and marched forward. They had against them the old
state, behind whose traditional facade a mighty power was still assumed
to exist, the liberal bourgeoisie with the State Duma, the Land and City
Unions, the military-industrial organisations, academies, universities,
a highly developed press, and finally the two strong socialist parties
who put up a patriotic resistance to the assault from below. In the
party of the Bolsheviks the insurrection had its nearest organisation,
but a headless organisation with a scattered staff and with weak illegal
nuclei. And nevertheless the revolution, which nobody in those days was
expecting, unfolded, and just when it seemed from above as though the
movement was already dying down, with an abrupt revival, a mighty
convulsion, it seized the victory.

Whence came this unexampled force of aggression and self-restraint? It
is not enough to refer to bitter feelings. Bitterness alone is little.
The Petersburg workers, no matter how diluted during the war years with
human raw material, had in their past a great revolutionary experience.
In their aggression and self-restraint, in the absence of leadership and
in the face of opposition from above, was revealed a vitally
well-founded, although not always expressed, estimate of forces and a
strategic calculation of their own.

On the eve of the war the revolutionary layers of the workers had been
following the Bolsheviks, and leading the masses after them. With the
beginning of the war the situation had sharply changed: conservative
groups lifted their heads, dragging after them a considerable part of
the class. The revolutionary elements found themselves isolated, and
quieted down. In the course of the war the situation began to change, at
first slowly, but after the defeats faster and more radically. An active
discontent seized the whole working class. To be sure, it was to an
extent patriotically coloured, but it had nothing in common with the
calculating and cowardly patriotism of the possessing classes, who were
postponing all domestic questions until after the victory. The war
itself, its victims, its horror, its shame brought not only the old, but
also the new layers of workers into conflict with the czarist régime. It
did this with a new incisiveness and led them to the conclusion: we can
no longer endure it. The conclusion was universal; it welded the masses
together and gave them a mighty dynamic force.

The army had swollen, drawing into itself millions of workers and
peasants. Every individual has his own people among the troops: a son, a
husband, a brother, a relative. The army was no longer insulated, as
before the war, from the people. One met with soldiers now far oftener;
saw them off to the front, lived with them when they came home on leave,
chatted with them on the streets and in the tramways about the front,
visited them in the hospitals. The workers’ districts, the barracks, the
front, and to an extent the villages too, became communicating vessels.
The workers would know what the soldiers were thinking and feeling. They
had innumerable conversations about the war, about the people who were
getting rich out of the war, about the generals, government, czar and
czarina. The soldier would say about the war: To hell with it! And the
worker would answer about the government: To hell with it! The soldier
would say: Why then do you sit still here in the centre? The worker
would answer: We can’t do anything with bare hands; we stubbed our toe
against the army in 1905. The soldier would reflect: What if we should
all start at once! The worker: That’s it, all at once! Conversations of
this kind before the war were conspirative and carried on by twos; now
they were going on everywhere, on every occasion, and almost openly, at
least in the workers’ districts.

The czar’s intelligence service every once in a while took its soundings
very successfully. Two weeks before the revolution a spy, who signed
himself with the name Krestianinov, reported a conversation in a tramcar
traversing the workers’ suburb. The soldier was telling how in his
regiment eight men were under hard labour because last autumn they
refused to shoot at the workers of the Nobel factory, but shot at the
police instead. The conversation went on quite openly, since in the
workers’ districts the police and the spies preferred to remain
unnoticed. “‘We’ll get even with them,’ the soldier concluded.” The
report reads further: “A skilled worker answered him: ‘For that it is
necessary to organise so that all will be like one.’ The soldier
answered: ‘Don’t you worry, we’ve been organised a long time ... They’ve
drunk enough blood. Men are suffering in the trenches and here they are
fattening their bellies!’ ... No special disturbance occurred. February
10, 1917. Krestianinov.” Incomparable spy’s epic. “No special
disturbance occurred.” They will occur, and that soon: this tramway
conversation signalises their inexorable approach.

The spontaneousness of the insurrection Mstislavsky illustrates with a
curious example: When the “Union of Officers of February 27,” formed
just after the revolution, tried to determine with a questionnaire who
first led out the Volynsky regiment, they received seven answers naming
seven initiators of this decisive action. It is very likely, we may add,
that a part of the initiative really did belong to several soldiers, nor
is it impossible that the chief initiator fell in the street fighting,
carrying his name with him into oblivion. But that does not diminish the
historic importance of his nameless initiative. Still more important is
another side of the matter which will carry us beyond the walls of the
barrack room. The insurrection of the battalions of the Guard, flaring
up a complete surprise to the liberal and legal socialist circles, was
no surprise at all to the workers. Without the insurrection of the
workers the Volynsky regiment would not have gone into the street. That
street encounter of the workers with the Cossacks, which a lawyer
observed from his window and which he communicated by telephone to the
deputy, was to them both an episode in an impersonal process: a factory
locust stumbled against a locust from the barracks. But it did not seem
that way to the Cossack who had dared wink to the worker, nor to the
worker who instantly decided that the Cossack had “winked in a friendly
manner.” The molecular interpenetration of the army with the people was
going on continuously. The workers watched the temperature of the army
and instantly sensed its approach to the critical mark. Exactly this was
what gave such inconquerable force to the assault of the masses,
confident of victory.

Here we must introduce the pointed remark of a liberal official trying
to summarise his February observations: “It is customary to say that the
movement began spontaneously, the soldiers themselves went into the
street. I cannot at all agree with this. After all, what does the word
‘spontaneously’ mean? ... Spontaneous conception is still more out of
place in sociology than in natural science. Owing to the fact that none
of the revolutionary leaders with a name was able to hang his label on
the movement, it becomes not impersonal but merely nameless.” This
formulation of the question, incomparably more serious than Miliukov’s
references to German agents and Russian spontaneousness, belongs to a
former Procuror who met the revolution in the position of a czarist
senator. It is quite possible that his experience in the courts
permitted Zavadsky to realise that a revolutionary insurrection cannot
arise either at the command of foreign agents, or in the manner of an
impersonal process of nature.

The same author relates two incidents which permitted him to look as
through a keyhole into the laboratory of the revolutionary process. On
Friday, February 24, when nobody in the upper circles as yet expected a
revolution in the near future, a tramcar in which a senator was riding
turned off quite unexpectedly, with such a jar that the windows rattled
and one was broken, from the Liteiny into a side street, and there
stopped. The conductor told everybody to get off: “The car isn’t going
any farther.” The passengers objected, scolded, but got off. “I can
still see the face of that unanswering conductor: angrily resolute, a
sort of wolf look.” The movement of the tramways stopped everywhere as
far as the eye could see. That resolute conductor, in whom the liberal
official could already catch a glimpse of the “wolf look,” must have
been dominated by a high sense of duty in order all by himself to stop a
car containing officials on the streets of imperial Petersburg in time
of war. It was just such conductors who stopped the car of the monarchy
and with practically the same words – this car does not go any farther!
– and who ushered out the bureaucracy, making no distinction in the rush
of business between a general of gendarmes and a liberal senator. The
conductor on the Liteiny boulevard was a conscious factor of history. It
had been necessary to educate him in advance.

During the burning of the District Court a liberal jurist from the
circle of that same senator started to express in the street his regret
that a roomful of judicial decisions and notarial archives was
perishing. An elderly man of sombre aspect dressed as a worker angrily
objected: “We will be able to divide the houses and the lands ourselves,
and without your archives.” Probably the episode is rounded out in a
literary manner. But there were plenty of elderly workers like that in
the crowd, capable of making the necessary retort. They themselves had
nothing to do with burning the District Court: why burn it? But at least
you could not frighten them with “excesses” of this kind. They were
arming the masses with the necessary ideas not only against the czarist
police, but against liberal jurists who feared most of all lest there
should burn up in the fire of the revolution the notarial deeds of
property. Those nameless, austere statesmen of the factory and street
did not fall out of the sky: they had to be educated.

In registering the events of the last days of February the Secret
Service also remarked that the movement was “spontaneous,” that is, had
no planned leadership from above; but they immediately added: “with the
generally propagandised condition of the proletariat.” This appraisal
hits the bull’s-eye: the professionals of the struggle with the
revolution, before entering the cells vacated by the revolutionists,
took a much closer view of what was happening than the leaders of
liberalism.

The mystic doctrine of spontaneousness explains nothing. In order
correctly to appraise the situation and determine the moment for a blow
at the enemy, it was necessary that the masses or their guiding layers
should make their examination of historical events and have their
criteria for estimating them. In other words, it was necessary that
there should be not masses in the abstract, but masses of Petrograd
workers and Russian workers in general, who had passed through the
revolution of 1905, through the Moscow insurrection of December 1905,
shattered against the Semenovsky regiment of the Guard. It was necessary
that throughout this mass should be scattered workers who had thought
over the experience of 1905, criticised the constitutional illusions of
the liberals and Mensheviks, assimilated the perspectives of the
revolution, meditated hundreds of times about the question of the army,
watched attentively what was going on in its midst – workers capable of
making revolutionary inferences from what they observed and
communicating them to others. And finally, it was necessary that there
should be in the troops of the garrison itself progressive soldiers,
seized, or at least touched, in the past by revolutionary propaganda.

In every factory, in each guild, in each company, in each tavern, in the
military hospital, at the transfer stations, even in the depopulated
villages, the molecular work of revolutionary thought was in progress.
Everywhere were to be found the interpreters of events, chiefly from
among the workers, from whom one inquired, “What’s the news?” and from
whom one awaited the needed words. These leaders had often been left to
themselves, had nourished themselves upon fragments of revolutionary
generalisations arriving in their hands by various routes, had studied
out by themselves between the lines of the liberal papers what they
needed. Their class instinct was refined by a political criterion, and
though they did not think all their ideas through to the end,
nevertheless their thought ceaselessly and stubbornly worked its way in
a single direction. Elements of experience, criticism, initiative,
self-sacrifice, seeped down through the mass and created, invisibly to a
superficial glance but no less decisively, an inner mechanics of the
revolutionary movement as a conscious process. To the smug politicians
of liberalism and tamed socialism everything that happens among masses
is customarily represented as an instinctive process, no matter whether
they are dealing with an anthill or a beehive. In reality the thought
which was drilling through the thick of the working class was far
bolder, more penetrating, more conscious, than those little ideas by
which the educated classes live. Moreover, this thought was more
scientific: not only because it was to a considerable degree fertilised
with the methods of Marxism, but still more because it was ever
nourishing itself on the living experience of the masses which were soon
to take their place on the revolutionary arena. Thoughts are scientific
if they correspond to an objective process and make it possible to
influence that process and guide it. Were these qualities possessed in
the slightest degree by the ideas of those government circles who were
inspired by the Apocalypse and believed in the dreams of Rasputin? Or
maybe the ideas of the liberals were scientifically grounded, who hoped
that a backward Russia, having joined the scrimmage of the capitalist
giants, might win at one and the same time victory and parliamentarism?
Or maybe the intellectual life of those circles of the intelligentsia
was scientific, who slavishly adapted themselves to this liberalism,
senile since childhood, protecting their imaginary independence the
while with long-dead metaphors? In truth here was a kingdom of spiritual
inertness, spectres, superstition and fictions, a kingdom, if you will,
of “spontaneousness.” But have we not in that case a right to turn this
liberal philosophy of the February revolution exactly upside down? Yes,
we have a right to say: At the same time that the official society, all
that many-storied superstructure of ruling classes, layers, groups,
parties and cliques, lived from day to day by inertia and automatism,
nourishing themselves with the relics of worn-out ideas, deaf to the
inexorable demands of evolution, flattering themselves with phantoms and
foreseeing nothing – at the same time, in the working masses there was
taking place an independent and deep process of growth, not only of
hatred for the rulers, but of critical understanding of their impotence,
an accumulation of experience and creative consciousness which the
revolutionary insurrection and its victory only completed.

To the question, Who led the February revolution? we can then answer
definitely enough: Conscious and tempered workers educated for the most
part by the party of Lenin. But we must here immediately add: This
leadership proved sufficient to guarantee the victory of the
insurrection, but it was not adequate to transfer immediately into the
hands of the proletarian vanguard the leadership of the revolution.



CHAPTER 9 THE PARADOX OF THE FEBRUARY REVOLUTION


 

The insurrection triumphed. But to whom did it hand over the power
snatched from the monarchy? We come here to the central problem of the
February revolution: Why and how did the power turn up in the hands of
the liberal bourgeoisie?

In Duma circles and in bourgeois “society” no significance was
attributed to the agitation beginning the 23rd of February. The liberal
deputies and patriotic journalists were assembling in drawing rooms as
before, talking over the questions of Trieste and Fiume, and again
confirming Russia’s need of the Dardanelles. When the decree dissolving
the Duma was already signed, a Duma commission was still hastily
considering the question of turning over the food problem to the city
administration. Less than twelve hours before the insurrection of the
battalions of the Guard, the Society for Slavic Reciprocity was
peacefully listening to its annual report. “Only when I had returned
home on foot from that meeting,” remembers one of the deputies, “I was
struck by some sort of awesome silence and emptiness in the usually
lively streets.” That awesome emptiness was forming around the old
ruling classes and already oppressing the hearts of their future
inheritors.

By the 26th the seriousness of the movement had become clear both to the
government and to the liberals. On that day negotiations about a
compromise were going on between the czar’s ministers and members of the
Duma, negotiations from which even subsequently the liberals never
lifted the curtain. Protopopov states in his testimony that the leaders
of the Duma bloc demanded as formerly the naming of new ministers from
among people enjoying social confidence: “This measure perhaps will
pacify the people.” But the 26th created, as we know, a certain stoppage
in the development of the revolution, and for a brief moment the
government felt firmer. When Rodzianko called on Golytsin to persuade
him to resign, the Premier pointed in answer to a portfolio on his desk
in which lay the completed edict dissolving the Duma, with the signature
of Nicholas but without a date. Golytsin put in the date. How could the
government decide upon such a step at the moment of growing pressure
from the revolution? Upon this question the ruling bureaucrats long ago
arrived at a firm conviction. “Whether we have a bloc or not, it is all
the same to the workers’ movement. We can handle that movement by other
means, and up till now the Ministry of the Interior has managed to deal
with it.” Thus Goremykin had spoken in August 1915. On the other hand,
the bureaucracy believed that the Duma, in case of its dissolution,
would not venture upon any bold step. Again in August 1915, in
discussing the question of dissolving a discontented Duma, the Minister
of the Interior, Prince Sherbatov, had said: “The Duma will hardly
venture upon direct disobedience. The vast majority are after all
cowards and are trembling for their hides.” The prince expressed himself
none too nicely, but in the long run correctly. In its struggle with the
liberal opposition, then, the bureaucracy felt plenty of firm ground
under its feet.

On the morning of the 27th, the Deputies, alarmed at the mounting
events, assembled at a regular session. The majority learned only here
that the Duma had been dissolved. The news seemed the more surprising as
on the very day before they had been carrying on peace negotiations with
the ministers. “And nevertheless,” writes Rodzianko with pride, “the
Duma submitted to the law, still hoping to find a way out of the tangled
situation, and passed no resolution that it would not disperse, or that
it would illegally continue its sessions.” The deputies gathered at a
private conference in which they made confessions of impotence to each
other. The moderate liberal Shidlovsky subsequently remembered, not
without a malicious pleasure, a proposal made by an extreme left Kadet,
Nekrasov, a future colleague of Kerensky, “to establish a military
dictatorship handing over the whole power to a popular general.” At that
time a practical attempt at salvation was undertaken by the leaders of
the Progressive Bloc, not present at this private conference of the
Duma. Having summoned the Grand Duke Mikhail to Petrograd, they proposed
to him to take upon himself the dictatorship, to “impel” the personal
staff of the government to resign, and to demand of the czar by direct
wire that he “grant” a responsible ministry. In those hours, when the
uprising of the first Guard regiments was beginning, the liberal
bourgeoisie were making a last effort to put down the insurrection with
the help of a dynastic dictator, and at the same time at the expense of
the revolution to enter into an agreement with the monarchy. “The
hesitation of the grand duke,” complains Rodzianko, “contributed to the
letting slip of the favourable moment.”

How easily a radical intelligentsia believes whatever it wants to, is
testified by a non-party socialist, Sukhanov, who begins in this period
to play a certain political rôle in the Tauride Palace. “They told me
the fundamental political news of those morning hours of that
unforgettable day,” he relates in his extensive memoirs: “The decree
dissolving the State Duma had been promulgated, and the Duma had
answered with a refusal to disperse, electing a Provisional Committee.”
This is written by a man who hardly ever left the Tauride Palace, and
was there continually button-holing his deputy friends. Miliukov in his
history of the revolution, following Rodzianko, categorically declares:
“There was adopted after a series of hot speeches a resolution not to
leave Petrograd, but no resolution that the State Duma should as an
institution ‘not disperse,’ as the legend runs” “Not to disperse” would
have meant to take upon themselves, however belatedly, a certain
initiative. “Not to leave Petrograd” meant to wash their hands of the
matter and wait to see which way the course of events would turn. The
credulousness of Sukhanov has, by the way, mitigating circumstances. The
rumour that the Duma had adopted a revolutionary resolution not to
submit to the czar’s decree was slipped in hurriedly by the Duma
journalists in their information bulletin, the only paper published at
that time owing to the general strike. Since the insurrection triumphed
during that day the deputies were in no hurry to correct this mistake,
being quite willing to sustain the illusions of their “left” friends.
They did not in fact undertake to establish the facts of the matter
until they were out of the country. The episode seems secondary, but it
is full of meaning. The revolutionary rôle of the Duma on the 27th of
February was a complete myth, born of the political credulity of the
radical intelligentsia delighted and frightened by the revolution,
distrusting the ability of the masses to carry the business through, and
eager to lean as quickly as possible toward the enfranchised
bourgeoisie.

In the memoirs of the deputies belonging to the Duma majority, there is
preserved by good luck a story of how the Duma did meet the revolution.
According to the account of Prince Mansyrev, one of the right Kadets,
among the deputies who assembled in great numbers on the morning of the
27th there were no members of the præsidium, no leaders of parties, nor
heads of the Progressive Bloc: they already knew of the dissolution and
the insurrection and had preferred as long as possible to refrain from
showing their heads. Moreover, at just that time they were, it seems,
negotiating with Mikhail about the dictatorship. “A general
consternation and bewilderment prevailed in the Duma,” says Mansyrev.
“Even lively conversations ceased, and in their place were heard sighs
and brief ejaculations like ‘It’s come,’ or indeed frank expressions of
fear for life.” Thus speaks a very moderate deputy who sighed the
loudest of all. At two o’clock in the afternoon, when the leaders had
found themselves obliged to appear in the Duma, the secretary of the
præsidium brought in the joyful but ill-founded news: “The disorders
will soon be put down, because measures have been taken.” It is possible
that by “measures” was meant the negotiations for a dictatorship, but
the Duma was downcast and awaited a decisive word from the leader of the
Progressive Bloc. “We cannot adopt any decision at the present moment,”
Miliukov announced, “because the extent of the disorders is unknown to
us; likewise it is unknown upon which side a majority of the local
troops, workers and social organisations will take their stand. It is
necessary to gather accurate information about this, and then will be
time enough to judge the situation. At present it is too soon.” At two
o’clock in the afternoon of February 27 it is still for liberalism “too
soon”! “Gather information” means wash your own hands and await the
outcome of the struggle. But Miliukov had not ended his speech – which,
by the way, he began with a view to ending in nothing – when Kerensky
came running into the hall in high excitement: An enormous crowd of
people and soldiers is coming to the Tauride Palace, he announces, and
intends to demand of the Duma that it seize the power in its hands! The
radical deputy knows accurately just what the enormous crowd of people
is going to demand. In reality it is Kerensky himself who first demands
that the power shall be seized by a Duma which is still hoping in its
soul that the insurrection may yet be put down. Kerensky’s announcement
is met with “general bewilderment and dismayed looks.” He has however
not finished speaking when a frightened Duma attendant, rushing in,
interrupts him: the advanced detachment of the soldiers has already
reached the Palace, a detachment of sentries stopped them at the
entrance, the chief of the sentries, it seems, was heavily wounded. A
minute later it transpires that the soldiers have entered the Palace. It
will be declared later in speeches and articles that the soldiers came
to greet the Duma and swear loyalty to it, but right now everything is
in mortal panic. The water is up to their necks. The leaders whisper
together. We must get a breathing space. Rodzianko hastily introduces a
proposal, suggested to him by somebody, that they form a Provisional
Committee. Affirmative cries. But they all want to get out of there as
quickly as possible. No time for voting. The president, no less
frightened than the others, proposes that they turn over the formation
of the committee to the council of elders. Again affirmative cries from
the few still remaining in the hall. The majority have already vanished.
Such was the first reaction of the Duma, dissolved by the czar, to the
victory of the insurrection.

At that time the revolution was creating in the same building only in a
less showy part of it, another institution. The revolutionary leaders
did not have to invent it; the experience of _the Soviets_ of 1905 was
forever chiselled into the consciousness of the workers. At every lift
of the movement, even in wartime, the idea of soviets was almost
automatically reborn. And although the appraisal of the rôle of the
soviets was different among Bolsheviks and Mensheviks – the Social
Revolutionaries had in general no stable appraisals – the form of
organisation itself stood clear of all debate. The Mensheviks liberated
from prison, members of the Military-Industrial Committee, meeting in
the Tauride Palace with leaders of the Trade Union and Co-operative
movements, likewise of the right wing, and with the Menshevik deputies
of the Duma, Cheidze and Skobelev, straightway formed a “Provisional
Executive Committee of the Soviet of Workers’ Deputies,” which in the
course of the day was filled out principally with former revolutionists
who had lost connection with the masses but still preserved their
“names.” This Executive Committee, including also Bolsheviks in its
staff summoned the workers to elect deputies at once. The first session
was appointed for the same evening in the Tauride Palace. It actually
met at nine o’clock and ratified the staff of the Executive Committee,
supplementing it with official representatives from all the socialist
parties. But not here lay the significance of this first meeting of
representatives of the victorious proletariat of the capital. Delegates
from the mutinied regiments made speeches of greeting at this meeting.
Among their number were completely grey soldiers, shell-shocked as it
were by the insurrection, and still hardly in control of their tongues.
But they were just the ones who found the words which no orator could
find. That was one of the most moving scenes of the revolution, now
first feeling its power, feeling the unnumbered masses it has aroused,
the colossal tasks, the pride in success, the joyful failing of the
heart at the thought of the morrow which is to be still more beautiful
than today. The revolution still has no ritual, the streets are in
smoke, the masses have not yet learned the new songs. The meeting flows
on without order, without shores, like a river at flood. The Soviet
chokes in its own enthusiasm. The revolution is mighty but still naïve,
with a child’s naïveness.

At the first session it was decided to unite the garrison with the
workers in a general Soviet of Workers’ arid Soldiers’ Deputies. Who
first proposed this resolution? It probably arose from various, or
rather from all sides, as an echo of that fraternisation of workers and
soldiers which had this day decided the fate of the revolution. From the
moment of its formation the Soviet in the person of its Executive
Committee, begins to function as a sovereign. It elects a temporary food
commission and places it in charge of the mutineers and of the garrison
in general. It organises parallel with itself a Provisional
revolutionary staff – everything was called provisional in those days –
of which we have already spoken above. In order to remove financial
resources from the hands of the officials of the old power, the Soviet
decides to occupy the State Bank, the Treasury, the Mint and the
Printing Office with a revolutionary guard. The tasks and functions of
the Soviet grow unceasingly under pressure from the masses. The
revolution finds here its indubitable centre. The workers, the soldiers,
and soon also the peasants, will from now on turn only to the Soviet. In
their eyes the Soviet becomes the focus of all hopes and all authority,
an incarnation of the revolution itself. But representatives of the
possessing classes will also seek in the Soviet, with whatever grindings
of teeth, protection and counsel in the resolving of conflicts.

However, even in those very first days of victory, when the new power of
the revolution was forming itself with fabulous speed and inconquerable
strength, those socialists who stood at the head of the Soviet were
already looking around with alarm to see if they could find a real
“boss.” They took it for granted that power ought to pass to the
bourgeoisie. Here the chief political knot of the new régime is tied:
one of its threads leads into the chamber of the Executive Committee of
workers and soldiers, the other into the central headquarters of the
bourgeois parties.

The Council of Elders at three o’clock in the afternoon, when the
victory was already fully assured in the capital, elected a “Provisional
Committee of Members of the Duma” made up from the parties of the
Progressive Bloc with the addition of Cheidze and Kerensky. Cheidze
declined, Kerensky wiggle-waggled. The designation prudently indicated
that it was not a question of an official committee of the State Duma,
but a private committee of a conference of members of the Duma. The
leaders of the Progressive Bloc thought to the very end of but one
thing: how to avoid responsibility and not tie their own hands. The task
of the committee was defined with meticulous equivocation: “The
restoration of order and conducting of negotiations with institutions
and persons.” Not a word as to the kind of order which those gentlemen
intended to restore, nor with what institutions they intended to
negotiate. They were not yet openly reaching out their hands toward the
bear’s hide: what if he is not killed but only badly wounded? Only at
eleven o’clock in the evening of the 27th, when, as Miliukov
acknowledged, “the whole scope of the revolutionary movement had become
clear, did the Provisional Committee decide upon a further step, and
take in its hands the power which had fallen from the hands of the
government.” Imperceptibly the new institution had changed from a
committee of the members of the Duma to a committee of the Duma itself.
There is no better means of preserving the state juridical succession
than forgery. But Miliukov remains silent about the chief thing: the
leaders of the Executive Committee of the Soviet, created during that
day, had already appeared before the Provisional-Committee and
insistently demanded that it take the power into its hands. This
friendly push had its effect. Miliukov subsequently explained the
decision of the Duma Committee by saying that the government was
supposed to be sending loyal troops against the insurrectionists, “and
on the streets of the capital it threatened to come to actual battle.”
In reality the government was already without troops, the revolution was
wholly in the past. Rodzianko subsequently wrote that in case they had
declined the power, “the Duma would have been arrested and killed off to
the last man by the mutinied troops, and the power would gave gone
immediately to the Bolsheviks.” That is, of course, an inept
exaggeration, wholly in the character of the respected Lord Chamberlain;
but it unmistakably reflects the feelings of the Duma, which regarded
the transfer of power to itself as an act of political rape.

With such feelings the decision was not easily arrived at. Rodzianko
especially stormed and vacillated, putting a question to the others
“What will this be? Is it a rebellion or not a rebellion?” The
monarchist deputy Shulgin answered him, according to his own report:
“There is no rebellion in this at all; take the power as a loyal subject
... If the ministers have run away somebody has got to take their place
... There may be two results: Everything quiets down – the sovereign
names a new government, we turn over the power to him. Or it doesn’t
quiet down. In that case if we don’t take the power, others will take
it, those who have already elected some sort of scoundrels in the
factories ...” We need not take offence at the low-class abuse directed
by the reactionary gentleman toward the workers: the revolution had just
firmly stepped on the tails of all these gentlemen. The moral is clear:
if the monarchy win we are with it; if the revolution wins, we will try
to plunder it.

The conference lasted long. The democratic leaders were anxiously
waiting for a decision. Finally, Miliukov came out of the office of
Rodzianko. He wore a solemn expression. Approaching the Soviet
delegation Miliukov announced: “The decision is reached, we will take
the power ...” “I did not inquire whom he meant by _we_,” relates
Sukhanov with rapture, “I asked nothing further, but I felt with all my
being, as they say, a new situation. I felt that the ship of the
revolution, tossed in the squall of those hours by the complete caprice
of the elements, had put up a sail, acquired stability and regularity in
its movements amid the terrible storm and the rocking.” What a
high-flying formula for a prosaic recognition of the slavish dependence
of the petty bourgeois democracy upon capitalistic liberalism! And what
a deadly mistake in political perspective. The handing over of power to
the liberals not only will not give stability to the ship of state, but,
on the contrary, will become from that moment a source of headlessness
of the revolution, enormous chaos, embitterment of the masses, collapse
of the front, and in the future extreme bitterness of the civil war.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

If you look only backward to past ages, the transfer of power to the
bourgeoisie seems sufficiently regular: in all past revolutions who
fought on the barricades were workers, apprentices, in part students,
and the soldiers came over to their side. But afterwards the solid
bourgeoisie, having cautiously watched the barricades through their
windows, gathered up the power. But the February revolution of 1917 was
distinguished from former revolutions by the incomparably higher social
character and political level of the revolutionary class, by the hostile
distrust of the insurrectionists toward the liberal bourgeoisie, and the
consequent formation at the very moment of victory of a new organ of
revolutionary power, Soviet, based upon the armed strength of the
masses. In these circumstances the transfer of power to a politically
isolated and unarmed bourgeoisie demands explanation.

First of all we must examine more closely the correlation of forces
which resulted from the revolution. Was not the Soviet democracy
compelled by the objective situation to renounce the power in favour of
the big bourgeoisie? The bourgeoisie itself did not think so. We have
already seen that it not only did not expect power from the revolution,
but on the contrary foresaw in it a mortal danger to its whole social
situation. “The moderate parties not only did not desire a revolution,”
writes Rodzianko, “but were simply afraid of it. In particular the Party
of the People’s Freedom, ‘the Kadets,’ as a party standing at the left
wing of the moderate group, and therefore having more than the rest a
point of contact with the revolutionary parties of the country, was more
worried by the advancing catastrophe than all the rest.” The experience
of 1905 had too significantly hinted to the liberals that a victory of
the workers and peasants might prove no less dangerous to the
bourgeoisie than to the monarchy. It would seem that the course of the
February insurrection had only confirmed this foresight. However
formless in many respects may have been the political ideas of the
revolutionary masses in those days, the dividing line between the
toilers and the bourgeoisie was at any rate implacably drawn.

Instructor Stankevich who was close to liberal circles – a friend, not
an enemy of the Progressive Bloc – characterises in the following way
the mood of those circles on the second day after the overturn which
they had not succeeded in preventing: “Officially they celebrated,
eulogised the revolution, cried ‘Hurrah!’ to the fighters for freedom,
decorated themselves with red ribbons and marched under red banners ...
But in their souls, their conversations _tête-à-tête_, they were
horrified, they shuddered, they felt themselves captives in the hands of
hostile elements travelling an unknown road. Unforgettable is the figure
Rodzianko, that portly lord and imposing personage, when, preserving a
majestic dignity but with an expression of deep suffering despair frozen
on his pale face, he made his way through a crowd of dishevelled
soldiers in the corridor of the Tauride Palace. Officially it was
recorded: The soldiers have come to support the Duma in its struggle
with the government. But actually the Duma had been abolished from the
very first day. And the same expression was on the faces of the members
of the Provisional Committee of the Duma and those circles which
surrounded it. They say that the representatives of the Progressive Bloc
in their own homes wept with impotent despair.”

This living testimony is more precious than any sociological research
into the correlation of forces. According to his own tale, Rodzianko
trembled with impotent indignation when he saw unknown soldiers, “at
whose orders is not recorded” arresting the officials of the old régime
and bringing them to the Duma. The Lord Chamberlain turned out to be
something in the nature of a jailer in relation to people, with whom he
had, to be sure, his differences, but who never the less remained people
of his own circle. Shocked by this “arbitrary” action Rodzianko invited
the arrested Minister Sheglovitov into his office, but the soldiers
brusquely refused to turn over to him the hated official. “When I tried
to show my authority”, relates Rodzianko, “the soldiers surrounded their
captive and with the most challenging and insolent expression pointed to
their rifles, after which more ado they led Sheglovitov away I know not
where.” Would it be possible to confirm more absolutely Sankevich's
assertion that the regiments supposedly coming to support the Duma, in
reality abolished it?

That the power was from the very first moment in the hands of the soviet
– upon that question the Duma members less than anybody else could
cherish any illusion. The Octobrist deputy Shidlovsky, one of the
leaders of the Progressive Bloc, relates how, “The Soviet seized all the
Post and Telegraph bureaux, the wireless, all the Petrograd railroad
stations, all the printing establishments, so that without its
permission it was impossible to send a telegram, to leave Petrograd, or
to print an appeal.” In this unequivocal characterisation of the
correlation of forces, it is necessary to introduce one slight
correction: the “seizure” of the Soviet of the telegraph, railroad
stations, printing establishments, etc., meant merely that the workers
and clerks in those enterprises refused to submit to anybody but the
Soviet.

The plaint of Shidlovsky is admirably illustrated by an incident which
occurred at the very height of the negotiations about the power between
the leaders of the Soviet and the Duma. Their joint session was
interrupted by an urgent communication from Pskov, where after his
railroad wanderings the czar had now come to a stand, stating that they
wanted Rodzianko on the direct wire. The all-powerful President of the
Duma declared that he would not go to the telegraph office. “Look here,
you’ve got the power and the sovereignty,” he continued excitedly. “you
can, of course, arrest me or maybe you are going to arrest us all, how
do we know?” This happened on the 1st of March, less than twenty-hours
after the power was “taken over” by the Provisional Committee with
Rodzianko at its head.

How did it happen then that in such a situation the liberals turned out
to be in power? How and by whom were they authorised to form a
government as the result of a revolution which they had dreaded, which
they had resisted, which they tried to put down, which was accomplished
by masses completely hostile to them, and accomplished with such
audacity and decisiveness that the Soviet of Workers and Soldiers
arising from the insurrection became the natural, and by all
unequivocally recognised, master of the situation?

Let us listen now to the other side, to those who surrendered the power.
“The people did not gravitate toward the State Duma,” writes Sukhanov of
the February days, “they were not interested in it, and never thought of
making it either politically or technically the centre of the movement.”
This acknowledgement is the more remarkable in that its author will soon
devote all his force to getting the power handed over to a committee of
the Sate Duma. “Miliukov perfectly understood,” says Sukhanov further,
speaking of the negotiations of March, “that the Executive Committee was
in a perfect position either to give the power to the bourgeois
government, or not to give it.” Could it be more categorically
expressed? Could a political situation be clearer? And nevertheless
Sukhanov, in direct contradiction to the situation and to himself,
immediately adds: “The power destined to replace czarism must be only a
bourgeois power ... we must steer our course by this principle.
Otherwise the uprising will not succeed and the revolution will
collapse.” The revolution will collapse without Rodzianko!

The problem of the living relations of social forces is here replaced by
an a priori scheme and a conventional terminology: and this is the very
essence of the doctrinairism of the intelligentsia. But we shall see
later that this doctrinairism was by no means Platonic: it fulfilled a
very real political function, although with blindfolded eyes.

We have quoted Sukhanov for a reason. In that first period the inspirer
of the Executive Committee was not its president, Cheidze, an honest and
limited provincial, but this very Sukhanov, a man, generally speaking,
totally unsuited for revolutionary leadership. Semi-Narodnik,
semi-Marxist, a conscientious observer rather than a statesman, a
journalist rather than a revolutionist, a rationaliser rather than a
journalist – he was capable of standing by a revolutionary conception
only up to the time when it was necessary to carry it into action. A
passive internationalist during the war, he decided on the very first
day of the revolution that it was necessary just as quickly as possible
to toss the power and the war over to the bourgeoisie. As a theorist –
that is, at least in his feelings of the need that things should be
reasoned out, if not in his ability to fulfil it – he stood above all
the then members of the Executive Committee. But his chief strength lay
in his ability to translate into a language of doctrinairism the organic
traits of all that many-coloured and yet nevertheless homogeneous
brotherhood: distrust of their own powers, fear of the masses, and a
heartily respectful attitude toward the bourgeoisie. Lenin described
Sukhanov as one of the best representatives of the petty bourgeoisie,
and that is the most flattering thing that can be said of him.

Only in this connection it must not be forgotten that the question is
here of a new capitalist type of petty bourgeoisie, of industrial,
commercial and bank clerks, the functionaries of capital on one side,
and the workers’ bureaucracy on the other – that is of that new _middle
caste_, in whose name the well known German social democrat Edward
Bernstein undertook at the end of the last century a revision of the
revolutionary conceptions of Marx. In order to answer the question how a
revolution of workers and peasants came to surrender the power to the
bourgeoisie, it is necessary to introduce into the political chain an
intermediate link: the petty bourgeois democrats and socialists of the
Sukhanov type, journalists and politicians of the new middle caste, who
had taught the masses that the bourgeoisie is an enemy, but themselves
feared more than any thing else to release the masses from the control
of that enemy. The contradiction between the character of the revolution
and the character of the power that issued from it, is explained by the
contradictory character of this new petty bourgeois partition-wall
between the revolutionary masses and the capitalist bourgeoisie. In the
course of further events the political rôle of this petty bourgeois
democracy of the new type will fully open before us. For the time being
we will limit ourselves to a few words.

A minority of the revolutionary class actually participates in the
insurrection, but the strength of that minority lies in the support, or
at least sympathy, of the majority. The active and militant minority
inevitably puts forward under fire from the enemy its more revolutionary
and self-sacrificing element. It is thus natural that in the February
fights the worker-Bolshevik occupied the leading place. But the
situation changes the moment the victory is won and its political
fortification begins. The elections to the organs and institutions of
the victorious revolution attract and challenge infinitely broader
masses than those who battled with arms in their hands. This is true not
only of general democratic institutions like the city dumas and
zemstvos, or later on, the Constituent Assembly, but also of class
institutions, like the Soviet of Workers’ Deputies. An overwhelming
majority of the workers, Menshevik, Social Revolutionary and non-party,
supported the Bolsheviks at the moment of direct grapple with czarism.
But only a small minority of the workers understood that the Bolsheviks
were different from other socialist parties. At the same time, however,
all the workers drew a sharp line between themselves and the
bourgeoisie. This fact determined the political situation after the
victory. The workers elected socialists, that is, those who were not
only against the monarchy, but against the bourgeoisie. In doing this
they made almost no distinction between the three socialist parties. And
since the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries comprised infinitely
larger ranks of the intelligentsia – who came pouring in from all sides
– and thus got into their hands immediately an immense staff of
agitators, the elections, even in shops and factories, gave them an
enormous majority. An impulse in the same direction, but an incomparably
stronger one, came from the awakening army. On the fifth day of the
insurrection the Petrograd garrison followed the workers. After the
victory it found itself summoned to hold elections for the Soviet. The
soldiers trustfully elected those who had been for the revolution
against monarchist officers, and who knew how to say this out loud:
these were volunteers, clerks, assistant surgeons, young war-time
officers from the intelligentsia, petty military officials – that is,
the lowest layers of that new middle _caste_. All of them almost to the
last man inscribed themselves, beginning in March, in the party of the
Social Revolutionaries, which with its intellectual formlessness
perfectly expressed their intermediate social situation and their
limited political outlook. The representation of the garrison thus
turned out to be incomparably more moderate and bourgeois than the
soldier masses. But the latter were not conscious of this difference: it
would reveal itself to them only during the experience of the coming
months. The workers, on their part, were trying to cling as closely as
possible to the soldiers, in order to strengthen their blood-bought
union and more permanently arm the revolution. And since the spokesmen
of the army were predominantly half-baked Social Revolutionaries, this
fact could not help raising the authority of that party along with its
ally, the Mensheviks, in the eyes of the workers themselves. Thus
resulted the predominance in the soviets of the two Compromise parties.
It is sufficient to remark that even in the soviet of the Vyborg
district the leading rôle in those first times belonged to the
worker-Mensheviks. Bolshevism in that period was still only simmering in
the depths of the revolution. Thus the official Bolsheviks, even in the
Petrograd Soviet, represented an insignificant minority, who had
moreover none too clearly defined its tasks.

Thus arose the paradox of the February revolution. The power was in the
hands of the democratic socialists. It had not been seized by them
accidentally by way of a Blanquist coup; no, it was openly delivered to
them by the victorious masses of the people. Those masses not only did
not trust or support the bourgeoisie, but they did not even distinguish
them from the nobility and the bureaucracy. They put their weapons at
the disposal only of the soviets. Meanwhile the socialists, having so
easily arrived at the head of the soviets, were worrying about only one
question: Will the bourgeoisie, politically isolated, hated by the
masses and hostile through and through to the revolution, consent to
accept the power from our hands? Its consent must be won at any cost.
And since obviously a bourgeoisie cannot renounce its bourgeois
programme, we, the “socialists,” will have to renounce ours: we will
have to keep still about the monarchy, the war, the land, if only the
bourgeoisie will accept the gift of power. In carrying out this
operation, the “socialists,” as though to ridicule themselves, continued
to designate the bourgeoisie no otherwise than as their class enemy. In
the ceremonial forms of their worship was thus introduced an act of
arrant blasphemy. A class struggle carried to its conclusion is a
struggle for state power. The fundamental character of a revolution lies
in its carrying the class struggle to its conclusion. A revolution is a
direct struggle for power. Nevertheless, our “socialists” are not
worried about getting the power away from the class enemy who does not
possess it, and could not with his own forces seize it, but, just the
opposite, with forcing this power upon him at any cost. Is not this
indeed a paradox? It seems all the more striking, because the experience
of the German revolution of 1918 did not then exist, and humanity had
not yet witnessed a colossal and still more successful operation of this
same type carried out by the “new middle caste” led by the German social
democracy.

How did the Compromisers explain their conduct? One explanation had a
doctrinaire character: Since the revolution is bourgeois, the socialists
must not compromise themselves with the power – let the bourgeoisie
answer for itself. This sounded very implacable. In reality, however,
the petty bourgeoisie disguised with this false implacability its
obsequiousness before the power of wealth, education, enfranchised
citizenship. The right of the big bourgeoisie to power, the petty
bourgeois acknowledged as a right of primogeniture, independent of the
correlation of forces. Fundamentally we had here the same almost
instinctive movement which has compelled the small merchant or teacher
to step aside respectfully in the stations or theatres to let a
Rothschild pass. Doctrinaire arguments served as a compensation for the
consciousness of a personal insignificance. In only two months, when it
became evident that the bourgeoisie was totally unable with its own
force to keep the power thus delivered to it, the Compromisers had no
difficulty in tossing away their “socialistic” prejudices and entering a
coalition ministry – not in order to crowd out the bourgeoisie but, on
the contrary, in order to save it – not against its will but, on the
contrary, at its invitation, which sounded almost like a command.
Indeed, the bourgeoisie threatened the democrats, if they refused, to
let the power drop on their heads.

The second argument for refusing the power, although no more serious in
essence, had a more practical appearance. Our friend Sukhanov made the
most of the “scatteredness” of democratic Russia: “The democrats had at
that time no stable or influential organisations, party, professional or
municipal.” That sounds almost like a joke! Not a word about the soviets
of workers’ and soldiers’ deputies from this socialist who is acting in
the name of the soviets. As a matter of fact, thanks to the tradition of
1905, the soviets sprang up as though from under the earth, and
immediately became incomparably more powerful than all the other
organisations which later tried to compete with them (the
municipalities, the co-operatives, and in part the trade unions). As for
the peasantry, a class by its very nature scattered, thanks to the war
and revolution it was exactly at that moment organised as never before.
The war had assembled the peasants into an army, and the revolution had
given the army a political character! No fewer than eight million
peasants were united in companies and squadrons, which had immediately
created their revolutionary representation and could through it at any
moment be brought to their feet by a telephone call. Is this at all
similar to “scatteredness”?

You may say to be sure, that at the moment of deciding the question of
power, the democracy did not know what would be the attitude of the army
at the front. We will not raise the question whether there was the
slightest basis for fearing or hoping that the soldiers at the front,
worn out with the war, would want to support the imperialist
bourgeoisie. It is sufficient to remark that this question was fully
decided during the next two or three days, which the Compromisers passed
in the backstage preparation of a bourgeois government. “The revolution
was successfully achieved by the 3rd of March,” concedes Sukhanov. In
spite of the adherence of the whole army to the soviets, the leaders of
the latter continued with all their strength to push away the power:
they feared it the more, the more completely it became concentrated in
their hands.

But why? How could those democrats, “socialists,” directly supported by
such human masses as no democracy in history ever had behind it –
masses, moreover, with a considerable experience, disciplined and armed,
and organised in soviets – how could that all-powerful and apparently
inconquerable democracy fear the power? This apparently intricate enigma
is explained by the fact that the democracy did not trust its own
support, feared those very masses, did not believe in the stability of
their confidence in itself, and worst of all dreaded what they called
“anarchy,” that is, that having seized the power, they might along with
the power prove a mere plaything of the so called unbridled elements. In
other words, the democracy felt that it was not called to be the leader
of the people at the moment of its revolutionary uprising, but the left
wing of a bourgeois order, its feeler stretched out toward the masses.
It called itself, and even deemed itself “socialistic,” in order to
disguise not only from the masses, but from itself too, its actual rôle:
without this self-inebriation it could not have fulfilled this rôle.
This is the solution of the fundamental paradox of the February
revolution.

On the evening of March 1, representatives of the Executive Committee,
Cheidze, Steklov, Sukhanov and others, appeared at a meeting of the Duma
Committee, in order to discuss the conditions upon which the soviets
would support the new government. The programme of the democrats flatly
ignored the question of war, republic, land, eight-hour day, and
confined itself to one single demand: to give the left parties freedom
of agitation. An example of disinterestedness for all peoples and ages!
Socialists, having all the power in their hands, and upon whom alone it
depended whether freedom of agitation should be given to others or not,
handed over the power to their “class enemy” upon the condition that the
latter should promise them ... freedom of agitation! Rodzianko was
afraid to go to the telegraph office and said to Cheidze and Sukhanov:
“You have the power, you can arrest us all.” Cheidze and Sukhanov
answered him: “Take the power, but don’t arrest us for propaganda.” When
you study the negotiations of the Compromisers with the liberals, and in
general all the incidents of the interrelation of the left and right
wings at the Tauride Palace in those days, it seems as though upon that
gigantic stage upon which the historic drama of a people is developing,
a group of provincial actors, availing themselves of a vacant corner and
a pause, were playing out a cheap quick-change vaudeville act.

The leaders of the bourgeoisie, we must do them justice, never expected
anything of the kind. They would surely have less dreaded the revolution
if they had counted upon this kind of politics from its leaders. To be
sure, they would have miscalculated even in that case, but at least
together with the latter. Fearing, nevertheless, that the bourgeoisie
might not agree to take the power on the proposed conditions, Sukhanov
delivered a threatening ultimatum: “Either we or nobody can control the
elements ... there is but one way out – agree to our terms.” In other
words: accept the programme, which is your programme; for this we
promise to subdue for you the masses who gave us the power. Poor
subduers of the elements!

Miliukov was astonished. “He did not try to conceal,” remembers
Sukhanov, “his satisfaction and his agreeable astonishment.” When the
Soviet delegates, to make it sound more important, added that their
conditions were “final,” Miliukov even became expansive and patted them
on the head with the remark: “Yes, I was listening and I was thinking
how far forward our workers’ movement has progressed since the days of
1905 ...” In the same tone of the good-natured crocodile the
Hohenzollern diplomat at Brest-Litovsk conversed with the delegates of
the Ukranian Rada, complimenting them upon their statesman-like maturity
just before swallowing them up. If the Soviet democracy was not
swallowed up by the bourgeoisie, it was not Miliukov’s fault, and no
thanks to Sukhanov. The bourgeoisie received the power behind the backs
of the people. It had no support in the toiling classes. But along with
the power it received a simulacrum of support second-hand. The
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries, lifted aloft by the masses,
delivered as if from themselves a testimonial of confidence to the
bourgeoisie. If you look at this operation of formal democracy in
cross-section you have a picture of a twofold election, in which the
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries play the technical rôle of a
middle link, that is, Kadet electors. If you take the question
politically, it must be conceded that the Compromisers betrayed the
confidence of the masses by calling to power those against whom they
themselves were elected. And finally from a deeper, more social point of
view, the question presents itself thus: the petty bourgeois parties,
having in everyday circumstances shown an extraordinary pretentiousness
and satisfaction with themselves, as soon as they were raised by a
revolution to the heights of power, were frightened by their own
inadequacy and hastened to surrender the helm to representatives of
capital. In this act of prostration is immediately revealed the terrible
shakiness of the new middle caste and its humiliating dependence upon
the big bourgeoisie. Realising or only feeling that the power in their
hands would not last long anyway, that they would soon have to surrender
it either to the right or the left, the democrats decided that it was
better to give it today to the solid liberals than tomorrow to the
extreme representatives of the proletariat. But in this view also, the
rôle of the Compromisers, in spite of its social conditioning, does not
cease to be a treachery to the masses.

In giving their confidence to the socialists the workers and soldiers
found themselves, quite unexpectedly, expropriated politically. They
were bewildered, alarmed, but did not immediately find a way out. Their
own betrayers deafened them from above with arguments to which they had
no ready answer, but which conflicted with all their feelings and
intentions. The revolutionary tendencies of the masses, even at the
moment of the February revolution, did not at all coincide with the
Compromise tendencies of the petty bourgeois parties. The proletariat
and the peasantry voted for the Mensheviks and the Social
Revolutionaries not as compromisers, but as opponents of the czar, the
capitalists and the landowners. But in voting for them they created a
partition-wall between themselves and their own aims. They could not now
move forward at all without bumping into this wall erected by
themselves, and knocking it over. Such was the striking _quid pro quo_
comprised in the class relations as they were uncovered by the February
revolution.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

To this fundamental paradox a supplementary one was immediately added.
The liberals agreed to take the power from the hands of the socialists
only on condition that the monarchy should agree to take it from their
hands. During the time when Guchkov, with the monarchist Shulgin,
already known to us, was travelling out to Pskov to save the dynasty,
the problem of a constitutional monarchy was at the centre of
negotiation between the two committees in the Tauride Palace. Miliukov
was trying to convince the democrats who had come to him with the power
in the palms of their hands, that the Romanovs could now no longer be
dangerous, that Nicholas, to be sure, would have to be removed, but that
the czarevich Alexei, with Mikhail as regent, could fully guarantee the
welfare of the country: “The one is a sick child, the other an utterly
stupid man.” We will add also a characterisation which the liberal
monarchist Shidlovsky gave of the candidate for czar: “Mikhail
Alexandrovich has tried every way possible to avoid interfering in any
affairs of state, devoting himself wholeheartedly to horse-racing.” A
striking recommendation, especially if it were repeated before the
masses. After the flight of Louis XVI to Varennes, Danton proclaimed in
the Jacobin Club that once a man is weak-minded he can no longer be
king. The Russian liberals thought on the contrary that the
weak-mindedness of a monarch would serve as the best possible decoration
for a constitutional régime. However, this was a random argument
calculated to impress the mentality of the “left” simpletons – a little
too crude, however, even for them. It was suggested to broad circles of
the liberal Philistines that Mikhail was an “Anglomaniac” – without
making clear whether in the matter of horseracing or parliamentarism.
But the main argument was that they needed a “customary symbol of
power.” Otherwise the people would imagine that anarchy had come.

The democrats listened, were politely surprised and tried to persuade
them ... to declare a republic? No. Only not to decide the question in
advance. The third point of the Executive Committee’s conditions read:
“The Provisional Government shall not undertake any steps which would
define in advance the future form of government.” Miliukov, made of the
question of the monarchy an ultimatum. The democrats were in despair.
But here the masses came to their help. At the meetings in the Tauride
Palace absolutely nobody, not only among the workers, but among the
soldiers, wanted a czar, and there was no means of imposing one upon
them. Nevertheless, Miliukov tried to swim against the current, and to
save the throne and dynasty over the heads of his left allies. In his
history of the revolution he himself cautiously remarks that towards the
end of the 2nd of March the excitement produced by his announcement of
the Regency of Mikhail “had considerably increased.” Rodzianko far more
colourfully paints the effect upon the masses produced by this
monarchist manoeuvre of the liberals. The moment he arrived from Pskov
with the czar’s abdication in favour of Mikhail, Guchkov, upon the
demand of the workers, went from the station to the railroad shops to
tell what had happened, and having read the act of abdication he
concluded: “Long live the Emperor Mikhail!” The result was unexpected.
The orator was, according to Rodzianko, immediately arrested by the
workers, and even apparently threatened with execution. “He was
liberated with great difficulty, with the help of a sentry company of
the nearest regiment.” Rodzianko, as always, exaggerates a little, but
the essence of the matter is correctly stated. The country had so
radically vomited up the monarch that it could not ever crawl down the
people’s throat again. The revolutionary masses did not permit even the
thought of a new czar.

Facing such a situation the members of the Provisional Committee sidled
away from Mikhail one after another – not decisively, but “until the
Constituent Assembly” and then we shall see. Only Miliukov and Guchkov
stood out for monarchy to the end, continuing to make it a condition of
their entering the cabinet. What to do? The democrats thought that
without Miliukov it was impossible to create a bourgeois government, and
without a bourgeois government to save the revolution. Bickerings and
persuasions went on without end. At a morning conference on March 3, a
conviction of the necessity of “persuading the grand duke to abdicate” –
they considered him czar then, after all! – seemed to gain the upper
hand completely in the Provisional Committee. The left Kadet Nekrasov
even drew up a text of the abdication. But since Miliukov stubbornly
refused to yield, a decision was finally reached after further
passionate quarrels: “Both sides shall present before the grand duke
their opinions and without further argument leave the decision to the
grand duke himself.” Thus an “utterly stupid man,” to whom his older
brother overthrown by the insurrection had tried, in conflict even with
the dynastic statute, to slip the throne, unexpectedly became the
super-umpire on the question of the state structure of the revolutionary
country. However improbable it may seem, a betting competition had
arisen over the fate of the state. In order to induce the duke to tear
himself away from the stables for the throne, Miliukov assured him that
there was an excellent possibility of collecting outside of Petrograd a
military force to defend his rights. In other words, having barely
received the power from the hands of the socialists, Miliukov advanced a
plan for a monarchist coup d'etat. At the end of the speeches for and
against, of which there were not a few, the grand duke requested time
for reflection. Inviting Rodzianko into another room Mikhail flatly
asked him: Would the new authorities guarantee him only the crown, or
also his head? The incomparable Lord Chamberlain answered that he could
only promise the monarch in case of need to die with him. This did not
at all satisfy the candidate. Coming out to the deputies after an
embrace with Rodzianko, Mikhail Romanov “pretty firmly” declared that he
would decline the lofty but risky position offered to him. Here
Kerensky, who personified in these negotiations the conscience of the
democracy, ecstatically jumped up from his chair with the words: “Your
Highness, you are a noble man!” – and swore that from that time on he
would proclaim this everywhere. “Kerensky’s grandiloquence,” comments
Miliukov dryly, “harmonised badly with the prose of the decision just
taken.” It is impossible to disagree. The text of this interlude truly
left no place for pathos. To our comparison with a vaudeville played in
the corner of an ancient amphitheatre, it is necessary to add that the
stage was divided by screens into two halves: in one the revolutionists
were begging the liberals to save the revolution, in the other the
liberals were begging the monarchy to save liberalism.

The representatives of the Executive Committee were sincerely perplexed
as to why such a cultured and far-sighted man as Miliukov should be
obstinate about some old monarchy, and even be ready to renounce the
power if he could not get a Romanov thrown in. Miliukov’s monarchism,
however, was neither doctrinaire, nor romantic; on the contrary, it was
a result of the naked calculation of the frightened property-owners. In
its nakedness indeed lay its hopeless weakness. Miliukov, the historian,
might, it is true, cite the example of the leader of the French
revolutionary bourgeoisie, Mirabeau, who also in his day strove to
reconcile the revolution with the king. There too at the bottom it was
the fear of the property-owners for their property: the more prudent
policy was to disguise it with the monarchy, just as the monarchy had
disguised itself with the church. But in 1789 the tradition of kingly
power in France had still a universal popular recognition, to say
nothing of the fact that all surrounding Europe was monarchist. In
clinging to the king the French bourgeoisie was still on common ground
with the people – at least in the sense that it was using against the
people their own prejudices. The situation was wholly different in
Russia in 1917. Aside from the shipwreck of the monarchist régime in
various other countries of the world, the Russian monarchy itself had
been irremediably damaged already in 1905. After the 9th of January,
Father Gapon had cursed the czar and his “serpent offspring.” The Soviet
of Workers’ Deputies of 1905 had stood openly for a republic. The
monarchist feelings of the peasantry, upon which the monarchy itself had
long counted, and with references to which the bourgeoisie camouflaged
its own monarchism, simply did not exist. The militant
counter-revolution which arose later, beginning with Kornilov, although
hypocritically, nevertheless all the more demonstratively, disavowed the
czarist power – so little was left of the monarchist roots in the
people. But that same revolution of 1905, which mortally wounded the
monarchy, had undermined forever the unstable republican tendencies of
the “advanced” bourgeoisie. In contradicting each other, these two
processes supplemented each other. Feeling in the first hours of the
February revolution that it was drowning, the bourgeoisie grabbed at a
straw. It needed the monarchy, not because that was a faith common to it
and the people; on the contrary, the bourgeoisie had nothing left to set
against the faith of the people but a crowned phantom. The “educated”
classes of Russia entered the arena of the revolution not as the
announcers of a rational state, but as defenders of medieval
institutions. Having no support either in the people or in themselves,
they sought it above themselves. Archimedes undertook to move the earth
if they would give him a point of support. Miliukov was looking for a
point of support in order to prevent the overthrow of the landlord’s
earth.[1] He felt in this operation much nearer to the calloused Russian
generals and the hierarchs of the orthodox church, than to these tame
democrats who were worried about nothing but the approval of the
liberals. Not being in a position to break the revolution, Miliukov
firmly decided to outwit it. He was ready to swallow a great deal: civil
liberty for soldiers, democratic municipalities, Constituent Assembly,
but on one condition: that they should give him an Archimedian point of
support in the form of monarchy. He intended gradually and step by step
to make the monarchy the axis of a group of generals, a patched-up
bureaucracy, princes of the church, property-owners, all those who were
dissatisfied with the revolution, and starting with a “symbol,” to
create gradually a real monarchist bridle for the masses as soon as the
latter should get tired of the revolution. If only he could gain time.
Another leader of the Kadet Party, Nabokov, explained later what a
capital advantage would have been gained if Mikhail had consented to
take the throne: “The fatal question of convoking a Constituent Assembly
in war time would have been removed.” We must bear those words in mind.
The conflict about the date of the Constituent Assembly occupied a great
place between February and October, during which time the Kadets
categorically denied their intention to delay the summoning of the
people’s representatives, while insistently and stubbornly carrying out
a policy of postponement in fact. Alas, they had only themselves to rely
on in this effort: the monarchist camouflage they never got. After the
desertion of Mikhail, Miliukov had not even a straw to grab.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. In Russian, the words _earth_ and _land_ are the same. [_Trans._]



CHAPTER 10 THE NEW POWER


 

The belated Russian bourgeoisie, separated from the people, bound up
much more closely with foreign finance capital than with its own toiling
masses, hostile to the revolution which had triumphed, could not in its
own name find a single justification for its pretence to power. And yet
some justification was necessary, for the revolution was subjecting to a
ruthless examination not only inherited rights but new claims. Least of
all capable of presenting convincing arguments to the masses was the
President of the Provisional Committee, Rodzianko, who arrived at the
head of the revolutionary nation during the first days of the uprising.

A page in the court of Alexander II, an officer of the Cavalier Guard,
head of the nobles of his province, Lord Chamberlain under Nicholas II,
a monarchist through and through, a rich landlord and agrarian
administrator, a member of the Octobrist Party, a deputy in the State
Duma, Rodzianko was finally elected its president. This happened after
the resignation of Guchkov, who was hated by the court as a “Young
Turk.” The Duma hoped that through the mediation of the Lord Chamberlain
it would find easier access to the heart of the monarch. Rodzianko did
what he could: sincerely enough assured the czar of his loyalty to the
dynasty, begged the honour of being presented to the Heir Apparent, and
introduced himself to the latter as “the biggest and fattest man in
Russia.” In spite of all his Byzantine clowning, the Lord Chamberlain
did not win over the czar to the constitution, and the czarina briefly
referred to Rodzianko in her letters as a scoundrel. During the war the
President of the Duma undoubtedly gave the czar not a few unpleasant
moments, cornering him when making personal reports and filling his ears
with prolix exhortations, patriotic criticisms and gloomy forebodings.
Rasputin considered Rodzianko a personal enemy. Kurlov, who was close to
the court gang, speaks of Rodzianko’s “insolence combined with obvious
limitations.” Witte spoke in better terms, although condescendingly, of
the President of the Duma: “Not a stupid man, rather sensible; but still
Rodzianko’s chief talent lies not in his mind but his voice-he has an
excellent bass.” At first Rodzianko tried to put down the revolution
with the help of the fire-hose; he wept when he found out that the
government of Count Golytsin had abandoned its post; declined with
terror the power which the socialists offered him; afterwards decided to
take it, but only in order as a loyal subject to restore the lost
property as soon as possible to the monarch. It wasn’t Rodzianko’s fault
if that opportunity never arrived. However the revolution – with the
help of the socialists – did offer the Lord Chamberlain a grand
opportunity to exercise his thunderous bass before the revolting troops.
As early as the 27th of February this retired Captain of the Guard said
to a cavalier regiment which had come to the Tauride Palace: “Christian
warriors, hearken to my counsel. I am an old man; I will not deceive you
– obey your officers – they will not teach you evil, and will act in
full agreement with the State Duma. Long live holy Russia!” Such a
revolution as that would have been agreeable to all the Guard officers,
but the soldiers couldn’t help wondering what was the use making such a
revolution. Rodzianko feared the soldiers; feared the workers,
considered Cheidze and other left deputies German agents, and while he
stood at the head of the revolution kept looking around every few
minutes to see whether the Soviet was going to arrest him.

The figure of Rodzianko was a little funny, but by no means accidental.
This Lord Chamberlain with an excellent bass personified the union of
the two ruling classes of Russia, the landlords and the bourgeoisie,
with the progressive priesthood adhering to them. Rodzianko himself was
very pious and expert in hymn singing – and the liberal bourgeoisie,
whatever its attitude towards Greek orthodoxy, considered a union with
the church just as necessary to law and order as a union with the
monarchy. The venerable monarchist, having received the power from the
hands of conspirators, rebels and tyrannicides, wore a haunted
expression in those days. And the other members of the Provisional
committee felt but little better. Some of them never appeared at the
Tauride Palace at all, considering that the situation had not yet
sufficiently defined itself. The wisest of them sneaked on tiptoe round
the blaze of the revolution, choking from the smoke, and saying to
themselves: let it burn down to the coals, then we’ll try to cook up
something. Although it agreed to accept the power, the Committee did not
immediately decide to form a ministry. “Awaiting the proper moment for
the formation of a government” – as Miliukov expresses it – the
Committee confined itself to the naming of commissars from the
membership of the Duma to the principal governmental departments. That
left them a chance to retreat.

To the Ministry of the Interior they delegated the deputy Karaulov,
insignificant but rather less cowardly than the others, and he issued on
March 1 an order for the arrest of all police officials, public, secret
and political. This ferocious revolutionary gesture was purely platonic
in character, for the police were already being arrested and the jails
were their only refuge from massacre. It was some time later that the
reaction began to regard this demonstrative act of Karaulov as the
beginning of all their troubles.

As commander of Petrograd, they appointed Colonel Engelhardt, an officer
of the Cavalier Guard, owner of a racing stud and vast landed
properties. Instead of arresting the “dictator” Ivanov, sent from the
front to pacify the capital, Engelhardt put at his disposition a
reactionary officer in the capacity of chief of staff. It was all a
matter between friends.

To the Ministry of Justice they delegated a bright light of the Moscow
liberal bar, the eloquent and empty Maklakov, who began by giving the
reactionary bureaucrats to understand that he did not want to accept the
ministry as a favour from the revolution, and “glancing around at a
messenger boy who had just come in,” said in French: “_Le danger est à
gauche._” The workers and soldiers did not have to understand French in
order to recognise in all these gentlemen their mortal enemies.

Rodzianko’s reverberations at the head of the Committee did not last
very long. His candidacy for president of the revolution faded away of
itself. The mediator between the monarchy and the property owners was
too obviously useless as a mediator between the property owners and the
revolution.

But he did not disappear from the scene. He stubbornly attempted to
revive the Duma as a counter-weight to the Soviet, and invariably
appears in the centre of all attempts to solidify the
capitalist-landlord counter-revolution. We shall hear of him again.

On the 1st March the Provisional Committee undertook the formation of a
ministry, appointing to it those men whom the Duma had been recommending
to the czar since 1915 as enjoying the confidence of the country. They
were big landlords and industrialists, opposition deputies in the Duma,
leaders of the Progressive Bloc. The fact is that, with one single
exception, the revolution accomplished by workers and soldiers found no
reflection whatever in the staff of the revolutionary government. The
exception was Kerensky. The distance from Rodzianko to Kerensky appeared
officially to represent the whole gamut of the February revolution.

Kerensky entered the government somewhat in the character of a
plenipotentiary ambassador. His connection with the revolution, however,
was that of a provincial lawyer who had defended political cases.
Kerensky was not a revolutionist; he merely hung around the revolution.
Arriving in the fourth Duma thanks to his legal position, Kerensky
became the president of a grey and characterless faction, the Trudoviks,
anaemic fruit of a crossbreeding between liberalism and Narodnikism. He
had no theoretical preparation, no political schooling, no ability to
think, no political will. The place of these qualities was occupied by a
nimble susceptibility, an inflammable temperament, and that kind of
eloquence which operates neither upon mind nor will, but upon the
nerves. His speeches in the Duma, couched in a spirit of declamatory
radicalism which had no lack of occasions, gave Kerensky, if not
popularity, at least a certain notoriety. During the war Kerensky, a
patriot, had looked with the liberals upon the very idea of revolution
as ruinous. He acknowledged the revolution only after it had come and
catching him up by his pseudo-popularity lifted him aloft. The
revolution naturally identified itself for him with the new power. The
Executive Committee decided, however, that was a bourgeois revolution
and the power should belong to the bourgeoisie. This formula seemed
false to Kerensky, if only because it slammed the doors of the ministry
in his face. Kerensky was quite rightly convinced that his socialism
would not trouble the bourgeois revolution, nor would the bourgeois
revolution do any damage to his socialism. The Provisional Committee of
the Duma decided to try to draw this radical deputy away from the
Soviet, and achieved it with no difficulty by offering him the portfolio
of Justice, which had already been refused by Maklakov. Kerensky
buttonholed his friends in the _couloirs_, and asked: Shall I take it or
not? His friends had no doubt whatever that he would take it. Sukhanov,
who was very friendly towards Kerensky at that period, attributes to him
in his subsequent memoirs, “a confidence in some mission of his own ...
and an enormous vexation with those who had not yet found out about that
mission.” In the long run his friends, and Sukhanov among them, advised
Kerensky to take the portfolio: We will be safer this way – we will have
our own man to tell us what is going on among those foxy liberals. But
while pushing Kerensky _sub rosa_ toward that sin to which he himself
aspired with all his heart, the leaders of the Executive Committee
refused him their official sanction. As Sukhanov reminded Kerensky, the
Executive Committee had already expressed itself against its members
entering the government, and to raise the question again in the Soviet
would be “not without danger,” for the Soviet might simply answer: “The
power ought to belong to the soviet democracy”. Those are the very words
of Sukhanov himself, an unbelievable mixture of naïveté and cynicism.
The inspirer of this whole governmental mystification thus openly
acknowledges that, as early as the 2nd of March, the Petrograd Soviet
was in a mood for the _formal_ seizure of that power which had belonged
to it _in fact_ since the evening of February 27 – that only behind the
backs of the workers and soldiers, without their knowledge, and against
their actual will, had the socialist leaders been able to expropriate
this power for the benefit of the bourgeoisie. In Sukhanov’s account
this deal between the democrats and the liberals acquires all the
necessary juridical marks of a crime against the revolution, a veritable
secret conspiracy against the sovereignty and rights of the people.
Discussing Kerensky’s impatience, the leaders of the Executive Committee
whispered that it would be embarrassing for the socialists to take back
from the members of the Duma a small piece of the power when they had
only just handed the whole thing over to them. Better let Kerensky do it
on his own responsibility. Truly those gentlemen had an infallible
instinct for finding in every situation the most false and tangled-up
solution possible. But Kerensky did not want to enter the government in
the business suit of a radical deputy; he wanted to wear the cloak of a
plenipotentiary of the triumphant revolution. In order to avoid
obstacles, he did not appeal for sanction either to that party of which
he professed himself a member, nor to the Executive Committee of which
he was one of the vice-presidents. Without warning the leaders, he
appeared at a plenary session of the Soviet – chaotic meetings in those
days – requested the floor for a special announcement, and in a speech
which some describe as incoherent, others as hysterical – in which, to
be sure, there is no contradiction – demanded the personal confidence of
the deputies, and spoke of his general readiness to die for the
revolution, and his more immediate readiness to take the portfolio of
Minister of Justice. He had only to mention the necessity of complete
political amnesty and a prosecution of the czar’s officials, in order to
win tumultuous applause from that inexperienced and leaderless assembly.
“This farce,” Shliapnikov remembers, “produced in many a deep
indignation and disgust for Kerensky.” But nobody opposed him. Having
turned over the power to the bourgeoisie, the socialists, as we have
heard, wanted to avoid raising that question before the masses. There
was no vote. Kerensky decided to interpret the applause as a vote of
confidence. In a way he was right. The Soviet was undoubtedly in favour
of socialists entering the ministry, seeing in that a step toward the
liquidation of the bourgeois government with which it had not for a
moment reconciled itself. At any rate, Kerensky, flouting the official
doctrine of the sovereignty, accepted on March 2 the post of Minister of
Justice. “He was highly pleased with his appointment,” the Octobrist
Shidlovsky relates, “and I distinctly remember him in the chambers of
the Provisional Committee, lying in an armchair, telling us heatedly
upon what an unattainably high pedestal he was going to place justice in
Russia.” He demonstrated this some months later in his prosecution of
the Bolsheviks.

The Menshevik Cheidze, upon whom the liberals – guided by a too simple
calculation and an international tradition – wanted in a hard moment to
unload the Ministry of Labour, categorically refused, and remained
President of the Soviet. Although less brilliant than Kerensky, Cheidze
was made of more serious material.

The axis of the Provisional Government, although not formally its head,
was Miliukov, the indubitable leader of the Kadet Party. “Miliukov was
incomparably above his colleagues in the cabinet,” wrote the Kadet
Nabokov, after he had broken with Miliukov, “as an intellectual force,
as a man of enormous, almost inexhaustible knowledge and wide
intelligence.” Sukhanov, while blaming Miliukov personally for the wreck
of Russian liberalism, nevertheless wrote: “Miliukov was then the
central figure, the soul and brain of all the bourgeois political
circles ... Without him there would have been no bourgeois policy in the
first period of the revolution.” In spite of their slightly exalted
tone, these reports truly indicate the superiority of Miliukov to the
other political men of the Russian bourgeoisie. His strength lay, and
his weakness too, in this: he expressed more fully and elegantly than
others in the language of politics the fate of the Russian bourgeoisie –
the fact that it was caught historically in a blind alley. The
Mensheviks wept because Miliukov ruined liberalism, but it would be
truer to say that liberalism ruined Miliukov.

In spite of his Neo-Slavism warmed over for imperialistic purposes,
Miliukov always remained a bourgeois “Westerner.” The goal of his party
was always the triumph in Russia of European civilisation. But the
farther he went, the more he feared those revolutionary paths upon which
the Western peoples were travelling. His “Westernism” therefore reduced
itself to an impotent envy of the West.

The English and French bourgeoisie created a new society in their own
image. The Germans came later, and they were compelled to live for a
long time on the pale gruel of philosophy. The Germans invented the
phrase “speculative world,” which does not exist in English or French.
While these nations were creating a new world the Germans were thinking
one up. But the German bourgeoisie, although poor in political activity,
created the classical philosophy, and that is no small achievement.
Russia came much later. To be sure, she translated the German phrase
“speculative world” into Russian, and that with several variations, but
this only the more clearly exposed both her political impotence and her
deadly philosophical poverty. She imported ideas as well as machines,
establishing high tariffs for the latter, and for the former a
quarantine of fear. To these characteristics of his class Miliukov was
called to give a political expression.

A former Moscow professor of history, author of significant scholarly
works, founder of the Kadet Party – a union of the liberal landlords and
the left intelligentsia – Miliukov was completely free from that
insufferable, half-aristocratic and half-intellectual political
dilettantism which is proper to the majority of Russian liberal men of
politics. Miliukov took his profession very seriously and that alone
distinguished him.

Before 1905, the Russian liberals were customarily embarrassed about
being liberal. A tinge of Narodnikism, and later of Marxism, long served
them as a defensive colouration. This rather shallow, shamefaced
capitulation to socialism on the part of wide bourgeois circles, among
them a number of young industrialists, expressed the lack of
self-confidence of a class which appeared soon enough to concentrate
millions in its hands, but too late to stand at the head of the nation.
The bearded fathers, wealthy peasants and shopkeepers, had piled up
their money, thinking nothing of their social rôle. Their sons graduated
from the university in the period of pre-revolutionary intellectual
ferment, and when they tried to find their place in society, they were
in no hurry to adopt the banner of liberalism, already worn out in
advanced countries, patched and half faded. For a period of time they
gave a part of their souls, and even a part of their incomes, to the
revolutionists. This is especially true of the representatives of the
liberal professions. A very considerable number of them passed through a
stage of socialistic sympathy in their youth. Professor Miliukov never
had these measles. He was organically bourgeois and not ashamed of it.

It is true that at the time of the first revolution, Miliukov did not
wholly renounce the idea of utilising the revolutionary masses – with
the help of tame and well-trained socialist parties. Witte relates that
when he was forming his constitutional cabinet in October 1905, and
appealed to the Kadets to “cut off their revolutionary tail,” the answer
was that they could no more get along without the armed forces of the
revolution than Witte could without the army. In the essence of the
matter, this was a bluff even then: in order to raise their own price,
the Kadets tried to frighten Witte with the masses whom they themselves
feared. It was precisely the experience of 1905 which convinced Miliukov
that, no matter how strong the liberal sympathies of the socialist
groups of the intelligentsia might be, the genuine forces of the
revolution, the masses, would never give up their weapons to the
bourgeoisie, and would be the more dangerous the better armed they were.
When he declared openly that the red flag is a red rag, Miliukov ended
to everybody’s relief a romance which in reality nobody had seriously
begun. The isolation of the so-called intelligentsia from the people has
been one of the traditional themes of Russian journalism – and by
“intelligentsia” the liberals, in contrast with the socialists, mean all
the “educated,” that is, possessing, classes. Ever since that isolation
proved such a calamity to the liberals in the first revolution, the
ideologues of the “educated” masses have lived in a kind of perpetual
expectation of the judgment day. One of the liberal writers, a
philosopher not restrained by the exigencies of politics, has expressed
this fear of the masses with an ecstatic force which reminds us of the
epileptic reactionism of Dostoyevsky: “Whatever we stand for, we must
not dream of uniting with the people – we must fear them more than all
the persecutions of the government, and we must give thanks to the
government which alone protects us with its prisons and bayonets from
the ferocity of the people.” With such political feelings, could the
liberals possibly dream of leading a revolutionary nation? Miliukov’s
whole policy is marked with a stamp of hopelessness. At the moment of
national crisis his party thinks about dodging the blow, not dealing it.

As a writer, Miliukov is heavy, prolix and wearisome. He has the same
quality as an orator. Decorativeness is unnatural to him. That might
have been an advantage, if the niggardly policies of Miliukov had not so
obviously needed a disguise or if they had had, at least, an objective
disguise in the shape of a great tradition. There was not even a little
tradition. The official policy in France – quintessence of bourgeois
perfidy and egotism – has two mighty allies: tradition and rhetoric.
Each promoting the other, they surround with a defensive covering any
bourgeois politician, even such a prosaic clerk of the big proprietors
as Poincaré. It is not Miliukov’s fault if he had no glorious ancestors,
and if he was compelled to conduct a policy of bourgeois egotism on the
borders of Europe and Asia.

“Along with a sympathy for Kerensky,” we read in the memoirs of the
Social Revolutionary, Sokolov, “one felt from the beginning an immense
and unconcealed, and yet rather strange, antipathy for Miliukov. I did
not understand, and do not now, why that respectable social reformer was
so unpopular.” If the Philistines had understood the cause of their
admiration for Kerensky and their distaste for Miliukov, they would have
ceased to be Philistines. The everyday bourgeois did not like Miliukov,
because Miliukov too prosaically and soberly, without adornment,
expressed the political essence of the Russian bourgeoisie. Beholding
himself in the Miliukov mirror, the bourgeois saw that he was grey,
self-interested and cowardly; and, as so often happens, he took offence
at the mirror.

On his side, observing the displeased grimaces of the liberal bourgeois,
Miliukov quietly and confidently remarked: “The everyday man is a fool.”
He pronounced these words without irritation, almost caressingly, as
though to say: He does not understand me to day, but never mind, he will
understand later. Miliukov was deeply confident that the bourgeoisie
would not betray him, that it would obey the logic of the situation and
follow, for it had no other way to go. And in reality, after the
February revolution, all the bourgeois parties, even those to the right,
followed the Kadet leader, abusing and even cursing him.

It was very different with the democratic politicians of a socialist
colouring, men of the type of Sukhanov. This was no ordinary Philistine,
but on the contrary a professional man-of-politics, sufficiently expert
in his small trade. He could never look intelligent, because one saw too
plainly the continual contrast between what he wanted, and what he
arrived at. But he intellectualised and blundered and bored. In order to
lead him after you, it was necessary to deceive him by acknowledging his
genuine independence, even accusing him of being self-willed,
excessively given to command. That flattered him and reconciled him to
the rôle of helper. It was in conversation with just these socialistic
highbrows that Miliukov tossed out that phrase: “The everyday man is a
fool.” This was delicate flattery: “Only you and I are intelligent.” As
a matter of fact, at that very moment Miliukov was hooking a ring in the
noses of his democratic friends. By that ring they were subsequently led
out of the way.

His personal unpopularity prevented Miliukov from standing at the head
of the government. He took the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, which had
been his speciality in the Duma.

The War Minister of the revolution was the big Moscow industrialist,
Guchkov, already known to us – in his youth a liberal with an
adventurous temperament, but afterwards, in the period of the defeat of
the first revolution, the trusted man of the big bourgeoisie under
Stolypin. The dissolution of the two first Dumas, dominated by the
Kadets, led to the governmental overturn of the 3rd of June 1907, which
changed the election law to the benefit of the party of Guchkov. It
became the leader of the two subsequent Dumas and continued so right up
to the day of the revolution. In Kiev in 1911, at the unveiling of a
monument to Stolypin who was killed by a terrorist, Guchkov, in placing
a wreath, bowed silently down to the ground: a gesture in the name of
his class. In the Duma, Guchkov dedicated himself chiefly to the
question of “military might,” and in preparing for war walked
hand-in-hand with Miliukov. In the position of President of the Central
Military Industrial Committee, Guchkov united the industrialists under
the banner of a patriotic opposition – not however preventing the
leaders of the Progressive Bloc, including Rodzianko, from getting a
rake-off on military contracts. For revolutionary recommendation there
was attached to Guchkov’s name that semi-legend about the plot of a
palace revolution. A former chief of police asserted, moreover, that
Guchkov “had permitted himself in private conversations about the
monarch to employ an epithet insulting in the highest degree.” That was
very likely true, but in that Guchkov was no exception. The pious
czarina hated Guchkov, lavished crude abuse upon him in her letters, and
expressed the hope that he would hang “on a high tree.” But the czarina
had many others in view for this same high position. Somehow, at any
rate, this man who bowed to the earth in honour of the hangman of the
first revolution became the War Minister of the second.

The Minister of Agriculture was the Kadet Shingarev, a provincial doctor
who had subsequently become a deputy in the Duma. His close associates
in the party considered him an honest mediocrity or, as Nabokov
expressed it, “a Russian provincial intellectual, designed on a
small-town or county, rather than a national, scale.” The indefinite
radicalism of his early years had long washed away, and the chief
anxiety of Shingarev was to demonstrate his statesmanlike maturity to
the possessing classes. Although the old Kadet program spoke of the
“confiscation with just indemnity of the landed estates,” none of the
property owners took this program seriously especially now in the years
of the war inflation. And Shingarev made it his chief task to delay the
decision of the agrarian problem, deluding the peasants with the mirage
of a Constituent Assembly which the Kadets did not want to summon. On
the land question and the question of war, the February revolution was
destined to break its neck. Shingarev helped all he could.

The portfolio of Finance was given to a young man named Tereshchenko.
“Where did they get him?” everybody was inquiring with bewilderment in
the Tauride Palace. The well-informed explained that this was an owner
of sugar factories, estates, forests, and other innumerable properties,
worth some eighty million roubles in gold, president of the
Military-Industrial Committee of Kiev, possessed of a good French
pronunciation, and on top of it all a connoisseur of the ballet. And
they added – more importantly – that as the favourite of Guchkov,
Tereshchenko had almost taken part in the great conspiracy which was to
have overthrown Nicholas II. The revolution which prevented that
conspiracy was of great help to Tereshchenko.

In the course of those five February days when the revolutionary fight
was being waged in the cold streets of the capital, there flitted before
us several times like a shadow the figure of a liberal of noble family,
the son of a former czarist minister, Nabokov – almost symbolic in his
self-satisfied correctness and dry egotism. Nabokov passed the decisive
days of the insurrection within the four walls of the chancellery, or
his home, “in dull and anxious expectancy.” He now became General
Administrator of the Provisional Government, actually a minister without
portfolio. In his Berlin exile where he was finally killed by the stray
bullet of a White Guard, he left memoirs of the Provisional Government
which are not without interest. Let us place that to his credit.

But we have forgotten to mention the Prime Minister – whom, by the way,
in the most serious moments of his brief term everybody forgot. On March
2, in recommending the new government to a meeting at the Tauride
Palace, Miliukov described Prince Lvov as “the incarnation of the
Russian social consciousness so persecuted by the czarist régime.”
Later, in his history of the revolution, Miliukov prudently remarks that
at the head of the government was placed Prince Lvov, “personally little
known to the majority of the Provisional Committee.” The historian here
tries to relieve the politician of responsibility for this choice. As a
matter of fact, the prince had long been a member of the Kadet Party,
belonging to its right wing. After the dissolution of the first Duma, at
that famous meeting of the deputies at Vyborg which addressed the
population with the ritual of offended liberalism: “Refuse to pay the
taxes!” Prince Lvov attended but did not sign the appeal. Nabokov
relates that immediately upon his arrival at Vyborg the prince fell
sick, and his sickness was “attributed to the emotional condition in
which he found himself.” The prince was evidently not built for
revolutionary excitement. This moderate prince, owing to a political
indifference that looked like broadmindedness, tolerated in the
organisations which he administered a large number of left
intellectuals, former revolutionists, socialistic patriots, and
draft-dodgers. They worked just as well as the bureaucrats, did not
graft, and moreover created for the prince a simulacrum of popularity. A
prince, a rich man, and a liberal, that was very impressive to the
average bourgeois. For that reason Prince Lvov was marked for the
premiership even under the czar. To sum it all up in a word, the head of
the government of the February revolution was an illustrious but
notoriously empty spot. Rodzianko would at least have been more
colourful.

The legendary history of the Russian state begins with a tale in the
_Chronicle_ to the effect that delegates of the Slavic tribes went to
the Scandinavian princes with the request: “Come and rule and be princes
over us.” The pitiable representatives of the social democracy
transformed this historic legend into a fact – not in the ninth but in
the twentieth century, and with this difference, that they did not
address themselves to princes over the sea, but to their own home
princes. Thus as a result of a victorious insurrection of workers and
soldiers, there appeared at the helm of government a handful of the very
richest landlords and industrialists, remarkable for less than nothing,
political dilettantes without a program and at the head of them a prince
with a strong dislike for excitement.

The composition of the new government was greeted with satisfaction in
the Allied embassies, in the bourgeois and bureaucratic salons, and in
the broader circles of the middle, and part of the petty, bourgeoisie.
Prince Lvov, Octobrist Guchkov, Kadet Miliukov – those names sounded
reassuring. The name of Kerensky perhaps caused some eyebrows to rise
among the Allies, but they were not badly frightened. The more
far-seeing understood: after all, there is a revolution in the country;
with such a steady wheel-horse as Miliukov, a mettlesome team-mate can
only be helpful. Thus the French ambassador Paléologue, a great lover of
Russian metaphors, must have expressed it.

Among the workers and soldiers the composition of the government created
an immediate feeling of hostility, or at the best a dumb bewilderment.
The name of Miliukov or Guchkov did not evoke one voice of greeting in
either factory or barrack. There exists no little testimony to this.
Officer Mstislavisky reports the sullen alarm of his soldiers at the
news that the power had passed from czar to prince: Is that worth
shedding blood for? Stankevich, one of Kerensky’s intimate circle, made
the rounds of his sapper battalion, company by company, recommending the
new government, which he himself considered best possible and of which
he spoke with great enthusiasm. “But I felt a coolness in the audience.”
Only when the officer mentioned Kerensky did the soldiers “kindle with
sincere satisfaction.” By that time the bourgeois social opinion of the
capital had already converted Kerensky into the central hero of the
revolution. The soldiers even more than the workers desired to see in
Kerensky a counterpoise to the bourgeois government, and only wondered
why he was there alone. Kerensky was not a counterpoise, however, but a
finishing touch, a screen, a decoration. He was defending the same
interests as Miliukov, but with magnesium flashlights.

What was the real constitution of the country after the inauguration of
the new power?

The monarchist reaction was hiding in the cracks. With the very first
ebb of the wave, property owners of all kinds and tendencies gathered
around the banner of the Kadet Party, which had suddenly become the only
non-socialist party – and at the same time the extreme right party – in
the open arena.

The masses went over in droves to the socialists, whom they identified
with the Soviet. Not only the workers and soldiers of the enormous
garrisons in the rear, but all the many-coloured small people of the
towns – mechanics, street peddlers, petty officials, cab-drivers,
janitors, servants of all kinds – feeling alien to the Provisional
Government and its bureaux, were seeking a closer and more accessible
authority. In continually increasing numbers, peasant delegates were
appearing at the Tauride Palace. The masses poured into the Soviet as
though into the triumphal gates of the revolution. All that remained
outside the boundaries of the Soviet seemed to fall away from the
revolution, seemed somehow to belong to a different world. And so it was
in reality. Beyond the boundaries of the Soviet remained the world of
the property owner, in which all colours mingled now in one greyish-pink
defensive tint.

Not all the toiling masses chose the Soviet; not all awakened at once;
not every layer of the oppressed dared instantly believe that the
revolution concerned them. In the consciousness of many only an
undiscriminating hope was stirring. But all the active elements of the
masses poured into the Soviet, and activity prevails in times of
revolution. Moreover, since mass activity was growing from day to day,
the basis of the Soviet was continually broadening. It was the sole
genuine basis of the revolution.

In the Tauride Palace there were two halves: the Duma and the Soviet.
The Executive Committee was at first crowded into some narrow
secretarial chambers, through which flowed an uninterrupted human flood.
The deputies of the Duma tried to feel like proprietors in their
sumptuous chambers. But the barriers were soon swept away by the
overflow of the revolution. In spite of all the indecisiveness of its
leaders, the Soviet spread out irresistibly, and the Duma was crowded
away into the back yard. The new correlation of forces broke its path
everywhere.

Deputies in the Tauride Palace, officers in their regiments, commanders
in the staffs, directors and managers in factories, on the railroads, in
the telegraph offices, landlords or managers of estates – all felt
themselves during those first days of the revolution to be under the
suspicious and tireless scrutiny of the masses. In the eyes of those
masses the Soviet was an expression of their distrust of all who had
oppressed them. Typesetters would jealously follow the text of the
articles which they had set up, railroad workers would anxiously and
vigilantly watch over the military trains, telegraphers would become
absorbed in re-reading the texts of telegrams, soldiers would glance
around suspiciously every time their officer made a move, workers would
dismiss from the factory an overseer belonging to the Black Hundreds and
take in under observation a liberal manager. The Duma from the first
hours of the revolution, and the Provisional Government from its first
days, became reservoirs into which flowed a continuous stream of
complaints and objections from the upper layers of society, their
protests against “excesses,” their woeful comments and dark forebodings.

“Without the bourgeoisie we cannot manage the state apparatus,” reasoned
the socialistic petty bourgeois, timidly looking up at the official
buildings where the skeleton of the old government looked out with empty
eyes. The problem was solved by setting some sort of a liberal head on
the institution which the revolution had beheaded. The new ministers
entered into the czarist bureaux, took possession of the apparatus of
typewriters, telephones, couriers, stenographers and clerks, and found
out from day to day that the machine was running empty.

Kerensky subsequently related how the Provisional Government “took the
power in its hands on the third day of all Russian anarchy, when
throughout the whole extent of the Russian land there existed not only
no governmental power, but literally not one policeman.” The soviets of
workers’ and soldiers’ deputies standing at the head of millions of
people, counted for nothing; that of course was merely one element of
the anarchy. The orphaned condition of the country is summed up for
Kerensky in the disappearance of policemen. In that confession of faith
of the most leftward of the ministers, you have the key to the whole
policy of the government.

The place of the governors of provinces was occupied, on the order of
Prince Lvov, by the presidents of the provincial zemstvos, who differed
but little from their predecessors. Often enough they were feudal
landlords who regarded even the governors as Jacobins. At the head of
the counties stood the presidents of the county zemstvos. Under the new
name of “commissars” the population recognised their old enemies. “New
Presbyter is but Old Priest writ large,” as Milton once said of the
cowardly Presbyterian reformation. The provincial and district
commissars took possession of the typewriters, correspondence, and
clerks of the governors and chiefs of police, only to find out that they
had inherited no real power. Real life both in the provinces and in the
counties concentrated around the Soviet. A two-power system thus reigned
from top to bottom. But in the provinces the Soviet leaders, those same
Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, were a little simpler and by no
means everywhere renounced that power which the whole situation was
imposing upon them. As a result of this, the activity of the provincial
commissars consisted mainly of submitting complaints as to the complete
impossibility of fulfilling the duties of their office. Two days after
the formation of the liberal ministry the bourgeoisie were feeling that
they had not acquired the power, but lost it. In spite of all the
fantastic caprices of the Rasputin clique before the revolution, its
real power had been limited. The influence of the bourgeoisie upon the
government had been enormous. The very participation of Russia in the
war was more the work of the bourgeoisie than the monarchy. But the main
thing was that the czarist government had guaranteed to the property
owners their factories, land, banks, houses, newspapers; it was
consequently upon the most vital questions _their_ government. The
February revolution changed the situation in two contrary directions: it
solemnly handed over to the bourgeoisie the external attributes of
power, but at the same time it took from them that share in the actual
rulership which they had enjoyed before the revolution. The former
employees of the zemstvos where Prince Lvov was the boss, and of the
Military-Industrial Committee where Guchkov was in command, became
today, under the name of Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, lords of
the situation in the country and on the front, in the city and in the
village. They appointed Lvov and Guchkov to the ministry, and laid down
the conditions of their work as though they were hiring stewards.

On the other hand, the Executive Committee, having created a bourgeois
government, could not make up its mind like the Bible God to call the
creation good. On the contrary, it made great haste to increase the
distance between itself and the work of its hands, and announced that it
intended to support the new power only in so far as it should truly
serve the democratic revolution. The Provisional Government very well
knew that it could not survive an hour without the support of the
official democracy. But this support was promised only as a reward for
good behaviour-that is, for fulfilling tasks alien to it, and which the
democracy itself had just declined to fulfil. The government never knew
within what limits it might dare to reveal its semi-contraband
sovereignty. The leaders of the Executive Committee could not always
advise it, because it was hard for them to guess just where some
dissatisfaction would break out in their own midst, expressing the
dissatisfaction of the masses. The bourgeoisie pretended that the
socialists were deceiving them. The socialists in their turn were afraid
that the liberals, with their premature demands, would stir up the
masses and complicate a situation difficult enough as it was. “_In so
far as_” – that equivocal formula laid its imprint on the whole
pre-October period. It became the juridical formulation of the inner lie
contained in the hybrid régime of the February revolution.

To bring pressure upon the government, the Executive Committee elected a
special commission which it politely but ludicrously named “Contact
Commission.” The organisation of the revolutionary power was thus upon
the principle of mutual persuasion. The mystic writer Merezhkovsky could
find a precedent for such a régime only in the Old Testament: the kings
of Israel had their prophets. But the prophets of the Bible, like the
prophets of the last Romanov, used at least to receive suggestions
directly from heaven, and the kings did not dare to contradict. In that
way a single sovereignty was assured. It was quite different with the
prophets of the Soviet: they prophesied only under the stimulus of their
own limited intelligence. The liberal ministers moreover believed that
nothing good could come out of the Soviet. Cheidze, Skobelev, Sukhanov
and others would run to the government and garrulously try to persuade
it to make some concession; the ministers would object; the delegates
would return to the Executive Committee, try to influence it with the
authority of the government; again get into contact with the ministers;
and so begin over again from the beginning. This complicated mill-wheel
never did any grinding.

In the Contact Commission everybody complained. Guchkov especially wept
over the disorders in the army caused by the connivances of the Soviet.
At times the War Minister of the revolution “in the literal sense of the
word ... poured out tears, or at least earnestly wiped his eyes with his
handkerchief.” He was quite right in thinking that to dry the tears of
the anointed is one of the functions of a prophet.

On the ninth of March General Alexeiev, the Chief of Staff, telegraphed
the War Minister: “The German yoke is near if only we indulge the
Soviet.” Guchkov answered him tearfully: “The government, alas, has no
real power: the troops, the railroads, the post and telegraph are in the
hands of the Soviet. The simple fact is that the Provisional Government
exists only so long as the Soviet permits it.”

Week followed week, but the situation did not improve in the least.
Early in April when the Provisional Government sent deputies of the Duma
to the front, it directed them, gritting its teeth, not to reveal any
disagreements with the delegates of the Soviet. Throughout the whole
journey the liberal deputies felt as though they were under convoy, but
they also knew that without this, notwithstanding their lofty
credentials, they not only could not approach the soldiers, but they
could not even find seats in the trains. That prosaic detail in the
memoirs of Prince Mansyrev excellently supplements Guchkov’s
correspondence with the staff as to the essence of the February
constitution. One of the reactionary wits pretty well characterised the
situation thus: “The old government is in prison, and the new one under
house arrest.”

But did the Provisional Government have no other support but this
equivocal one of the Soviet leaders? What had become of the possessing
classes? The question is a fundamental one. United by their past with
the monarchy, the possessing classes had hastened to group themselves
around a new axis after the revolution. On the 2nd of March, the Council
of Trade and Industry, representing the united capital of the whole
country, saluted the act of the State Duma, and declared itself “wholly
at the disposition” of its Committee.

The zemstvos and the town dumas adopted the same course. On March 10,
even the Council of the United Nobility, the mainstay of the throne,
summoned all the people of Russia in a language of eloquent cowardice
“to unite around the Provisional Government as now the sole lawful power
in Russia.” Almost at the same time the institutions and organs of the
possessing classes began to denounce the dual power, and to lay the
blame for the disorders upon the Soviet – at first cautiously but then
bolder and bolder. The employers were soon followed by the clerks, the
united liberal professions, the government employees. From the army came
telegrams, addresses and resolutions of the same character –
manufactured in the staff. The liberal press opened a campaign “for a
single sovereignty,” which in the coming months acquired the character
of a hurricane of fire around the heads of the Soviet. All these things
together looked exceedingly impressive. The enormous number of
institutions, well-known names, resolutions, articles, the decisiveness
of tone – it had an indubitable effect upon the suggestible heads of the
Committee. And yet there was no serious force behind this threatening
parade of the propertied classes. How about the force of property? said
the petty bourgeois socialists, answering the Bolsheviks. Property is a
relation among people. It represents an enormous power so long as it is
universally recognised and supported by that system of compulsion called
Law and the State. But the very essence of the present situation was
that the old state had suddenly collapsed, and the entire old system of
rights had been called in question by the masses. In the factories the
workers were more and more regarding themselves as the proprietors, and
the bosses as uninvited guests. Still less assured were the feelings of
the landlords in the provinces, face to face with those surly vengeful
muzhiks, and far from that governmental power in whose existence they
did for a time, owing to their distance from the capital, believe. The
property-holders, deprived of the possibility of using their property,
or protecting it, ceased to be real property holders and became badly
frightened Philistines who could not give any support to the government
for the simple reason that they needed support themselves. They soon
began to curse the government for its weakness, but they were only
cursing their own fate

In those days the joint activity of the Executive Committee and the
ministry seemed to have for its goal to demonstrate that the art of
government in time of revolution consists in a garrulous waste of time.
With the liberals this was a consciously adopted plan. It was their firm
conviction that all measures demanded postponement except one: the oath
of loyalty to the Entente.

Miliukov acquainted his colleagues with the secret treaties. Kerensky
let them in one ear and out the other. Apparently only the Procuror of
the Holy Synod, a certain Lvov, rich in surprises, a namesake of the
Premier but not a prince, went into a storm of indignation and even
called the treaties “brigandage and swindle ” – which undoubtedly
provoked a condescending smile from Miliukov (“The everyday man is a
fool”) and a quiet proposal to return to the order of business. The
official Declaration of the government promised to summon a Constituent
Assembly at the earliest possible date – which date, however, was
intentionally not stated. Nothing was said about the form of government:
they still hoped to return to the lost paradise of monarchy. But the
real meat of the Declaration lay in its promise to carry the war through
to victory, and “unswervingly carry out the agreements made with our
Allies.” So far as concerned the most threatening problems of the
people’s existence, the revolution had apparently been achieved only in
order to make the announcement: everything remains as before. Since the
democrats attributed an almost mystic importance to recognition by the
Entente – a small trader amounts to nothing until the bank recognises
his credit – the Executive Committee swallowed in silence the
imperialist declaration of March 6.

“Not one official organ of the democracy,” grieves Sukhanov a year
later, “publicly reacted to the Declaration of the Provisional
Government, which disgraced our revolution at its very birth in the eyes
of democratic Europe.”

At last, on the 8th of March, there issued from the ministerial
laboratory a Decree of Amnesty. By that time the doors of the prisons
had been opened by the people throughout the whole country, political
exiles were returning in a solid stream with meetings, hurrahs, military
speeches, flowers. The decree sounded like a belated echo from the
government buildings. On the twelfth they announced the abolition of the
death penalty. Four months later it was restored in the army. Kerensky
promised to elevate justice to unheard-of heights. In a moment of heat
he actually did carry out a resolution of the Executive Committee
introducing representatives of the workers and soldiers as members of
the courts of justice. That was the sole measure in which could be felt
the heartbeat of the revolution, and it raised the hair on the heads of
the eunuchs of justice. But the matter stopped right there. Lawyer
Demianov, an important officer in the ministry under Kerensky, and also
a “socialist,” decided to adopt the principle of leaving all former
officials at their posts. To quote his own words: “The policies of a
revolutionary government ought never to offend anybody unnecessarily.”
That was, at bottom, the guiding principle of the whole Provisional
Government, which feared most of all to offend anybody from the circles
of the possessing classes, or even the czarist bureaucracy. Not only the
judges, but even the prosecutors of the czarist régime remained at their
posts. To be sure, the masses might be offended. But that was the
Soviet’s business; the masses did not enter into the field of vision of
the government.

The sole thing in the nature of a fresh stream was brought in by the
above-mentioned temperamental Procuror, Lvov, who gave an official
report on the “idiots and scoundrels” sitting in the Holy Synod. The
ministers listened to his juicy characterisations with some alarm, but
the synod continued a state institution, and Greek Orthodoxy the state
religion. Even the membership of the Synod remained unchanged. A
revolution ought not to quarrel with anybody!

The members of the State Council – faithful servants of two or three
emperors – continued to sit, or at least to draw their salaries. And
this fact soon acquired a symbolic significance. Factories and barracks
noisily protested. The Executive Committee worried about it. The
government spent two sessions debating the question of the fate and
salaries of the members of the State Council, and could not arrive at a
decision. Why disturb these respectable people, among whom, by the way,
we have many good friends?

The Rasputin ministers were still in prison, but the Provisional
Government hastened to vote them a pension. This sounded like mockery,
or a voice from another world. But the government did not want to offend
its predecessors even though they were locked up in jail.

The senators continued to drowse in their embroidered jackets, and when
a left senator, Sokolov, newly appointed by Kerensky, dared to appear in
a black frock coat, they quietly removed him from the hall. These
czarist legislators were not afraid to offend the February revolution,
once convinced that its government had no teeth.

Karl Marx saw the cause of the failure of the March revolution in
Germany in the fact that it “reformed only the very highest political
circles, leaving untouched all the layers beneath them – the old
bureaucracy, the old army, the old judges, born and brought up and grown
old in the service of absolutism.” Socialists of the type of Kerensky
were seeking salvation exactly where Marx saw the cause of failure. And
the Menshevik Marxists were with Kerensky, not Marx.

The sole sphere in which the government showed initiative and
revolutionary tempo, was that of legislation on stock holdings. Hence
the degree of reform was issued on the 17th of March. National and
religious limitations were annulled only three days later. There were
quite a few people on the staff of the government, you see, who had
suffered under the old régime, if at all, only from a lack of business
in stocks.

The workers were impatiently demanding an eight-hour day. The government
pretended to be deaf in both ears. Besides it is war time, and all ought
to sacrifice themselves for the good of the Fatherland. Moreover that is
the soviet’s business: let them pacify the workers.

Still more threatening was the land question. Here it was really
necessary to do something. Spurred on by the prophets, the Minister of
Agriculture, Shingarev, ordered the formation of local land committees –
prudently refraining, however, from defining their tasks and functions.
The peasants had an idea that these committees ought to give them the
land. The landlords thought the committees ought to protect their
property. From the very start the muzhik’s noose, more ruthless than all
others, was tightening round the neck of the February régime.

Agreeably to the official doctrine, all those problems which had caused
the revolution were postponed to the Constituent Assembly. How could you
expect these irreproachable democrats to anticipate the national will,
when they had not even succeeded in seating Mikhail Romanov astride of
it? The preparation of a national representation was approached in those
days with such bureaucratic heaviness and deliberate procrastination
that the Constituent Assembly itself became a mirage. Only on the 25th
of March, almost a month after the insurrection – a month of revolution!
– the government decided to call a lumbering Special Conference for the
purpose of working out an election law. But the conference never opened.
Miliukov in his _History of the Revolution_ – which is false from
beginning to end – confusedly states that as a result of various
difficulties “the work of the Special Conference was not begun under the
first government.” The difficulties were inherent in the constitution of
the conference and in its function. The whole idea was to postpone the
Constituent Assembly until better times: until victory, until peace or
until the Calends of Kornilov.

The Russian bourgeoisie, which appeared in the world too late, mortally
hated the revolution. But its hatred had no strength. It had to bide its
time and manoeuvre. Being unable to overthrow and strangle the
revolution, the bourgeoisie counted on starving it out.



CHAPTER 11 DUAL POWER


 

What constitutes the essence of a dual power?[1] We must pause upon this
question, for an illumination of it has never appeared in historic
literature. And yet this dual power is a distinct condition of social
crisis, by no means peculiar to the Russian revolution of 1917, although
there most clearly marked out.

Antagonistic classes exist in society everywhere, and a class, deprived
of power inevitably strives to some extent to swerve the governmental
course in its favour. This does not as yet mean, however, that two or
more powers are ruling in society. The character of a political
structure is directly determined by the relation of the oppressed
classes to the ruling class. A single government, the necessary
condition of stability in any régime, is preserved so long as the ruling
class succeeds in putting over its economic and political forms upon the
whole of society as the only forms possible.

The simultaneous dominion of the German Junkers and the bourgeoisie –
whether in the Hohenzollern form or the republic – is not a double
government, no matter how sharp at times may be the conflict between the
two participating powers. They have a common social basis, therefore
their clash does not threaten to split the state apparatus. The
two-power régime arises only out of irreconcilable class conflicts – is
possible, therefore, only in a revolutionary epoch, and constitutes one
of its fundamental elements.

The political mechanism of revolution consists of the transfer of power
from one class to another. The forcible overturn is usually accomplished
in a brief time. But no historic class lifts itself from a subject
position to a position of rulership suddenly in one night, even though a
night of revolution. It must already on the eve of the revolution have
assumed a very independent attitude towards the official ruling class;
moreover, it must have focused upon itself the hopes of intermediate
classes and layers, dissatisfied with the existing state of affairs, but
not capable of playing an independent rôle. The historic preparation of
a revolution brings about, in the pre-revolutionary period, a situation
in which the class which is called to realise the new social system,
although not yet master of the country, has actually concentrated in its
hands a significant share of the state power, while the official
apparatus of the government is still in the hands of the old lords. That
is the initial dual power in every revolution.

But that is not its only form. If the new class, placed in power by a
revolution which it did not want, is in essence an already old,
historically belated, class; if it was already worn out before it was
officially crowned; if on coming to power it encounters an antagonist
already sufficiently mature and reaching out its hand toward the helm of
state; then instead of one unstable two-power equilibrium, the political
revolution produces another, still less stable. To overcome the
“anarchy” of this twofold sovereignty becomes at every new step the task
of the revolution – or the counter-revolution.

This double sovereignty does not presuppose – generally speaking,
indeed, it excludes – the possibility of a division of the power into
two equal halves, or indeed any formal equilibrium of forces whatever.
It is not a constitutional, but a revolutionary fact. It implies that a
destruction of the social equilibrium has already split the state
superstructure. It arises where the hostile classes are already each
relying upon essentially incompatible governmental organisations – the
one outlived, the other in process of formation – which jostle against
each other at every step in the sphere of government. The amount of
power which falls to each of these struggling classes in such a
situation is determined by the correlation of forces in the course of
the struggle.

By its very nature such a state of affairs cannot be stable. Society
needs a concentration of power, and in the person of the ruling class –
or, in the situation we are discussing, the two half-ruling classes –
irresistibly strives to get it. The splitting of sovereignty foretells
nothing less than civil war. But before the competing classes and
parties will go to that extreme – especially in case they dread the
interference of third force – they may feel compelled for quite long
time to endure, and even to sanction, a two-power system. This system
will nevertheless inevitably explode. Civil war gives to this double
sovereignty its most visible, because territorial, expression. Each of
the powers, having created its own fortified drill ground, fights for
possession of the rest of the territory, which often has to endure the
double sovereignty in the form of successive invasions by the two
fighting powers, until one of them decisively installs itself.

The English revolution of the seventeenth century, exactly because it
was a great revolution shattering the nation to the bottom, affords a
clear example of this alternating dual power, with sharp transitions in
the form of civil war.

At first the royal power, resting upon the privileged classes or the
upper circles of these classes – the aristocrats and bishops – is
opposed by the bourgeoisie and the circles of the squirearchy that are
close to it. The government of the bourgeoisie is the Presbyterian
Parliament supported by the City of London. The protracted conflict
between these two régimes is finally settled in open civil war. The two
governmental centres – London and Oxford – create their own armies. Here
the dual power takes territorial form, although, as always in civil war,
the boundaries are very shifting. Parliament conquers. The king is
captured and awaits his fate.

It would seem that the conditions are now created for the single rule of
the Presbyterian bourgeoisie. But before the royal power could be
broken, the parliamentary army has converted itself into an independent
political force. It has concentrated in its ranks the Independents, the
pious and resolute petty bourgeoisie, the craftsmen and farmers. This
army powerfully interferes in the social life, not merely as an armed
force, but as a Praetorian Guard, and as the political representative of
a new class opposing the prosperous and rich bourgeoisie.
Correspondingly the army creates a new state organ rising above the
military command: a council of soldiers’ and officers’ deputies
(“agitators”). A new period of double sovereignty has thus arrived: that
of the Presbyterian Parliament and the Independents’ army. This leads to
open conflicts. The bourgeoisie proves powerless to oppose with its own
army the “model army” of Cromwell – that is, the armed plebeians. The
conflict ends with a purgation of the Presbyterian Parliament by the
sword of the Independents. There remains but the rump of a parliament;
the dictatorship of Cromwell is established. The lower ranks of the
army, under the leadership of the Levellers – the extreme left wing of
the revolution – try to oppose to the rule of the upper military levels,
the patricians of the army, their own veritably plebeian régime. But
this new two-power system does not succeed in developing: the Levellers,
the lowest depths of the petty bourgeoisie, have not yet, nor can have,
their own historic path. Cromwell soon settles accounts with his
enemies. A new political equilibrium, and still by no means a stable
one, is established for a period of years.

In the great French revolution, the Constituent Assembly, the backbone
of which was the upper levels of the Third Estate, concentrated the
power in its hands – without however fully annulling the prerogatives of
the king. The period of the Constituent Assembly is a clearly-marked
period of dual power, which ends with the flight of the king to
Varennes, and is formally liquidated with the founding of the Republic.

The first French constitution (1791), based upon the fiction of a
complete independence of the legislative and executive powers, in
reality concealed from the people, or tried to conceal, a double
sovereignty: that of the bourgeoisie, firmly entrenched in the National
Assembly after the capture by the people of the Bastille, and that of
the old monarchy still relying upon the upper circles of the priesthood,
the clergy, the bureaucracy, and the military, to say nothing of their
hopes of foreign intervention. In this self-contradictory régime lay the
germs of its inevitable destruction. A way out could be found only in
the abolition of bourgeois representation by the powers of European
reaction, or in the guillotine for the king and the monarchy. Paris and
Coblenz must measure their forces.

But before it comes to war and the guillotine, the Paris Commune enters
the scene – supported by the lowest city layers of the Third Estate –
and with increasing boldness contests the power with the official
representatives of the national bourgeoisie. A new double sovereignty is
thus inaugurated, the first manifestation of which we observe as early
as 1790, when the big and medium bourgeoisie is still firmly seated in
the administration and in the municipalities. How striking is the
picture – and how vilely it has been slandered! – of the efforts of the
plebeian levels to raise themselves up out of the social cellars and
catacombs, and stand forth in that forbidden arena where people in wigs
and silk breeches are settling the fate of the nation. It seemed as
though the very foundation of society, tramped underfoot by the cultured
bourgeoisie, was stirring and coming to life. Human heads lifted
themselves above the solid mass, horny hands stretched aloft, hoarse but
courageous voices shouted! The districts of Paris, bastards of the
revolution, began to live a life of their own. They were recognised – it
was impossible not to recognise them! – and transformed into sections.
But they kept continually breaking the boundaries of legality and
receiving a current of fresh blood from below, opening their ranks in
spite of the law to those with no rights, the destitute _Sansculottes_.
At the same time the rural municipalities were becoming a screen for a
peasant uprising against that bourgeois legality which was defending the
feudal property system. Thus from under the second nation arises a
third.

The Parisian sections at first stood opposed to the Commune, which was
still dominated by the respectable bourgeoisie. In the bold outbreak of
August 10, 1792, the sections gained control of the Commune. From then
on the revolutionary Commune opposed the Legislative Assembly, and
subsequently the Convention, which failed to keep up with the problems
and progress of the revolution – registering its events, but not
performing them – because it did not possess the energy, audacity and
unanimity of that new class which had raised itself up from the depths
of the Parisian districts and found support in the most backward
villages. As the sections gained control of the Commune, so the Commune,
by way of a new insurrection, gained control of the Convention. Each of
the stages was characterised by a sharply marked double sovereignty,
each wing of which was trying to establish a single and strong
government – the right by a defensive struggle, the left by an
offensive. Thus, characteristically – for both revolutions and
counter-revolutions – the demand for a dictatorship results from the
intolerable contradictions of the double sovereignty. The transition
from one of its forms to the other is accomplished through civil war.
The great stages of revolution – that is, the passing of power to new
classes or layers – do not at all coincide in this process with the
succession of representative institutions, which march along after the
dynamic of the revolution like a belated shadow. In the long run, to be
sure, the revolutionary dictatorship of the Sansculottes unites with the
dictatorship of the Convention. But with what Convention? A Convention
purged of the Girondists, who yesterday ruled it with the hand of the
Terror – a Convention abridged and adapted to the dominion of new social
forces. Thus by the steps of the dual power the French revolution rises
in the course of four years to its culmination. After the 9th Thermidor
it begins – again by the steps of the dual power – to descend. And again
civil war precedes every downward step, just as before it had
accompanied every rise. In this way the new society seeks a new
equilibrium of forces.

The Russian bourgeoisie, fighting with and co-operating with the
Rasputin bureaucracy, had enormously strengthened its political position
during the war. Exploiting the defeat of czarism, it had concentrated in
its hands, by means of the Country and Town unions and the
Military-Industrial Committees, a great power. It had at its independent
disposition enormous state resources, and was in the essence of the
matter a parallel government. During the war the czar’s ministers
complained that Prince Lvov was furnishing supplies to the army, feeding
it, medicating it, even establishing barber shops for the soldiers. “We
must either put an end to this, or give the whole power into his hands,”
said Minister Krivoshein in 1915. He never imagined that a year and a
half later Lvov would receive “the whole power” – only not from the
czar, but from the hands of Kerensky, Cheidze and Sukhanov. But on the
second day after he received it, there began a new double sovereignty:
alongside of yesterday’s liberal half-government – today formally
legalised – there arose an unofficial, but so much the more actual
government of the toiling masses in the form of the soviets. From that
moment the Russian revolution began to grow up into an event of
world-historic significance.

What, then, is the peculiarity of this dual power as it appeared in the
February revolution? In the events of the seventeenth and eighteenth
centuries, the dual power was in each case a natural stage in a struggle
imposed upon its participants by a temporary correlation of forces, and
each side strove to replace the dual power with its own single power. In
the revolution of 1917, we see the official democracy consciously and
intentionally creating a two-power system, dodging with all its might
the transfer of power into its own hands. The double sovereignty is
created, or so it seems at a glance, not as a result of a struggle of
classes for power, but as the result of a voluntary “yielding” of power
by one class to another. In so far as the Russian “democracy” sought for
an escape from the two-power régime, it could find one only in its own
removal from power. It is just this that we have called the paradox of
the February, revolution.

A certain analogy can be found in 1848, in the conduct of the German
bourgeoisie with relation to the monarchy. But the analogy is not
complete. The German bourgeoisie did try earnestly to divide the power
with the monarchy on the basis of an agreement. But the bourgeoisie
neither had the full power in its hands, nor by any means gave it over
wholly to the monarchy. “The Prussian bourgeoisie nominally possessed
the power, it did not for a moment doubt that the forces of the old
government would place themselves unreservedly at its disposition and
convert themselves into loyal adherents of its own omnipotence” (Marx
and Engels).

The Russian democracy of 1917, having captured the power from the very
moment of insurrection tried not only to divide it with the bourgeoisie,
but to give the state over to the bourgeoisie absolutely. This means, if
you please, that in the first quarter of the twentieth century the
official Russian democracy had succeeded in decaying politically more
completely than the German liberal bourgeoisie of the nineteenth
century. And that is entirely according to the laws of history, for it
is merely the reverse aspect of upgrowth in those same decades of the
proletariat, which now occupied the place of the craftsmen of Cromwell
and the _Sansculottes_ of Robespierre.

If you look deeper, the twofold rule of the Provisional Government and
the Executive Committee had the character of a mere reflection. Only the
proletariat could advance a claim to the new power. Relying
distrustfully upon the workers and soldiers, the Compromisers were
compelled to continue the double bookkeeping – of the kings and the
prophets. The twofold government of the liberals and the democrats only
reflected the still concealed double sovereignty of the bourgeoisie and
the proletariat. When the Bolsheviks displace the Compromisers at the
head of the Soviet – and this will happen within a few months – then
that concealed double sovereignty will come to the surface, and this
will be the eve of the October revolution. Until that moment the
revolution will live in a world of political reflections. Refracted
through the rationalisations of the socialist intelligentsia, the double
sovereignty, from being a stage in the class struggle, became a
regulative principle. It was just for this reason that it occupied the
centre of all theoretical discussions. Everything has its uses: the
mirror-like character of the February double government has enabled us
better to understand those epochs in history when the same thing appears
as a full-blooded episode in a struggle between two régimes. The feeble
and reflected light of the moon makes possible important conclusions
about the sunlight.

In the immeasurably greater maturity of the Russian proletariat in
comparison with the town masses of the older revolutions, lies the basic
peculiarity of the Russian revolution. This led first to the paradox of
a half-spectral double government, and afterwards prevented the real one
from being resolved in favour of the bourgeoisie. For the question stood
thus: Either the bourgeoisie will actually dominate the old state
apparatus, altering it a little for its purposes, in which case the
soviets will come to nothing; or the soviets will form the foundation of
a new state, liquidating not only the old governmental apparatus but
also the dominion of those classes which it served. The Mensheviks and
the Social Revolutionaries were steering toward the first solution, the
Bolsheviks toward the second. The oppressed classes, who, as Marat
observed, did not possess in the past the knowledge, or skill, or
leadership to carry through what they had begun, were armed in the
Russian revolution of the twentieth century with all three. The
Bolsheviks were victorious.

A year after their victory the same situation was repeated in Germany,
with a different correlation of forces. The social democracy was
steering for the establishment of a democratic government of the
bourgeoisie and the liquidation of the soviets. Luxemburg and Liebknecht
steered toward the dictatorship of the soviets. The Social Democrats
won. Hilferding and Kautsky in Germany, Max Adler in Austria, proposed
that they should “combine” democracy with the soviet system, including
the workers’ soviets in the constitution. That would have meant making
potential or open civil war a constituent part of the state régime. It
would be impossible to imagine a more curious Utopia. Its sole
justification on German soil is perhaps an old tradition: the
Württemberg democrats of ’48 wanted a republic with a duke at the head.

Does this phenomenon of the dual power – heretofore not sufficiently
appreciated – contradict the Marxian theory of the state, which regards
government as an executive committee of the ruling class? This is just
the same as asking: Does the fluctuation of prices under the influence
of supply and demand contradict the labour theory of value? Does the
self-sacrifice of a female protecting her offspring refute the theory of
a struggle for existence? No, in these phenomena we have a more
complicated combination of the same laws. If the state is an
organisation of class rule, and a revolution is the overthrow of the
ruling class, then the transfer of power from the one class to the other
must necessarily create self-contradictory state conditions, and first
of all in the form of the dual power. The relation of class forces is
not a mathematical quantity permitting _a priori_ computations. When the
old régime is thrown out of equilibrium, a new correlation of forces can
be established only as the result of a trial by battle. That is
revolution.

It may seem as though this theoretical inquiry has led us away from the
events of 1917. In reality it leads right into the heart of them. It was
precisely around this problem of twofold power that the dramatic
struggle of parties and classes turned. Only from a theoretical height
is it possible to observe it fully and correctly understand it.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. Dual power is the phrase settled upon in communist literature as an
English rendering of _dvoevlastie_. The term is untranslatable both
because of its form twin-powerdom – and because the stem, vlast, means
sovereignty as well as power. Vlast is also used as an equivalent of
government, and in the plural corresponds to our phrase the authorities.
In view of this, I have employed some other terms besides dual power:
double sovereignty, two-power régime, etc. [_Trans._]



CHAPTER 12 THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE


 

The organisation created on February 27 in the Tauride Palace, and
called “Executive Committee of The Soviet of Workers’ Deputies,” had
little in common with its name. The Soviet of Deputies of 1905, the
originator of the system, rose out of a general strike. It directly
represented the masses in struggle. The leaders of the strike became the
deputies of the Soviet; the selection of its membership was carried out
under fire; its Executive Committee was elected by the Soviet for the
further prosecution of the struggle. It was this Executive Committee
which placed on the order of the day the armed insurrection.

The February revolution, thanks to the revolt of the troops, was
victorious before the workers had created a soviet. The Executive
Committee was self-constituted, in advance of the Soviet and
independently of the factories and regiments after the victory of the
revolution.

We have here the classic initiative of the radicals – standing aside
from the revolutionary struggle, but getting ready to harvest its fruit.
The real leaders of the workers had not yet left the streets. They were
disarming some, arming others, making sure of the victory. The more
far-sighted among them were alarmed by the news that in the Tauride
Palace some kind of a soviet of workers’ deputies had come into being.
Just as in the autumn of 1916 the liberal bourgeoisie, in expectation of
a palace revolution which somebody was supposed to put through, had got
ready a reserve government to impose upon the new czar in case it
succeeded, so the radical intelligentsia got ready its reserve
sub-government at the moment of the February victory. Inasmuch as they
had been, at least in the past, adherents of the workers’ movement and
inclined to cover themselves with its tradition, they now named their
offspring Executive Committee of the Soviet. That was one of those
half-intentional falsifications with which all history is filled,
especially the history of popular revolutions. In a revolutionary turn
of events involving a break in the succession, those “educated” classes
who have now to learn to wield the power, gladly seize hold of any names
and symbols connected with the heroic memories of the masses. And words
not infrequently conceal the essence of things – especially when this is
demanded by the interests of influential groups. The immense authority
of the Executive Committee from the very day of its birth rested upon
its seeming continuance of the Soviet of 1905. This Committee, ratified
by the first chaotic meeting of the Soviet, thereafter exerted a
decisive influence both upon the membership of the Soviet and upon its
policy. This influence was the more conservative, in that the natural
selection of revolutionary representatives which is guaranteed by the
red-hot atmosphere of a struggle no longer existed. The insurrection was
already in the past. All were drunk with victory, were planning how to
get comfortable on the new basis, were relaxing their souls, partly also
their heads. It required months of new conflicts and struggles in new
circumstances, with the consequent reshuffling of personnel, in order
that the soviets, from being organs for consecrating the victory, should
become organs of struggle and preparation for a new insurrection. We
emphasise this aspect of the matter because it has until now been left
completely in the shade.

However, not only the conditions in which the Executive Committee and
the Soviet arose determined their moderate and compromising character.
Deeper and more enduring causes were operating in the same direction.

There were over 150,000 soldiers in Petrograd. There were at least four
times as many working men and women of all categories. Nevertheless for
every two worker-delegates in the Soviet, there were five soldiers. The
rules of representation were extremely elastic, and they were always
stretched to the advantage of the soldiers. Whereas the workers elected
only one delegate for every thousand, the most petty military unit would
frequently send two. The grey army cloth became the general ground tone
of the Soviet.

But by no means all even of the civilians were selected by workers. No
small number of people got into the Soviet by individual invitation,
through pull, or simply thanks to their own penetrative ability. Radical
lawyers, physicians, students, journalists, representing various
problematical groups – or most often representing their own ambition.
This obviously distorted character of the Soviet was even welcomed by
the leaders, who were not a bit sorry to dilute the too concentrated
essence of factory and barrack with the lukewarm water of cultivated
Philistia. Many of these accidental crashers-in, seekers of adventure,
self-appointed Messiahs, and professional bunk shooters, for a long time
crowded out with their authoritative elbows the silent workers and
irresolute soldiers.

And if this was so in Petrograd, it is not hard to imagine how it looked
in the provinces, where the victory came wholly without struggle. The
whole country was swarming with soldiers. The garrisons at Kiev,
Helsingfors, Tiflis, were as numerous as that in Petrograd; in Saratov,
Samara, Tambov, Omsk, there were 70,000 to 80,000 soldiers; in
Yaroslavl, Ekaterinoslav, Ekaterinburg 60,000; in a whole series of
other cities, 50,000, 40,000 and 30,000. The soviet representation was
differently organised in different localities, but everywhere it put the
troops in a privileged position. Politically this was caused by the
workers themselves, who wanted to go as far as possible to meet the
soldiers. The soviet leaders were equally eager to go to meet the
officers. Besides the considerable number of lieutenants and ensigns at
first elected by the soldiers themselves, a special representation was
often given, particularly in the provinces, to the commanding staff. As
a result the military had in many soviets an absolutely overwhelming
majority. The soldier masses, who had not yet had time to acquire a
political physiognomy, nevertheless determined through their
representatives the physiognomy of the soviets.

In every representative system there is a certain lack of
correspondence. It was especially great on the second day of the
revolution. The deputies of the politically helpless soldiers often
turned out in those early days to be people completely alien to the
soldiers and to the revolution – all sorts of intellectuals and
semi-intellectuals who had been hiding in the rear barracks and
consequently came out as extreme patriots. Thus was created a divergence
between the mood of the barracks and the mood of the soviet. Officer
Stankevich, whom the soldiers of his battalion had received back
sullenly and distrustfully after the revolution, made a successful
speech in the soldiers’ section on the delicate question of discipline.
Why, he asked, is the mood of the Soviet gentler and more agreeable than
that of the battalions? This naïve perplexity testifies once more how
hard it is for the real feelings of the lower ranks to find a path to
the top.

Nevertheless, as early as March 8, meetings of soldiers and workers
began to demand that the Soviet depose forthwith the Provisional
Government of the liberal bourgeoisie, and take the power in its own
hands. Here again the initiative belonged to the Vyborg district. And
could there be, indeed, a demand more intelligible and nearer to the
hearts of the masses? But this agitation was soon broken off, not only
because the Defensists sharply opposed it; worse than that, the majority
leadership had already in the first half of March bowed down in real
fact to the two-power régime. And anyway, aside from the Bolsheviks,
there was no one to bring up squarely the question of power. The Vyborg
leaders had to back down. The Petrograd workers, however, did not for
one moment give their confidence to the new government, nor consider it
their own. They did listen keenly, though, to the soldiers and try not
to oppose them too sharply. The soldiers, on the other hand, just
learning the first syllables of political life, although as shrewd
peasants they would not trust any master who happened along,
nevertheless intently listened to their representatives, who in turn
lent a respectful ear to the authoritative leaders of the Executive
Committee; and these latter did nothing but listen with alarm to the
pulse of the liberal bourgeoisie. Upon this system of universal
listening from the bottom toward the top everything rested – for the
time being. However, the mood from below had to break out on the
surface. The question of power, artificially sidetracked, kept pushing
up anew, although in disguised form. “The soldiers don’t know whom to
listen to,” complained the districts and the provinces, expressing in
this way to the Executive Committee their dissatisfaction with the
divided sovereignty. Delegations from the Baltic and Black Sea fleets
announced on the 16th of March that they were ready to recognise the
Provisional Government in so far as it went hand in hand with the
Executive Committee; in other words, they did not intend to recognise it
at all. As time goes on, this note sounds louder and louder. “The army
and the population should submit only to the directions of the Soviet,”
resolves the 172nd Reserve regiment, and then immediately formulates the
contrary theorem: “Those directions of the Provisional Government which
conflict with the decision of the Soviet are not to be obeyed.” With a
mixed feeling of satisfaction and anxiety the Executive Committee
sanctioned this situation; with grinding teeth the government endured
it. There was nothing else for either of them to do.

Already early in March, soviets were coming into being in all the
principal towns and industrial centres. From these they spread in the
next few weeks throughout the country. They began to arrive in the
villages only in April and May; at first it was practically the army
alone which spoke in the name of the peasants.

The Executive Committee of the Petrograd Soviet actually acquired a
state significance. The other soviets guided themselves by the capital,
one after the other adopting resolutions of conditional support to the
Provisional Government. Although in the first months the relations
between the Petrograd and provincial soviets worked themselves out
smoothly, and without conflict or serious disagreement, nevertheless the
necessity of a state organisation was obvious in the whole situation. A
month after the overthrow of the autocracy a first conference of soviets
was summoned – incomplete and one-sided in its membership. Although, out
of 185 organisations represented, two-thirds were provincial soviets,
these were for the most part soldiers’ soviets. Together with the
representatives of the front organisations, these military delegates –
for the most part officers – were in an overwhelming majority. Speeches
resounded about war to complete victory, and outcries resounded against
the Bolsheviks, notwithstanding their more than moderate behaviour. The
conference filled out the Petrograd Executive Committee with sixteen
conservative provincials, thus legitimising its state character.

That strengthened the right wing still more. From now on they frightened
the malcontents by alluding to the provinces. The resolution on
regulating the membership of the Petrograd Soviet – adopted March 14 –
was hardly carried out at all. It is not the local soviet that decides,
but the All-Russian Executive Committee. The official leaders thus
occupied an almost unassailable position. The most important decisions
were made by the Executive Committee, or rather by its ruling nucleus,
after a preliminary agreement with the nucleus of the government. The
Soviet remained on one side. They treated it like a meeting: “Not there,
not in general meetings, is the policy wrought out; all these ‘plenary
sessions’ had decidedly no practical importance” (Sukhanov). These
complacent rulers of destiny thought that in entrusting the leadership
to them the soviets had essentially completed their task. The future
will soon show them that this is not so. The masses are long-suffering,
but they are not clay out of which you can fashion anything you want to.
Moreover, in a revolutionary epoch they learn fast. In that lies the
power of a revolution.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In order better to understand the further development of events, it is
necessary to pause upon the character of the two parties which from the
very beginning formed a close political bloc, dominating in the soviets,
in the democratic municipalities, in the congresses of the so-called
revolutionary democracy, and even carrying their steadily dwindling
majority to the Constituent Assembly, which became the last reflection
of their former power, like the glow on a hilltop illumined by a sun
already set.

If the Russian bourgeoisie appeared in the world too late to be
democratic, the Russian democracy for the same reason wanted to consider
itself socialistic. The democratic ideology had been hopelessly played
out in the course of the nineteenth century. A radical intelligentsia
standing on the edge of the twentieth, if it wanted to find a path to
the masses, had need of a socialist colouring. This is the general
historic cause which gave rise to those two intermediate parties:
Menshevik and Social Revolutionary. Each of them, however, had its own
genealogy and its own ideology.

The views of the Mensheviks were built up on a Marxian basis. In
consequence of that same historical belatedness of Russia, Marxism had
there become at first not so much a criticism of capitalist society as
an argument for the inevitability of the bourgeois development of the
country. History cleverly made use of the emasculated theory of
proletarian revolution, in order with its help to Europeanise, in the
bourgeois sense, wide circles of the mouldy “Narodnik” intelligentsia.
In this process a very important rôle fell to the Mensheviks.
Constituting the left wing of the bourgeois intelligentsia, they put the
bourgeoisie in touch with the more moderate upper layers of the workers,
those with a tendency towards legal activity around the Duma and in the
trade unions.

The Social Revolutionaries, on the contrary, struggled theoretically
against Marxism – although sometimes surrendering to it. They considered
themselves a party which realised the union of the intelligentsia, the
workers and the peasants – under the leadership, it goes without saying,
of the Critical Reason. In the economic sphere their ideas were an
indigestible mess of various historical accumulations, reflecting the
contradictory life-conditions of the peasantry in a country rapidly
becoming capitalistic. The coming revolution presented itself to the
Social Revolutionaries as neither bourgeois nor socialistic, but
“democratic”: they substituted a political formula for a social content.
They thus laid out for themselves a course halfway between the
bourgeoisie and the proletariat, and consequently a position of arbiter
between them. After February it might seem as though the Social
Revolutionaries did actually approach this position.

From the time of the first revolution they had had their roots in the
peasantry. In the first months of 1917, the whole rural intelligentsia
adopted for its own the traditional formula of the Narodniks: “Land and
Freedom.” In contrast to the Mensheviks who remained always a party of
the cities, the Social Revolutionaries had found, it seemed, an
amazingly powerful support in the country. More than that, they
dominated even in the cities: in the soviets through the soldiers’
sections, and in the first democratic municipalities where they had an
absolute majority of the votes. The power of this party seemed
unlimited. In reality it was a political aberration. A party for whom
everybody votes except that minority who know what they are voting for,
is no more a party, than the tongue in which babies of all countries
babble is a national language. The Social Revolutionary Party came
forward as a solemn designation for everything in the February
revolution that was immature, unformulated and confused. Everybody who
had not inherited from the pre-revolutionary past sufficient reasons to
vote for the Kadets or the Bolsheviks, voted for the Social
Revolutionaries. But the Kadets stood inside a closed circle of property
owners; and the Bolsheviks were still few, misunderstood, and even
terrifying. To vote for the Social Revolutionaries meant to vote for the
revolution in general, and involved no further obligation. In the city
it meant the desire of the soldiers to associate themselves with a party
that stood for the peasants, the desire of the backward part of the
workers to stand close to the soldiers, the desire of the small
townspeople not to break away from the soldiers and the peasants. In
those days the Social Revolutionary membership-card was a temporary
ticket of admission to the institutions of the revolution, and this
ticket remained valid until it was replaced by another card of a more
serious character. It has been truly said of this great party, which
took in all and everybody, that it was only a grandiose zero.

From the time of the first revolution, the Mensheviks had inferred the
necessity of a union with the liberals from the bourgeois character of
the revolution. And they valued this union higher than cooperation with
the peasantry, whom they considered an unsafe ally. The Bolsheviks, on
the contrary, had founded their view of the revolution on a union of the
proletariat with the peasantry against the liberal bourgeoisie. As an
actual fact we see in the February revolution an opposite grouping – the
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries come out a close union, completed
by their common bloc with the liberal bourgeoisie. The Bolsheviks, on
the official political field, are completely isolated.

This apparently inexplicable fact is in reality wholly in accord with
the laws of things. The Social Revolutionaries were not by any means a
peasant party, notwithstanding the wholesale sympathy for their slogans
in the villages. The central nucleus of the party – what actually
defined its policies and created ministers and bureaucrats from its
midst – was far more closely associated with the liberal and radical
circles of the cities than with the masses of the peasants in revolt.
This ruling nucleus – monstrously swelled by the careerist flood of
Social Revolutionaries of the March vintage – was frightened to death by
the spread of the peasant movement under Social Revolutionary slogans.
These freshly baked “Narodniks” wished the peasants all good things, of
course, but did not want the red cock to crow. And the horror of the
Social Revolutionaries before the peasant revolt was paralleled by the
horror of the Mensheviks before the assault of the proletariat. In its
entirety this democratic fright was a reflection of the very real danger
to the possessing classes caused by a movement of the oppressed, a
danger which united them in a single camp, the bourgeois-landlord
reaction. The bloc of the Social Revolutionaries with the government of
landlord Lvov signalised their break with the agrarian revolution, just
as the bloc of the Mensheviks with industrialists and bankers of the
type of Guchkov, Tereshchenko and Konovalov, meant their break with the
proletarian movement. In these circumstances the union of Mensheviks and
Social Revolutionaries meant not a cooperation of proletariat with
peasants, but a coalition of those parties which had broken with the
proletariat and the peasants respectively, for the sake of a bloc with
the possessing classes.

From what has been said it is clear that the socialism of the two
democratic parties was a fiction. But this is far from saying that their
democratism was real. It is a bloodless sort of democratism that
requires a socialistic disguise. The Russian proletariat had waged its
struggle for democracy in irreconcilable antagonism to the liberal
bourgeoisie. The democratic parties therefore, in entering a bloc with
the liberal bourgeoisie, had inevitably to enter into conflict with the
proletariat. Such were the social roots of the cruel struggle to come
between Compromisers and Bolsheviks.

If you reduce the above outlined processes to their naked class
mechanism – of which of course the participants, and even the leaders,
of the two compromise parties were not thoroughly conscious – you get
approximately the following distribution of historic functions: The
liberal bourgeoisie was already unable to win over the masses. Therefore
it feared a revolution. But a revolution was necessary for the bourgeois
development. From the enfranchised bourgeoisie two groups split off,
consisting of sons and younger brothers. One of these groups went to the
workers, the other to the peasants. They tried to attach these workers
and peasants to themselves, sincerely and hotly demonstrating that they
were socialists and hostile to the bourgeoisie. In this way they
actually gained a considerable influence over the people. But very soon
the effect of their ideas outstripped the original intention. The
bourgeoisie sensed a mortal danger and sounded the alarm. Both the
groups which had split off from it, the Mensheviks and the Social
Revolutionaries, eagerly responded to the summons from the head of the
family. Hastily patching up the old disagreements they all stood
shoulder to shoulder, abandoned the masses, and rushed to the rescue of
bourgeois society.

The Social Revolutionaries made a feeble and flabby impression even in
comparison with the Mensheviks. To the Bolsheviks at all important
moments they seemed merely third-rate Kadets. To the Kadets they seemed
third-rate Bolsheviks. (The second-rate position was occupied, in both
cases, by the Mensheviks.) Their unstable support and the formlessness
of their ideology were reflected in their personnel: on all the Social
Revolutionary leaders lay the imprint of unfinishedness, superficiality
and sentimental unreliability. We may say without any exaggeration that
the rank-and-file Bolshevik revealed more political acumen, more
understanding of the relations between classes, than the most celebrated
Social Revolutionary leaders.

Having no stable criteria, the Social Revolutionaries showed a tendency
toward moral imperatives. It is hardly necessary to add that these moral
pretensions did not in the least hinder them from employing in big
politics those petty knaveries so characteristic of intermediate parties
lacking a stable support, a clear doctrine, and a genuine moral axis.

In the Menshevik-Social Revolutionary bloc the dominant place belonged
to the Mensheviks, in spite of the weight of numbers on the side of the
Social Revolutionaries. In this distribution of forces was expressed in
a way the hegemony of the town over the country, the predominance of the
city over the rural petty bourgeoisie, and finally the intellectual
superiority of a “Marxist” intelligentsia over an intelligentsia which
stood by the simon-pure Russian sociology, and prided itself on the
meagreness of the old Russian history.

In the first weeks after the revolution not one of the left parties, as
we know, had its actual headquarters in the capital. The generally
recognised leaders of the socialist parties were abroad. The secondary
leaders were on their way to the centre from the Far East. This created
a mood of prudence and watchful waiting among the temporary leaders,
which drew them closer together. Not one of the guiding groups in those
weeks thought anything through to the end. The struggle of parties in
the Soviet was extremely peaceable in character. It was a question,
almost, of mere nuances within one and the same “revolutionary
democracy.” It is true that with the arrival of Tseretelli from exile
(March 19) the Soviet leadership took a rather sharp turn toward the
right – toward direct responsibility for the government and the war. But
the Bolsheviks also toward the middle of March, under the influence of
Kamenev and Stalin who had arrived from exile, swung sharply to the
right, so that the distance between the Soviet majority and its left
opposition had become by the beginning of April even less than it was at
the beginning of March. The real differentiation began a little later.
It is possible to set the exact date: April 4, the day after the arrival
of Lenin in Petrograd.

The Menshevik Party had a number of distinguished figures at the head of
its different tendencies, but not one revolutionary leader. Its extreme
right wing, led by the old teachers of the Russian social democracy –
Plekhanov, Zassulich, Deutsch – had taken a patriotic position even
under the autocracy. On the very eve of the February revolution,
Plekhanov, who had so pitifully outlived himself, wrote in an American
newspaper that strikes and other forms of working-class struggle in
Russia would now be a crime. The broader circles of old Mensheviks –
among their number such figures as Martov, Dan, Tseretelli – had
inscribed themselves in the camp of Zimmerwald and refused to accept
responsibility for the war. But this internationalism of the left
Mensheviks, as also of the left Social Revolutionaries, concealed in the
majority of cases a mere democratic oppositionism. The February
revolution reconciled a majority of those Zimmerwaldists[1] to the war,
which from now on they discovered to be a struggle in defence of the
revolution. The most decisive in this matter was Tseretelli, who carried
Dan and the others along with him. Martov, whom the war had found in
France, and who arrived from abroad only on May 9, could not help seeing
that his former party associates had after the February revolution
arrived at the same position occupied by Guesde, Sembat and others at
the beginning of 1914, when they took upon themselves the defence of a
bourgeois republic against German absolutism. Standing at the head of
the left wing of the Mensheviks, which did not rise to any serious rôle
in the revolution, Martov remained in opposition to the policy of
Tseretelli and Dan – at the same time opposing a rapprochement between
the left Mensheviks and the Bolsheviks. Tseretelli spoke in the name of
official Menshevism and had an indubitable majority – pre-revolutionary
patriots having found it easy to unite with these patriots of the
February vintage. Plekhanov, however, had his own group, completely
chauvinist and standing outside the party and outside the Soviet.
Martov’s faction, which did not quit the party, had no paper of its own
and no policy of its own. As always at times of great historic action,
Martov floundered hopelessly and swung in the air. In 1917, as in 1905,
the revolution hardly noticed this unusually able man.

The president of the Menshevik faction of the Duma, Cheidze, became
almost automatically the president of the Petrograd Soviet, and
afterwards of its Executive Committee. He tried to consecrate to the
duties of his office all the resources of his conscientiousness,
concealing his perpetual lack of confidence in himself under an
ingenuous jocularity. He carried the ineradicable imprint of his
province. Mountainous Georgia, the land of sun, vineyards, peasants and
petty princes, with a small percentage of workers, produced a very wide
stratum of left intellectuals, flexible, temperamental, but the vast
majority of them not rising above the petty bourgeois outlook. Georgia
sent Mensheviks as deputies to all four Dumas, and in all four factions
her deputies played the rôle of leaders. Georgia became the Gironde of
the Russian revolution. But whereas the Girondists of the eighteenth
century were accused of federalism, the Girondists of Georgia, although
at first defending a single and indivisible Russia, ended in separatism.

The most distinguished figure produced by the Georgian Gironde was
undoubtedly the former deputy of the second Duma, Tseretelli, who
immediately on his arrival from exile took the leadership, not only of
the Mensheviks, but of the whole Soviet majority. Not a theoretician and
not even a journalist, but a distinguished orator, Tseretelli remained a
radical of the southern French type. In conditions of ordinary
parliamentary routine he would have been a fish in water. But he was
born into a revolutionary epoch, and had poisoned himself in youth with
a dose of Marxism. At any rate, of all the Mensheviks, Tseretelli
revealed in the events of the revolution the widest horizon and the
desire to pursue a consistent policy. For this reason he, more than any
other, helped on with the destruction of the February régime. Cheidze
wholly submitted to Tseretelli, although at moments be was frightened by
that doctrinaire straightforwardness which caused the revolutionary
hard-labour convict of yesterday to unite with the conservative
representatives of the bourgeoisie.

The Menshevik Skobelev, indebted for his new popularity to his position
as deputy in the last Duma, conveyed – and not only on account of his
youthful appearance – the impression of a student playing the rôle of
statesman on a home-made stage. Skobelev specialised in putting down
“excesses,” quieting local conflicts, and in general caulking up the
cracks of the two-power régime – until he was included, in the unlucky
rôle of Minister of Labour, in the Coalition government of May.

A most influential figure among the Mensheviks was Dan, an old party
worker, always considered the second figure after Martov. If Menshevism
in general was nourished upon the flesh, blood, tradition, and spirit of
the German social democracy of the period of decline, Dan actually
seemed to be a member of the German party administration – an Ebert on a
smaller scale. Ebert, the German Dan, successfully carried out in
Germany a year later that policy which Dan, the Russian Ebert, had
failed to carry out in Russia. The cause of the difference however was
not in the men, but in the conditions.

If the first violin in the orchestra of the Soviet majority was
Tseretelli, the piercing clarinet was played by Lieber – with all his
lungpower and blood in his eyes. This was a Menshevik from the Jewish
workers’ union (The Bund), with a long revolutionary past, very sincere,
very temperamental, very eloquent, very limited, and passionately
desirous of showing himself an inflexible patriot and iron statesman.
Lieber was literally beside himself with hatred of Bolsheviks.

We may close the phalanx of Menshevik leaders with the former ultra-left
Bolshevik, Voitinsky, a prominent participant in the first revolution,
who had served at hard labour, and who broke with his party in March on
grounds of patriotism. After joining the Mensheviks, Voitinsky became,
as was to be expected, a professional Bolshevik-eater. He lacked only
Lieber’s temperament in order to equal him in baiting his former party
comrades.

The general staff of the Narodniks was equally heterogeneous, but far
less significant and bright. The so-called Popular Socialists, the
extreme right flank, were led by the old emigrant Chaikovsky, who
equalled Plekhanov in military chauvinism but lacked his talent and his
past. Alongside him stood the old woman Breshko-Breshkovskaia, whom the
Social Revolutionaries called the “grandmother of the Russian
Revolution,” but who zealously forced herself as godmother on the
Russian counter-revolution. The superannuated anarchist Kropotkin, who
had had a weakness ever since youth for the Narodniks, made use of the
war to disavow everything he had been teaching for almost half a
century. This denouncer of the state supported the Entente, and if he
denounced the dual power in Russia, it was not in the name of anarchy,
but in the name of a single power of the bourgeoisie. However, these old
people played mostly a decorative rôle – although later on in the war
against the Bolsheviks Chaikovsky headed one of the White governments
financed by Churchill. The first place among the Social Revolutionaries
– far in advance of the others, though not in the party but above it –
was occupied by Kerensky, a man without any party past whatever. We
shall meet often again this providential figure, whose strength in the
two-power period lay in his combining the weaknesses of liberalism with
the weaknesses of the democracy. His formal entrance into the Social
Revolutionary Party did not destroy Kerensky’s scornful attitude toward
parties in general: he considered himself the directly chosen one of the
nation. But after all, the Social Revolutionary Party had ceased by that
time to be a party, and become a grandiose and indeed national zero. In
Kerensky this party found an adequate leader.

The future Minister of Agriculture, and afterwards President of the
Constituent Assembly, Chernov, was indubitably the most representative
figure of the old Social Revolutionary Party, and by no accident was
considered its inspirator, theoretician and leader. A well-read rather
than educated man, with a considerable but unintegrated learning,
Chernov always had at his disposition a boundless assortment of
appropriate quotations, which for a long time caught the imagination of
the Russian youth without teaching them much. There was only one single
question which this many-worded leader could not answer: Whom was he
leading and whither? The eclectic formulas of Chernov, ornamented with
moralisms and verses, united for a time a most variegated public who at
all critical moments pulled in different directions. No wonder Chernov
complacently contrasted his methods of forming a party with Lenin’s
“sectarianism.”

Chernov arrived from abroad five days after Lenin: England after some
hesitation had passed him. To the numerous greetings of the Soviet, the
leader of its biggest party answered with its longest speech – a speech
about which Sukhanov, himself a half Social Revolutionary, comments as
follows: “Not only I, but many other Social Revolutionary party patriots
wrinkled our brows and shook our heads, because he chanted so
unpleasantly and minced and rolled his eyes – yes, and talked endlessly
and without aim or purpose.” All the further activity of Chernov in the
revolution developed in tune with this first speech. After some attempts
to oppose Kerensky and Tseretelli from the left, finding himself pressed
on all sides, Chernov surrendered without a struggle, purged himself of
his emigrant Zimmerwaldism, took a seat in the Contact Commission, and
later also in the coalition government. Everything he did was
inappropriate. He decided therefore to evade all issues. Abstaining from
the vote became for him a form of political life. His authority melted
away from April to October, faster even than the ranks of his party.
With all the differences between Chernov and Kerensky, who hated each
other, they were both completely rooted in the pre-revolutionary past –
in the old flabby Russian society, in that thin-blooded and pretentious
intelligentsia, burning with a desire to teach the masses of the people,
to be their guardian and benefactor, but completely incapable of
listening to them, understanding them, and learning from them. And
without learning from the masses there can be no revolutionary
statesmanship.

Avksentiev, who was raised by his party to the highest revolutionary
posts – president of the Executive Committee of the Peasants’ Deputies,
Minister of the Interior, President of the Pre-Parliament – was the
complete caricature of a statesman. A charming teacher of language in a
ladies’ seminary in Orel – that is really all you can say about him,
although, to be sure his political activity turned out far more
pernicious than his personality. A large rôle was played – although
mostly behind the scenes – in the Social Revolutionary faction, and in
the ruling nucleus of the Soviet, by Gotz. A terrorist of well-known
revolutionary family, Gotz was less pretentious and more business-like
than his closest political friends. But in his character as a so-called
“practical,” he limited himself to kitchen matters, leaving the big
questions to others. It is necessary to add that he was neither orator
nor writer, and that his chief resource was his personal authority
bought with years of imprisonment at hard labour.

We have named essentially all who can be named among the ruling circle
of the Narodniks. Below them are completely accidental figures like
Filipovsky, whose arrival at the very height of the February Olympus
nobody ever could explain: the deciding factor would seem to have been
his naval officer’s uniform. Alongside the official leaders of the two
ruling parties in the Executive Committee, there were quite a few “wild
ones,” solitaries, participants of the past movement at its various
stages, people who had withdrawn from the struggle long before the
uprising, and now, after a hasty return under the banner of the
victorious revolution, were in no hurry to adopt the yoke of any party.
On all fundamental questions the “wild ones” followed the line of the
Soviet majority. For the first few days they played even a leading rôle,
but in proportion as the official leaders began to arrive from exile and
from abroad, these non-party men retired to a secondary place. Politics
began to take form, and party allegiance entered into its rights.

Enemies of the Executive Committee in the reactionary camp made a great
point of the “preponderance” in it of non-Russians: Jews, Georgians,
Letts, Poles, and so forth. Although by comparison with the whole
membership of the Executive Committee the non-Russian elements were not
very numerous, it is nevertheless true that they occupied a very
prominent place in the præsidium, in the various committees, among the
orators, etc. Since the intelligentsia of the oppressed nationalities –
concentrated as they were for the most part in cities – had flowed
copiously into the revolutionary ranks, it is not surprising that among
the old generation of revolutionaries the number of non-Russians was
especially large. Their experience, although not always of a high
quality, made them irreplaceable when it came to inaugurating new social
forms. The attempt, however, to explain the policy of the soviets and
the course of the whole revolution by an alleged “predominance” of
non-Russians is pure nonsense. Nationalism in this case again reveals
its scorn for the real nation – that is, the people – representing them
in the period of their great national awakening as a mere block of wood
in alien and accidental hands. But why and how did the non-Russians
acquire such miracle-working power over the native millions? As a matter
of fact, at a moment of deep historic change, the bulk of a nation
always presses into its service those elements which were yesterday most
oppressed, and therefore are most ready to give expression to the new
tasks. It is not that aliens lead the revolution, but that the
revolution makes use of the aliens. It has been so even in great reforms
introduced from above. The policy of Peter did not cease to be national
when, swinging out of the old tracks, it impressed into its service
non-Russians and foreigners. The master of some German suburb, or some
Dutch skipper, would express far better at that period the demands of
the national development of Russia, than Russian priests dragged in long
ago by the Greeks, or Moscow Boyars, who also complained of foreign
predominance, although themselves descended from those alien tribes who
created the Russian state. In any case the non-Russian intelligentsia of
1917 were distributed amongst the same parties as the one hundred per
cent Russians, suffered from the same vices, made the same mistakes –
and moreover the non-Russians among the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries displayed a most particular zeal for the defence and
unity of Russia.

Such was the Executive Committee, the highest organ of the democracy.
Two parties which had lost their illusions but preserved their
prejudices, with a staff of leaders who were incapable of passing from
word to deed, arrived at the head of revolution called to break the
fetters of a century and lay the foundations of a new society. The whole
activity of the Compromisers became one long chain of painful
contradictions exhausting the masses and leading to the convulsions of
civil war.

The workers, soldiers and peasants took events seriously. They thought
that the soviets which they had created ought to undertake immediately
to remove those evils which had caused the revolution. They all ran to
the Soviet. Everybody brought his pains there. And who was without
pains? They demanded decisions, hoped for help, awaited justice,
insisted upon indemnification. Solicitors, complainers, petitioners,
exposers, all came assuming that at last they had replaced a hostile
power with their own. The people believe in the Soviet, the people are
armed, therefore the Soviet is the sovereign power. That was the way
they understood it. And were they not indeed right? An uninterrupted
flood of soldiers, workers, soldiers’ wives, small traders, clerks,
mothers, fathers, kept opening and shutting the doors, sought,
questioned, wept, demanded, compelled action – sometimes even indicating
what action – and converted the Soviet in very truth into a
revolutionary government. “That was not all in the interest, or at least
did not at all enter into the plans, of the Soviet itself,” complains
our friend Sukhanov, who of course struggled with all his might against
this process. But with what success did he struggle? Alas, he is soon
compelled to acknowledge that “the Soviet apparatus began involuntarily,
automatically, against the will of the Soviet, to crowd out the official
governmental machine, which was grinding more and more without grain.”
What did the doctrinaires of capitulation do – the mechanics of this
empty grinding? “It became necessary to reconcile ones self and take up
the separate functions of administration,” Sukhanov sadly confesses, “at
the same time preserving the fiction that the Mariinsky Palace was
performing them.” That is what those people were busy with in a
shattered country caught in the flames of war and revolution –
protecting with masquerade measures the prestige of a government which
the people had organically ejected. The revolution may die, but long
live the fiction! And all the while the power which they had driven out
of the door, kept crawling back through the window, catching them every
time unawares and making them look cheap or ludicrous.

On the night of the 28th of February, the Executive Committee closed up
the monarchist press and established a licensing system for newspapers.
Protests were heard, those shouting the loudest who had been accustomed
to stop the mouths of others. After a few days the Committee had to take
up again the problem of a free press: to permit or not to permit the
publication of reactionary papers? Disagreements arose. Doctrinaires of
the type of Sukhanov stood for absolute freedom of the press. Cheidze at
first disagreed: how can we leave weapons at the uncontrolled
disposition of our mortal enemies? It occurred to nobody, by the way, to
turn over the whole question to the decision of the government. Anyway,
that would have been useless; the typographical workers took orders only
from the Soviet. On March 5 the Executive Committee confirmed this fact
as follows: “The right press is closed and the issue of new papers will
depend upon the decision of the Soviet.” But as early as the 10th, under
pressure from bourgeois circles, that resolution was annulled. “They
took only three days to come to their senses,” exults Sukhanov.
Ill-founded exultation! The press does not stand above society: the
conditions of its existence during a revolution reflect the progress of
the revolution itself. When the latter assumes, or may assume, the
character of a civil war, not one of the warring camps will permit the
existence of a hostile press within the sphere of its influence – no
more than it will let escape from its control the arsenals, the
railroads, the printing establishments. In a revolutionary struggle the
press is only one kind of weapon. The right to speech is certainly not
higher than the right to life. A revolution takes the latter too into
its hands. We may lay this down as a law: Revolutionary governments are
the more liberal, the more tolerant, the more “magnanimous” to the
reaction, the shallower their programme, the more they are bound up with
the past, the more conservative their rôle. And the converse: the more
gigantic their tasks and the greater the number of vested rights and
interests they are to destroy, the more concentrated will be the
revolutionary power, the more naked its dictatorship. Whether this is a
good thing or bad, it is by these roads that humanity has thus far moved
forward. The Soviet was right when it wanted to retain control of the
press. Why did it so easily give this up? Because in general it was
refusing to make a serious fight. It remained silent about peace, about
the land, even about a republic. Having turned over the power to the
conservative bourgeoisie, it had neither a reason for fearing the right
press, nor a possibility of struggling against it. The government, on
the other hand, began after a few months, with the support of the
Soviet, to suppress ruthlessly the left press. The Bolshevik papers were
shut down one after another.

On March 7 in Moscow, Kerensky declaimed: “Nicholas II is in my hands. I
will never be the Marat of the Russian revolution. Nicholas II is to go
under my personal supervision to England ...” Ladies threw flowers;
students applauded. But the depths bestirred themselves. Not one serious
revolution yet – not one that had something to lose – has let the
deposed monarch escape over the border. From the workers and soldiers
came continuous demands: arrest the Romanovs. The Executive Committee
sensed the fact that there could be no joking here. It was decided that
the Soviet must take into its own hands the question of the Romanovs:
the government was thus openly proclaimed undeserving of confidence. The
Executive Committee gave an order to all railroads not to let Romanov
through. That was why the czar’s train got lost in the tracks. One of
the members of the Executive Committee, the worker Gvosdev, a right
Menshevik, was commissioned to arrest Nicholas. Kerensky was disavowed –
and along with him the government. But instead of resigning it submitted
in silence. On March 9 Cheidze reported to the Executive Committee that
the government had “renounced” the thought of sending Nicholas to
England. The czar’s family was put under arrest in the Winter Palace.

Thus the Executive Committee stole the power from under its own pillow.
But from the front the demand became more and more insistent: transfer
the former czar to the Peter and Paul fortress.

Revolutions have always involved a reshuffling of property, not only by
legislative means, but also by mass seizure. No agrarian revolution in
history has ever proceeded otherwise: legal reforms always trail behind
the red cock. In the towns, forcible seizures have played a smaller
rôle: bourgeois revolutions have not had the task of uprooting bourgeois
property relations. But there has never been any revolution, it seems,
in which the masses have not appropriated for social purposes the
buildings which formerly belonged to the enemies of the people.
Immediately after the February revolution the parties came out from
underground, trade unions arose, continuous meetings were held, there
were soviets in every district; for all these things quarters were
needed. Organisations seized the uninhabited summer homes of the czarist
ministers, or the vacant palaces of the czar’s ballerinas. The victims
complained, or else the government interfered on its own initiative. But
since the expropriators really possessed the sovereign power – the
official power being a ghost – it became necessary for the Prosecuting
Attorney to appeal in the long run to that same Executive Committee to
restore the ravished rights of a certain ballerina, whose none too
complicated functions had been so highly paid for by the members of the
dynasty out of the people’s wealth. The Contact Commission of course was
brought into operation; the ministers held sittings; the Bureau of the
Executive Committee conferred; delegations were sent to the
expropriators – and the affair dragged on for months.

Sukhanov relates that as a “Left” he had nothing against the most
radical legislative invasions of the rights of property, but on the
other hand he was a “bitter opponent of all forcible seizures.” With
ruses like this the unhappy “Lefts” have always covered up their
bankruptcy. A genuinely revolutionary government might unquestionably
have reduced these chaotic seizures to a minimum by a timely decree on
the requisition of quarters. But the left Compromisers had turned over
the power to the fanatics of property, in order afterwards carefully to
preach to the masses – under an open sky – a respect for revolutionary
legality. The climate of Petrograd is not favourable to Platonism.

The bread-lines had given the last stimulus to the revolution. They also
proved the first threat to the new régime. At the very first session of
the Soviet a food commission had been created. The government bothered
little about feeding the capital. It would not have been averse to
holding it down with hunger. The task lay on the Soviet. It had at its
disposition economists and statisticians with some practical experience,
people who had served formerly in the economic and administrative organs
of the bourgeoisie. They were in most cases Mensheviks of the right
wing, like Grohman and Cherevanin, or former Bolsheviks like Bazarov and
Avilov, who had moved far to the right. But they had hardly approached
the problem of feeding the capital, when they found themselves compelled
by the whole situation to apply extremely radical measures to control
speculation and organise a market. In a series of sessions of the Soviet
a whole system of measures of “military socialism” was adopted,
including the declaring of all grain stores public property, the
establishment of a definite price for bread, to accord with similar
prices for industrial products, state control of industry, a regulated
exchange of goods with the peasants. The leaders of the Executive
Committee looked at each other in alarm; not knowing what else to
propose, however, they supported these radical resolutions. The members
of the Contact Commission afterward communicated them, in some
embarrassment, to the government. The government promised to examine
them. But Prince Lvov, and Guchkov, and Konovalov had not the least
desire to control, requisition, or otherwise cut down on themselves and
their friends. All the economic measures of the Soviet went to pieces
against the passive resistance of the state apparatus – except in so far
as they were carried out independently by local soviets. The sole
practical measure carried through by the Petrograd Soviet in the matter
of food supply was the limitation of the consumer to a strict ration: a
pound and a half of bread for people engaged in physical labour, a pound
for the rest. To be sure, this limitation introduced almost no change
into the natural food budget of the population of the capital: you can
live on a pound, or a pound and a half. The misery of daily
under-nourishment was still ahead. For a period of years – not months,
but years – the revolution will have to take in its belt tighter and on
a shrinking stomach. It will weather the ordeal. At present what
troubles it is not hunger but doubt, indefiniteness, uncertainty of
tomorrow. Economic difficulties that have been multiplied by thirty-two
months of war, are knocking at the doors and windows of the new régime.
The breakdown of transport, the lack of various kinds of raw materials,
the exhaustion of a considerable part of the equipment, alarming
inflation, dislocation of trade, all these things demand bold and
immediate measures. But while approaching these problems economically,
the Compromisers made the solution of them impossible politically. Every
economic problem they encountered turned into a condemnation of the dual
power; every decision they had to sign burned their fingers unbearably.

The eight-hour working day was the great test of strength and mutual
relations. The insurrection had conquered, but the general strike
continued. The workers seriously assumed that a change in the régime
ought to introduce changes into their lives. This caused instant alarm
to the new rulers, both liberal and socialist. The patriotic parties and
newspapers adopted the cry: “Soldiers to the barracks, workers to the
shops!” “Does that mean that everything is going to remain the same?”
asks the worker. “For the time being,” answer the Mensheviks,
embarrassed. But the workers understand: If there isn’t a change right
now, there never will be.

The bourgeoisie left the task of settling things with the workers to the
socialists. Referring to the fact that the victory already won “has
sufficiently guaranteed the position of the working class in its
revolutionary struggle” – to be sure, have not the liberal landlords
come into power? – the Executive Committee designated March 5 as the
date for resuming work in the Petrograd district. Workers to the shops!
Such is the iron-clad egotism of the educated classes, liberals and
socialists alike. Those people believed that millions of workers and
soldiers lifted to the heights of insurrection by the inconquerable
pressure of discontent and hope, would after their victory tamely submit
to the old conditions of life. From reading historical works, they had
got the impression that it happened this way in previous revolutions.
But no, even in the past it has never been so. If the workers have been
driven back into their former stalls, it has been only in a roundabout
way, after a whole series of defeats and deceptions. Marat was keenly
aware of this cruel social perversion of political revolutions. For that
reason he is so well slandered by the official historians. “A revolution
is accomplished and sustained only by the lowest classes of society,” he
wrote a month before the revolution of August 10, 1792, “by all the
disinherited, whom the shameless rich treat as _canaille_, and whom the
Romans with their usual cynicism once named proletarians.” And what will
the revolution give to the disinherited? “Winning a certain success at
the beginning, the movement is finally conquered; it always lacks
knowledge, skill, means, weapons, leaders and a definite plan of action;
it remains defenceless in the face of conspirators possessed of
experience, adroitness and craft.” Is it any wonder that Kerensky did
not want to be the Marat of the Russian revolution?

One of the former captains of Russian industry, V. Auerbach, relates
with indignation how “the revolution was understood by the lower orders
as something in the nature of an Easter carnival: servants, for example,
disappeared for whole days, promenaded in red ribbons, took rides in
automobiles, came home in the morning only long enough to wash up and
again went out for fun.” It is remarkable that in trying to demonstrate
the demoralising effect of a revolution, this accuser describes the
conduct of a servant in exactly those terms which – with the exception,
to be sure, of the red ribbon – most perfectly reproduce the daily life
of the bourgeois lady-patrician. Yes, a revolution is interpreted by the
oppressed as a holiday – or the eve of a holiday – and the first impulse
of the drudge aroused by it is to loosen the yoke of the day-by-day
humiliating, anguishing, ineluctable slavery. The working-class as a
whole could not, and did not intend to, comfort themselves with mere red
ribbons as a symbol of victory – a victory won for others. There was
agitation in the factories of Petrograd. A considerable number of shops
openly refused to submit to the resolution of the Soviet. The workers
were of course ready to return to the shops, for that was necessary –
but upon what terms? They demanded the eight-hour day. The Mensheviks
answered by alluding to 1905 when the workers tried to introduce the
eight-hour day by forcible methods and were defeated. “A struggle on two
fronts – against the reaction and against the capitalist – is too much
for the proletariat.” That was the central idea of the Mensheviks. They
recognised in a general way the inevitability of a break in the future
with the bourgeoisie. But this purely theoretical recognition did not
bind them to anything. They considered that it was wrong to force the
break. And since the bourgeoisie is driven into alliance with the
reaction not by heated phrases from orators and journalists, but by the
independent activity of the toiling classes, the Mensheviks tried with
all their power to oppose this activity – to oppose the economic
struggle of the workers and peasants. “For the working class,” they
taught, “social questions are not now of the first importance. Its
present task is to achieve political freedom.” But just what this
speculative freedom consisted of, the workers could not understand. They
wanted in the first place a little freedom for their muscles and nerves.
And so they brought pressure on their bosses. By the irony of fate it
was exactly on the 10th of March, when the Mensheviks were explaining
that the eight-hour day is not a current issue that the Manufacturers’
Association – which had already been obliged to enter into official
relations with the Soviet – announced its readiness to introduce the
eight-hour day and permit the organisation of factory and shop
committees. The industrialists were more far-seeing than the democratic
strategists of the Soviet. And no wonder: these employers came face to
face with the workers, and the workers in no less than half of the
Petrograd plants, among them a majority of the biggest ones, were
already leaving the shops in a body after eight hours of work. They
themselves took what the soviet and the government refused them. When
the liberal press unctuously compared this gesture of the Russian
industrialists of March 10, 1917 with that of the French nobility of
August 4, 1789, they were far nearer the historic truth than they
themselves imagined: like the feudalists of the end of the eighteenth
century, the Russian capitalists acted under the club of necessity,
hoping by this temporary concession to make sure of getting back in the
future what they had lost. One of the Kadet publicists, breaking through
the official lie, frankly acknowledged this: “Unfortunately for the
Mensheviks, the Bolsheviks had already by means of terror compelled the
Manufacturers’ Association to agree to an immediate introduction of the
eight-hour day.” In what this terror consisted we already know.
Worker-Bolsheviks indubitably occupied the front ranks in the movement,
and here as in the decisive days of February an overwhelming majority of
the workers followed them.

The Soviet, led by Mensheviks, recorded with mixed feelings this
gigantic victory gained essentially against its opposition. The
disgraced leaders were compelled, however, to make a still further step
forward; they had to propose to the Provisional Government the
promulgation in advance of the Constituent Assembly of an eight-hour law
for all Russia. The government, however, in agreement with the
manufacturers, resisted. Hoping for better days, they refused to fulfil
this demand-presented to them, to be sure, without any particular
insistence.

In the Moscow region the same struggle arose, but it lasted longer. Here
too the soviet in spite of the resistance of the workers demanded a
return to work. In one of the biggest factories a resolution against
calling off the strike received 7,000 votes against 0. Other factories
reacted in much the same way. On the 10th of March the soviet again
proclaimed the duty of returning immediately to the shops. Although work
began after that in a majority of shops, there developed almost
everywhere a struggle for the shortening of the working day. The workers
corrected their leaders by direct action. After a long resistance the
Moscow Soviet was obliged on the 21st of March to introduce the
eight-hour day by its own act. The industrialists immediately submitted.
In the provinces the same struggle was carried over into April. Almost
everywhere the soviets at first refrained and resisted, and afterwards
under pressure from the workers entered into negotiations with the
manufacturers. And where the latter did not accede, the soviets were
obliged independently to decree the eight-hour day. What a breach in the
system!

The government stood aside on purpose. In those days, a furious campaign
was opening under liberal leadership against the workers. In order to
subdue them it was decided to turn the soldiers against them. To shorten
the working day means, you see, to weaken the front. How can anybody
think only of himself in war time? Are they counting the hours in the
trenches? ... When the possessing classes make a start on the road of
demagogism, they stop at nothing. The agitation assumed a frenzied
character, and was soon carried into the trenches. The soldier Pireiko
in his reminiscences of the front confesses that this agitation –
carried on chiefly by half-baked socialists among the officers – was not
without success. “But the great weakness of the official staff in their
effort to turn the soldiers against the workers lay in the fact that
they were officers. It was too fresh in the mind of every soldier what
his officer had been to him in the past.” This baiting of the workers
was most bitter, however, in the capital. The industrialists along with
the Kadet staff found unlimited means and opportunities for agitation in
the garrison. “Towards the end of March,” says Sukhanov, “you could see
at all street crossings, in the tramways, and in every public place,
workers and soldiers locked together in a furious verbal battle.” Even
physical fights occurred. The workers understood the manoeuvre and
skilfully warded it off. For this it was only necessary to tell the
truth – to cite the figures of war profits, to show the soldiers the
factories and shops with the roar of machines, the hell fires of the
furnaces, their perpetual front where victims are innumerable. On the
initiative of the workers there began regular visits by the troops of
the garrison to the factories, and especially to those working on
munitions. The soldiers looked and listened. The workers demonstrated
and explained. These visits would end in triumphant fraternisation. The
socialist papers printed innumerable resolutions of the military units
as to their indestructible solidarity with the workers. By the middle of
April the very topic of the conflict had disappeared from the
newspapers. The bourgeois press was silent. Thus after their economic
victory, the workers won a political and moral victory.

The events connected with this struggle for the eight-hour day had an
immense significance for the whole future development of the revolution.
The workers had gained a few free hours a week for reading, for
meetings, and also for practice with the rifle, which became a regular
routine from the moment of the creation of the workers’ militia.
Moreover, after this clear lesson, the workers began to watch the Soviet
leadership more closely. The authority of the Mensheviks suffered a
serious drop. The Bolsheviks grew stronger in the factories, and partly
too in the barracks. The soldier became more attentive, thoughtful,
cautious: he understood that somebody was stalking him. The treacherous
design of the demagogues turned against its own inspirers. Instead of
alienation and hostility, they got a closer welding together of workers
and soldiers.

The government, in spite of the idyll of “Contact,” hated the Soviet,
hated its leaders and their guardianship. It revealed this upon the very
first occasion. Since the Soviet was fulfilling purely governmental
functions, and this moreover at the request of the government itself
whenever it became necessary to subdue the masses, the Executive
Committee requested the payment of a small subsidy for expenses. The
government refused, and in spite of the repeated insistence of the
Soviet, stood pat: it could not pay out the resources of the state to a
“private organisation.” The Soviet swallowed it. The budget of the
Soviet lay on the workers who never tired of taking collections for the
needs of the revolution. In those days both sides, the liberals and the
socialists, kept up the decorum of a complete mutual friendliness. At
the All-Russian Conference of Soviets the existence of the dual power
was declared a fiction Kerensky assured the delegates from the army that
between the government and the soviets there was a complete unity of
problems and aims. The dual power was no less zealously denied by
Tseretelli, Dan and other Soviet pillars. With the help of these lies,
they tried to reinforce a régime which was founded on lies.

However, the régime tottered from the very first weeks. The leaders were
tireless in the matter of organisational combinations. They tried to
bring to bear all sorts of accidental representative bodies against the
masses – the soldiers against the workers, the new dumas, zemstvos and
cooperatives against the soviets, the provinces against the capital, and
finally the officers against the people.

The soviet form does not contain any mystic power. It is by no means
free from the faults of every representative system – unavoidable so
long as that system is unavoidable. But its strength lies in that it
reduces all these faults to a minimum.

We may confidently assert – and the events will soon prove it – that any
other representative system, atomising the masses, would have expressed
their actual will in the revolution incomparably less effectively, and
with far greater delay. Of all the forms of revolutionary
representation, the soviet is the most flexible, immediate and
transparent. But still it is only a form. It cannot give more than the
masses are capable of putting into it at a given moment. Beyond that, it
can only assist the masses in understanding the mistakes they have made
and correcting them. In this function of the soviets lay one of the most
important guarantees of the development of the revolution.

What was the political plan of the Executive Committee? You could hardly
say that any one of the leaders had a plan thoroughly thought out.
Sukhanov subsequently asserted that, according to his plan, the power
was turned over to the bourgeoisie only for a short time, in order that
the democracy, having strengthened itself, might the more surely take it
back. However, this construction – naïve enough in any case – was
obviously retrospective. At least it was never formulated by anybody at
the time. Under the leadership of Tseretelli, the vacillations of the
Executive Committee, if they were not put an end to, were at least
organised into a system. Tseretelli openly announced that without a firm
bourgeois power the revolution would inevitably fail. The democracy must
limit itself to bringing pressure on the liberal bourgeoisie, beware of
pushing it over by some incautious step into the camp of the reaction,
and conversely, support it in so far as it backs up the conquests of the
revolution. In the long run that half-minded régime would have ended in
a bourgeois republic with the socialists as a parliamentary opposition.

The main difficulty for the leaders was not so much to find a general
plan, as a current programme of action. The Compromisers had promised
the masses to get from the bourgeoisie by way of “pressure” a democratic
policy, foreign and domestic. It is indubitable that under pressure from
the popular mass, ruling classes have more than once in history made
concessions. But “pressure” means, in the last analysis, a threat to
crowd the ruling class out of the power and occupy its place. Just this
weapon however was not in the hands of the democracy. They had
themselves voluntarily given over the power to the bourgeoisie. At
moments of conflict the democracy did not threaten to seize the power,
but on the contrary the bourgeoisie frightened them with the idea of
giving it back. Thus the chief lever in the mechanics of pressure was in
the hands of the bourgeoisie. This explains how, in spite of its
complete impotence, the government succeeded in resisting every somewhat
serious undertaking of the Soviet leaders.

By the middle of April, even the Executive Committee had proved too
broad an organ for the political mysteries of the ruling nucleus, who
had turned their faces completely toward the liberals. A “bureau” was
therefore appointed, consisting exclusively of right defensists. From
now on big politics was carried on in its own small circle. Everything
seemed nicely and permanently settled. Tseretelli dominated in the
Soviet without limit. Kerensky was riding higher and higher. But exactly
at that moment appeared clearly the first alarming signs from below-from
the masses. “It is amazing,” writes Stankevich, who was close to the
circle of Kerensky, “that at the very moment when this committee was
formed, when responsibility for the work was assumed by a bureau
selected only from defensist parties, exactly at this moment they let
slip from their hands the leadership of the masses – the masses moved
away from them.” Not at all amazing, but quite in accord with the laws
of things.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. The term is applied to those who attended the conference of anti-war
socialists held in Zimmerwald in 1915, or adhered to its programme. The
conference reassembled the following year in Kienthal. – _Trans._



CHAPTER 13 THE ARMY AND THE WAR


 

In the months preceding the revolution discipline in the army was
already badly shaken. You can pick up plenty of officers’ complaints
from those days: soldiers disrespectful to the command; their treatment
of horses, of military property, even of weapons, indescribably bad;
disorders in the military trains. It was not equally serious everywhere.
But everywhere it was going in the same direction – toward ruin.

To this was now added the shock of revolution. The uprising of the
Petrograd garrison took place not only without officers, but against
them. In the critical hours the command simply hid its head.
Deputy-Octobrist Shidlovsky conversed on the 27th of February with the
officers of the Preobrazhensky regiment obviously in order to feel out
their attitude to the Duma – but found among these aristocrat-cavaliers
a total ignorance of what was happening, perhaps a half-hypocritical
ignorance, for they were all frightened monarchists.

“What was my surprise,” says Shidlovsky, “when the very next morning I
saw the whole Preobrazhensky regiment marching down the street in
military formation led by a band, their order perfect and without a
single officer!” To be sure, a few companies arrived at the Tauride with
their officers – more accurately, they brought their officers with them.
But the officers felt that in this triumphal march they occupied the
position of captives. Countess Kleinmichel, observing these scenes while
under arrest, says plainly: “The officers looked like sheep led to the
slaughter.”

The February uprising did not create the split between soldiers and
officers but merely brought it to the surface. In the minds of the
soldiers the insurrection against the monarchy was primarily an
insurrection against the commanding staff. “From the morning of the 28th
of February,” says the Kadet Nabokov, then wearing an officer’s uniform,
“it was dangerous to go out, because they had begun to rip off the
officers’ epaulets.” That is how the first day of the new régime looked
in the garrison.

The first care of the Executive Committee was to reconcile soldiers with
officers. That meant nothing but to subordinate the troops to their
former command. The return of the officers to their regiments was
supposed, according to Sukhanov, to protect the army against “universal
anarchy or the dictators of the dark and disintegrated rank-and-file.”
These revolutionists, just like the liberals, were afraid of the
soldiers, not of the officers. The workers on the other hand, along with
the “dark” rank-and-file, saw every possible danger exactly in the ranks
of those brilliant officers. The reconciliation therefore proved
temporary.

Stankevich describes in these words the mental attitude of the soldiers
to the officers who returned to them after the uprising: “The soldiers,
breaking discipline and leaving their barracks, not only without
officers, but in many cases against their officers and even after
killing them at their posts, had achieved, it turned out, a great deed
of liberation. If it was a great deed, and if the officers themselves
now affirm this, then why didn’t they lead the soldiers into the
streets? That would have been easier and less dangerous. Now, after the
victory, they associate themselves with this deed. But how sincerely and
for how long?” These words are the more instructive that the author
himself was one of those “left” officers to whom it did not occur to
lead his soldiers into the streets.

On the morning of the 28th, on Sampsonievsky Prospect, the commander of
an engineers’ division was explaining to his soldiers that “the
government which everybody hated is overthrown,” a new one is formed
with Prince Lvov at the head therefore it is necessary to obey officers
as before. “And now I ask all to return to their places in the
barracks.” A few soldiers cried: “Glad to try”.[1] The majority merely
looked bewildered: “Is that all?”

The scene was observed accidentally by Kayurov. It jarred him. “Permit
me a word, Mr. Commander ...” And without waiting for permission,
Kayurov put this question: “Has the workers’ blood been flowing in the
streets of Petrograd for three days merely to exchange one landlord for
another?” Here Kayurov took the bull by the horns. His question
summarised the whole struggle of the coming months. The antagonism
between the soldier and the officer was a refraction of the hostility
between peasant and landlord.

The officers in the provinces, having evidently got their instructions
in good season, explained the events all in the same way: “His Majesty
has exceeded his strength in his efforts for the good of the country,
and has been compelled to hand over the burden of government to his
brother.” The reply was plain on the faces of the soldiers, complains an
officer in a far corner of the Crimea: “Nicholas or Mikhail – it’s all
the same to us.” When, however, this same officer was compelled next
morning to communicate the news of the revolutionary victory, the
soldiers, he tells us, were transformed. Their questions, gestures,
glances, testified to the “prolonged and resolute work which somebody
had been doing on those dark and cloudy brains, totally unaccustomed to
think.” What a gulf between the officer, whose brain accommodates itself
without effort to the latest telegram from Petrograd, and those soldiers
who are, however stiffly, nevertheless honestly, defining their attitude
to the events, independently weighing them in their calloused palms!

The high command, although formally recognising the revolution, decided
not to let it through to the front. The chief of staff ordered the
commander-in-chief of all the fronts, in case revolutionary delegations
arrived in his territory – delegations which General Alexeiev called
“gangs” for short – to arrest them immediately and turn them over to
court-martial. The next day the same general, in the name of “His
Highness,” the Grand Duke Nikolai Nikolaievich, demanded of the
government “an end of all that is now happening in the rear of the army”
– in other words, an end of the revolution.

The command delayed informing the active army about the revolution as
long as possible, not so much through loyalty to the monarchy as through
fear of the revolution. On several fronts they established a veritable
quarantine: stopped all letters from Petrograd, and held up newcomers.
In that way the old régime stole a few extra days from eternity. The
news of the revolution rolled up to the line of battle not before the
5th or 6th of March – and in what form? About the same as above: “The
grand duke is appointed commander-in-chief; the czar has abdicated in
the name of the Fatherland; everything else as usual.” In many trenches,
perhaps even in the majority, the news of the revolution came from the
Germans before it got there from Petrograd. Could there have been any
doubt among the soldiers that the whole command was in a conspiracy to
conceal the truth? And could those same soldiers trust those same
officers to the extent of two cents, when a couple of days later they
pinned on a red ribbon?

The chief of staff of the Black Sea fleet tells us, that the news of the
events in Petrograd at first made no marked impression on the soldiers.
But when the first socialist papers arrived from the capital, “in the
wink of an eye the mood changed, meetings began, criminal agitators
crawled out of their cracks.” The admiral simply did not understand what
was happening before his eyes. The newspapers did not create this change
of mood. They merely scattered the doubt of the soldiers as to the depth
of the revolution, and permitted them to reveal their true feelings
without fear of reprisals from the staff. The political physiognomy of
the Black Sea staff, his own among them, is characterised by the same
author in a single phrase: “The majority of the officers of the fleet
thought that without the czar the Fatherland would perish.” The
democrats also thought that the Fatherland would perish – unless they
brought back bright lights of this kind to the “dark” sailors!

The commanding staff of the army and fleet soon divided into two groups.
One group tried to stay in their places, tuning in on the revolution,
registering as Social Revolutionaries. Later a part of them even tried
to crawl into the Bolshevik camp. The other group strutted a while and
tried to oppose the new order, but soon broke out in some sharp conflict
and were swept away by the soldier flood. Such groupings are so natural
that they have been repeated in all revolutions. The irreconcilable
officers of the French monarchy, those who in the words of one of them
“fought as long as they could,” suffered less over the disobedience of
the soldiers than over the knuckling under of their noble colleagues. In
the long run the majority of the old command were pushed out or
suppressed, and only a small part re-educated and assimilated. In a more
dramatic form the officers shared the fate of those classes from which
they were recruited.

An army is always a copy of the society it serves – with this
difference, that it gives social relations a concentrated character,
carrying both their positive and negative features to an extreme. It is
no accident that the war did not create one single distinguished
military name in Russia. The high command was sufficiently characterised
by one of its own members: “Much adventurism, much ignorance, much
egotism, intrigue, careerism, greed, mediocrity and lack of foresight” –
writes General Zalessky – “and very little knowledge, talent or desire
to risk life, or even comfort and health.” Nikolai Nikolaievich, the
first commander-in-chief, was distinguished only by his high stature and
august rudeness. General Alexeiev, a grey mediocrity, the oldest
military clerk of the army, won out through mere perseverance. Kornilov
was a bold young commander whom even his admirers regarded as a bit
simple; Kerensky’s War Minister, Verkhovsky, later described him as the
lion heart with the brain of a sheep. Brussilov and Admiral Kolchak a
little excelled the others in culture, if you will, but in nothing else.
Denikin was not without character, but for the rest, a perfectly
ordinary army general who had read five or six books. And after these
came the Yudeniches, the Dragomirovs the Lukomskies, speaking French or
not speaking it, drinking moderately or drinking hard, but amounting to
absolutely nothing.

To be sure, not only feudal, but also bourgeois and democratic Russia
had its representatives in the officers’ corps. The war poured into the
ranks of the army tens of thousands of petty bourgeois youths in the
capacity of officers, military engineers. These circles, standing almost
solid for war to complete victory, felt the necessity of some broad
measures of reform, but submitted in the long run to the reactionary
command. Under the czar they submitted through fear, and after the
revolution through conviction – just as the democracy in the rear
submitted to the bourgeoisie. The conciliatory wing of the officers
shared subsequently the unhappy fate of the conciliatory parties – with
this difference, that at the front the situation developed a thousand
times more sharply. In the Executive Committee you could hold on for a
long time with ambiguities; in the face of the soldiers it was not so
easy.

The ill-will and friction between the democratic and aristocratic
officers, incapable of reviving the army, only introduced a further
element of decomposition. The physiognomy of the army was determined by
the old Russia, and this physiognomy was completely feudal. The officers
still considered the best soldier to be a humble and unthinking peasant
lad, in whom no consciousness of human personality had yet awakened.
Such was the “national” tradition of the Russian army – the Suvorov
tradition – resting upon primitive agriculture, serfdom and the village
commune. In the eighteenth century Suvorov was still creating miracles
out of this material. Leo Tolstoy, with a baronial love, idealised in
his Platon-Karatayev the old type of Russian soldier, unmurmuringly
submitting to nature, tyranny and death (_War and Peace_). The French
revolution, initiating the magnificent triumph of individualism in all
spheres of human activity, put an end to the military art of Suvorov.
Throughout the nineteenth century, and the twentieth too – throughout
the whole period between the French and Russian revolutions – the czar’s
army was continually defeated because it was a feudal army. Having been
formed on that “national” basis, the commanding staff was distinguished
by a scorn for the personality of the soldier, a spirit of passive
Mandarinism, an ignorance of its own trade, a complete absence of heroic
principles, and an exceptional disposition toward petty larceny. The
authority of the officers rested upon the exterior signs of superiority,
the ritual of caste, the system of suppression, and even a special caste
language – contemptible idiom of slavery – in which the soldier was
supposed to converse with his officer.[2] Accepting the revolution in
words and swearing fealty to the Provisional Government, the czar’s
marshals simply shouldered off their own sins on the fallen dynasty.
They graciously consented to allow Nicholas II to be declared scapegoat
for the whole past. But farther than that, not a step! How could they
understand that the moral essence of the revolution lay in the
spiritualisation of that human mass upon whose inertness all their good
fortune had rested? Denikin, appointed to command the front, announced
at Minsk: “I accept the revolution wholly and irrevocably. But to
revolutionise the army and bring demagogism into it, I consider ruinous
to the country.” A classic formula of the dull-wittedness of
major-generals! As for the rank-and-file generals, to quote Zalessky,
they made but one demand: “Only keep your hands off us – that is all we
care about!” However, the revolution could not keep its hands off them.
Belonging to the privileged classes, they stood to win nothing, but they
could lose much. They were threatened with the loss not only of officer
privileges, but also of landed property. Covering themselves with
loyalty to the Provisional Government, the reactionary officers waged so
much the more bitter a campaign against the soviets. And when they were
convinced that the revolution was penetrating irresistibly into the
soldier mass, and even into their home estates, they regarded this as a
monstrous treachery on the part of Kerensky, Miliukov, even Rodzianko –
to say nothing of the Bolsheviks.

The life conditions of the fleet even more than the army nourished the
live seeds of civil war. The life of the sailors in their steel bunkers,
locked up there by force for a period of years, was not much different,
even in the matter of food, from that of galley slaves. Right beside
them the officers, mostly from privileged circles and having voluntarily
chosen naval service as their calling, were identifying the Fatherland
with the czar, the czar with themselves, and regarding the sailor as the
least valuable part of the battleship. Two alien and tight-shut worlds
thus live in close contact, and never out of each other’s sight. The
ships of the fleet have their base in the industrial seaport towns with
their great population of workers needed for building and repairing.
Moreover, on the ships themselves, in the engineering and machine corps,
there is no small number of qualified workers. Those are the conditions
which convert the fleet into a revolutionary mine. In the revolutions
and military uprisings of all countries the sailors have been the most
explosive material; they have almost always at the first opportunity
drastically settled accounts with their officers. The Russian sailors
were no exception.

In Kronstadt the revolution was accompanied by an outbreak of bloody
vengeance against the officers, who attempted, as though in horror at
their own past, to conceal the revolution from the sailors. One of the
first victims to fall was Admiral Viren, who enjoyed a well-earned
hatred. A number of the commanding staff were arrested by the sailors.
Those who remained free were deprived of arms.

In Helsingfors and Sveaborg, Admiral Nepenin did not admit the news of
the insurrection in Petrograd until the night of March 4, threatening
the soldiers and sailors meanwhile with acts of repression. So much the
more ferocious was the insurrection of these soldiers and sailors. It
lasted all night and all day. Many officers were arrested. The most
hateful were shoved under the ice. “Judging by Skobelev’s account of the
conduct of the officers of the fleet and the Helsingfors authorities,”
writes Sukhanov, who is by no means indulgent to the “dark rank-and
file,” “it is a wonder these excesses were so few.”

But in the land forces too there were bloody encounters, several waves
of them. At first this was an act of vengeance for the past, for the
contemptible striking of soldier. There was no lack of memories that
burned like ulcers. In 1915 disciplinary punishment by flogging had been
officially introduced into the czar’s army. The officers flogged
soldiers upon their own authority – soldiers who were often the fathers
of families. But it was not always a question of the past. At the
All-Russian Conference of Soviets, a delegate speaking for the army
stated that as early as the 15th or 17th of March an order had been
issued introducing corporal punishment in the active army. A deputy of
the Duma, returning from the front, reported that the Cossacks said to
him, in the absence of officers: “Here, you say, is the order.
[Evidently the famous Order Number 1, of which we will speak further.]
We got it yesterday, and yet today an officer socked me on the jaw.” The
Bolsheviks went out to try to restrain the soldiers from excesses as
often as the Conciliators. But bloody acts of retribution were as
inevitable as the recoil of a gun. The liberals had no other ground for
calling the February revolution bloodless except that it gave them the
power.

Some of the officers managed to stir up bitter conflicts about the red
ribbons, which were in the eyes of the soldiers a symbol of the break
with the past. The commander of the Sumsky regiment got killed in this
way. Another commander, having ordered newly arrived reinforcements to
remove their ribbons, was arrested by the soldiers, and locked up in the
guard house. A number of encounters also resulted from the czar’s
portraits, not yet removed from the official quarters. Was this out of
loyalty to the monarchy? In a majority of cases it was mere lack of
confidence in the revolution, an act of personal insurance. But the
soldiers were not wrong in seeing the ghost of the old régime lurking
behind those portraits.

It was not thought-out measures from above, but spasmodic movements from
below, which established the new régime in the army. The disciplinary
power of the officers was neither annulled nor limited. It merely fell
away of itself during the first weeks of March. “It was clear,” said the
chief of the Black Sea staff, “that if an officer attempted to impose
disciplinary punishment upon a soldier, the power did not exist to get
it executed.” In that you have one of the sure signs of a genuinely
popular revolution.

With the falling away of their disciplinary power, the practical
bankruptcy of the staff of officers was laid bare. Stankevich, who
possessed both a gift of observation and an interest in military
affairs, gives a withering account in this respect of the commanding
staff. The drilling still went on according to the old rules, he tells
us, totally out of relation to the demands of the war. “Such exercises
were merely a test of the patience and obedience of the soldiers.” The
officers, of course, tried to lay the blame for this, their own
bankruptcy, upon the revolution.

Although they were quick with cruel reprisals, the soldiers were also
inclined to childlike trustfulness and self-forgetful acts of gratitude.
For a short time the deputy Filomenko, a priest and a liberal, seemed to
the soldiers at the front a standard-bearer of the idea of freedom, a
shepherd of the revolution. The old churchly ideas united in funny ways
with the new faith. The soldiers carried this priest on their hands,
raised him above their heads, carefully seated him in his sleigh. And he
afterward, choking with rapture, reported to the Duma: “We could not
finish our farewells. They kissed our hands and feet.” This deputy
thought that the Duma had an immense authority in the army. What had
authority in the army was the revolution. And it was the revolution that
threw this blinding reflection on various accidental figures.

The symbolic cleansing carried out by Guchkov in the upper circles of
the army – the removal of a few score of generals – gave no satisfaction
to the soldiers, and at the same time created a state of uncertainty
among the high officers. Each one was afraid that he would lose his
place. The majority swam with the current, spoke softly and clenched
their fists in their pockets. It was still worse with the middle and
lower officers, who came face to face with the soldiers. Here there was
no governmental cleansing at all. Seeking a legal method, the soldiers
of one artillery battery wrote to the Executive Committee and the State
Duma about their commander: “Brothers, we humbly request you to remove
our domestic enemy, Vanchekhaza.” Receiving no answer to such petitions,
the soldiers would employ what means they had: disobedience, crowding
out, even arrest. Only after that the command would wake up, remove the
arrested or assaulted officer, sometimes trying to punish the soldiers,
but oftener leaving them unpunished in order to avoid complicating
things. This created an intolerable situation for the officers, and yet
gave no clear definition to the situation of the soldiers.

Even many fighting officers, those who seriously cared about the fate of
the army, insisted upon the necessity of a general clean-up of the
commanding staff. Without that, they said, it is useless to think of
reviving the fighting ability of the troops. The soldiers presented to
the deputies of the Duma no less convincing arguments. Formerly, they
said, when they had a grievance, they had to complain to the officers,
who ordinarily paid no attention to their complaint. And what were they
to do now? The officers were the same – the fate of their complaints
would be the same. “It was very difficult to answer that question,” a
deputy confesses. But nevertheless that question contained the whole
fate of the army and fore-ordained its future.

It would be a mistake to represent the state of affairs in the army as
homogeneous throughout the country in all kinds of troops and all
regiments. The variation was very considerable. While the sailors of the
Baltic fleet responded to the first news of the revolution by killing
officers, right beside them in the garrison at Helsingfors the officers
were occupying a leading position in the soldiers’ soviet by the
beginning of April, and here an imposing general was speaking at
celebrations in the name of the Social Revolutionaries. There were many
such contrasts between hate and trustfulness. But nevertheless the army
was like a system of communicating vessels, and the political mood of
the soldiers and sailors gravitated towards a single level.

Discipline was maintained somehow while the soldiers were counting on a
quick and decisive change. “But when the soldiers saw,” to quote a
delegate from the front, “that everything remained as before – the same
oppression, slavery, ignorance, the same insults – an agitation began.”
Nature, who was not thoughtful enough to arm the majority of men with
rhinoceros skin, also endowed the soldier with a nervous system.
Revolutions serve to remind us from time to time of this carelessness on
the part of nature.

In the rear as well as at the front, accidental pretexts easily led to
conflicts. The soldiers were given the right to attend theatres,
meetings, concerts, etc., “equally with all citizens.” Many soldiers
interpreted this as a right to attend theatres free. The ministry
explained that “freedom” was to be understood in a speculative sense.
But a people in insurrection has never shown any inclination towards
Platonism or Kantianism.

The worn-out tissue of discipline broke through in various ways at
different times, in different garrisons, and in different regiments. A
commander would often think that everything had gone well in his
regiment until certain newspapers appeared, or until the arrival of some
outside agitator. It was all really the work of deep inexorable forces.

The liberal deputy Yanushkevich came back from the front with a
generalisation – that the disorganisation is worst of all in the “green”
troops composed of muzhiks. “In the more revolutionary regiments the
soldiers are getting along very well with the officers.” As a matter of
fact discipline rested for the most part on two foundations: the
privileged cavalry made up of well-off peasants, and the artillery or
technical branch in general with a high percentage of workers and
intellectuals. The land-owning Cossacks held out longest of all,
dreading an agrarian revolution in which the majority of them would
lose, and not gain. More than once after the revolution individual
Cossack divisions carried out punitive operations, but in general these
differences were merely in the date and tempo of disintegration.

The blind struggle had its ebbs and flows. The officers would try to
adapt themselves; the soldiers would again begin to bide their time. But
during this temporary relief, during these days and weeks of truce, the
social hatred which was decomposing the army of the old régime would
become more and more intense. Oftener and oftener it would flash out in
a kind of heat lightning. In Moscow, in one of the amphitheatres, a
meeting of invalids was called, soldiers and officers together. An
orator-cripple began to cast aspersions on the officers. A noise of
protest arose, a stamping of shoes, canes, crutches. “And how long ago
were you, Mr. Officer, insulting the soldiers with lashes and fists?”
These wounded, shell-shocked, mutilated people stood like two walls, one
facing the other. Crippled soldiers against crippled officers, the
majority against the minority, crutches against crutches. That nightmare
scene in the amphitheatre foreshadowed the ferocity of the coming civil
war.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Above all these fluctuations and contradictions in the army and in the
country, one eternal question was hanging, summed up in the short word,
war. From the Baltic to the Black Sea, from the Black Sea to the Caspian
and beyond into the depths of Persia, on an immeasurable front, stood
sixty-eight corps of infantry and nine of cavalry. What should happen to
them further? What was to be done with the war?

In the matter of military supplies the army had been considerably
strengthened before the revolution. Domestic production for its needs
had increased, and likewise the importation of War material through
Murmansk and Archangel – especially artillery from the Allies. Rifles,
cannon, cartridges, were on hand in incomparably greater quantities than
during the first years of the war. New infantry divisions were in
process of organisation. The engineering corps had been enlarged. On
this ground a number of the unhappy military chieftains attempted later
to prove that Russia had stood on the eve of victory, and that only the
revolution had prevented it. Twelve years before, Kuropatkin and
Linevich had asserted with as good a foundation that Witte prevented
them from cleaning up the Japanese. In reality Russia was farther from
victory in 1917 than at any other time. Along with the increase in
ammunition there appeared in the army toward the end of 1916 an extreme
lack of food supplies. Typhus and scurvy took more victims than the
fighting. The breakdown of transport alone cancelled all strategy
involving large-scale regroupings of the military mass. Moreover an
extreme lack of horses often condemned the artillery to inaction. But
the chief trouble was not even here; it was the moral condition of the
army that was hopeless. You might describe it by saying that the army as
an army no longer existed. Defeats, retreats, and the rottenness of the
ruling group had utterly undermined the troops. You could no more
correct that with administrative measures, than you could change the
nervous system of the country. The soldier now looked at a heap of
cartridges with the same disgust that he would at a pile of wormy meat;
the whole thing seemed to him unnecessary and good for nothing; a deceit
and a thievery. And his officer could say nothing convincing to him,
couldn’t even make up his mind to crack him on the jaw. The officer
himself felt deceived by the higher command, and moreover not
infrequently ashamed before the soldiers for his own superiors. The army
was incurably sick. It was still capable of speaking its word in the
revolution, but so far as making war was concerned, it did not exist.
Nobody believed in the success of the war, the officers as little as the
soldiers. Nobody wanted to fight any more, neither the army nor the
people.

To be sure, in the high chancelleries, where a special kind of life is
lived, they were still chattering, through mere inertia, about great
operations, about the spring offensive, the capture of the Dardanelles.
In the Crimea they even got ready a big army for this latter purpose. It
stood in the bulletins that the best element of the army had been
designated for the siege. They sent the regiments of the guard from
Petrograd. However, according to the account of an officer who began
drilling them on the 25th of February – two days before the revolution –
these reinforcements turned out to be indescribably bad. Not the
slightest desire to fight was to be seen in those imperturbable blue,
hazel and grey eyes. “All their thoughts and their aspirations were for
one thing only – peace.”

There is no lack of such testimony. The revolution merely brought to the
surface what already existed. The slogan “Down with the war!” became for
that reason one of the chief slogans of the February days. It came from
demonstrations of women, from the workers of the Vyborg quarter, from
the regiments of the Guard. Early in March when deputies from the Duma
made a tour of the front, the soldiers, especially the older ones, would
continually ask them: “What are they saying about the land?” The
deputies answered evasively that the land question would be decided by
the Constituent Assembly. But here would sound out a voice betraying the
hidden thought of everybody: “Well, as for the land, if I’m not here,
you know, I won’t need it.” Such was the original soldier programme of
revolution: first peace, and then the land.

Toward the end of March at the All-Russian Conference of Soviets, where
there was a good deal of patriotic bragging, one of the delegates
representing the soldiers in the trenches reported very sincerely how
the front received the news of the revolution: “All the soldiers said,
‘Thank God! Maybe now we will have peace!’” The trenches instructed the
delegate to tell the conference “We are ready to lay down our lives for
freedom, but just the same, Comrades, we want an end of the war.” That
was the living voice of reality – especially the latter half of it. We
will wait a while if we have to, but you up there at the top, hurry
along with the peace.

The czar’s troops in France in a completely unnatural atmosphere – being
moved by the same feelings, passed through the same stages of
disintegration. “When we heard that the czar had abdicated,” an
illiterate middle-aged peasant soldier explained to his officer, “we all
thought it meant that the war was over ... The czar sent us to war, and
what is the use of freedom if I have got to rot in the trenches again?”
That was the genuine soldier philosophy of the revolution – not brought
in from the outside. No agitator could think up those simple and
convincing words.

The liberals and the half-liberal socialists tried afterwards to
represent the revolution as a patriotic uprising. On the 2nd of March,
Miliukov explained to the French journalists: “The Russian revolution
was made in order to remove the obstacles on Russia’s road to victory.”
Here hypocrisy goes hand-in-hand with self-deceit – the hypocrisy
somewhat the larger of the two. The candid reactionaries saw things
clearer. Von Struve, a German Pan-Slavist, a Lutheran Greek Orthodox,
and a Marxian monarchist, better defined the actual sources of the
revolution, although in the language of reactionary hatred. “In so far
as the popular, and especially the soldier, masses took part in the
revolution, it was not a patriotic explosion, but a riotous
self-demobilisation, and was directed straight against a prolongation of
the War. That is, it was made in order to stop the War.”

Along with a true thought, those words contain also a slander. The
riotous demobilisation was growing as a matter of fact right out of the
war. The revolution did not create, but on the contrary checked it.
Deserting, extraordinarily frequent on the eve of the revolution, was
very infrequent in the first weeks after. The army was waiting. In the
hope that the revolution would give peace, the soldier did not refuse to
put a shoulder under the front: Otherwise, he thought, the new
government won’t be able to conclude a peace.

“The soldiers are definitely expressing the opinion,” reports the chief
of the Grenadier Division on the 23rd of March, “that we can only defend
ourselves and not attack.” Military reports and political speeches
repeat this thought in various forms. Ensign Krylenko, an old
revolutionist and a future commander-in-chief under the Bolsheviks,
testified that for the soldier the war question was settled in those
days with this formula: “Support the front, but don’t join the
offensive.” In a more solemn but wholly sincere language, that meant:
defend freedom.

“We mustn’t stick our bayonets in the ground!” Under the influence of
obscure and contradictory moods the soldiers those days frequently
refused even to listen to the Bolsheviks. They thought perhaps,
impressed by certain unskilful speeches, that the Bolsheviks were not
concerned with the defence of revolution and might prevent the
government from concluding peace. The social patriotic papers and
agitators more and more cultivated this idea among the soldiers. But
even though sometimes preventing the Bolsheviks from speaking, the
soldiers from the very first days decisively rejected the idea of an
offensive. To the politicians of the capital this seemed some kind of a
misunderstanding which could be removed with appropriate pressure. The
agitation for war reached extraordinary heights. The bourgeois press in
millions of issues portrayed the problems of the revolution in the light
of “War to complete victory.” The Compromisers hummed the same tune – at
first under their breath, then more boldly. The influence of the
Bolsheviks, very weak in the army at the moment of the revolution,
became even weaker when thousands of workers who had been banished to
the front for striking left its ranks. The desire for peace thus found
no open and clear expression exactly where it was most intense. This
situation made it possible for the commanders and commissars, who were
looking round for comforting illusions, to deceive themselves about the
actual state of affairs. In the articles and speeches of those times it
is frequently asserted that the soldiers declined the offensive because
they did not correctly understand the formula “without annexations or
indemnities.” The Compromisers spared no effort to explain that
defensive warfare permits taking the offensive, and sometimes even
requires it. As though that scholastic question were at issue! An
offensive meant re-opening the war. A waiting support of the front meant
armistice. The soldiers’ theory and practice of defensive warfare was a
form of silent, and later indeed of quite open, agreement with the
Germans: “Don’t touch us and we won’t touch you.” More than that the
army had nothing to give to the war.

The soldiers were still less open to warlike persuasions because, under
the form of preparation for an offensive, reactionary officers were
obviously trying to get the reins in their hands. In the soldiers’
conversation appeared the phrase: “Bayonet for the Germans, butt for the
inside enemy.” The bayonet, however, had here a defensive significance.
The soldiers in the trenches never thought of the Dardanelles. The
desire for peace was a mighty underground current which must soon break
out on the surface.

Although he did not deny that negative signs were “to be observed” in
the army, Miliukov tried for a long time after the revolution to assert
that the army was capable of fulfilling the tasks laid out for it by the
Entente. “The Bolshevik propaganda,” he writes in his character of
historian, “by no means immediately reached the front. For the first
month or month and-a-half after the revolution the army remained
healthy.” He approaches the whole question at the level of propaganda,
as though that exhausts the historic process. Under the form of a
belated struggle against Bolsheviks, to whom he attributes veritably
mystic powers, Miliukov carries on his struggle against facts. We have
already seen how the army looked in reality. Let us see how the
commanders themselves appraised its fighting capacity in the first
weeks, and even days, after the revolution.

On March 6 the commander-in-chief of the northern front, General Ruszky,
informs the Executive Committee that a complete insubordination of the
soldiers is beginning, popular personalities must be sent to the front
in order to introduce some sort of tranquillity into the army.

The chief of the staff of the Black Sea fleet says in his memoirs: “From
the first days of the revolution it was clear to me that it was
impossible to wage war, and that the war was lost.” Kolchak, according
to him, was of the same opinion, and if he remained at his post as
commander at the front, it was merely to defend the staff officers
against violence.

Count Ignatiev, who occupied a high command in the Imperial Guard, wrote
to Nabokov in March: “You must clearly understand that the war is
finished, that we can’t and won’t fight any longer. Intelligent people
ought to be thinking up a way to liquidate the war painlessly, otherwise
there will be a catastrophe ...” Guchkov told Nabokov at the same time
that he was receiving such letters by the thousand. Certain
superficially more hopeful reports, rare enough in any case, were mostly
contradicted by their own supplementary explanations. “The desire of the
troops for victory remains,” says the commander of the 2nd Army,
Danilov. “In some regiments it is even stronger.” But just here he adds:
“Discipline has fallen off ... It would be well to postpone offensive
action until the situation quiets down (say one to three months).” And
then an unexpected supplement: “Only 50 per cent of the reinforcements
are arriving. If they continue to melt away in the future, and are
equally undisciplined, we cannot count on the success of the offensive.”

“Our Division is fully capable of defensive action,” reports the valiant
commander of the 51st Infantry Division, and immediately adds: “It is
necessary to rescue the army from the influence of the Soldiers’ and
Workers’ Deputies.” That, however, was not so easy to do.

The chief of the 182nd Division reports to the commander of the corps:
“With every day misunderstandings are increasing, essentially about
trifles, but ominous in their character. The soldiers are increasingly
nervous, and the officers still more so.”

This is so far only scattered testimony, although there is much of it.
But on the 18th of March there was held at staff head-quarters a
conference of high officers on the condition of the army. The conclusion
of the central organs of command was unanimous: “It will be impossible
to send troops to the front in sufficient numbers to replace the losses,
for there is unrest among all the reserves. The army is sick. It will
probably take two or three months to adjust the relations between
officers and soldiers.” The generals did not understand that the disease
could only progress. For the present they observed a decline of spirits
among the officers, agitation among the troops, and a considerable
tendency to desert. “The fighting capacity of the army is lowered, and
it is difficult at present to rely on the possibility of an advance.”
Conclusion: “It is now impossible to carry into execution the active
operations indicated for the spring.”

In the weeks following, the situation continues to get worse and similar
testimony is endlessly multiplied. Late in March the commander of the
5th Army, General Dragomirov, wrote to General Ruszky: “The fighting
spirit has declined. Not only is there no desire among the soldiers to
take the offensive, but even a simple stubbornness on the defensive has
decreased to a degree threatening the success of the war ... Politics,
which has spread through all the layers of the army, has made the whole
military mass desire only one thing – to end the war and go home.”

General Lukomsky, one of the pillars of the reactionary staff,
dissatisfied with the new order, took over the command of a corps and
found, as he tells us, that discipline remained only in the artillery
and engineering division in which there were many officers and soldiers
of the regular army. “As for the three infantry divisions, they were all
on the road to complete disintegration.”

Deserting, which had decreased after the revolution under the influence
of hope, increased again under the influence of disappointment. In one
week, from the 1st to the 7th of April, according to the report of
General Alexeiev, approximately 8,000 soldiers deserted from the
northern and western fronts. “I read with the utmost astonishment,” he
wrote to Guchkov, “the irresponsible reports as to the ’excellent’
temper of the army, What is the use? It will not deceive the Germans,
and for us it is a fatal self-deception.”

So far, it is well to note, there is hardly a reference to the
Bolsheviks. The majority of officers had hardly learned that strange
name. When they raised the question of the causes of the army’s
disintegration, it was newspapers, agitators, soviets, “politics” in
general – in a word, the February revolution.

You still could find individual officer-optimists who hoped that
everything would turn out all right. There were still more who
intentionally shut their eyes to the facts, in order not to cause
unpleasantness to the new government. On the other hand a considerable
number, especially of the highest officers, consciously exaggerated the
signs of disintegration in order to get from the government some
decisive action, which they themselves, however, were not quite ready to
call by name. But the fundamental picture is indubitable. Finding the
army sick, the revolution clothed the inexorable process of its decline
in political forms which became more cruelly definite from week to week.
The revolution carried to its logical end not only the passionate thirst
for peace, but also the hostility of the soldier mass to the commanding
staff and to the ruling classes in general.

In the middle of April, Alexeiev made a personal report to the
government on the mood of the army, in which he evidently did not
hesitate to lay on colours. “I well remember,” writes Nabokov, “what a
feeling of awe and hopelessness seized me.” We may assume that Miliukov
was present during that report, which must have occurred in the first
six weeks after the revolution. More likely indeed it was he who had
summoned Alexeiev with the desire of frightening his colleagues, and
through their mediation, his friends the socialists.

Guchkov actually had a conversation after that with the representatives
of the Executive Committee. “A ruinous fraternisation has begun,” he
complained. “Cases of direct insubordination are reported. Orders are
talked over in army organisations and at general meetings before being
carried out. In such and such regiments they wouldn’t even hear of
active operations. When people are hoping that peace will come tomorrow”
– Guchkov added, wisely enough – “you can’t expect them to give up their
lives today.” From this the War Minister drew the conclusion: “We must
stop talking out loud about peace.” But since the revolution was just
what had taught people to say out loud what they were formerly thinking
in silence, this meant stop the revolution.

The soldier, of course, from the very first day of the war, did not want
either to die or to fight. But he did not want this just the way an
artillery horse does not want to drag a heavy gun through the mud. Like
the horse, he never thought that he might get rid of the load they had
hitched to him. There was no connection between his will and the events
of the war. The revolution showed him that connection. For millions of
soldiers the revolution meant the right to a personal life, and first of
all the right to life in general, the right to protect their lives from
bullets and shells, and by the same token their faces from the officers’
fists. In this sense it was said above, that the fundamental
psychological process taking place in the army was the awakening of
personality. In this volcanic eruption of individualism, which often
took anarchistic forms, the educated classes saw only treachery to the
nation. But as a matter of fact in the stormy speeches of the soldiers,
in their intemperate protests, even in their bloody excesses, a nation
was merely beginning to form itself out of impersonal prehistoric raw
material. This flood of mass individualism, so hateful to the
bourgeoisie, was due to the very character of the February revolution,
to the fact that it was a bourgeois revolution.

But that was not its only content, either. For besides the peasant and
his soldier son, the worker took part in this revolution. The worker had
long ago felt himself a personality, and he entered into the war not
only with hatred of it, but also with the thought of struggling against
it. The revolution meant only the naked fact of conquering, but also the
partial triumph of his ideas. The overthrow of the monarchy was for him
only a first step, and he did not pause on it but hastened toward other
goals. The whole question for him was, how much farther would the
soldier and peasant go with him? What good is the land to me if I won’t
be there? asked the soldier. What good is freedom to me, he repeated
after the worker before the closed doors of the theatre, if the keys to
freedom are in the hand of the master? Thus across the immeasurable
chaos of the February revolution, the steely gleams of October were
already visible.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. “Glad to try, your excellency,” was the customary reply to an order
in the old army.

2. “Just so,” “in no wise,” and “I cannot know,” instead of “yes,” “no,”
and “I don’t know” are translations of the examples give by the author
of this idiom. [_Trans._]



CHAPTER 14 THE RULING GROUP AND THE WAR


 

What did the Provisional Government and the Executive Committee intend
to do with this war and this army?

First of all it is necessary to understand the policy of the liberal
bourgeoisie, since they played the leading rôle. In external appearance
the war policy of liberalism remained aggressive-patriotic,
annexationist, irreconcilable. In reality it was self-contradictory,
treacherous, and rapidly becoming defeatist.

“Even if there had been no revolution,” wrote Rodzianko later, “the war
would have been lost just the same, and in all probability a separate
peace signed.” Rodzianko’s views were not distinguished by independence,
and for that reason ably typify the average opinions of liberally
conservative circles. The mutiny of the battalions of the Guard foretold
to the possessing classes not victory abroad but defeat at home. The
liberals were the less able to deceive themselves about this, because
they had foreseen, and to the best of their ability struggled against,
this danger. The unexpected revolutionary optimism of Miliukov –
declaring the revolution a step towards victory – was in reality the
last resort of desperation. The question of war and peace had almost
ceased for the liberals to be an independent question. They felt that
they would not be able to use the revolution for the purposes of war,
and so much the more imperative became their other task: to use the war
against the revolution.

Problems concerning the international situation of Russia after the war,
debts and new loans, the capital market and the sales market, of course
still confronted the leaders of the Russian bourgeoisie; but these
questions did not directly determine their policy. The concern of the
moment was not to secure advantageous international conditions for
bourgeois Russia, but to save the bourgeois régime itself, even at the
price of Russia’s further enfeeblement. “First we must recover,” said
this heavily wounded class. “After that we will put things in order.”
But to recover meant to put down the revolution.

To keep up the war hypnosis and the mood of chauvinism was the only
possible way the bourgeoisie could maintain their hold upon the masses –
especially upon the army – against the so-called “deepeners” of the
revolution. The problem was to sell to the people an old war which had
been inherited from czarism, with all its former aims and allies, as a
new war in defence of the conquests and hopes of the revolution. That
would be something of an achievement. But how achieve it? The liberals
firmly expected to direct against the revolution that whole organisation
of patriotic social opinion which they had been using yesterday against
the Rasputin clique. Since they had failed to save the monarchy, the
highest court of appeal against the people, so much the more must they
hold fast to the Allies. In time of war at any rate, the Entente was a
far more powerful court of appeal than their own monarchy could be.

A prolongation of war would justify them in preserving the old military
bureaucratic apparatus, postponing the Constituent Assembly,
subordinating the revolutionary country to the front – that is, to the
commanding staff acting in unison with the liberal bourgeoisie. All
domestic questions, especially the agrarian, and all social legislation,
were to be postponed until the end of the war – which in turn was to be
postponed until a victory in which the liberals did not believe. A war
to exhaust the enemy was thus converted into a war to exhaust the
revolution. This was not perhaps a completed plan, thought-up in advance
and talked over in official meetings. But that was unnecessary. The plan
flowed inevitably from the whole preceding policy of liberalism and the
situation created by the revolution.

Compelled to choose the path of war, Miliukov could not of course refuse
in advance to participate in the division of the booty. The Allied hopes
of victory remained very real, and indeed with the entrance of America
into the war had grown immensely stronger. To be sure, the Entente was
one thing and Russia another. The leaders of the Russian bourgeoisie had
learned during the war that, in view of the economic and military
weakness of Russia, a victory of the Entente over the Central Empires
would also mean a victory over Russia. For whatever might happen, Russia
could only come out of the war broken and weakened. But the liberal
imperialists quite consciously decided to close their eyes to this
prospect. There was really nothing else for them to do. Guchkov frankly
stated to his circle that only a miracle could save Russia, and that his
programme as War Minister was to hope for a miracle. For domestic
purposes Miliukov needed the myth of victory. It does not matter how
much he himself believed in it. At any rate, he stubbornly asserted that
Constantinople must be ours. In this he acted with his usual cynicism.
On the 20th of March this Russian Minister of Foreign Affairs tried to
persuade the Allied ambassadors to betray Serbia in order by this means
to purchase the treason of Bulgaria to the Central Empires. The French
ambassador wrinkled his nose. Miliukov, however, insisted upon the
“necessity of abandoning sentimental considerations in this matter,”
abandoning at the same time that Neo-Slavism which he had been preaching
ever since the defeat of the first revolution. Engels was right when he
wrote to Bernstein as early as 1882: “What does all this Russian
Pan-Slavic charlatanism amount to? The seizure of Constantinople and
nothing more.”

The charge of being Germanophile, even of being bribed by the Germans –
directed yesterday against a court camarilla – was now directed with
venom against the revolution. Bolder, louder, more insolent day by day,
this note resounded in the speeches and articles of the Kadet Party.
Before capturing the Turkish waters, liberalism was going to dirty the
springs and poison the wells of the revolution.

By no means all the liberal leaders took an irreconcilable position, at
least immediately after the revolution, on the question of war. Many
were still in the pre-revolutionary mood, contemplating the prospect of
a separate peace. Certain leading Kadets told about this afterwards with
complete frankness. Nabokov, according to his own confession, was
already talking with members of the government about a separate peace on
the 7th of March. Several members of the Kadet centre tried collectively
to demonstrate to their leaders the impossibility of continuing the war.
“Miliukov with his usual cold precision explained,” says Baron Nolde,
“that the aims of the war must be achieved.” General Alexeiev, at that
time drawing near to the Kadet Party, joined his voice with Miliukov’s,
asserting that “the army could be revived.” That staff organiser of
calamities apparently felt called to revive it.

A good many of the liberals and democrats, a little more naïve,
misunderstood Miliukov of course, and thought him a very knight of
loyalty to the Allies, the Don Quixote of the Entente. What nonsense!
After the Bolsheviks seized the power, Miliukov did not hesitate one
second to hurry down to Kiev, then occupied by the Germans, and offer
his services to the Hohenzollern government – which, to be sure, was in
no hurry to accept them. Miliukov’s immediate goal in this was to secure
for the purpose of his struggle with the Bolsheviks that same German
gold with whose spectre he had earlier tried to befoul the revolution.
Miliukov’s appeal to Germany in 1918 seemed to many liberals just as
incomprehensible as his programme of shattering Germany in the first
months of 1917. But these were merely two sides of the same medal. In
preparing to betray the Allies – as formerly he tried to betray Serbia –
Miliukov did not betray himself nor his class. He was pursuing the same
policy, and it was not his fault if it didn’t look nice. In feeling out
under czarism the path to a separate peace in order to avoid revolution;
in demanding war to complete victory in order to stop the February
revolution when it came; in seeking an alliance with the Hohenzollerns
in order to overthrow the October revolution – in all this Miliukov
remained true to the interests of the possessing classes. If he did not
succeed in helping them, but only butted his head each time into a new
wall, that is merely because his patrons were in a blind alley. What
Miliukov especially needed in the first days after the uprising was an
enemy attack, a good German crack over the skull for the revolution.
Unfortunately for him, March and April were inauspicious from a climatic
point of view for large operations on the Russian front. And more
important, the Germans, whose own situation was getting more and more
difficult, decided after some hesitation to leave the Russian revolution
to its own inner course. General Lisingen alone showed some private
initiative at the Stokhod, the 20th and 21st of March. His success
simultaneously frightened the German, and delighted the Russian
governments. The staff, with the same shamelessness with which under the
czar it had exaggerated every trivial success, now exaggerated this
defeat on the Stokhod. And the liberal press took up the cry. They
described examples of weakness, panic, and loss in the Russian troops
with the same gusto with which they had formerly described war-prisoners
and trophies. The bourgeoisie and the general staff had quite plainly
gone over to the defeatist position. But Lisingen was stopped by his
superior officers, and the front again stood stock-still in spring mud
and expectation.

The device of using the war against the revolution had a chance of
success only if the intermediate parties, whom the popular masses
followed, agreed to play the part of transmitting mechanism for this
liberal policy. Liberalism was not in a position to unite the idea of
war with the idea of revolution; only yesterday it had been preaching
that a revolution would be ruinous to the war. This task must be turned
over to the democrats. But of course the “secret” must not be revealed
to them. They must not be initiated into the scheme, but taken with a
hook. The best way to take them was through their prejudices, their
vanity, their high opinion of their own statesmanlike intelligence,
their fear of anarchy, their superstitious bowing down to the
bourgeoisie.

In the first days the socialists – for brevity we will use this name for
both Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries – did not know what to do
with the war. Cheidze heaved a sigh: “We have been talking against war
all the time – how can I now advocate continuing the war?” On March 10
the Executive Committee voted to send a greeting to Franz Mehring.[1]
With this little gesture, the left wing tried to quiet its not very
active socialist conscience. Upon the war itself the Soviet continued to
say nothing. The leaders were afraid they might stir up a conflict with
the Provisional Government on this subject, and darken those honeymoon
weeks of “contact.” They were no less afraid of a split in their own
ranks. They had both defenders of the Fatherland and Zimmerwaldists
among them. Each of these groups overestimated their differences. Wide
circles of the revolutionary intelligentsia had undergone a deep
bourgeois metamorphosis during the war. Patriotism, open or disguised,
had united the intelligentsia with the ruling classes, drawing them away
from the masses. The banner of Zimmerwald with which the left wing had
covered themselves did not bind them to anything much, and it did permit
them to keep hidden their patriotic solidarity with the Rasputin clique.
But now the Romanov régime was overthrown. Russia had become a
democratic country. Her freedom, dancing in all colours, stood out
sharply on the background of well-policed Europe with her military
dictatorships. “Must we not defend our revolution against the
Hohenzollern?” exclaimed both the old and the new patriots at the head
of the Executive Committee. Zimmerwaldists of the type of Sukhanov and
Steklov diffidently pointed out that the war remained imperialist, that
the liberals were insisting that the revolution guarantee the
annexations agreed on under the czar. “How can I now advocate continuing
the war?” says the worried Cheidze. But since these Zimmerwaldists were
themselves the initiators of the transfer of power to the liberals,
their objection to the liberal policy merely hung in the air. After some
weeks of wavering and obstruction the first part of Miliukov’s plan was,
with the help of Tseretelli, decided in a satisfactory manner: these
half-hearted democrats calling themselves socialists were hitched up in
the war harness, and under the whip of the liberals tried with all their
tiny strength to guarantee victory – the victory of the Entente over
Russia and of America over Europe!

The chief function of the Compromisers was to short circuit the
revolutionary energy of the masses into patriotic wires. They tried on
the one hand to revive the fighting capacity of the army – that was
difficult. They tried on the other hand to induce the governments of the
Entente to renounce their prospective robberies – that was ludicrous. In
both efforts they passed from illusion to disappointment, from error to
humiliation. Let us note the first signposts on this road.

In the brief hours of his grandeur, Rodzianko succeeded in publishing an
order for the immediate return of the soldiers to their barracks, and
their subordination to the officers. The indignation this caused in the
garrison compelled the Soviet to dedicate one of its first sessions to
the question of the future of the soldier. In the heated atmosphere of
those hours, in the chaos of those sessions like mass meetings, and at
the direct dictation of the soldiers whom the absent leaders could not
restrain, there was born the famous _Order No.1_ – the single worthy
document of the February revolution, a charter of the freedom of the
revolutionary army. Its bold paragraphs, giving the soldiers an
organisational mode of entry to the new highway, declare: that elective
committees shall be formed in all military regiments; soldiers’ deputies
shall be elected to the Soviet; in all political acts the soldiers shall
submit to the Soviet and its committees; weapons shall be in the control
of the regimental and battalion committees, and shall “in no case be
given up to the officer”; on duty, the severest military discipline –
off duty, complete citizens’ rights; saluting off duty and titling of
officers, are abolished; uncivil treatment of soldiers is forbidden, and
particularly addressing them as _thou_ ... Such were the inferences
drawn by the Petrograd soldiers from their participation in the
revolution. Could they have been other? Nobody dared to oppose them.
During the preparation of this “order” the leaders of the Soviet were
distracted by more lofty business – they were conducting negotiations
with the liberals. That gave them an alibi later when they had to
justify themselves before the bourgeoisie and the commanding staff.
Simultaneously with _Order No.1_, the Executive Committee – having
hastily pulled itself together – sent to the printer, by way of
antidote, an appeal to the soldiers, which, under the pretext of
condemning lynch law for officers, demanded the soldiers’ subordination
to the old commanding staff. The typesetters simply refused to set up
this document. Its democratic authors were beside themselves with
indignation: where are we headed for? It would be a mistake to imagine,
however, that the typesetters were longing for bloody reprisals upon
officers. The demand for subordination to the czarist commanding staff
on the second day after the revolution, seemed to them to be merely
opening the door to the counterrevolution. Of course the typesetters
exceeded their rights. But they did not feel themselves to be only
typesetters. It was a question, in their opinion, of the life of the
revolution.

In those first days, when both the soldiers and the workers were
intensely excited about the future of the officers who had returned to
their troops, the Mezhrayontsi, a Social Democratic organisation close
to the Bolsheviks, formulated this sore question with revolutionary
audacity. “In order that the aristocrats and officers shall not deceive
you,” said their appeal to the soldiers, “choose your own platoon,
company and regiment commanders, accept only those officers whom you
know to be friends of the people.” And what happened? This proclamation,
which adequately met the situation, was immediately confiscated by the
Executive Committee, and Cheidze in his speech called it an act of
provocateurs. The democrats, you see, were not in the least embarrassed
about limiting the freedom of the press when it came to dealing blows to
the left. Fortunately their own freedom was sufficiently limited, for
the workers and soldiers, although supporting the Executive Committee as
their highest organ, at all important moments corrected the policy of
the leadership by direct interference. Before two days passed, the
Executive Committee was trying by means of _Order No.2_ to annul the
first order, limiting its application to the Petrograd military
district. In vain. _Order No.1_ was indestructible it had not invented
anything, but merely affirmed and strengthened what had already come to
pass both in the rear and at the front, and was demanding recognition.
Even liberal deputies, when face to face with the soldiers, defended
themselves against questions and reproaches by referring to _Order
No.1_. But in the sphere of Big Politics, that audacious order became
the chief argument of the bourgeoisie against the Soviet. From that time
on, the beaten generals discovered in _Order No.1_ the chief obstacle
which had prevented them from crushing the German armies. Its origin was
even traced to Germany! The Compromisers never ceased to apologise for
what they had done, and bewildered the soldiers by trying to take away
with their right hand what their left hand had let slip.

Meanwhile in the Soviet the majority of rank-and-file deputies were
already demanding the election of officers. The democrats got excited.
Finding no better argument, Sukhanov tried to frighten the deputies with
the idea that the bourgeoisie, to whom they had turned over the power,
would not go this far. The democrats frankly hid behind Guchkov’s back.
In their scheme, the liberals occupied the same place which the monarchy
was to have occupied in the scheme of the liberals. “As I was returning
from the tribune to my place,” Sukhanov relates, “I ran into a soldier
who blocked my path, and shaking his fist in my face, angrily shouted
something about ‘gentlemen who have never been in a soldier’s skin.’”
After this “excess” our democrat, completely losing his equilibrium, ran
to find Kerensky, and only with the latter’s help was “the question
somehow smoothed over.” These people did nothing all the time but smooth
questions over.

For two weeks they succeeded in pretending that they had not noticed the
war. At last, however, a further postponement became impossible. On the
14th of March, the Executive Committee introduced into the Soviet the
project of a manifesto written by Sukhanov and addressed to “the people
of the whole world.” The liberal press soon named this document – which
united the right and left Compromisers – “Order No.1 in the sphere of
foreign policy.” But this flattering appraisal was just as false as the
document to which it referred. _Order No.1_ had been the honest answer
of the lower ranks themselves to the questions raised before the army by
the revolution. The manifesto of March 14 was the treacherous answer of
the upper ranks to the questions honestly presented to them by soldiers
and workers.

The manifesto of course expressed a desire for peace, and moreover a
democratic peace without annexations or indemnities. But long before the
February revolution, the Western imperialists had learned to make use of
that same phraseology. It was exactly in the name of a durable,
honourable, “democratic” peace, that Wilson was getting ready just at
that moment to go into the war. The pious Mr. Asquith had given to
Parliament a learned classification of annexations, from which it could
be unmistakably inferred that all those annexations were to be condemned
as immoral which conflicted with the interests of Great Britain. As for
French diplomacy, its very essence consisted in giving the most
liberating possible aspect to the greediness of the shopkeeper and
moneylender. The Soviet document, to which one cannot deny a rather
simple sincerity of motive, dropped with fatal perfection into the
well-worn rut of official French hypocrisy. The manifesto promised
“firmly to defend our own freedom” against foreign militarism. The
French social patriots had been occupied with just that business ever
since August 1914. “The hour has come for the people to take into their
own hands the decision about war and peace,” declares this manifesto,
whose authors, in the name of the Russian people, had just turned over
the decision of that question to the big bourgeoisie. The workers of
Germany and Austria-Hungary were summoned by the manifesto, “to refuse
to serve as an instrument of conquest and spoliation in the hands of
kings, landlords and bankers!” Those words are the quintessence of a lie
– for the leaders of the Soviet had no intention of breaking off their
own alliance with the kings of Great Britain and Belgium, with the
Emperor of Japan, with the landlords and bankers of their own and all
the countries of the Entente. While turning over the leadership of
foreign policy to Miliukov, who had been scheming not long before to
convert East Prussia into a Russian province, the leaders of the Soviet
summoned the German and Austro-Hungarian workers to follow the lead of
the Russian revolution. Their theatrical condemnation of slaughter
altered nothing: the Pope himself was doing that. With the help of
magniloquent phrases directed against the shadows of bankers, landlords
and kings, these Compromisers were converting the February revolution
into an instrument in the hands of real kings, landlords and bankers. In
his telegram of salutation to the Provisional Government, Lloyd George
had appraised the revolution as a proof that “the present war is in its
foundations a struggle for popular government and freedom.” The
manifesto of March 14 associated itself with Lloyd George “in its
foundations,” and gave invaluable aid to the war propaganda in America.
Miliukov’s paper was a thousand times right when it declared that “the
manifesto, although it began with so typical a note of pacifism,
developed an ideology essentially common to us and to all our allies.”
If the Russian liberals nevertheless at times fiercely attacked the
manifesto, and the French censorship would not let it through, that was
merely due to a fear of the interpretation which would be given it by
revolutionary but still trustful masses. Although written by
Zimmerwaldists, the manifesto signalised the victory of the patriotic
wing. The local soviets understood the signal. They pronounced the
slogan “war against war” unpermissible. Even in the Urals and in
Kostroma, where the Bolsheviks were strong, the patriotic manifesto
received unanimous approval. No wonder, when in the Petrograd Soviet
itself the Bolsheviks offered no resistance to this false document.

After a few weeks it became necessary to make partial payments on bills
of exchange. The Provisional Government issued a war loan, of course
called “liberty loan.” Tseretelli explained that since the government
“as a whole and in general” was fulfilling its obligations, the
democracy ought to support the loan. In the Executive Committee the
opposition captured more than a third of the votes. But at the plenum of
the Soviet (April 22) only 112 votes were cast against the loan out of
almost 2,000. From this the conclusion is sometimes drawn that the
Executive Committee was further to the left than the Soviet. But that is
not true. The Soviet was merely more honest than the Executive
Committee: if the war is in defence of the revolution, then you must
give money for the war, you must support the loan. The Executive
Committee was not more revolutionary, but more evasive. It lived on
ambiguities and reservations. It supported the government set up by
itself only “as a whole and in general,” and took the responsibility for
the war “in so far as.” These petty trickeries are alien to the masses.
Soldiers cannot fight “in so far as,” nor die “as a whole and in
general.”

In order to reinforce the victory of statesmanly thinking over wild
talk, General Alexeiev – who had been intending on March 5 to shoot all
“gangs” of propagandists – was on April 1 officially placed at the head
of the armed forces. From then on everything was in order. The inspirer
of the czarist foreign policy, Miliukov, was Minister of Foreign
Affairs; the leader of the army under the czar, Alexeiev, had become
commander-in-chief of the revolution. The succession was fully
re-established.

At the same time, however, the Soviet leaders felt compelled by the
logic of the situation to unravel the loops of the net they were
weaving. The official democracy mortally feared those officers whom they
tolerated and supported. They could not help opposing to them their own
authority, trying to find support for it among the rank-and-file
soldiers and make it as independent of the officers as possible. At the
session of March 6, the Executive Committee considered it advisable to
install its own commissars in all regiments and in all military
institutions. Thus was created a three way bond between the soldier and
the Soviet; the regiments sent their representatives to the Soviet; the
Executive Committee sent its commissars to the regiments; and finally at
the head of each regiment stood an elective committee, constituting a
sort of lower nucleus of the Soviet.

One of the principal duties of the commissars was to keep watch over the
political reliability of the staff and commanding officers. “The
democratic régime outdid in this respect the autocratic,” says Denikin
with indignation. And he boasts how cleverly his staff intercepted and
handed over to him the cipher-correspondence of the commissars with
Petrograd. To watch over monarchists and feudal lords what could be more
outrageous! To steal the correspondence of commissars with the
government is, of course, a different matter. But however things stood
in the field of morals, the internal situation in the ruling apparatus
of the army at that time is perfectly clear: each side was afraid of the
other and watching the other with hostility; they were united only by
their common fear of the soldier. Even the generals and admirals,
whatever further hopes and plans they may have had, saw clearly that
without a democratic smokescreen things would go badly with them. The
resolutions on committees in the fleet were drawn up by Kolchak. He
counted on strangling the committees in the future. But since it was
impossible for the present to take a single step without them, Kolchak
interceded with the staff to get them confirmed. Similarly General
Markov, one of the future White chieftains, sent to the ministry early
in April a plan for the institution of commissars to keep watch over the
loyalty of the commanding staff. Thus the “age-old laws of the army” –
that is, the traditions of military bureaucratism – went to pieces like
straws under the pressure of the revolution.

The soldiers approached the committees from the opposite angle, and
united around them against the commanding staff. And although the
committees did defend officers against the soldiers, this was only
within certain limits. The situation of an officer who came into
conflict with the committee became unbearable. Thus was created the
unwritten right of the soldiers to remove the commanders. On the western
front by the month of July, according to Denikin, sixty of the old
officers ranking from commander of a corps to commander of a regiment,
had gone. Similar removals had occurred within the regiments.

At that time a meticulous secretarial work was going on in the War
Ministry, in the Executive Committee, in the Contact Sessions, aiming to
create “reasonable” relations in the army, raise the authority of the
officers, and reduce the army committees to a secondary and mainly
economic rôle. But while the high-up leaders were thus cleaning away the
shadow of the revolution with the shadow of a broom, the committees were
actually developing into a powerful system ascending toward the
Petrograd Executive Committee and strengthening its organisational
control over the army. The Executive Committee used this control,
however, chiefly in order, through the commissars and committees, to
drag the army once more into the war. More and more the soldiers found
themselves pondering the question: how does it come about that
committees elected by us so often say, not what we think, but what our
officers want of us?

The trenches arc more and more frequently sending deputies to the
capital to find out how things stand. From the beginning of April this
movement of the soldiers from the front becomes continual. Every day
mass conversations are going on in the Tauride. Arriving soldiers are
stirring their heavy brains, trying to find their way among the
mysteries of the politics of an Executive Committee which cannot give a
clear answer to any single question. The army is ponderously moving over
to a Soviet position but only in order the more clearly to convince
itself of the bankruptcy of the Soviet leadership.

The liberals, not daring to oppose the Soviet openly, nevertheless tried
to carry on a struggle for the control of the army. Chauvinism, of
course, must serve as their political bond with the soldiers. The Kadet
minister Shingarev, in one of the conferences with the trench delegates,
defended the order of Guchkov against “unnecessary indulgence” towards
war-prisoners, and spoke of “German ferocity.” His remarks did not meet
with the slightest sympathy. The conference decisively expressed itself
in favour of relieving the conditions of the prisoners of war. These
were the same men whom the liberals had so casually accused of excesses
and ferocities. But the grey men from the front had their own criterion.
They considered it permissible to take vengeance on an officer for
insulting soldiers, but it seemed contemptible to them to avenge on a
captive German soldier the real or imagined ferocity of Ludendorff. The
Eternal Standards of Morality remained, alas, quite foreign to those
rough and lousy muzhiks.

Out of the attempt of the bourgeoisie to get control of the army there
arose a contest – which, however, never came to anything – between the
liberals and the Compromisers. It was at a congress of delegates from
the western front on the 7th-10th of April. This first congress of one
of the fronts was to be a decisive political test of the army, and both
sides sent to Minsk their best forces. From the Soviet: Tseretelli,
Cheidze, Skobelev, Gvozdev. From the bourgeoisie: Rodzianko himself, the
Kadet, Demosthenes Rodichev, and others. An intense feeling reigned in
the crowded hall of the Minsk theatre, and spread in ripples throughout
the town. The reports of the delegates painted a picture of the real
state of affairs. Fraternisation was going an along the whole front; the
soldiers were taking the initiative more and more boldly; the commanding
staff could not even think of repressive measures. What could the
liberals say here? Faced by this passionate audience, they at once gave
up the idea of opposing their own resolutions to those of the Soviet.
They confined themselves to a patriotic note in their speeches; of
greeting, and soon erased themselves entirely. The battle was won by the
democrats without a struggle. Their task was not to lead the masses
against the bourgeoisie, but to hold them back, The slogan of peace –
equivocally woven in with war for the defence of the revolution, in the
spirit of the manifesto of March 14 – ruled the congress. The Soviet
resolution on the war was adopted by 610 votes against 8, with 46
abstaining. The last hope of the liberals, that of opposing the front to
the rear, the army to the Soviet, went up in smoke. But the democratic
leaders returned from the congress more frightened than inspired by
their victory. They had seen the ghosts raised by the revolution and
they felt unable to cope with them.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Franz Mehring was one of the leaders, alongside Rosa Luxemburg and
Karl Liebknecht, of the revolutionary anti-war Spartacus League.



CHAPTER 15 THE BOLSHEVIKS AND LENIN


 

On the 3rd of April Lenin arrived in Petrograd from abroad. Only from
that moment does the Bolshevik Party begin to speak out loud, and, what
is more important, with its own voice.

For Bolshevism the first months of the revolution had been a period of
bewilderment and vacillation. In the “manifesto” of the Bolshevik
Central Committee, drawn up just after the victory of the insurrection,
we read that “the workers of the shops and factories, and likewise the
mutinied troops, must immediately elect their representatives to the
Provisional Revolutionary Government.” The manifesto was printed in the
official organ of the Soviet without comment or objection, as though the
question were a purely academic one. But the leading Bolsheviks
themselves also regarded their slogans as purely demonstrative. They
behaved not like representatives of a proletarian party preparing an
independent struggle for power, but like the left wing of a democracy,
which, having announced its principles, intended for an indefinite time
to play the part of loyal opposition.

Sukhanov asserts that at the sitting of the Executive Committee on March
1 the central question at issue was merely as to the conditions of the
handing over of power. Against the thing itself – the formation of a
bourgeois government – not one voice was raised, notwithstanding that
out of 39 members of the Executive Committee, 11 were Bolsheviks or
their adherents, and moreover three members of the Bolshevik centre,
Zalutsky, Shliapnikov and Molotov, were present at the sitting.

In the Soviet on the next day, according to the report of Shliapnikov
himself, out of 400 deputies present, only 19 voted against the transfer
of power to the bourgeoisie – and this although there were already 40 in
the Bolshevik faction. The voting itself passed off in a purely formal
parliamentary manner, without any clear counter-proposition from the
Bolsheviks, without conflict, and without any agitation whatever in the
Bolshevik press.

On the 4th of March the Bureau of the Bolshevik Central Committee
adopted a resolution on the counter-revolutionary character of the
Provisional Government, and the necessity of steering a course towards
the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry. The
Petrograd committee, rightly regarding this resolution as academic –
since it gave no directives for today’s action – approached the problem
from the opposite angle. “Taking cognisance of the resolution on the
Provisional Government adopted by the Soviet,” it announces that “it
will not oppose the power of the Provisional Government in so far as,”
etc. ... In essence this was the position of the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries – only moved back to the second line trenches. This
openly opportunist resolution of the Petrograd Committee contradicted
only in a formal way the resolution of the Central Committee, whose
academic character had meant nothing politically but putting up with an
accomplished fact.

This readiness to submit silently, or with reservations, to the
government of the bourgeoisie did not have by any means the entire
sympathy of the party. The Bolshevik workers met the Provisional
Government from the first as a hostile rampart unexpectedly grown up in
their path. The Vyborg Committee held meetings of thousands of workers
and soldiers, which almost unanimously adopted resolutions on the
necessity for a seizure of power by the soviets. An active participant
in this agitation, Dingelstedt, testifies: “There was not one meeting,
not one workers’ meeting, which would have voted down such a resolution
from us if there had only been somebody to present it.” The Mensheviks
and Social Revolutionaries were afraid in those first days to appear
openly before audiences of workers and soldiers with their formulation
of the question of power. A resolution of the Vyborg workers, in view of
its popularity, was printed and pasted up as a placard. But the
Petrograd Committee put an absolute ban upon this resolution, and the
Vyborg workers were compelled to submit.

On the question of the social content of the revolution and prospects of
its development, the position of the Bolshevik leadership was no less
cloudy. Shliapnikov recalls: “We agreed with the Mensheviks that we were
passing through the period of the breakdown of feudal relations, and
that in their place would appear all kinds of ‘freedoms’ proper to
bourgeois relations.” Pravda said in its first number: “The fundamental
problem is to establish a democratic republic.” In an instruction to the
workers’ deputies, the Moscow Committee announced: “The proletariat aims
to achieve freedom for the struggle for socialism, its ultimate goal.”
This traditional reference to the “ultimate goal” sufficiently
emphasises the historic distance from socialism. Farther than this
nobody ventured. The fear to go beyond the boundaries of a democratic
revolution dictated a policy of waiting, of accommodation, and of actual
retreat before the Compromisers.

It is easy to imagine how heavily this political character-lessness of
the centre influenced the provinces. We will confine ourselves to the
testimony of one of the Saratov organisations: “Our party after taking
an active part in the insurrection has evidently lost its influence with
the masses, and this has been caught up by the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries. Nobody knew what the slogans of the Bolsheviks were ...
It was a very unpleasant picture.”

The left Bolsheviks, especially the workers, tried with all their force
to break through this quarantine. But they did not know how to refute
the premise about the bourgeois character of the revolution and the
danger of an isolation of the proletariat. They submitted, gritting
their teeth, to the directions of the leaders. There were various
conflicting currents in Bolshevism from the very first day, but no one
of them carried its thoughts through to the end. Pravda reflected this
cloudy and unstable intellectual state of the party, and did not bring
any unity into it. The situation became still more complicated toward
the middle of March, after the arrival from exile of Kamenev and Stalin,
who abruptly turned the helm of official party policy to the right.

Although a Bolshevik almost from the very birth of Bolshevism, Kamenev
had always stood on the right flank of the party. Not without
theoretical foundations or political instinct, and with a large
experience of factional struggle in Russia and a store of political
observations made in Western Europe, Kamenev grasped better than most
Bolsheviks the general ideas of Lenin, but he grasped them only in order
to give them the mildest possible interpretation in practice. You could
not expect from him either independence of judgment or initiative in
action. A distinguished propagandist, orator, journalist, not brilliant
but thoughtful, Kamenev was especially valuable for negotiations with
other parties and reconnoitres in other social circles—although from
such excursions he always brought back with him a bit of some mood alien
to the party. These characteristics of Kamenev were so obvious that
almost nobody ever misjudged him as a political figure. Sukhanov remarks
in him an absence of “sharp corners.” “It is always necessary to lead
him on a tow-line,” he says. “He may resist a little, but not strongly.”
Stankevich writes to the same effect: Kamenev’s attitude to his enemies
“was so gentle that it seemed as though he himself were ashamed of the
irreconcilableness of his position; in the committee he was certainly
not an enemy but merely an opposition.” There is little to add to that.

Stalin was a totally different type of Bolshevik, both in his
psychological make-up and in the character of his party work: a strong,
but theoretically and politically primitive, organiser. Whereas Kamenev
as a publicist stayed for many years abroad with Lenin, where stood the
theoretical forge of the party, Stalin as a so-called “practical,”
without theoretical viewpoint, without broad political interests, and
without a knowledge of foreign languages, was inseparable from the
Russian soil. Such party workers appeared abroad only on short visits to
receive instructions, discuss their further problems, and return again
to Russia. Stalin was distinguished among the practicals for energy,
persistence, and inventiveness in the matter of moves behind the scenes.
Where Kamenev as a natural result of his character felt “embarrassed” by
the practical conclusions of Bolshevism, Stalin on the contrary was
inclined to defend the practical conclusions which he adopted without
any mitigation whatever, uniting insistence with rudeness.

Notwithstanding their opposite characters, it was no accident that
Kamenev and Stalin occupied a common position at the beginning of the
revolution: they supplemented each other. A revolutionary conception
without a revolutionary will is like a watch with a broken spring.
Kamenev was always behind the time – or rather beneath the tasks – of
the revolution. But the absence of a broad political conception condemns
the most wilful revolutionist to indecisiveness in the presence of vast
and complicated events. Stalin, the empiric, was open to alien
influences not on the side of will but on the side of intellect. Thus it
was that this publicist without decision, and this organiser without
intellectual horizon, carried Bolshevism in March 1917 to the very
boundaries of Menshevism. Stalin proved even less capable than Kamenev
of developing an independent position in the Executive Committee, which
he entered as a representative of the party. There is to be found in its
reports and its press not one proposal, announcement, or protest, in
which Stalin expressed the Bolshevik point of view in opposition to the
fawning of the “democracy” at the feet of liberalism. Sukhanov says in
his _Notes of the Revolution_: “Among the Bolsheviks, besides Kamenev,
there appeared in the Executive Committee in those days Stalin ...
During the time of his modest activity in the Executive Committee he
gave me the impression – and not only me – of a grey spot which would
sometimes give out a dim and inconsequential light. There is really
nothing more to be said about him.” Although Sukhanov obviously
underestimates Stalin as a whole, he nevertheless correctly describes
his political characterlessness in the Executive Committee of the
Compromisers.

On the 14th of March the manifesto “to the people of the whole world,”
interpreting the victory of the February revolution in the interests of
the Entente, and signifying the triumph of a new republican social
patriotism of the French stamp, was adopted by the Soviet unanimously.
That meant a considerable success for Kamenev and Stalin, but one
evidently attained without much struggle. _Pravda_ spoke of it as a
“conscious compromise between different tendencies represented in the
Soviet.” It is necessary to add that this compromise involved a direct
break with the tendency of Lenin, which was not represented in the
Soviet at all.

Kamenev, a member of the emigrant editorial staff of the central organ,
Stalin, a member of the Central Committee, and Muranov, a deputy in the
Duma who had also returned from Siberia, removed the old editors of
_Pravda_, who had occupied a too “left” position, and on the 15th of
March, relying on their somewhat problematical rights, took the paper
into their own hands. In the programme announcement of the new
editorship, it was declared that the Bolsheviks would decisively support
the Provisional Government “in so far as it struggles against reaction
or counter-revolution.” The new editors expressed themselves no less
categorically upon the question of war: While the German army obeys its
emperor, the Russian soldier must stand firmly at his post answering
bullet with bullet and shell with shell. “Our slogan is not the
meaningless ‘down with war.’ Our slogan is pressure upon the Provisional
Government with the aim of compelling it ... to make an attempt to
induce all the warring countries to open immediate negotiations ... and
until then every man remains at his fighting post!” Both the idea and
its formulation are those of the defensists. This programme of pressure
upon an imperialist government with the aim of “inducing” it to adopt a
peace-loving form of activity, was the programme of Kautsky in Germany,
Jean Longuet in France, MacDonald in England. It was anything but the
programme of Lenin, who was calling for the overthrow of imperialist
rule. Defending itself against the patriotic press, _Pravda_ went even
farther “All ‘defeatism,’” it said, “or rather what an undiscriminating
press protected by the czar’s censorship has branded with that name,
died at the moment when the first revolutionary regiment appeared on the
streets of Petrograd.” This was a direct abandonment of Lenin.
“Defeatism” was not invented by a hostile press under the protection of
a censorship, it was proclaimed by Lenin in the formula: “The defeat of
Russia is the lesser evil.” The appearance of the first revolutionary
regiment, and even the overthrow of the monarchy, did not alter the
imperialist character of the war. “The day of the first issue of the
transformed _Pravda_,” says Shliapnikov, “was a day of rejoicing for the
defensists. The whole Tauride Palace, from the business men in the
committee of the State Duma to the very heart of the revolutionary
democracy, the Executive Committee, was brimful of one piece of news:
the victory of the moderate and reasonable Bolsheviks over the
extremists. In the Executive Committee itself they met us with venomous
smiles ... When that number of _Pravda_ was received in the factories it
produced a complete bewilderment among the members of the party and its
sympathisers, and a sarcastic satisfaction among its enemies ... The
indignation in the party locals was enormous, and when the proletarians
found out that _Pravda_ had been seized by three former editors arriving
from Siberia they demanded their expulsion from the party.” _Pravda_ was
soon compelled to print a sharp protest from the Vyborg district: “If
the paper does not want to lose the confidence of the workers, it must
and will bring the light of revolutionary consciousness, no matter how
painful it may be, to the bourgeois owls.” These protests from below
compelled the editors to become more cautious in their expressions, but
did not change their policy. Even the first article of Lenin which got
there from abroad passed by the minds of the editors. They were steering
a rightward course all along the line. “In our agitation,” writes
Dingelstedt, a representative of the left wing, “we had to take up the
principle of the dual power ... and demonstrate the inevitability of
this roundabout road to that same worker and soldier mass which during
two weeks of intensive political life had been educated in a wholly
different understanding of its tasks.”

The policy of the party throughout the whole country naturally followed
that of _Pravda_. In many soviets resolutions about fundamental problems
were now adopted unanimously: the Bolsheviks simply bowed down to the
Soviet majority. At a conference of the soviets of the Moscow region the
Bolsheviks joined in the resolution of the social patriots on the war.
And finally at the All-Russian Conference of the representatives of 82
soviets at the end of March and the beginning of April, the Bolsheviks
voted for the official resolution on the question of power, which was
defended by Dan. This extraordinary political rapprochement with the
Mensheviks caused a widespread tendency towards unification. In the
provinces the Bolsheviks and Mensheviks entered into united
organisations. The Kamenev-Stalin faction was steadily converting itself
into a left flank of the so-called revolutionary democracy, and was
taking part in the mechanics of parliamentary “pressure” in the
_couloirs_ upon the bourgeoisie, supplementing this with a similar,
pressure upon the democracy.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The part of the Central Committee which lived abroad and the Central
Organ, _The Social Democrat_, had been the spiritual centre of the
party. Lenin, with Zinoviev as assistant, had conducted the whole work
of leadership. The most responsible secretarial duties were fulfilled by
Lenin’s wife, Krupskaia. In the practical work this small centre relied
upon the support of a few score of Bolshevik emigrants. During the war
their isolation from Russia became the more unbearable as the military
police of the Entente drew its circle tighter and tighter. The
revolutionary explosion they had so long and tensely awaited caught them
unawares. England categorically refused to the emigrant
internationalists, of whom she had kept a careful list, a visa to
Russia. Lenin was raging in his Zurich cage, seeking a way out. Among a
hundred plans that were talked over, one was to travel on the passport
of a deaf-and-dumb Scandinavian. At the same time Lenin did not miss any
chance to make his voice heard from Switzerland. On March 6 he
telegraphed through Stockholm to Petrograd: “Our tactic; absolute lack
of confidence; no support to the new government; suspect Kerensky
especially; arming of proletariat the sole guarantee; immediate
elections to the Petrograd Duma; no rapprochement with other parties.”
In this directive, only the suggestion about elections to the Duma
instead of the Soviet, had an episodic character and soon dropped out of
sight. The other points, expressed with telegraphic incisiveness, fully
indicate the general direction of the policy to be pursued. At the same
time Lenin begins to send to _Pravda_ his _Letters from Afar_ which,
although based upon fragments of foreign information constitute a
finished analysis of the revolutionary situation. The news in the papers
soon enabled him to conclude that the Provisional government, with the
direct assistance not only of Kerensky but of Cheidze, was not
unsuccessfully deceiving the workers, giving out the imperialist war for
a war of defence. On the 17th of March, through friends in Stockholm, he
wrote a letter filled with alarm. “Our party would disgrace itself for
ever, kill itself politically, if it took part in such deceit ... I
would choose an immediate split with no matter whom in our party rather
than surrender to social patriotism ...” After this apparently
impersonal threat – having definite people in mind however – Lenin
adjures: “Kamenev must understand that a world historic responsibility
rests upon him.” Kamenev is named here because it is a question of
political principle. If Lenin had had a practical militant problem in
mind, he would have been more likely to mention Stalin. But in just
those hours Lenin was striving to communicate the intensity of his will
to Petrograd across smoking Europe, Kamenev with the co-operation of
Stalin was turning sharply toward social patriotism.

Various schemes – disguises, false whiskers, foreign or false passports
– were cast aside one after the other as impossible. And meanwhile the
idea of travelling through Germany became more and more concrete. This
plan frightened the majority emigrants – and not only those who were
patriotic, either. Martov and the other Mensheviks could not make up
their minds to adopt the bold action of Lenin, and continued to knock in
vain on the doors of the Entente. Later on even many of Bolsheviks
repented of their journey through Germany, in view of the difficulties
caused by the “sealed train” in the sphere of agitation. From the
beginning Lenin never shut his eyes to those future difficulties.
Krupskaia wrote not long before the departure from Zurich: “Of course
the patriots will raise an outcry in Russia, but for that we must be
prepared.” The question stood as follows: either stay in Switzerland or
travel through Germany. There was no other choice. Could Lenin have
hesitated for a moment? Just one month later Martov Axelrod and the
others had to follow in his steps.

In the organisation of this unusual trip through hostile territory in
war time, the fundamental traits of Lenin as statesman expressed
themselves – boldness of conception and meticulous carefulness in its
fulfilment. Inside that great revolutionist there dwelt a pedantic
notary – one who knew his function, however, and drew up his paper at
the moment when it might help in the overthrow of all such notarial acts
for ever. The conditions of the journey through German were worked out
with extraordinary care in this unique international treaty between the
editorial staff of a revolutionary paper and the empire of the
Hohenzollerns. Lenin demanded complete extraterritoriality during the
transit: no supervision of the personnel of the passengers, their
passports or baggage. No single person should have the right to enter
the train throughout the journey. (Hence the legend of the “sealed”
train.) On their part, the emigrant group agreed to insist upon the
release from Russia of a corresponding number of German and
Austro-Hungarian civil prisoners.

At the same time a joint declaration was drawn up with several foreign
revolutionists. “The Russian internationalists who are now going to
Russia in order to serve there the cause of the revolution, will help us
arouse the proletariat of other countries, especially of Germany and
Austria, against their governments.” So speaks the protocol signed by
Loriot and Gilbeaux from France, Paul Levy from Germany, Platten from
Switzerland, by Swedish left deputies and others. On those conditions
and with those precautions, thirty Russian emigrants left Switzerland at
the end of March. A rather explosive trainload even among the loads of
those war days!

In his farewell letter to the Swiss workers Lenin reminded them of the
declaration of the central organ of the Bolsheviks in the autumn of
1915: If the revolution brings to power in Russia a republican
government which wants to continue the imperialist war, the Bolsheviks
will be against the defence of the republican Fatherland. Such a
situation has now arisen. “Our slogan is no support to the government of
Guchkov-Miliukov.” With those words Lenin now entered the territory of
the revolution.

However, the members of the Provisional Government did not see any
ground for alarm. Nabokov writes: “At one of the March sessions of the
Provisional Government, during a recess, in a long conversation about
the increasing propaganda of the Bolsheviks, Kerensky exclaimed with his
usual hysterical giggle: ‘Just you wait, Lenin himself is coming, then
the real thing will begin!’” Kerensky was right. The real thing would
begin only then. However the ministers, according to Nabokov, were not
greatly disturbed: “The very fact of his having appealed to Germany will
so undermine the authority of Lenin that we need not fear him.” As was
to be expected, the ministers were exceedingly perspicacious.

Friendly disciples went to meet Lenin in Finland. “We had hardly got
into the car and sat down,” writes Raskolnikov, a young naval officer
and a Bolshevik, “when Vladimir Ilych flung at Kamenev: ‘What’s this
you’re writing in _Pravda_? We saw several numbers and gave it to you
good and proper.’” Such was their meeting after a separation of several
years. But even so it was a friendly meeting.

The Petrograd Committee, with the co-operation of the military
organisation, mobilised several thousand workers and soldiers for a
triumphal welcome to Lenin. A friendly armoured car division detailed
all their cars to meet him. The committee decided to go to the station
with the armoured cars. The revolution had already created a partiality
for that type of monster, so useful to have on your side in the streets
of a city.

The description of the official meeting which took place in the
so-called “Czar’s Room” of the Finland station, constitutes a very
lively page in the many-volumed and rather faded memoirs of Sukhanov.
“Lenin walked, or rather ran, into the ’Czar’s Room’ in a round hat, his
face chilled, and a luxurious bouquet in his arms. Hurrying to the
middle of the room, he stopped still in front of Cheidze as though he
had run into a completely, unexpected obstacle. And here Cheidze, not
abandoning his previous melancholy look, pronounced the following
‘speech of greeting,’ carefully, preserving not only the spirit and
voice of a moral instructor: ‘Comrade Lenin, in the name of the
Petrograd Soviet and the whole revolution. We welcome you to Russia ...
_but_ we consider the that the chief task of the revolutionary democracy
at present is to defend our revolution against every kind of attack both
from within and from without ... We hope that you will join us in
striving towards this goal.’ Cheidze ceased. I was dismayed with the
unexpectedness of it. But Lenin, it seemed, knew well how to deal with
all that. He stood there looking as though what was happening did not
concern him in the least, glanced from one side to the other, looked
over the surrounding public, and even examined the ceiling of the
‘Czar’s Room’ while rearranging his bouquet (which harmonised rather
badly with his whole figure), and finally, having turned completely away
from the delegates of the Executive Committee, ‘answered’ thus: ‘Dear
comrades, soldiers, sailors and workers, I am happy to greet in you the
victorious Russian revolution, to greet you as the advance guard of the
international proletarian army ... The hour is not far when, at the
summons of our comrade Karl Liebknecht, the people will turn their
weapons against their capitalist exploiters ... The Russian revolution
achieved by you has opened a new epoch. Long live the world wide
socialist revolution!’”

Sukhanov is right – the bouquet harmonised badly with the figure of
Lenin, and doubtless hindered and embarrassed him with its
inappropriateness to the austere background of events. In general, as it
happens, Lenin did not like flowers in a bouquet. But doubtless he was
far more embarrassed by that official and hypocritical Sunday school
greeting in the parade room of a station. Cheidze was better than his
speech of greeting. He was a little timid of Lenin. But they undoubtedly
had told him that it was necessary to pull up on the “sectarian” from
the very beginning. To supplement Cheidze’s speech, which had
demonstrated the pitiable level of the leadership, a young naval
commander, speaking in the name of the sailors, was brilliant enough to
express the hope that Lenin might become a member of the Provisional
Government. Thus the February revolution, garrulous and flabby and still
rather stupid, greeted the man who had arrived with a resolute
determination to set it straight both in thought and in will. Those
first impressions, multiplying tenfold the alarm which he had brought
with him, produced a feeling of protest in Lenin which it was difficult
to restrain. How much more satisfactory to roll up his sleeves!
Appealing from Cheidze to the sailors and workers, from the defence of
the Fatherland to international revolution, from the Provisional
Government to Liebknecht, Lenin merely gave a short rehearsal there at
the station of his whole future policy.

And nevertheless that clumsy revolution instantly and heartily took its
leader into its bosom. The soldiers demanded that Lenin climb up on one
of the armoured cars, and he had to obey. The oncoming night made the
procession especially impressive. The lights on the other armoured cars
being dimmed, the night was stabbed by the sharp beam from the projector
of the machine on which Lenin rode. It sliced out from the darkness of
the street sections of excited workers, soldiers, sailors – the same
ones who had achieved the great revolution and then let the power slip
through their fingers. The band ceased playing every so often, in order
to let Lenin repeat or vary his speech before new listeners. “That
triumphal march was brilliant,” says Sukhanov, “and even somewhat
symbolic.”

In the palace of Kshesinskaia, Bolshevik headquarters in the satin nest
of a court ballerina – that combination must have amused Lenin’s always
lively irony – greetings began again. This was too much. Lenin endured
the flood of eulogistic speeches like an impatient pedestrian waiting in
a doorway for the rain to stop. He felt the sincere joyfulness at his
arrival, but was bothered by its verboseness. The very tone of the
official greetings seemed to him imitative, affected – in a word
borrowed from the petty bourgeois democracy, declamatory, sentimental
and false. He saw that the revolution, before having even defined its
problems and tasks, had already created its tiresome etiquette. He
smiled a good-natured reproach, looked at his watch, and from time to
time doubtless gave an unrestrained yawn. The echo of the last greeting
had not died away, when this unusual guest let loose upon that audience
a cataract of passionate thought which at times sounded almost like a
lashing. At that period the stenographic art was not yet open to
Bolshevism. Nobody made notes. All were too absorbed in what was
happening. The speeches have not been preserved. There remain only
general impressions in the memoirs of the listeners. And these have been
edited by the lapse of time; rapture has been added to them, and fright
washed away. The fundamental impression made by Lenin’s speech even
among those nearest to him was one of fright. All the accepted formulas,
which with innumerable repetition had acquired in the course of a month
a seemingly unshakeable permanence, were exploded one after another
before the eyes of that audience. The short Leninist reply at the
station, tossed out over the head of the startled Cheidze, was here
developed into a two hour speech addressed directly to the Petrograd
cadres of Bolshevism.

The non-party socialist, Sukhanov, was accidentally present at this
meeting as a guest – admitted by the good-natured Kamenev, although
Lenin was intolerant of such indulgences. Thanks to this we have a
description made by an outsider – half-hostile and half-ecstatic – of
the first meeting of Lenin with the Petersburg Bolsheviks.

“I will never forget that thunderlike speech, startling and amazing not
only to me, a heretic accidentally dropped in, but also to the faithful,
all of them. I assert that nobody there had expected anything of the
kind. It seemed as if all the elements and the spirit of universal
destruction had risen from their lairs, knowing neither barriers nor
doubts nor personal difficulties nor personal considerations, to hover
through the banquet chambers of Kshesinskaia above the heads of the
bewitched disciples.”

Personal considerations and difficulties – to Sukhanov that meant for
the most part the editorial waverings of the _Novy Zhizn_ circle having
tea with Maxim Gorky. Lenin’s considerations went deeper. Not the
elements were hovering in that banquet hall, but human thoughts – and
they were not embarrassed by the elements, but were trying to understand
in order to control them. But never mind – the impression is clearly
conveyed.

“On the journey here with my comrades,” said Lenin, according to
Sukhanov’s report – “I was expecting they would take us directly from
the station to Peter and Paul. We are far from that, it seems. But let
us not give up the hope that it will happen, that we shall not escape
it.”

For the others at that time the development of the revolution was
identical with a strengthening of the democracy; for Lenin the nearest
prospect led straight to the Peter and Paul prison-fortress. It seemed a
sinister joke. But Lenin was not joking, nor was the revolution joking.

“He swept aside legislative agrarian reform,” complains Sukhanov, “along
with all the rest of the policies of the Soviet. He spoke for an
organised seizure of the land by the peasants, not anticipating ... any
governmental power at all.”

“‘We don’t need any parliamentary republic. We don’t need any bourgeois
democracy. We don’t need any government except the Soviet of workers’,
soldiers’, and farmhands’ deputies!’”

At the same time Lenin sharply separated himself from the Soviet
majority, tossing them over into the camp of the enemy. That alone was
enough in those days to make his listeners dizzy!”

“Only the Zimmerwald Left stands guard over the proletarian interests
and the world revolution” – thus Sukhanov reports, with indignation, the
thoughts of Lenin, “The rest are the same old opportunists speaking
pretty words but in reality betraying the cause of socialism and the
worker masses.”

Raskolnikov supplements Sukhanov: “He decisively assailed the tactics
pursued before his arrival by the ruling party groups and by individual
comrades. The most responsible workers were here. But for them too the
words of Ilych were a veritable revelation. They laid down a Rubicon
between the tactics of yesterday and today.” That Rubicon, as we shall
see, was not laid down at once.

There was no discussion of the speech. All were too much astounded, and
each wanted a chance to collect his thoughts. “I came out on the
street,” concludes Sukhanov, “feeling as though on that night I had been
flogged over the head with a flail. Only one thing was clear: There was
no place for me, a non-party man, beside Lenin!”

Indeed not!

The next day Lenin presented to the party a short written exposition of
his views, which under the name of _Theses of April 4_ has become one of
the most important documents of the revolution. The theses expressed
simple thoughts in simple words comprehensible to all: The republic
which has issued from the February revolution is not our republic, and
the war which it is now waging is not our war, The task of the
Bolsheviks is to overthrow the imperialist government. But this
government rests upon the support of the Social Revolutionaries and
Mensheviks, who in turn are supported by the trustfulness of the masses
of the people. We are in the minority. In these circumstances there can
be no talk of violence from our side. We must teach the masses not to
trust the Compromisers and defensists. “We must patiently explain.” The
success of this policy, dictated by the whole existing situation, is
assured, and it will bring us to the dictatorship of the proletariat,
and so beyond the boundaries of the bourgeois régime. We will break
absolutely with capital, publish its secret treaties, and summon the
workers of the whole world to cast loose from the bourgeoisie and put an
end to the war. We are beginning the international revolution. Only its
success will confirm our success, and guarantee a transition to the
socialist régime.

These theses of Lenin were published in his own name and his only. The
central institutions of the party met them with a hostility softened
only by bewilderment. Nobody – not one organisation, group or individual
– affixed his signature to them. Even Zinoviev, arriving with Lenin from
abroad, where for ten years his ideas had been forming under the
immediate and daily influence of Lenin, silently stepped aside, Nor was
this side-stepping a surprise to the teacher, who knew his closest
disciple all too well.

Where Kamenev was a propagandist populariser, Zinoviev was an agitator,
and indeed, to quote an expression of Lenin, “nothing but an agitator.”
He has not, in the first place, a sufficient sense of responsibility to
be a leader. But not only that. Lacking inner discipline, his mind is
completely incapable of theoretical work, and his thoughts dissolve into
formless intuitions of the agitator. Thanks to an exceptionally quick
scent, he can catch out of the air whatever formulas are necessary to
him – those which will exercise the most the most effective influence on
the masses. Both as journalist and orator he remains an agitator, with
only this difference – that in his articles you usually see his weaker
side, and in oral speech his stronger. Although far more bold and
unbridled in agitation than any other Bolshevik, Zinoviev is even less
capable than Kamenev of revolutionary initiative. He is, like all
demagogues, indecisive. Passing from the arena of factional debate to
that of direct mass fighting, Zinoviev almost involuntarily separated
from his teacher.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

There have been plenty of attempts of late years to prove that the April
party crisis was a passing and almost accidental confusion. They all go
to pieces at first contact with the facts.[1]

What we already know of the activity of the party in March reveals the
deepest possible contradiction between Lenin and the Petersburg
leadership. This contradiction reached its highest intensity exactly at
the moment of Lenin’s arrival. Simultaneously with the All-Russian
Conference of representatives of 82 soviets, where Kamenev and Stalin
voted for the resolution on sovereignty introduced by the Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, there took place in Petrograd a party
conference of Bolsheviks assembled from all over Russia. This
conference, at the very end of which Lenin arrived, has an exceptional
interest for anyone wishing to characterize the mood and opinions of the
party and all its upper layers as they issued from the war. A reading of
the reports, to this day unpublished, frequently produces a feeling of
amazement: is it possible that a party represented by these delegates
will after seven months seize the power with an iron hand? A month had
already passed since the uprising – a long period for a revolution, as
also for a war. Nevertheless opinions were not defined in the party on
the most basic questions of the revolution. Extreme patriots such as
Voitinsky, Eliava, and others, participated in the conference alongside
of those who considered themselves internationalists. The percentage of
outspoken patriots, incomparably less than among the Mensheviks, was
nevertheless considerable. The conference as a whole did not decide the
question whether to break with its own patriots or unite with the
patriots of Menshevism. In an interval between sessions of the Bolshevik
conference there was held a united session of Bolsheviks and Mensheviks
– delegates to the Soviet conference – to consider the war question. The
most furious Menshevik-patriot, Lieber, announced at this session: “We
must do away with the old division between Bolshevik and Menshevik, and
speak only of our attitude toward the war.” The Bolshevik, Voitinsky,
hastened to proclaim his readiness to put his signature to every word of
Lieber. All of them together, Bolsheviks and Mensheviks, patriots and
internationalists, were seeking a common formula for their attitude to
the war.

The views of the Bolshevik conference undoubtedly found their most
adequate expression in the report of Stalin on relations with the
Provisional Government. It is necessary to introduce here the central
thought of this speech, which, like the reports as a whole, is not yet
published. “The power has been decided between two organs of which
neither one possesses full power. There is debate and struggle between
them, and there ought to be. The rôles have been divided. The Soviet has
in fact taken the initiative in the revolutionary transformation; the
Soviet is the revolutionary leader of the insurrectionary people; an
organ controlling the Provisional Government. And the Provisional
Government has in fact taken the rôle of fortifier of the conquests of
the revolutionary people. The Soviet mobilizes the forces, and controls.
The Provisional Government, balking and confused, takes the rôle of
fortifier of those conquests of the people, which they have already
seized as a fact. This situation has disadvantageous, but also
advantageous sides. It is not to our advantage at present to force
events, hastening the process of repelling the bourgeois layers, who
will in the future inevitably withdraw from us.”

Transcending class distinctions, the speaker portrays the relation
between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat as a mere division of
labour. The workers and soldiers achieve the revolution, Guchkov and
Miliukov “fortify” it. We recognize here the traditional conception of
the Mensheviks, incorrectly modelled after the events of 1789. This
superintendent’s approach to the historical process is exactly
characteristic of the leaders of Menshevism, this handing out of
instructions to various classes and then patronisingly criticising their
fulfillment. The idea that it is disadvantageous to hasten the
withdrawal of the bourgeoisie from the revolution, has always been the
guiding principle of the whole policy of the Mensheviks. In action this
means blunting and weakening the movement of the masses in order not to
frighten away the liberal allies. And finally, Stalin’s conclusion as to
the Provisional Government is wholly in accord with the equivocal
formula of the Compromisers: “In so far as the Provisional Government
fortifies the steps of the revolution, in so far we must support it, but
in so far as it is counter-revolutionary, support to the Provisional
Government is not permissible.”

Stalin’s report was made on March 29. On the next day the official
spokesman of the Soviet conference, the non-party social democrat
Steklov, defending the same conditional support to the Provisional
Government, in the ardor of his eloquence painted such a picture of the
activity of the “fortifiers” of the revolution – opposition to social
reforms, leaning towards monarchy, protection of counter-revolutionary
forces, appetite for annexation – that the Bolshevik conference recoiled
in alarm from this formula of support. The right Bolshevik Nogin
declared: “The speech of Steklov has introduced one new thought: it is
clear that we ought not now to talk about support, but about
resistance.” Skrypnik also arrived at the conclusion that since the
speech of Steklov “many things have changed, there can be no more talk
of supporting the government. There is a conspiracy of the Provisional
Government against the people and the revolution.” Stalin, who a day
before had been painting an idealistic picture of the “division of
labour” between the government and the Soviet, felt obliged to eliminate
this point about supporting the government. The short and superficial
discussion turned about the question whether to support the Provisional
Government “in so far as,” or only to support the revolutionary
activities of the Provisional Government. The delegate from Saratov,
Vassiliev, not untruthfully declared: “We all have the same attitude to
the Provisional Government.” Krestinsky formulated the situation even
more clearly: “As to practical action there is no disagreement between
Stalin and Voitinsky.” Notwithstanding the fact that Voitinsky went over
to the Mensheviks immediately after the conference, Krestinsky was not
very wrong. Although he eliminated the open mention of support, Stalin
did not eliminate support. The only one who attempted to formulate the
question in principle was Krassikov, one of those old Bolsheviks who had
withdrawn from the party for a series of years, but now, weighed down
with life’s experience, was trying to return to its ranks.

Krassikov did not hesitate to seize the bull by the horns. Is this then
a dictatorship of the proletariat you are about to inaugurate? he asked
ironically. But the conference passed over his irony, and along with it
passed over this question as one not deserving attention. The resolution
of the conference summoned the revolutionary democracy to urge the
Provisional Government toward “a most energetic struggle for the
complete liquidation of the old régime” – that is, gave the proletarian
party the rôle of governess of the bourgeoisie.

The next day they considered the proposal of Tseretelli for a union of
Bolsheviks and Mensheviks. Stalin was wholly in favour of the proposal:
“We must do it. It is necessary to define our proposal for a basis of
union; union is possible on the basis of Zimmerwald-Kienthal.” Molotov,
who had been removed from the editorship of _Pravda_ by Kamenev and
Stalin because of the too radical line of the paper, spoke in
opposition: Tseretelli wants to unite heterogeneous elements, he himself
calls himself Zimmerwaldist; a union on that basis is wrong. But Stalin
stuck to his guns: “There is no use running ahead and trying to
forestall disagreements. There is no party life without disagreements.
We will live down petty disagreements within the party.” The whole
struggle which Lenin had been carrying on during the war years against
social patriotism and its pacifist disguise, was thus casually swept
aside. In September 1916 Lenin had written through Shliapnikov to
Petrograd with special insistence: “Conciliationism and consolidation is
the worst thing for the workers’ party in Russia, not only idiotism but
ruin to the party ... We can rely only on those who have understood the
whole deceit involved in the idea of unity and whole necessity of a
split with that brotherhood (Cheidze & Co.) in Russia.” This warning was
not understood. Disagreements with Tseretelli, the leader of the ruling
Soviet bloc, seemed to Stalin petty disagreements, which could be “lived
down” within a common party. This furnishes the best criterion for an
appraisal of the views held by Stalin at that time.

On April 4 Lenin appeared at the party conference. His speech,
developing his “theses,” passed over the work of the conference like the
wet sponge of a teacher erasing what had been written on the blackboard
by a confused pupil.

“Why didn’t you seize the power?” asked Lenin. At the Soviet conference
not long before that, Steklov had confusedly explained the reasons for
abstaining from the power: the revolution is bourgeois – it is the first
stage – the war, etc. “That’s nonsense,” Lenin said. “The reason is that
the proletariat was not sufficiently conscious and not sufficiently
organised. That we have to acknowledge. The material force was in the
hands of the proletariat, but the bourgeoisie was conscious and ready.
That is the monstrous fact. But it is necessary to acknowledge it
frankly, and say to the people straight out that we did not seize the
power because we were unorganised and not conscious.”

From the plane of pseudo-objectivism, behind which the political
capitulators were hiding, Lenin shifted the whole question to the
subjective plane. The proletariat did not seize the power in February
because the Bolshevik Party was not equal to its objective task, and
could not prevent the Compromisers from expropriating the popular masses
politically for the benefit of the bourgeoisie.

The day before that, lawyer Krassikov had said challengingly: “If we
think that the time has now come to realize the dictatorship of the
proletariat, then we ought to pose the question that way. We
unquestionably have the physical force for a seizure of power.” The
chairman at that time deprived Krassikov of the floor on the ground that
practical problems were under discussion, and the question of
dictatorship was out of order. But Lenin thought that, as the sole
practical question, the question of preparing the dictatorship of the
proletariat was exactly in order. “The peculiarity of the present moment
in Russia,” he said in his theses, “consists in the transition from the
first stage of the revolution, which gave the power to the bourgeoisie
on account of the inadequate consciousness and organization of the
proletariat, to its second stage which must give the power to the
proletariat and the poor layers of the peasantry.” The conference,
following the lead of _Pravda_, had limited the task of the revolution
to a democratic transformation to be realized through the Constituent
Assembly. As against this, Lenin declared that “life and the revolution
will push the Constituent Assembly into the background. A dictatorship
of the proletariat exists, but nobody knows what to do with it.”

The delegates exchanged glances. They whispered to each other that Ilych
had stayed too long abroad, had not had time, to look around and
familiarize himself with things. But the speech of Stalin on the
ingenious division of labour between the government and the Soviet sank
out of sight once and for ever. Stalin himself remained silent. From now
on he will have to be silent for a long time. Kamenev alone will man the
defences.

Lenin had already given warning in letters from Geneva that he was ready
to break with anybody who made concessions on the question of war,
chauvinism and compromise with the bourgeoisie. Now, face to face with
the leading circles of the party he opens an attack all along the line.
But at the beginning he does not name a single Bolshevik by name. If he
has need of a living model of equivocation and half-wayness, he points
his finger at the non-party men, or at Steklov or Cheidze. That was the
customary method of Lenin: not to nail anybody down to his position too
soon, to give the prudent a chance to withdraw from the battle in good
season and thus weaken at once the future ranks of his open enemies.
Kamenev and Stalin had thought that in participating in the war after
February, the soldiers and workers were defending the revolution. Lenin
thinks that, as before, the soldier and the worker take part in the war
as the conscripted slaves of capital. “Even our Bolsheviks,” he says,
narrowing the circle around his antagonists, “show confidence in the
government. Only the fumes of the revolution can explain that. That is
the death of socialism ... If that’s your position, our ways part. I
prefer to remain in the minority.” That was not a mere oratorical
threat; it was a clear path thought through to the end.

Although naming neither Kamenev nor Stalin, Lenin was obliged to name
the paper: “_Pravda_ demands of the government that it renounce
annexation. To demand from the government of the capitalists that it
renounce annexation is nonsense, flagrant mockery.” Restrained
indignation here breaks out with a high note. But the orator immediately
takes himself in hand: he wants to say no less than is necessary, but
also no more. Incidentally and in passing, Lenin gives incomparable
rules for revolutionary statesmanship: “When the masses announce that
they do not want conquests, I believe them. When Guchkov and Lvov say
they do not want conquests, they are deceivers! When a worker says that
he wants the defense of the country, what speaks in him is the instinct
of the oppressed.” This criterion, to call it by its right name, seems
simple as life itself. But the difficulty is to call it by its right
name in time.

On the question of the appeal of the Soviet “to the people of the whole
world” – which caused the liberal paper _Rech_ at one time to declare
that the theme of pacifism is developing among us into an ideology
common to the Allies – Lenin expressed himself more clearly and
succinctly: “What is peculiar to Russia is the gigantically swift
transition from wild violence to the most delicate deceit.”

“This appeal,” wrote Stalin concerning the manifesto, “if it reaches the
broad masses (of the West), will undoubtedly recall hundreds and
thousands of workers to the forgotten slogan ‘Proletarians of all
Countries Unite!’”

“The appeal of the Soviet,” objects Lenin, “– there isn’t a word in it
imbued with class consciousness. There is nothing to it but phrases.”
This document, the pride of the home-grown Zimmerwaldists, is in Lenin’s
eyes merely one of the weapons of “the most delicate deceit.”

Up to Lenin’s arrival _Pravda_ had never even mentioned the Zimmerwald
left. Speaking of the International, it never indicated which
International. Lenin called this “the Kautskyanism of _Pravda_.” “In
Zimmerwald and Kienthal,” he declared at a party conference, “the
Centrists predominated ... We declare that we created a left and broke
with the centre ... The left Zimmerwald tendency exists in all the
countries of the world. The masses ought to realize that socialism has
split throughout the world ...”

Three days before that Stalin had announced at that same conference his
readiness to live down differences with Tseretelli on the basis of
Zimmerwald-Kienthal – that is, on the basis of Kautskyanism. “I hear
that in Russia there is a trend toward consolidation,” said Lenin.
“Consolidation with the defensists – that is betrayal of socialism. I
think it would be better to stand alone like Liebknecht – one against a
hundred and ten.” The accusation of betrayal of socialism – for the
present still without naming names – is not here merely a strong word;
it fully expresses the attitude of Lenin toward those Bolsheviks who
were extending a finger to the social patriots. In opposition to Stalin
who thought it was possible to unite with the Mensheviks, Lenin thought
it was unpermissible to share with them any longer the name of Social
Democrat. “Personally and speaking for myself alone,” he said, “I
propose that we change the name of the party, that we call it the
Communist Party.” “Personally and speaking for myself alone” – that
means that nobody, not one of the members of the conference, agreed to
that symbolic gesture of ultimate break with the Second International.

“You are afraid to go back on your old memories?” says the orator to the
embarrassed, bewildered and partly indignant delegates. But the time has
come “to change our linen; we’ve got to take off the dirty shirt and put
on clean.” And he again insists: “Don’t hang on to an old word which is
rotten through and through. Have the will to build a new party ... and
all the oppressed will come to you.”

Before the enormity of the task not yet begun, and the intellectual
confusion in his own ranks, a sharp thought of the precious time
foolishly wasted in meetings, greetings, ritual resolutions, wrests a
cry from the orator: “Have done with greetings and resolutions! It’s
time to get down to business. We must proceed to practical sober work!”
An hour later Lenin was compelled to repeat his speech at the previously
designated joint session of the Bolsheviks and Mensheviks, where it
sounded to a majority of the listeners like something between mockery
and delirium. The more condescending shrugged their shoulders: This man
evidently fell down from the moon; hardly off the steps of the Finland
station after a ten-year absence he starts preaching the seizure of
power by the proletariat. The less good-natured among the patriots made
references to the sealed train. Stankevich testifies that Lenin’s speech
greatly delighted his enemies: “A man who talks that kind of stupidity
is not dangerous. It’s a good thing he has come. Now he is in plain
sight ... Now he will refute himself.”

Nevertheless, with all its boldness of revolutionary grasp, its
inflexible determination to break even with his former long time
colleagues and comrades-in-arms, if they proved unable to march with the
revolution, the speech of Lenin – every part balanced against the rest –
was filled with deep realism and an infallible feeling for the masses.
Exactly for this reason, it seemed to the democrats a fantastic skimming
of the surface.

The Bolsheviks are a tiny minority in the Soviet, and Lenin dreams of
seizing the power; isn’t that pure adventurism? There was not a shadow
of adventurism in Lenin’s statement of the problem. He did not for a
moment close his eyes to the existence of “honest” defensist moods in
the broad masses. He did not intend either to lose himself in the masses
or to act behind their backs. “We are not charlatans” – he throws this
in the eyes of future objections and accusations – “we must base
ourselves only upon the consciousness of the masses. Even if it is
necessary to remain in a minority – so be it. It is a good thing to give
up for a time the position of leadership; we must not be afraid to
remain in the minority.” Do not fear to remain in a minority – even a
minority of one, like Liebknecht’s one against a hundred and ten – such
was the _leitmotif_ of his speech.

“The real government is the Soviet of workers’ deputies ... In the
Soviet our party is the minority ... What can we do? All we can do is to
explain patiently, insistently, systematically the error of their
tactics. So long as we are in the minority, we will carry on the work of
criticism, in order to free the masses from deceit. We do not want the
masses to believe us just on our say so; we are not charlatans. We want
the masses to be freed by experience from their mistakes.” Don’t be
afraid to remain in the minority! Not for ever, but for a time. The hour
of Bolshevism will strike. “Our line will prove right ... All the
oppressed will come to us, because the war will bring them to us. They
have no other way out.”

“At the joint conference,” relates Sukhanov, “Lenin was the living
incarnation of a split ... I remember Bogdanov (a prominent Menshevik)
sitting two steps away from the orator’s tribune. ‘Why, that is raving,’
he interrupted Lenin, ‘that is the raving of a lunatic ... You ought to
be ashamed to applaud such spouting,’ he cried, turning to the audience,
white in the face with rage and scorn. ‘You disgrace yourselves,
Marxists!’”

A former member of the Bolshevik Central Committee, Goldenberg, at that
time a non-party man, appraised Lenin’s theses in these withering words:
“For many years the place of Bakunin has remained vacant in the Russian
revolution, now it is occupied by Lenin.”

“His programme at that time was met not so much with indignation,”
relates the Social Revolutionary Zenzinov, “as with ridicule. It seemed
to everybody so absurd and fantastic.”

On the evening of the same day in the _couloirs_ of the Contact
Commission, two socialists were talking with Miliukov, and the
conversation touched on Lenin. Skobelev estimated him as “a man
completely played out, standing apart from the movement.” Sukhanov was
of the same mind, and added that “Lenin is to such a degree unacceptable
to everybody that he is no longer dangerous even to my companion
Miliukov here.”

The distribution of rôles in this conversation, however, was exactly
according to Lenin’s formula: the socialists were protecting the peace
of mind of the liberal from the trouble which Bolshevism might cause
him.

Rumors even arrived in the ears of the British ambassador that Lenin had
been declared a bad Marxist. “Among the newly arrived anarchists,” wrote
Buchanan, “was Lenin, who came through in a sealed train from Germany.
He made his first public appearance at a meeting of the Social
Democratic Party and was badly received.”

The most condescending of all toward Lenin in those days was no other
than Kerensky, who in a circle of members of the Provisional Government
unexpectedly stated that he must go to see Lenin, and explained in
answer to their bewildered questions: “Well, he is living in a
completely isolated atmosphere, he knows nothing, sees everything
through the glasses of his fanaticism. There is no one around him who
might help him orient himself a little in what is going on.” Thus
testifies Nabokov. But Kerensky never found the time to orient Lenin in
what was going on.

The April theses of Lenin not only evoked the bewildered indignation of
his opponents and enemies. They repelled a number of old Bolsheviks into
the Menshevik camp – or into that intermediate group which found shelter
around Gorky’s paper. This leakage had no serious political
significance. Infinitely more important was the impression which Lenin’s
position made on the whole leading group of the party. “In the first
days after his arrival,” writes Sukhanov, “his complete isolation among
all his conscious party comrades cannot be doubted in the least.” “Even
his party comrades, the Bolsheviks,” confirms the Social Revolutionary
Zenzinov, “at that time turned away in embarrassment from him.” The
authors of these comments were meeting the leading Bolsheviks every day
in the Executive Committee, and had first-hand evidence of what they
said.

But there is no lack of similar testimony from among the ranks of the
Bolsheviks. “When the theses of Lenin appeared,” wrote Tsikhon,
softening the colours as much as possible, as do a majority of the old
Bolsheviks when they stumble on the February revolution, “there was felt
in our party a certain wavering. Many of the comrades argued that Lenin
showed a syndicalist deviation, that he was out of touch with Russia,
that he was not taking into consideration the given moment,” etc. One of
the prominent Bolshevik leaders in the provinces, Lebedev, writes: “On
Lenin’s arrival in Russia, his agitation, at first not wholly
intelligible to us Bolsheviks, but regarded as Utopian and explainable
by his long removal from Russian life, was gradually absorbed by us, and
entered, as you might say, into our flesh and blood.”

Zalezhski, a member of the Petrograd Committee and one of the organizers
of the welcome to Lenin, expresses it more frankly “Lenin’s theses
produced the impression of an exploding bomb.” Zalezhski fully confirms
the complete isolation of Lenin after that so warm and impressive
welcome. “On that day (April 4) Comrade Lenin could not find open
sympathisers even in our own ranks.”

Still more important, however, is the evidence of _Pravda_. “On April 8,
after the publication of the theses – when time enough had passed to
make explanations and reach a mutual understanding – the editors of
_Pravda_ wrote: “As for the general scheme of Comrade Lenin, it seems to
us unacceptable in that it starts from the assumption that the
bourgeois-democratic revolution is ended, and counts upon an immediate
transformation of this revolution into a socialist revolution.” The
central organ of the party thus openly announced before the working
class and its enemies a split with the generally recognised leader of
the party upon the central question of the revolution for which the
Bolshevik ranks had been getting ready during a long period of years.
That alone is sufficient to show the depth of the April crisis in the
party, due to the clash of two irreconcilable lines of thought and
action. Until it surmounted this crisis the revolution could not go
forward.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. In the big collection volume issued under the editorship of Professor
Pokrovsky, _Essays on the History of the October Revolution_ (Vol.II,
Moscow 1927), an apologetic work is devoted to the “April confusion” by
a certain Bayevsky, which for its unceremonious treatment of facts and
documents might be called cynical, were it not childishly impotent.



CHAPTER 16 RE-ARMING THE PARTY


 

How explain Lenin’s extraordinary isolation at the beginning of April?
How in general could such a situation arise, and how was the rearming of
the Bolshevik staff accomplished?

From the year 1905 the Bolshevik Party had waged a struggle against the
autocracy under the slogan “Democratic Dictatorship of the proletariat
and the Peasantry.” This slogan as well as its theoretical background,
derives from Lenin. In opposition to the Mensheviks, whose theoretician,
Plekhanov, stubbornly opposed the “mistaken idea of the possibility of
accomplishing a bourgeois revolution without the bourgeoisie,” Lenin
considered that the Russian bourgeoisie was already incapable of leading
its own revolution. Only the proletariat and peasantry in close union
could carry through a democratic revolution against the monarchy and the
landlords. The victory of this union, according to Lenin, should
inaugurate a democratic dictatorship, which was not only not identical
with the dictatorship of the proletariat, but was in sharp contrast to
it, for its problem was not the creation of a socialist society, nor
even the creation of forms of transition to such a society, but merely a
ruthless cleansing of the Augean stables of medievalism. The goal of the
revolutionary struggle was fully described in three militant slogans:
Democratic Republic, Confiscation of the Landed Estates, Eight-Hour
Working Day – colloquially called the three whales of Bolshevism, by
analogy with those whales upon which according to an old popular fable
the earth reposes.

The question of the possibility of a democratic dictatorship of the
proletariat and peasantry hinged upon the question of the ability of the
peasantry to accomplish their own revolution – that is, to put forward a
new government capable of liquidating the monarchy and the landed
nobility. To be sure, the slogan of democratic dictatorship assumed also
a participation in the revolutionary government of workers’
representatives. But this participation was limited in advance by the
rôle attributed to the proletariat as ally on the left in solving the
problems of the peasant revolution. The popular and even officially
recognised idea of the hegemony of the proletariat in the democratic
revolution could not, consequently, mean anything more than that the
workers’ party would help the peasantry with a political weapon from its
arsenal, suggest to them the best means and methods for liquidating the
feudal society, and show them how to apply these means and methods. In
any case, to speak of the leading rôle of the proletariat in the
bourgeois revolution did not at all signify that the proletariat would
use the peasant uprising in order with its support to place upon the
order of the day its own historic task – that is, the direct transition
to a socialist society. The hegemony of the proletariat in the
democratic revolution was sharply distinguished from the dictatorship of
the proletariat, and polemically contrasted against it. The Bolshevik
Party had been educated in these ideas ever since the spring of 1905.

The actual course of the February revolution disrupted this accustomed
schema of Bolshevism. It is true that the revolution was accomplished by
a union of the workers and peasants. The fact that the peasants
functioned chiefly in the guise of soldiers did not alter this. The
behavior of the peasant army of czarism would have had decisive import
even if the revolution had developed in peace times. So much the more
natural if in war time these millions of armed men at first completely
concealed the peasantry. After the victory of the insurrection the
workers and soldiers were bosses of the situation. In that sense it
would seem possible to say that a democratic dictatorship of the workers
and peasants had been established. But as a matter of fact, the February
overturn led to a bourgeois government, in which the power of the
possessing classes was limited by the not yet fully realised sovereignty
of the workers’ and soldiers’ soviets. All the cards were mixed. Instead
of a revolutionary dictatorship – i.e. the most concentrated power –
there was established the flabby régime of the dual power, in which the
feeble energy of the ruling classes was wasted in overcoming inner
conflicts. Nobody had foreseen this régime. And indeed one cannot demand
from a prognosis that it indicate not only the fundamental tendencies of
development, but also accidental conjunctions. “Who ever made a great
revolution knowing beforehand how to carry it through to the end?” asked
Lenin later. “Where could you get such knowledge? It is not to be found
in books. There are no such books. Our decisions could only be born out
of the experience of the masses.”

But human thought is conservative, and the thought of revolutionists is
at times especially so. The Bolshevik staff in Russia continued to stand
by the old formula and regarded the February revolution, notwithstanding
its obvious establishment of two incompatible régimes, merely as the
first stage of a bourgeois revolution. At the end of March Rykov sent to
_Pravda_ from Siberia, in the name of the Social Democrats, a telegram
of greeting to the victory of the “national revolution,” whose problem
was “the winning of political liberty.” All the leading Bolsheviks – not
one exception is known to us – considered that the democratic
dictatorship still lay in the future. After this Provisional Government
of the bourgeoisie “exhausts itself,” then a democratic dictatorship of
the workers and peasants will be established as the forerunner of the
bourgeois parliamentary régime. This was a completely erroneous
perspective. The régime which issued from the February revolution not
only was not preparing a democratic dictatorship, but was a living and
exhaustive proof of the fact that such a dictatorship was impossible.
That the compromising democracy did not accidentally, through the
light-mindedness of Kerensky and the limited intelligence of Cheidze,
hand over the power to the liberals, is demonstrated by the fact that
throughout the eight months following, it struggled with all its force
to preserve the bourgeois government. It repressed the workers, peasants
and soldiers, and on the 25th of October it fell fighting at its post as
ally and defender of the bourgeoisie. Moreover it was clear enough from
the beginning, when the democracy, with gigantic tasks before it and the
unlimited support of the masses, voluntarily renounced the power, that
this was not due to political principles or prejudices, but to the
hopelessness of the situation of the petty bourgeoisie in the capitalist
society – especially in a period of war and revolution, when the
fundamental life problems of countries, peoples and classes are under
decision. In handing Miliukov the sceptre, the petty bourgeoisie said:
“No, I am not equal to these tasks.”

The peasantry, lifting on its shoulders the conciliatory democracy,
contains in itself in a rudimentary form all the classes of bourgeois
society. Along with the petty bourgeoisie of the cities – which in
Russia, however, never played a serious rôle – it constitutes that
protoplasm out of which new classes have been differentiated in the
past, and continue to be differentiated in the present. The peasantry
always has two faces, one turned towards the proletariat and the other
to the bourgeoisie. But the intermediary, compromising position of
“peasant” parties like the Social Revolutionaries, can be maintained
only in conditions of comparative political stagnation; in a
revolutionary epoch the moment inevitably comes when the petty
bourgeoisie is compelled to choose. The Social Revolutionaries and
Mensheviks made their choice from the first moment. They destroyed the
“democratic dictatorship” in embryo, in order to prevent it from
becoming a bridge to the dictatorship of the proletariat. But they thus
opened a road to the latter – only a different road, not through them,
but against them.

The further development of the revolution must obviously proceed from
new facts, not old schemas. Through their representatives the masses
were drawn, partly against their will, partly without their
consciousness, into the mechanics of the two power régime. They now had
to pass through this in order to learn by experience that it could not
give them either peace or land. To recoil from the two-power régime
henceforward meant for the masses to break with the Social
Revolutionaries and the Mensheviks. But it is quite evident that a
political turning of the workers and soldiers toward the Bolsheviks,
having knocked over the whole two-power construction, could now no
longer mean anything but the establishment of a dictatorship of the
proletariat resting upon a union of the workers and peasants. In case
the popular mass had been defeated, only a military dictatorship of
capital could have risen on the ruins of the Bolshevik Party. “The
democratic dictatorship” was impossible in either case. In looking
toward it, the Bolsheviks had actually to turn their faces toward a
phantom of the past. It was in this position that Lenin found them when
he arrived with his inflexible determination to bring the party out on a
new road.

Lenin himself, to be sure, did not replace the formula of democratic
dictatorship by any other formula, even conditional or hypothetical,
until the very beginning of the February revolution. Was he correct in
this? We think not. What happened in the party after the revolution
revealed all too alarmingly the belatedness of that rearming – which
moreover in the given situation no one but Lenin himself could have
carried through. He had prepared himself for that. He had heated his
steel white hot and re-tempered it in the fires of the war. In his eyes
the general prospect of the historic process had changed; the shock of
the war had sharply advanced the possible date of a socialist revolution
in the West. While remaining for Lenin still democratic, the Russian
revolution was to give the stimulus to a socialist revolution in Europe,
which should then drag belated Russia into its whirlpool. Such was
Lenin’s general conception when he left Zurich. The letter to the Swiss
workers which we have already quoted says: “Russia is a peasant country,
one of the most backward of European countries. Here socialism cannot
immediately conquer, but the peasant character of the country, with
enormous tracts of land remaining intact in the hands of the nobility,
can, on the basis of the experience of 1905, give enormous scope to a
bourgeois-democratic revolution in Russia, and make our revolution a
prologue to the worldwide socialist revolution, a step leading to it.”
In this sense Lenin now first wrote that the Russian proletariat will
begin the socialist revolution.

Such was the connecting link between the old position of Bolshevism,
which limited the revolution to democratic aims, and the new position
which Lenin first presented to the party in his theses of April 4. This
new prospect of an immediate transition to the dictatorship of the
proletariat seemed completely unexpected, contradictory to tradition,
and indeed simply would not fit into the mind. Here it is necessary to
remember that up to the outbreak of the February revolution and for a
time after, Trotskyism did not mean the idea that it was impossible to
build a socialist society within the national boundaries of Russia
(which “possibility” was never expressed by anybody up to 1924 and
hardly came into anybody’s head). Trotskyism meant the idea that the
Russian proletariat might win the power in advance of the Western
proletariat, and that in that case it could not confine itself within
the limits of a democratic dictatorship but would be compelled to
undertake the initial socialist measures. It is not surprising, then,
that the April theses of Lenin were condemned as Trotskyist. [See
Appendix II for more on Trotsky and the April theses]

The counter-arguments of the old Bolsheviks developed along several
lines. The principal quarrel was about the question whether the
bourgeois-democratic revolution was finished. Inasmuch as the agrarian
revolution was not yet complete, the opponents of Lenin justly asserted
that the democratic revolution as a whole was not finished, and hence,
they concluded, there is no place for a dictatorship of the proletariat,
even though the social conditions of Russia render it possible in
general at a more or less proximate date. It was in this way that the
editors of _Pravda_ posed the question in the passage we have already
cited. Later on, in the April conference, Kamenev repeated this: “Lenin
is wrong when he says that the bourgeois democratic revolution is
finished ... The classical relics of feudalism, the landed estates, are
not yet liquidated ... The state is not transformed into a democratic
society ... It is early to say that the bourgeois democracy has
exhausted all its possibilities.”

“The democratic dictatorship is our foundation stone” – this was
Tomsky’s argument – “We ought to organise the power of the proletariat
and the peasants, and we ought to distinguish this from the Commune,
since that means the power of the proletariat alone.”

Rykov seconded him: “Gigantic revolutionary tasks stand before us, but
the fulfillment of these tasks does not carry us beyond the framework of
the bourgeois régime.”

Lenin saw, of course, as clearly as his opponents that the democratic
revolution was not finished, that, on the contrary without really
beginning it had already begun to drop into the past. But from this very
fact it resulted that only the rulers of a new class could carry it
through to the end, and that this could be achieved no otherwise but by
drawing the masses out from under the influence of the Mensheviks and
Social Revolutionaries – that is to say, from the indirect influence of
the liberal bourgeoisie. The connection of those parties with the
workers, and especially with the soldiers, was based on the idea of
defence – “defence of the country” or “defence of the revolution.”
Lenin, therefore, demanded an irreconcilable opposition to all shades of
social patriotism. Separate the party from the backward masses, in order
afterwards to free those masses from their backwardness. “We must
abandon the old Bolshevism,” he kept repeating. “We must make a sharp
division between the line of the petty bourgeoisie and the wage worker.”

At a superficial glance it might seem that the age-old enemies had
exchanged weapons. The Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries now
represented a majority of the workers and soldiers, and seemed to have
realised that political union of the proletariat and peasantry which
Bolshevism had always been advocating against the Mensheviks. Lenin was
demanding that the proletarian vanguard break away from this union. In
reality, however, both sides remained true to themselves. The
Mensheviks, as always, saw their mission in supporting the liberal
bourgeoisie. Their union with the Social Revolutionaries was only a
means of broadening and strengthening this support. On the contrary, the
break of the proletarian vanguard with the petty bourgeois bloc meant
the preparation of a union of the workers and peasants under the
leadership of the Bolshevik Party – that is, the dictatorship of the
proletariat.

Another argument against Lenin was derived from the backwardness of
Russia. A government of the working class inevitably means a transition
to socialism, but economically and culturally Russia is not ripe for
this. We must carry through the democratic revolution. Only a socialist
revolution in the West can justify a dictatorship of the proletariat
here. This was Rykov’s argument at the April conference. That the
cultural-economic condition of Russia in itself was inadequate for the
construction of a socialist society was mere ABC to Lenin. But societies
are not so rational in building that the dates for proletarian
dictatorships arrive exactly at that moment when the economic and
cultural conditions are ripe for socialism. If humanity evolved as
systematically as that, there would be no need for dictatorship, nor
indeed for revolutions in general. Living historic societies are
inharmonious through and through, and the more so the more delayed their
development. The fact that in a backward country like Russia the
bourgeoisie had decayed before the complete victory of the bourgeois
régime, and that there was nobody but the proletariat to replace it in
the position of national leadership, was an expression of this in
harmony. The economic backwardness of Russia does not relieve the
working class of the obligation to fulfil its allotted task, but merely
surrounds this task with extraordinary difficulties. To Rykov, who kept
repeating that socialism must come from countries with a more developed
industry, Lenin gave a simple but sufficient answer: “You can’t say who
will begin and who finish.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In 1921, when the party – still far from bureaucratic ossification – was
appraising its past as freely as it prepared its future, one of the
older Bolsheviks, Olminsky, who had played a leading part in the party
press in all stages of its development, raised the question: How explain
the fact that the February revolution found the party on the opportunist
path, and what permitted it thereafter to turn so sharply to the path of
October? The author correctly found the source of the party’s going
astray in March in the fact that it held on too long to the “democratic
dictatorship.” “The coming revolution must be only a bourgeois
revolution ... That was,” says Olminsky, “an obligatory premise for
every member of the party, the official opinion of the party, its
continual and unchanging slogan right up to the February revolution of
1917, and even some time after.” In illustration Olminsky might have
referred to the fact that _Pravda_, even before Stalin and Kamenev –
that is under the “left” editorship, which included Olminsky himself,
declared on March 7, as though mentioning something that goes without
saying: “Of course there is no question among us of the downfall of the
rule of capital, but only of the downfall of the rule of autocracy and
feudalism.” From this too short aim resulted the March captivity of the
party to the bourgeois democracy. “Whence then the October revolution?”
asks the same author. “How did it happen that the party, from its
leaders to its rank-and-file members, so suddenly renounced everything
that it had regarded as fixed truth for almost two decades?”

Sukhanov, speaking as an enemy, raises the question differently. “How
did Lenin manage to outwit and conquer his Bolsheviks?” It is true that
Lenin’s victory within the party was not only complete, but was won in a
very short time. The party enemies indulged on this theme in a good deal
of irony as to the personal régime in the Bolshevik Party. Sukhanov
himself answers the question he had raised wholly in the heroic spirit:
“Lenin, the genius, was a historic authority – that is one side of it.
The other is that there was nobody and nothing in the party besides
Lenin. A few great generals without Lenin amounted to as little as a few
gigantic planets without the sun (I here omit Trotsky who was not then
within the ranks of the Order).” These curious lines attempt to explain
the influence of Lenin by his influentialness, as the capacity of opium
to produce sleep is explained by its soporific powers. Such an
explanation does not, of course, get us forward very far. Lenin’s actual
influence in the party was indubitably very great, but it was by no
means unlimited. It was still subject to appeal even later, after
October, when his authority had grown extraordinarily because the party
had measured his power with the yardstick of world events. So much the
more insufficient are these mere personal references to his authority in
April 1917, when the whole ruling group of the party had already taken
up a position contradictory to that of Lenin.

Olminsky comes much nearer to answering the question when he argues
that, in spite of its formula of bourgeois democratic revolution, the
party had in its whole policy toward the bourgeoisie and the democracy,
been for a long time actually preparing to lead the proletariat in a
direct struggle for power. “We (or at least many of us)” – says Olminsky
– “were unconsciously steering a course toward proletarian revolution,
although thinking we were steering a course toward a bourgeois
democratic revolution. In other words we were preparing the October
revolution while thinking we were preparing the February.” An extremely
valuable generalization, and at the same time the testimony of an
irreproachable witness!

In the theoretical education of the revolutionary party there had been
an element of contradiction, which had found its expression in the
equivocal formula “democratic dictatorship” of the proletariat and
peasantry. Speaking on the report of Lenin to the conference, a woman
delegate expressed the thought of Olminsky still more simply: “The
prognosis made by the Bolsheviks proved wrong, but their tactics were
right.”

In his April theses which seemed so paradoxical, Lenin was relying
against the old formula upon the living tradition of the party – its
irreconcilable attitude to the ruling classes and its hostility to all
half-way measures – whereas the “old Bolsheviks” were opposing a still
fresh although already outdated memory to the concrete development of
the class struggle. But Lenin had a too strong support prepared by the
whole historic struggle of the Bolsheviks against the Mensheviks. Here
it is suitable to remember that the official Social Democratic programme
was still at that time common to the Bolsheviks and the Mensheviks, that
the practical tasks of the democratic revolution looked the same on
paper to both parties. But they were by no means so in action. The
worker-Bolsheviks immediately after the revolution took the initiative
in the struggle for the eight hour day; the Mensheviks declared this
demand untimely. The Bolsheviks took the lead in arresting the czarist
officials; the Mensheviks opposed “excesses.” The Bolsheviks
energetically undertook the creation of a workers’ militia; the
Mensheviks delayed the arming of the workers, not wishing to quarrel
with the bourgeoisie. Although not yet overstepping the bounds of
bourgeois democracy, the Bolsheviks acted, or strove to act – however
confused by their leadership – like uncompromising revolutionists. The
Mensheviks sacrificed their democratic programme at every step in the
interests of a coalition with the liberals. In the complete absence of
democratic allies, Kamenev and Stalin inevitably hung in the air.

This April conflict between Lenin and the general staff of the party was
not the only one of its kind. Throughout the whole history of
Bolshevism, with the exception of some episodes which in essence only
confirm the rule, all the leaders of the party at all the most important
moments stood to the right of Lenin. This was not an accident. Lenin
became the unqualified leader of the most revolutionary party in the
world’s history, because his thought and will were really equal to the
demands of the gigantic revolutionary possibilities of the country and
the epoch. Others fell short by an inch or two, and often more.

Almost the whole ruling circle of the Bolshevik Party for months and
even years before the revolution had been outside the active work. Many
had carried away into jails and exile the oppressive recollections of
the first months of the war, and had lived through the wreck of the
International in solitude or in small groups. Although in the ranks of
the party they had manifested a sufficient receptivity to those thoughts
of revolution which had attracted them to Bolshevism, in isolation they
were not strong enough to resist the pressure of the surrounding milieu
and make an independent Marxist appraisal of events. The enormous shift
of opinion in the masses during the two and a half years of war had
remained almost outside their field of vision. Nevertheless the
revolution had not only dragged them out of their isolation, but
immediately placed them, thanks to their prestige, in a commanding
position in the party. They were often much closer in mood to the
“Zimmerwald” intelligentsia than to the revolutionary workers in the
factories.

The “Old Bolsheviks” – who pretentiously emphasised this appellation in
April 1917 – were condemned to defeat because they were defending
exactly that element of the party tradition which had not passed the
historic test. “I belong to the old Bolshevik Leninists,” said Kalinin,
for instance, at the Petrograd conference of April 14, “and I consider
that the old Leninism has not by any means proved good-for-nothing in
the present peculiar moment, and I am astonished at the declaration of
Comrade Lenin that the old Bolsheviks have become an obstacle at the
present moment.” Lenin had to listen to many such offended voices in
those days. However, in breaking with the traditional formula of the
party, Lenin did not in the least cease to be a “Leninist.” He threw off
the worn-out shell of Bolshevism in order to summon its nucleus to a new
life.

Against the old Bolsheviks Lenin found support in another layer of the
party already tempered, but more fresh and more closely united with the
masses. In the February revolution, as we know, the worker-Bolsheviks
played the decisive rôle. They thought it self-evident that that class
which had won the victory should seize the power. These same workers
protested stormily against the course of Kamenev and Stalin, and the
Vyborg district even threatened the “leaders” with expulsion from the
party. The same thing was to be observed in the provinces. Almost
everywhere there were left Bolsheviks accused of maximalism, even of
anarchism. These worker-revolutionists only lacked the theoretical
resources to defend their position. But they were ready to respond to
the first clear call. It was on this stratum of workers, decisively
risen to their feet during the upward years of 1912-14, that Lenin was
now banking. Already at the beginning of the war, when the government
dealt the party a heavy blow by arresting the Bolshevik faction of the
Duma, Lenin, speaking of the further revolutionary work, had demanded
the education by the party of “thousands of class conscious workers,
from among whom in spite of all difficulties a new staff of leaders will
arise.”

Although separated from these workers by two war fronts, and almost
without communication, Lenin had never lost touch with them. “Let the
war, jails, Siberia, hard labour, shatter them twice, ten times, you
cannot destroy that stratum. It is alive. It is imbued with
revolutionism and anti-chauvinism.”

In his mind Lenin had been living through the events along with these
worker-Bolsheviks, making with them the necessary inferences – only
broader and more boldly than they. In his struggle with the
indecisiveness of the staff and the broad officer layer of the party,
Lenin confidently relied on its under-officer layer which better
reflected the rank-and-file worker-Bolshevik.

The temporary strength of the social-patriots, and the hidden weakness
of the opportunist wing of the Bolsheviks, lay in the fact that the
former were basing themselves on the temporary prejudices and illusions
of the masses, and the latter were conforming themselves to these
temporary prejudices and illusions. The chief strength of Lenin lay in
his understanding the inner logic of the movement, and guiding his
policy by it. He did not impose his plan on the masses; he helped the
masses to recognize their own plan. When Lenin reduced all the problems
of the revolution to one – “patiently explain” – that meant it was
necessary to bring the consciousness of the masses into correspondence
with that situation into which the historic process had driven them. The
worker or the soldier, disappointed with the policy of the Compromisers,
had to be brought over to the position of Lenin and not left lingering
in the intermediate stage of Kamenev and Stalin.

Once the Leninist formulas were issued, they shed a new light for the
Bolsheviks upon the experience of the past months and of every new day.
In the broad party mass a quick differentiation took place – leftward
and leftward, toward the theses of Lenin. “District after district
adhered to them,” says Zalezhsky, “and by the time of the all-Russian
party conference on April 24, the Petersburg organization as a whole was
in favour of the theses.”

The struggle for the rearming of the Bolshevik ranks, begun on the
evening of April 3, was essentially finished by the end of the month.
The party conference, which met in Petrograd April 24-29, cast the
balance of March, a month of opportunist vacillations, and of April, a
month of sharp crisis. By that time the party had grown greatly, both
quantitatively and in a political sense. The 149 delegates represented
79,000 party members, of whom 15,000 lived in Petrograd. For a party
that had been illegal yesterday, and was today anti-patriotic, that was
an impressive number, and Lenin several times called attention to it
with satisfaction. The political physiognomy of the conference was
immediately defined by the election of a præsidium of five members. It
did not include either Kamenev or Stalin, the chief culprits of the
March misfortune.

Although for the party as a whole the debated questions were already
firmly decided, many of the leaders, still clinging to the past,
continued at this conference in opposition, or semi-opposition, to
Lenin. Stalin remained silent and waited. Dzerzhinsky, in the name of
“many,” who “did not agree in principle with the theses of the
spokesman,” demanded that a dissenting report be heard from “the
comrades who have along with us experienced the revolution in a
practical way.” This was an evident thrust at the emigrant character of
the Leninist theses. Kamenev did actually make a dissenting report in
defence of the bourgeois democratic dictatorship. Rykov, Tomsky,
Kalinin, tried to stand more or less by their March positions. Kalinin
continued to advocate a coalition with the Mensheviks in the interests
of the struggle with liberalism. The prominent Moscow party worker,
Smidovich, hotly complained in his speech that “every time we speak they
raise against us a certain bogey in the form of the theses of Comrade
Lenin.” Earlier, when the Moscow members were voting for the resolutions
of the Mensheviks, life had been a good deal more peaceful.

As a pupil of Rosa Luxemburg, Dzerzhinsky spoke against the right of
nations to self-determination, accusing Lenin of protecting separatist
tendencies which weakened the Russian proletariat. To Lenin’s answering
accusation of giving support to Great-Russian chauvinism, Dzerzhinsky
answered: “I can reproach him (Lenin) with standing at the point of view
of the Polish, Ukrainian and other chauvinists.” This dialogue is not
without a political piquancy: the Great-Russian Lenin accuses the Pole,
Dzerzhinsky, of Great-Russian chauvinism directed against the Poles, and
is accused by the latter of Polish chauvinism. Politically Lenin was in
the right in this quarrel. His policy on nationalities entered as a most
important constituent element into the October revolution.

The opposition was obviously on the wane. It did not muster more than
seven votes on the questions under debate. There was, however, one
curious and sharp exception, touching the international relations of the
party. At the very end of the conference, in the evening session of
April 29, Zinoviev introduced in the name of his commission a
resolution: “To take part in the international conference of
Zimmerwaldists designated for May 18 (at Stockholm).” The report says:
“Adopted by all votes against one.” That one was Lenin. He demanded a
break with Zimmerwald, where the majority had been decisively with the
German Independents and neutral pacifists of the type of the Swiss,
Grimm. But for the Russian circles of the party, Zimmerwald had during
the war become almost identified with Bolshevism. The delegates were not
yet ready to give up the name of Social Democrat or break with
Zimmerwald, which remained moreover in their eyes a bond with the masses
of the Second International.

Lenin tried at least to limit participation in the coming conference to
an attendance for informational purposes. Zinoviev spoke against him.
Lenin’s proposal was rejected. He then voted against the resolution as a
whole. Nobody supported him. That was the last splash of the “March”
tendency – a clinging to yesterday’s position, a fear of “isolation.”
The Stockholm Conference, however, was never held – a result of those
same inner diseases of Zimmerwald, which had led Lenin, to break with
it. His unanimously rejected policy of boycott was thus realised in
fact.

The abruptness of the turn in the policy of the party was obvious to
all. Schmidt, a worker-Bolshevik, afterward People’s Commissar of
Labour, said at the April conference: “Lenin gave a different direction
to the character of the work.” According to Raskolnikov – writing, to be
sure, several years later – Lenin in April 1917 “carried out an October
revolution in the consciousness of the party leaders ... The tactic of
our party is not a single straight line, but makes after the arrival of
Lenin a sharp jump to the left.” The old Bolshevik, Ludmila Stahl, more
directly and also more accurately appraised the change. “All the
comrades before the arrival of Lenin were wandering in the dark,” she
said, at the city conference on the 14th of April. “We know only the
formulas of 1905. Seeing the independent creative work of the people, we
could not teach them ... Our comrades could only limit themselves to
getting ready for the Constituent Assembly by parliamentary means, and
took no account of the possibility of going farther. In accepting the
slogans of Lenin we are now doing what life itself suggests to us. We
need not fear the Commune, and say that we already have a workers’
government; the Commune of Paris was not only a workers’, but also a
petty bourgeois government.” It is possible to agree with Sukhanov that
the rearming of the party “was the chief and fundamental victory of
Lenin completed by the first days of May.” Sukhanov, it is true thought
that Lenin in this operation substituted an anarchist for a Marxist
weapon.

It remains to ask – and this is no unimportant question, although easier
to ask than answer: How would the revolution have developed if Lenin had
not reached Russia in April 1917? If our exposition demonstrates and
proves anything at all, we hope it proves that Lenin was not a demiurge
of the revolutionary process, that he merely entered into a chain of
objective historic forces. But he was a great link in that chain. The
dictatorship of the proletariat was to be inferred from the whole
situation, but it had still to be established. It could not be
established without a party. The party could fulfil its mission only
after understanding it. For that Lenin was needed. Until his arrival,
not one of the Bolshevik leaders dared to make a diagnosis of the
revolution. The leadership of Kamenev and Stalin was tossed by the
course of events to the right, to the Social Patriots: between Lenin and
Menshevism the revolution left no place for intermediate positions.
Inner struggle in the Bolshevik Party was absolutely unavoidable.
Lenin’s arrival merely hastened the process. His personal influence
shortened the crisis. Is it possible, however, to say confidently that
the party without him would have found its road? We would by no means
make bold to say that. The factor of time is decisive here, and it is
difficult in retrospect to tell time historically. Dialectic materialism
at any rate has nothing in common with fatalism. Without Lenin the
crisis, which the opportunist leadership was inevitably bound to
produce, would have assumed an extraordinarily sharp and protracted
character. The conditions of war and revolution, however, would not
allow the party a long period for fulfilling its mission. Thus it is by
no means excluded that a disoriented and split party might have let slip
the revolutionary opportunity for years. The rôle of personality arises
before us here on a truly gigantic scale. It is necessary only to
understand that rôle correctly, taking personality as a link in the
historic chain.

The “sudden” arrival of Lenin from abroad after a long absence, the
furious cry raised by the press around his name, his clash with all the
leaders of his own party and his quick victory over them – in a word,
the external envelope of circumstance – make easy in this case a
mechanical contrasting of the person, the hero, the genius, against the
objective conditions, the mass, the party. In reality, such a contrast
is completely one-sided. Lenin was not an accidental element in the
historic development, but a product of the whole past of Russian
history. He was embedded in it with deepest roots. Along with the
vanguard of the workers, he had lived through their struggle in the
course of the preceding quarter century. The “accident” was not his
interference in the events, but rather that little straw with which
Lloyd George tried to block his path. Lenin did not oppose the party
from outside, but was himself its most complete expression. In educating
it he had educated himself in it. His divergence from the ruling circles
of the Bolsheviks meant the struggle of the future of the party against
its past. If Lenin had not been artificially separated from the party by
the conditions of emigration and war, the external mechanics of the
crisis would not have been so dramatic, and would not have overshadowed
to such a degree the inner continuity of the party’s development. From
the extraordinary significance which Lenin’s arrival received, it should
only be inferred that leaders are not accidentally created, that they
are gradually chosen out and trained up in the course of decades, that
they cannot be capriciously replaced, that their mechanical exclusion
from the struggle gives the party a living wound, and in many cases may
paralyse it for a long period.



CHAPTER 17 THE “APRIL DAYS”


 

On the 23rd of March the United States entered the war. On that day
Petrograd was burying the victims of the February revolution. The
funeral procession – in its mood a procession triumphant with the joy of
life – was a mighty concluding chord in the symphony of the five days.
Everybody went to the funeral: both those who had fought side by side
with the victims, and those who had held them back from battle, very
likely also those who killed them – and above all, those who had stood
aside from the fighting. Along with workers, soldiers, and the small
city people here were students, ministers, ambassadors, the solid
bourgeois, journalists, orators, leaders of all the parties. The red
coffins carried on the shoulders of workers and soldiers streamed in
from the workers’ districts to Mars Field. When the coffins were lowered
into the grave there sounded from Peter and Paul fortress the first
funeral salute, startling the innumerable masses of the people. That
cannon had a new sound: our cannon, our salute. The Vyborg section
carried fifty-one red coffins. That was only a part of the victims it
was proud of. In the procession of the Vyborg workers, the most compact
of all, numerous Bolshevik banners were to be seen, but they floated
peacefully beside other banners. On Mars Field itself there stood only
the members of the government, of the Soviet, and the State Duma –
already dead but stubbornly evading its own funeral. All day long no
less than 800,000 people filed past the grave with bands and banners.
And although, according to preliminary reckonings by the highest
military authorities, a human mass of that size could not possibly pass
a given point without the most appalling chaos and fatal whirlpools,
nevertheless the demonstration was carried out in complete order – a
thing to be observed generally in revolutionary processions, dominated
as they are by a satisfying consciousness of a great deed achieved,
combined with a hope that everything will grow better and better in the
future. It was only this feeling that kept order, for organisation was
still weak, inexperienced and unconfident of itself. The very fact of
the funeral was, it would seem, a sufficient refutation of the myth of a
bloodless revolution. But nevertheless the mood prevailing at the
funeral recreated, to some extent the atmosphere of those first days
when the legend was born.

Twenty-five days later – during which time the soviets had gained much
experience and self-confidence – occurred the May 1 celebration. (May 1
according to the Western calendar – April 18 old style.) All the cities
of Russia were drowned in meetings and demonstrations. Not only the
industrial enterprises, but the state, city and rural public
institutions were closed. In Moghilev, the headquarters of the General
Staff, the Cavaliers of St. George marched at the head of the
procession. The members of the staff – unremoved czarist generals –
marched under May 1 banners. The holiday of proletarian anti-militarism
blended with revolution-tinted manifestations of patriotism. The
different strata of the population contributed their own quality to the
holiday, but all flowed together into a whole, very loosely held
together and partly false, but on the whole majestic. In both capitals
and in the industrial centres the workers dominated the celebration, and
amid them the strong nuclei of Bolshevism stood out distinctly with
banners, placards, speeches and shouts. Across the immense facade of the
Mariinsky Palace, the refuge of the Provisional Government, was
stretched a bold red streamer with the words: “Long Live the Third
International!” The authorities, not yet rid of their administrative
shyness, could not make up their mind to remove this disagreeable and
alarming streamer. Everybody, it seemed, was celebrating. So far as it
could, the army at the front celebrated. News came of meetings,
speeches, banners and revolutionary songs in the trenches, and there
were responses from the German side.

The war had not yet come to an end; on the contrary it had only widened
its circle. A whole continent had recently – on the very day of the
funeral of the martyrs – joined the war and given it a new scope. Yet
meanwhile throughout Russia, side by side with soldiers, war-prisoners
were taking part in the processions under the same banners, sometimes
singing the same song in different languages. In this immeasurable
rejoicing, obliterating like a spring flood the delineations of classes,
parties and ideas, that common demonstration of Russian soldiers with
Austro-German war-prisoners was a vivid hope-giving fact which made it
possible to believe that the revolution, in spite of all, did carry
within itself the foundation of a better world.

Like the March funeral, the 1st of May celebration passed off without
clashes or casualties as an “all-national festival.” However, an
attentive ear might have caught already among the ranks of the workers
and soldiers impatient and even threatening notes. It was becoming
harder and harder to live. Prices had risen alarmingly; the workers were
demanding a minimum wage; the bosses were resisting; the number of
conflicts in the factories was continually growing; the food situation
was getting worse; bread rations were being cut down; cereal cards had
been introduced; dissatisfaction in the garrison had grown. The district
staff, making ready to bridle the soldiers, was removing the more
revolutionary units from Petrograd. At a general assembly of the
garrison on April 17 the soldiers, sensing these hostile designs, had
raised the question of putting a stop to the removal of troops. That
demand will continue to arise in the future, taking a more and more
decisive form with every new crisis of the revolution. But the root of
all evils was the war, of which no end was to be seen. When will the
revolution bring peace? What are Kerensky and Tseretelli waiting for?
The masses were listening more and more attentively to the Bolsheviks,
glancing at them obliquely, waitingly, some with half-hostility, others
already with trust. Underneath the triumphal discipline of the
demonstration the mood was tense. There was ferment in the masses.

However, nobody – not even the authors of the streamer on the Mariinsky
Palace – imagined that the very next two or three days would ruthlessly
tear off the envelope of national unity from the revolution. The
menacing event whose inevitability many foresaw, but which no one
expected so soon, was suddenly upon them. The stimulus was given by the
foreign policy of the Provisional Government, i.e., the problem of war.
No other than Miliukov touched the match to the fuse.

The history of that match and fuse is as follows: On the day of
America’s entry into the war, the Minister of Foreign Affairs of the
Provisional Government, greatly encouraged, developed his programme
before the journalists: seizure of Constantinople, seizure of Armenia,
division of Austria and Turkey, seizure of Northern Persia, and over and
above all this, the right of nations to self-determination. “In all his
speeches” – thus the historian Miliukov explains Miliukov the minister –
“he decisively emphasised the pacifist aims of the war of liberation,
but always presented them in close union with the national problems and
interests of Russia.” This interview disquieted the listeners, “When
will the foreign policy of the Provisional Government cleanse itself of
hypocrisy?” stormed the Menshevik paper. “Why does not the Provisional
Government demand from the Allied governments an open and decisive
renunciation of annexations?” What these people considered hypocrisy,
was the frank language of the predatory. In a pacifist disguise of such
appetites they were quite ready to see a liberation from all hypocrisy.
Frightened by the stirring of the democracy, Kerensky hastened to
announce through the press bureau: “Miliukov’s programme is merely his
personal opinion.” That the author of this personal opinion happened to
be the Minister of Foreign Affairs was, if you please, a mere accident.

Tseretelli, who had a talent for solving every question with a
commonplace, began to insist on the necessity of a governmental
announcement that for Russia the war was exclusively one of defence. The
resistance of Miliukov and to some extent of Guchkov was broken, and on
March 27 the government gave birth to a declaration to the effect that
“the goal of free Russia is not domination over other peoples, nor
depriving them of their national heritage, nor violent seizure of alien
territory,” but “nevertheless complete observance of the obligations
undertaken to our Allies.” Thus the kings and the prophets of the
two-power system proclaimed their intention to enter into the Kingdom of
Heaven in union with patricides and adulterers, Those gentlemen, besides
everything else that they lacked, lacked a sense of humour. That
declaration of March 27 was welcomed not only by the entire
Compromisers’ press, but even by the _Pravda_ of Kamenev and Stalin,
which said in its leading editorial four days before Lenin’s arrival:
“The Provisional Government has clearly and definitely announced before
the whole people that the aim of Russia is not the domination of other
nations,” etc., etc. The English press immediately and with satisfaction
interpreted Russia’s renunciation of annexations as her renunciation of
Constantinople, by no means intending of course to extend this formula
of renunciation to herself. The Russian ambassador in London sounded the
alarm, and demanded an explanation from Moscow to the effect that “the
principle of peace without annexations is to be applied by Russia not
unconditionally, but in so far as it does not oppose our vital
interests.” But that, of course, was exactly the formula of Miliukov:
“We promise not to rob anybody whom we don’t need to.” Paris, in
contrast to London, not only supported Miliukov but urged him on,
suggesting through Paléologue the necessity of a more vigorous policy
toward the Soviet.

The French Premier, Ribot, out of patience with the terrible red tape at
Petrograd, asked London and Rome “Whether they did not consider it
necessary to demand of the Provisional Government that they put an end
to all equivocation.” London answered that it would be wise “to give the
French and English socialists, who had been sent to Russia, time to
influence their colleagues.”

The sending of allied socialists into Russia had been undertaken on the
initiative of the Russian Staff – that is, the old czarist generals. “We
counted upon him,” wrote Ribot of Albert Thomas, “to give a certain
firmness to the decisions of the Provisional Government.” Miliukov
complained, however, that Thomas associated too closely with the leaders
of the Soviet. Ribot answered that Thomas “is sincerely striving” to
support the point of view of Miliukov, but nevertheless promised to urge
his ambassador to a more active support.

The declaration of March 27, although totally empty, disquieted the
Allies, who saw in it a concession to the Soviet. From London came
threats of a loss of faith “in the military power of Russia.” Paléologue
complained of “the timidity and indefiniteness” of the declaration. But
that was just what Miliukov needed. In the hope of help from the Allies,
Miliukov had embarked on a big game, far exceeding his resources. His
fundamental idea was to use the war against the revolution, and the
first task upon this road was to demoralise the democracy. But the
Compromisers had begun just in the first days of April to reveal an
increasing nervousness and fussiness upon questions of foreign policy,
for upon these questions the lower classes were unceasingly pressing
them. The government needed a loan. But the masses, with all their
defensism, were ready to defend a peace loan but not a war loan. It was
necessary to give them at least a peep at the prospect of peace.

Developing his policy of salvation by commonplaces, Tseretelli proposed
that they demand from the Provisional Government that it despatch a note
to the Allies similar to the domestic declaration of March 27. In return
for this, the Executive Committee would undertake to carry through the
Soviet a vote for the “Liberty Loan.” Miliukov agreed to the exchange –
the note for the loan – but decided to make a double use of the bargain.
Under the guise of interpreting the declaration, his note disavowed it.
It urged that the peace-loving phrases of the government should not give
anyone “the slightest reason to think that the revolution which had
occurred entailed a weakening of the rôle of Russia in the common
struggle of the Allies. Quite the contrary – the universal desire to
carry the world war through to a decisive victory had only been
strengthened.” The note further expressed confidence that the victors
“will find a means to attain those _guarantees and sanctions_, which are
necessary for the prevention of new bloody conflicts in the future.”
That word about “guarantees and sanctions,” introduced at the insistence
of Thomas, meant nothing less in the thieves’ jargon of diplomacy,
especially French, than annexations and indemnities. On the day of the
May 1 celebration Miliukov telegraphed his note, composed at the
dictation of Allied diplomats, to the governments of the Entente. And
only after this was it sent to the Executive Committee, and
simultaneously to the newspapers. The government had ignored the Contact
Commission, and the leaders of the Executive Committee found themselves
in the position of everyday citizens. Even had the Compromisers found in
the note nothing they had not heard from Miliukov before, they could not
help seeing in this a premeditated hostile act. The note disarmed them
before the masses, and demanded from them a direct choice between
Bolshevism and imperialism. Was not this in fact Miliukov's purpose?
Everything points in that direction, and suggests indeed that his design
went even farther. Already in March Miliukov had been trying with all
his might to resurrect that ill-fated plan for the seizure of the
Dardanelles by a Russian raid, and had carried on many conversations
with General Alexeiev, urging him to carry out the operation – which
would in Miliukov’s calculations place the democracy with its protest
against annexations before an accomplished fact. Miliukov’s note of
April 18 was a similar raid upon the ill-defended coastlines of the
democracy, The two acts – military and political – supplemented each
other, and in case of success would have justified each other. Generally
speaking, one does not condemn a victor. But Miliukov was not destined
to be a victor. Two to three hundred thousand troops were needed for the
raid, and the plan fell through because of a mere detail: the refusal of
the soldiers. They agreed to defend the revolution, but not to take the
offensive, Miliukov’s attempt upon the Dardanelles came to nothing, and
that broke down all his further plans. But it must be confessed that
they were not badly worked out – provided he won.

On April 17 there took place in Petrograd the patriotic nightmare
demonstration of the war invalids. An enormous number of wounded from
the hospitals of the capital, legless, armless, bandaged, advanced upon
the Tauride Palace. Those who could not walk were carried in automobile
trucks. The banners read: “War to the end.” That was a demonstration of
despair from the human stumps of the imperialist war, wishing that the
revolution should not acknowledge that their sacrifice had been in vain.
But the Kadet Party stood behind the demonstration, or rather Miliukov
stood behind it, getting ready his great blow for the following day.

At a special night session of the 19th, the Executive Committee
discussed the note sent the day before to the Allied governments. “After
the first reading.” relates Stankevich, “it was unanimously and without
debate acknowledged by all that this was not at all what the Committee
had expected.” But responsibility for the note had been assumed by the
government as a whole, including Kerensky. Consequently, it was
necessary first of all to save the government. Tseretelli began to
“decode” the note, which had never been coded, and to discover in it
more and more merits. Skobelev profoundly reasoned that in general it is
impossible to demand “a complete coincidence of the aims of the
democracy with that of the government.” The wise men harried themselves
until dawn, but found no solution. They dispersed in the morning only to
meet again after a few hours. Apparently they were counting upon time to
heal all wounds.

In the morning the note appeared in all the papers. _Rech_ commented
upon it in a spirit of carefully prepared provocation. The Socialist
Press expressed itself with great excitement. The Menshevik _Rabochaia
Gazeta_, not yet having succeeded like Tseretelli and Skobelev in
freeing itself from the vapours of the night’s indignation, wrote that
the Provisional Government had published “a document which is a mockery
of the democracy,” and demanded from the Soviet decisive measures “to
prevent its disastrous consequences.” The growing pressure of the
Bolsheviks was very clearly felt in those phrases.

The Executive Committee resumed its sitting, but only in order once more
to convince itself of its incapacity to arrive at a solution. It
resolved to summon a special plenary session of the Soviet “for purposes
of information” – in reality for the purpose of feeling out the amount
of dissatisfaction in the lower ranks, and to gain time for its own
vacillations. In the meantime all kinds of contact sessions were
suggested with the aim of bringing the whole agitation to nothing.

But amid all this ritual diddling of the double sovereignty, a third
power unexpectedly intervened. The masses came out with arms in their
hands. Among the bayonets of the soldiers glimmered the letters on a
streamer: “Down with Miliukov!” On other streamers Guchkov figured in
the same way. In these indignant processions it was hard to recognise
the demonstrators of May 1.

Historians call this movement “spontaneous” in the conditional sense
that no party took the initiative in it. The immediate summons to the
streets was given by a certain Linde, who therewith inscribed his name
in the history of the revolution. “Scholar, mathematician, philosopher,”
Linde was a non-party man – for the revolution with all his heart and
earnestly desirous that it should fulfil its promise. Miliukov’s note
and the comments of _Rech_ had aroused him. “Taking counsel with no
one,” says his biographer, “he acted at once, went straight to the
Finland regiment, assembled its committee and proposed that they march
immediately as a whole regiment to the Mariinsky Palace ... Linde’s
proposal was accepted, and at three o’clock in the afternoon a
significant demonstration of the Finlanders was marching through the
streets of Petrograd with challenging placards.” After the Finland
regiment came the soldiers of the 180th Reserve, the Moscow regiment,
the Pavlovsky, the Keksgolmsky, the sailors of the 2nd Baltic fleet. The
commotion spread to the workers' district; work stopped and whole
factories came out into the streets after the soldiers.

“The majority of the soldiers did not know why they had come,” affirms
Miliukov, as though he had asked them. “Besides the troops, boy workers
took part in the demonstration, loudly (!) proclaiming that they were
paid ten to fifteen roubles for doing it.” The source of this money is
also clear: “The idea of removing the two ministers (Miliukov and
Guchkov) was directly inspired from Germany.” Miliukov offered this
profound explanation not in the heat of the April struggle, but three
years after the October events had abundantly demonstrated to him that
nobody had to pay a high wage for the people’s hatred of Miliukov.

The unexpected sharpness of the April demonstration is explained by the
directness of the mass reaction to deceit from above. “Until the
government achieves peace, it is necessary to be on our guard.” That was
spoken without enthusiasm, but with conviction. It had been assumed
that, up above, everything was being done to bring peace. The
Bolsheviks, to be sure, were asserting that the government wanted the
war prolonged for the sake of robberies. But could that be possible? How
about Kerensky? We have known the Soviet leaders since February. They
were the first to come to us in the barracks. They are for peace.
Moreover, Lenin came straight from Berlin, whereas Tseretelli was at
hard labour. We must be patient ... Meanwhile the progressive factories
and regiments were more and more firmly adopting the Bolshevik slogans
of a peace policy: publication of the secret treaties; break with the
plans of conquest of the Entente; open proposal of immediate peace to
all warring countries. The note of April 18 fell among these complex and
wavering moods. How can this be? They are not for peace up there after
all, but for the old war aims? All our patience and waiting for nothing?
Down with ... but down with whom? Can the Bolsheviks be right? Hardly.
But what about this note? It means that somebody is selling our hides,
all right, to the czar’s allies. From a simple comparison of the press
of the Kadets and the Compromisers, it could be read that Miliukov,
betraying the general confidence, was intending to carry on a policy of
conquest in company with Lloyd George and Ribot. And yet Kerensky had
declared that the attempt upon Constantinople was “the personal opinion
of Miliukov.” ... That was how this movement flared up.

But it was not homogeneous. Certain hot-headed elements among the
revolutionists greatly overestimated the volume and political maturity
of the movement, because it had broken out so sharply and suddenly. The
Bolsheviks developed an energetic campaign among the troops and in the
factories. They supplemented the demand to “remove Miliukov,” which was,
so to speak, a programme-minimum of the movement, with placards against
the Provisional Government as a whole. But different elements understood
this differently: some as slogans of propaganda, others as the task of
the day. The slogan carried into the streets by the armed soldiers and
sailors: “Down with the Provisional Government!” inevitably introduced
into the demonstration a strain of armed insurrection. Considerable
groups of workers and soldiers were quite ready to shake down the
Provisional Government right then and there. They made an attempt to
enter the Mariinsky Palace, occupy its exits, and arrest the ministers.
Skobelev was delegated to rescue the ministers, and he fulfilled his
mission the more successfully in that the Mariinsky Palace happened to
be unoccupied.

In consequence of Guchkov’s illness, the government had met that day in
his private apartment. But it was not the accident which saved the
ministers from arrest; they were not seriously threatened. That army of
25,000 to 30,000 soldiers, which had come into the streets for a
struggle with the prolongers of the war, was plenty enough to do away
with a far solider government than that headed by Prince Lvov, but the
demonstrators had not set themselves this goal. All they really intended
was to show their fist at the window, so that these high gentlemen
should cease sharpening their teeth for Constantinople and get busy as
they should about the question of peace. In this way the soldiers hoped
to help Kerensky and Tseretelli against Miliukov.

General Kornilov attended that sitting of the government, reported the
armed demonstrations which were taking place, and declared that as the
commander of the troops of the Petrograd military district he had at his
disposition sufficient forces, to put down the disturbance with a mailed
fist: he merely awaited the command. Kolchak, who happened accidentally
to be present, related afterwards, at the trial which preceded his
execution, that Prince Lvov and Kerensky spoke against the, attempt to
put down the demonstration with military force. Miliukov did not express
himself directly, but summed up the situation by saying that the
honourable ministers might of course reason as they wished, but their
decision would not prevent their removal to prison. There is no doubt
whatever that Kornilov was acting in agreement with the Kadet centre.

The Compromise leaders had no difficulty in persuading the soldier
demonstrators to withdraw from the square before the Mariinsky Palace,
and even go back to their barracks. The commotion which had overflowed
the city, however, did not recede to its banks. Crowds gathered,
meetings assembled, they wrangled at street corners, the crowds in the
tramways divided into partisans and opponents of Miliukov. On the Nevsky
and adjoining streets, bourgeois orators waged an agitation against
Lenin – sent from Germany to overthrow the great patriot Miliukov. In
the suburbs and workers’ districts the Bolsheviks tried to extend the
indignation aroused against the note and its author to the government as
a whole.

At seven in the evening the plenum of the Soviet assembled. The leaders
did not know what to say to that audience, quivering with tense passion.
Cheidze explained to them at great length that after the session there
was to be a meeting with the Provisional Government. Chernov tried to
scare them with the approach of civil war. Feodorov, the metal worker, a
member of the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks, replied that the
civil war was already here, that what the soviets ought to do was to
rely upon it and seize the power in their hands. “Those were new and at
that time terrible words,” writes Sukhanov. “They hit the very centre of
the prevailing mood and received a response such as the Bolsheviks had
never met in the Soviet before, and did not meet for a long time after.”

The pivot of the conference, however, was an unexpected speech by
Kerensky’s favourite, the liberal socialist, Stankevich: “Comrades,” he
asked, “why should we take any ‘action’ at all? Against whom marshal our
forces? The sole power that exists is you and the masses which stand
behind you ... Look there! It is now five minutes to seven.” –
(Stankevich pointed his finger to the clock on the wall, and the whole
assembly turned in that direction) – “Resolve that the Provisional
Government does not exist, that it has resigned. We will communicate
this by telephone, and in five minutes it will surrender its authority.
Why all this talk about violence, demonstrations, civil war?” Loud
applause. Elated shouts. The orator wanted to frighten the soviets with
an extreme inference from the existing situation, but frightened himself
with the effect of his own speech. That unexpected truth about the power
of the Soviet lifted the assembly above the wretched pottering of its
leaders, whose main occupation was to prevent the Soviet from arriving
at any decision. “Who will take the place of the government?” An orator
replied to the applause. “We? But our hands tremble ...” That was an
incomparable characterisation of the compromisers – high and mighty
leaders with trembling hands.

Prime Minister Lvov, as though to supplement Stankevich from the other
side, made the next day the following announcement: “Up till now the
Provisional Government has received unwavering support from the ruling
organ of the Soviet. For the last two weeks ... the government has been
under suspicion. In these circumstances ... it is best for the
Provisional Government to withdraw.” We see again what was the real
constitution of the February revolution!

The meeting of the Executive Committee with the Provisional Government
took place in the Mariinsky Palace. Prince Lvov in an introductory
speech regretted the campaign undertaken by the socialist circles
against the government, and half offendedly, half threateningly, spoke
of resignation. The ministers described in turn the difficulties which
they had assisted with all their might to accumulate. Miliukov, turning
his back to all this “contact” oratory, spoke from the balcony to a
Kadet demonstration. “Seeing those placards with the inscription ‘Down
with Miliukov!’ ... I did not fear for Miliukov, I feared for Russia.”
Thus the historian Miliukov reports the modest words which the minister
Miliukov pronounced before the crowds assembled in the square.
Tseretelli demanded from the government a new note. Chernov found a
brilliant solution, proposing that Miliukov go over to the Ministry of
Public Education. Constantinople as a topic in geography would at any
rate be less dangerous than as a topic in diplomacy. Miliukov, however,
categorically refused both to return to science, and to write a new
note. The leaders of the Soviet did not need much persuasion, and agreed
to an “explanation” of the old note. It remained to find a few phrases
whose falsity should be sufficiently oiled over with democraticness, and
the situation might be considered saved – and with it Miliukov’s
portfolio.

But the restless third power would not be quiet. The 21st of April
brought a new wave of commotion, more powerful than yesterday’s. Today
the Petrograd Committee of the Bolsheviks had called for the
demonstration. In spite of the counter-agitation of the Mensheviks and
Social Revolutionaries, immense masses of workers advanced to the centre
from the Vyborg side, and later too from other districts. The Executive
Committee sent to meet the demonstrators their most authoritative
pacifiers with Cheidze at the head. But the workers firmly intended to
speak their word – and they had a word to speak. A well-known liberal
journalist described in _Rech_ this demonstration of workers on the
Nevsky: “About a hundred armed men marched in front; after them solid
phalanxes of unarmed men and women, a thousand strong. Living chains on
both sides. Songs. Their faces amazed me. All those thousands had but
one face, the stunned ecstatic face of the early Christian monks.
Implacable, pitiless, ready for murder, inquisition and death.” The
liberal journalist had looked the workers, revolution in the eye and
felt for a second its intense determination. How little those phalanxes
resembled Miliukov’s “boy-workers” hired by Ludendorff at fifteen
roubles a day!

Today as yesterday the demonstrators did not come out to overthrow the
government, although a majority of them, we may guess, had already
seriously thought about this problem, and a part were ready even today
to carry the demonstration far beyond the bounds of the majority mood.
Cheidze asked the demonstration to turn round and go back to its
districts. But the leaders sternly answered that the workers themselves
knew what to do. This was a new note – and Cheidze would have to get
used to it in the course of the next few weeks.

While the Compromisers were persuading and hushing up, the Kadets were
challenging and inflaming. In spite of the fact that Kornilov had not
yesterday been authorised to employ firearms, he not only had not
abandoned the plan, but on the contrary was all this day from early
morning getting ready to oppose the demonstrators with cavalry and
artillery. Firmly counting on the boldness of the generals, the Kadets
had issued a special handbill summoning their partisans to the streets,
clearly intending to carry matters to the point of a decisive conflict.
Although failing of his raid on the Dardanelles coastline, Miliukov
continued his general offensive, with Kornilov in the capacity of
advance guard and the Entente as heavy reserves. The note despatched
behind the back of the Soviet, and the editorial in _Rech_, were to
serve the liberal Chancellor of the February revolution in the rôle of
the Ems despatch. “All who stand for Russia and her freedom must unite
round the Provisional Government and support it.” Thus read the appeal
of the Kadet Central Committee, inviting all good citizens into the
street for the struggle against the advocates of immediate peace.

The Nevsky, the chief artery of the bourgeoisie, was converted into a
solid Kadet meeting. A considerable demonstration headed by the members
of the Kadet Central Committee marched to the Mariinsky Palace.
Everywhere could be seen brand-new placards, fresh from the
sign-painters: “Full Confidence to the Provisional Government!” “Long
Live Miliukov!” The ministers looked like guests of honour. They had
their own “people”, and this the more noticeably since emissaries of the
Soviet were doing their utmost to help them, dispersing revolutionary
meetings, steering workers’ and soldiers’ demonstrations toward the
suburbs, and restraining the barracks and factories from going out.
Under the flag of defence of the government, the first open and broad
mobilisation of counter-revolutionary forces took place. In the centre
of the town appeared trucks with armed officers, cadets and students.
The Cavaliers of St. George were sent out. The gilded youth organised a
mock trial on the Nevsky, establishing on the spot the existence both of
Leninists and of “German spies.” There were skirmishes and casualties.
The first bloody encounter began, according to reports, with an attempt
of officers to snatch from the workers a banner with a slogan against
the Provisional Government. The encounters became more and more fierce;
shots were interchanged, and towards afternoon they became almost
continuous. Nobody knew exactly who was shooting or why, but there were
already victims of this disorderly shooting, partly malicious, partly
the result of panic. The temperature was reaching red heat.

No, that day was not in the least like a manifestation of national
unity. Two worlds stood face to face. The patriotic columns called into
the streets against the workers and soldiers by the Kadet Party
consisted exclusively of the bourgeois layers of the population –
officers, officials, intelligentsia. Two human floods – one for
Constantinople, one for Peace – had issued from different parts of the
town. Different in social composition, not a bit similar in external
appearance, and with hostile inscriptions on their placards, as they
clashed together they brought into play fists, clubs, and even firearms.

The unexpected news reached the Executive Committee that Kornilov was
moving cannon into the Palace Square. Was this independent initiative on
the part of the commander? The character and further career of Kornilov
testify that somebody was always leading that brave general by the nose
– a function fulfilled on this occasion by the Kadet leaders. It was
only because they counted on the interference of Kornilov, and in order
to make this interference necessary, that they had summoned their masses
into the street. One of the younger historians has correctly remarked
that Kornilov’s attempt to draw away the military schools to Palace
Square coincided, not with the moment of real or pretended necessity to
defend the Mariinsky Palace from a hostile crowd, but with the moment of
highest pitch of the Kadet manifestation.

The Miliukov-Kornilov plan went to pieces, however, and very
ignominiously. However naïve the leaders of the Executive Committee may
have been, they could not fail to understand that their own heads were
in question. Even before the first news of bloody encounters on the
Nevsky, the Executive Committee had sent to all the military units of
Petersburg and its environs telegraphic instructions not to leave the
barracks without orders from the Soviet – not one detachment to the
streets of the capital. Now, when the intentions of Kornilov became
evident, the Executive Committee, contradicting all its solemn
declarations, put both hands to the helm, not only demanding of the
commander that he immediately send back the troops, but also
commissioning Skobelev and Filipovsky to send back those which had come
out in the name of the Soviet. “Except upon a summons from the Executive
Committee in these alarming days, do not come out on the streets with
arms in your hands. _To the Executive Committee alone belongs the right
to command you._” Thereafter every order for the despatch of troops had,
besides the customary formalities, to be issued on an official paper of
the Soviet and countersigned by no less than two persons authorised for
this purpose. It seemed that the Soviet had unequivocally interpreted
Kornilov’s act as an attempt on the part of the counter-revolution to
create a civil war. But, although by its order it reduced to nothing the
commandership of the district, the Executive Committee never thought of
removing Kornilov himself. How could one think of violating the
prerogatives of the government? “Their hands trembled.” The young régime
was wrapped up in fictions like a patient in pillows and compresses.
From the point of view of the correlation of forces, most instructive is
the fact that not only the Military units, but also the officers’
schools, even before receiving the order of Cheidze, refused to go out
without the sanction of the Soviet. These unpleasantnesses, not foreseen
by the Kadets, dropping upon them one after another, were inevitable
consequences of the fact that the Russian bourgeoisie up to the time of
the national revolution had been an anti-national class. That could be
concealed for a short time by the dual power, but could not be
corrected.

The April crisis apparently was coming to nothing. The Executive
Committee had succeeded in holding back the masses on the threshold of
the dual power. On its side, the grateful government explained that by
“guarantees” and “sanctions” was to be understood world courts,
limitation of armaments and all admirable things. The Executive
Committee hastily seized upon these terminological concessions, and by a
majority of 34 against 19 voted the matter adjusted. In order to quiet
their alarmed ranks, the majority also adopted the following resolution:
Our control of the activities of the Provisional Government must be
strengthened; without previously informing the Executive Committee no
important political steps must be taken; the diplomatic personnel must
be radically changed. The double sovereignty which had existed in fact
was thus translated into the juridical language of a constitution. But
this changed nothing in the nature of things. The left wing could not
even secure from the compromising majority the resignation of Miliukov.
Everything must remain as before. Over the Provisional Government hung
the far more effective control of the Entente, which the Executive
Committee did not dare to touch.

On the evening of the 21st the Petrograd Soviet cast up its balance.
Tseretelli reported on the fresh victory of the wise leadership, which
had put an end to all false interpretations of the note of March 27.
Kamenev, in the name of the Bolsheviks, proposed the formation of a
purely soviet government. Kollantai, a popular revolutionist who had
come over during the war from the Mensheviks to the Bolsheviks, proposed
a referendum throughout all the districts of Petrograd and its environs
on the desirability of this provisional government or another. But these
proposals hardly entered into the consciousness of the Soviet: the
question, it seemed, was adjusted. The solacing resolution of the
Executive Committee was adopted by an enormous majority against 18. To
be sure, a majority of the Bolshevik deputies were then still in their
factories, on the streets, or attending demonstrations. But nevertheless
it remains indubitable that in the central mass of the Soviet there was
not any move to the side of the Bolsheviks.

The Soviet directed all to refrain for two days from any street
demonstrations. This resolution was adopted unanimously. Nobody had a
shadow of doubt that all would submit to the decision. And as a fact the
workers, the soldiers, the bourgeois youth, the Vyborg side, the Nevsky
Prospect – no one at all dared to disobey the order of the Soviet.
Tranquillity was attained without any forcible measures whatever. The
Soviet had only to feel itself master of the situation and it would have
been so in fact.

Into the editorial offices of the left papers in those days poured many
scores of factory and regimental resolutions demanding the immediate
resignation of Miliukov, and sometimes of the whole Provisional
Government. And not only Petrograd surged up. In Moscow too the workers
abandoned the shops, and the soldiers issued from the barracks, filling
the streets with stormy protests. Telegrams poured in to the Executive
Committee from scores of local soviets, opposing the policy of Miliukov
and promising full support to the Soviet. The same voices came from the
front. But all was to remain as before.

“During April 21,” asserted Miliukov later, “a mood favourable to the
government again took possession of the streets.” He evidently had in
mind those streets which he had an opportunity to view from the balcony
after the majority of the workers and soldiers had gone home. As an
actual fact, the government had been completely shown up. There was no
serious force behind it. We have just heard this from the lips of
Stankevich and Prince Lvov himself. What did Kornilov’s assurance that
he had sufficient forces to put down the rebels mean? Nothing whatever
except the extreme light-mindedness of the respected general. This
light-mindedness will reach its highest bloom in August, when the
conspirator Kornilov will deploy against Petrograd a non-existent army.
The trouble was that Kornilov was still trying to judge the troops by
the commanding staff. The officers, a majority of them, were indubitably
with him – that is, they were ready, under the pretext of defending the
Provisional Government, to smash the ribs of the Soviet. The soldiers
stood for the Soviet, being very much farther to the left than the
Soviet itself. But inasmuch as the Soviet stood for the Provisional
Government, it happened that Kornilov was able to bring out in its
defence Soviet soldiers commanded by reactionary officers. Thanks to the
two-power régime, they were all playing hide and seek with one another.
However, the leaders of the Soviet had hardly issued the command to the
troops not to leave their barracks, when Kornilov found himself hanging
in the air along with the whole Provisional Government.

And yet the government did not fall. The masses who had made the attack
were totally unready to carry it through, to the end. The Compromise
leaders were thus still able to try to turn back the February régime to
its original position. Having forgotten, or desiring to make others
forget, that the Executive Committee had been openly compelled in
opposition to the “legally constituted” authorities to lay its hands on
the army, the _Izvestia_ of the Soviet complained on April 22: “The
Soviet did not aspire to seize the power in its own hands, but
nevertheless upon many banners carried by the partisans of the Soviet
there were inscriptions demanding the overthrow of the government and
the transfer of all power to the Soviet.” ... Is it not indeed
exasperating that the workers and soldiers had tried to tempt the
Compromisers with power – that is, had seriously imagined these
gentlemen capable of making a revolutionary use of it?

No, the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks did not want the power. As
we saw, the Bolshevik resolution demanding the transfer of power to the
soviets, mustered in the Petrograd Soviet an insignificant number of
votes. In Moscow the vote of “no confidence” in the Provisional
Government, introduced by the Bolsheviks on April 22, mustered only 74
votes out of many hundreds. To be sure the Helsingfors Soviet,
notwithstanding its domination by Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks,
adopted on that same day an extraordinarily bold resolution for those
times, offering the Petrograd Soviet its armed assistance in removing
the “imperialist Provisional Government.” But that resolution, adopted
under direct pressure from the sailors, was an exception. By an
overwhelming majority, the Soviet deputies, representing those masses
who had been but yesterday so near to an armed insurrection against the
Provisional Government, stood pat on the two-power system. What does
this signify?

This crying contradiction between the decisiveness of the mass offensive
and the half-heartedness of its political reflection was not accidental.
In a revolutionary epoch the oppressed masses turn more easily and
quickly to direct action, than they learn to give their desires and
demands a formal expression through their own representatives. The more
abstract the system of representation, the more it lags behind the
rhythm of those events which determine the activity of the masses. A
Soviet representation, the least abstract of all, has immeasurable
advantages in revolutionary conditions: it is sufficient to remember
that the democratic Dumas, elected according to their own regulations of
April 17, hampered by nothing and by nobody, proved absolutely powerless
to compete with the soviets. But with all the advantages of their
organic connection with the factories and regiments-that is, with the
active masses-the soviets are nevertheless representative organs, and
are therefore not free from the qualifications and distortions of
parliamentarism. The contradiction inherent in representation, even of
the soviet form, lies in the fact that it is on the one necessary to the
action of the masses, but on the other easily becomes a conservative
obstacle to it. The practical way out of this contradiction is to renew
the representation continually. But this operation, nowhere very simple,
must in a revolution be the result of direct action and therefore lag
behind such action. At any rate, on the day after the April
semi-insurrection, or more accurately, quarter-insurrection – the
semi-insurrection will occur in July – the same deputies were sitting in
the Soviet as on the day before. Arriving once more in their accustomed
seats they voted for the motions of their accustomed leaders.

But this by no means signifies that the April storm had passed without
effect on the Soviet, on the entire February system, and still more on
the masses themselves. That giant interference of the workers and
soldiers in political events, although not yet carried through to the
end, altered the political scene, gave impulse to the general movement
of the revolution, accelerated inevitable regroupings, and forced the
parlour and backstage politicians to forget their plans of yesterday and
adapt their action to new sets of circumstances.

When the Compromisers had liquidated this flare-up of civil war, and
thought that everything was coming back to its old position, the
government crisis was only just beginning. The liberals did not want to
rule any longer without a direct participation of socialists in the
government. The socialists on their part, forced by the logic of the
two-power system to agree to this condition, demanded an unequivocal
repudiation of the Dardanelles programme, and this inevitably led to the
downfall of Miliukov. On May 2, Miliukov found himself compelled to
leave the ranks of the government. The slogan of the demonstration of
April 20 was thus realised in the space of twelve days, and against the
will of the Soviet leaders.

But delays and procrastinations succeeded only in accentuating more
strongly the impotence of the rulers. Miliukov, attempting with the aid
of his general to make a sharp break in the correlation of forces, had
popped out of the government with a noise like a cork. The smashing
general found himself obliged to resign. The ministers did not look a
bit like guests of honour any more. The government implored the Soviet
to agree to a coalition. All this because the masses were pressing on
the long end of the lever.

This does not mean, however, that the Compromising parties were coming
nearer to the workers and soldiers. On the contrary, the April events by
suggesting what unexpected surprises lay hidden in the masses, impelled
the democratic leaders still further toward the right, toward a closer
union with the bourgeoisie. From that time on the patriotic course
definitely predominates. The majority of the Executive Committee becomes
more united. Formless radicals like Sukhanov, Steklov, etc., who had but
recently inspired the policies of the Soviet, and had made attempts to
save something at least of the traditions of socialism, are pushed
aside. Tseretelli takes a firm, conservative and patriotic position, an
accommodation of Miliukov’s policies to the representative organ of the
labouring masses.

The conduct of the Bolshevik Party during the April days was not
uniform. Events had caught the party unprepared. The internal crisis was
just being wound up, and busy preparations were going on for the party
conference. Impressed by the keen excitement in the workers’ districts
some Bolsheviks expressed themselves in favour of overthrowing the
Provisional Government. The Petrograd Committee, which on March 5 had
been still passing resolutions of qualified confidence in the
Provisional Government, wavered. It was decided to hold a demonstration
on the 21st, though its purpose was still insufficiently defined. A part
of the Petrograd Committee were bringing the workers and soldiers into
the streets with the intention not very clear, to be sure – of
attempting, so to speak incidentally, to overthrow the Provisional
Government. Individual left elements standing outside the party acted in
the same direction. There was apparently also an anarchist element – not
numerous but bustling. The military quarters were approached by
individual persons demanding armoured cars or general reinforcements,
now for the arrest of the Provisional Government, now for street
fighting with the enemy. An armoured car division close to the
Bolsheviks declared, however, that they would give no machines to anyone
except by order of the Executive Committee.

The Kadets did their best to place the blame for the bloody encounters
on the Bolsheviks. But a special committee of the Soviet established
beyond a doubt that the shooting had started, not in the streets, but
from doorways and windows. The newspapers published an announcement from
the Public Prosecutor: “The shooting was done by the scum of the
population for the purpose of arousing disorders and disturbances –
always useful to the criminal elements.”

The hostility of the ruling Soviet parties to the Bolsheviks had not yet
reached that intensity which two months later, in July, completely
eclipsed both reason and conscience. The Department of Justice, although
it had kept its old staff, was standing at attention before the
revolution, and in April had not yet permitted itself to apply to the
extreme left the methods of the czar’s secret service. Along this line
too Miliukov’s attack was repelled without difficulty.

The party Central Committee pulled up on the left wing Bolsheviks, and
declared on April 21 that they considered the Soviet’s veto of
demonstrations perfectly in order, and to be submitted to
unconditionally. “The motto ‘Down with the Government’ is incorrect at
present,” stated the resolution of the Central Committee, “because
without a solid (that is, conscious and organised) majority of the
people on the side of the proletariat, such a motto is either an empty
phrase, or leads to attempts of an adventurous character.” This
resolution declared the task of the moment to be criticism, propaganda,
and winning of the majority in the soviets, as the groundwork for
capturing the power. In this their opponents saw either the retreat of
frightened leaders, or a sly manoeuvre. We already know the fundamental
position of Lenin on the question of power; he was now teaching the
party to apply the “April theses” on the basis of actual experience.

Three weeks before this, Kamenev had declared that he was “happy” to
vote with the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries for a joint
resolution on the Provisional Government, and Stalin had been developing
his theory of a division of labour between Kadets and Bolsheviks. How
far those days and those theories were gone into the past! Only after
the lesson of the April days, Stalin at last came out against the theory
of benevolent “control” over the Provisional Government, cautiously
retreating from his own previous position. But this manoeuvre passed
unnoticed.

In what consisted the element of adventurism in the policy of certain
parts of the party? asked Lenin at a conference which opened right after
the menacing days. It consisted in the attempt to employ violence where
there was not yet, or no longer any place for revolutionary violence.
“You can overthrow one who is known to the people as a tyrant; but there
are no tyrants now; the cannon and rifles are in the hands of the
soldiers, not the capitalists. The capitalists are not prevailing with
violence but deceit, and you can’t talk now about violence – its mere
nonsense ... We gave the slogan of peaceful demonstration. We wanted
only to make a peaceful reconnoitre of the enemy’s strength, not to give
battle. But the Petrograd Committee aimed a wee bit too far to the left
... Along with the correct slogan, ‘Long Live the Soviets!’ they gave a
wrong one, ‘Down with the Provisional Government.’ A moment of action is
no time to aim ‘a wee bit too far to the left.’ We look upon that as the
greatest crime, disorganisation.”

What lies underneath the dramatic events of a revolution? Shifts in the
correlation of class forces. What causes these shifts? For the most part
oscillations of the intermediary classes, the peasantry, the petty
bourgeoisie, the army. There is a gigantic amplitude of oscillation
between Kadet imperialism and Bolshevism. These oscillations go
simultaneously in two opposite directions. The political representatives
of the petty bourgeoisie, their chiefs, the compromising leaders,
gravitate farther and farther to the right, toward the bourgeoisie. The
oppressed masses, on the other hand, will each time take a sharper and
more daring swing to the left. In protesting against the adventurism
shown by the leaders of the Petrograd organisation, Lenin made this
exception: if the intermediate masses had swung toward our side
seriously, deeply, steadily, we would not have hesitated one minute to
oust the government from the Mariinsky Palace. But this has not yet
happened. The April crisis, bursting into the street, was “not the first
and not the last swing of the petty bourgeois and semi-proletarian
masses.” Our task is still for the time being to “patiently explain” –
to prepare the next swing of the masses to our side, a deeper and more
conscious one.

As for the proletariat, its movement to the side of the Bolsheviks
assumed during April a clearly expressed character. Workers came to the
party committees asking how to transfer their names from the Menshevik
Party to the Bolshevik. At the factories they began insistently to
question the deputies about foreign policy, the war, the two-power
system, the food question; and as a result of these examinations
Menshevik and Social Revolutionary delegates were more and more
frequently replaced by Bolsheviks. The sharp turn began in the district
soviets, as these were closer to the factories. In the soviets of the
Vyborg side, Vasiliev Island, Narva district, the Bolsheviks seemed
suddenly and unexpectedly to find themselves toward the end of April in
a majority. This was a fact of the greatest significance, but the
Executive Committee leaders, busy with high politics, looked with
disdain upon the fussing of the Bolsheviks in the workers’ districts.
However, the districts began to press on the centre more and more
perceptibly. In the factories, without orders from the Petrograd
Committee, an energetic and successful campaign was carried on for the
re-election of representatives to the municipal soviet of workers’
deputies. Sukhanov estimates that at the beginning of May the Bolsheviks
had behind them a third of the Petrograd proletariat. Not less,
certainly – and the most active third besides. The March formlessness
had disappeared; political lines were sharpening; the “fantastic” theses
of Lenin were taking flesh in the Petrograd workers’ districts.

Every step forward of the revolution was evoked or compelled by direct
intervention of the masses – in most cases utterly unexpected by the
Soviet parties. After the February uprising, when the workers and
soldiers overthrew the monarchy without anyone’s permission, the leaders
of the Executive Committee considered the rôle of the masses fulfilled.
But they were fatally wrong. The masses had no intention of getting off
the stage. Already in the beginning of March, during the campaign for
the eight-hour day, the workers wrested this concession from capital in
spite of the efforts of Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries to hold
them back. The Soviet was forced to record a victory obtained without it
and against it. The April demonstration was a second correction of the
same kind. Every mass action, regardless of its immediate aim, is a
warning addressed to the leadership. This warning is at first mild in
character, but becomes more and more resolute. By July it had become a
threat. In October we have the final act.

In all critical moments the masses intervene “spontaneously” – in other
words, obeying only their own inferences drawn from political
experience, and their as yet officially unrecognised leaders.
Assimilating this or that premise from the talk of agitators, the masses
on their own volition translate its conclusions into the language of
action. The Bolsheviks, as a party, were not yet leading the campaign
for the eight-hour day. The Bolsheviks did not summon the masses to the
April demonstration. The Bolsheviks will not call the armed masses into
the street at the beginning of July. Only in October will the party
finally fall in step and march out at the head of the masses, not for a
demonstration but for a revolution.



CHAPTER 18 THE FIRST COALITION


 

All official theories, declarations and advertisements to the contrary
notwithstanding, the power belonged to the Provisional government on
paper only. The revolution, paying no attention to the resistance of the
so-called democracy, was striding along, lifting up new masses of the
people, strengthening the soviets, and to a limited extent even arming
the workers. The local commissars of the government and the “social
committees” created under them, in which representatives of bourgeois
organisations usually predominated, were quite naturally and without
effort crowded out by the soviets. In certain cases, when these agents
of the central power tried to resist, sharp conflicts arose. The
commissars accused the local soviets of refusing to recognise the
central government. The bourgeois press began to cry out that Kronstadt,
Schlusselburg or Czaritsyn had seceded from Russia and become
independent republics. The local soviets protested against this
nonsense. The ministers got excited. The governmental socialists
hastened to these places, persuading, threatening, justifying themselves
before the bourgeoisie. But all this did not change the correlation of
forces. The fatefulness of the processes undermining the two power
system could be seen in the fact that these processes were developing,
although at different tempos, all over the country. From organs for
controlling the government the soviets were becoming organs of
administration. They would not accommodate themselves to any theory of
the division of powers, but kept interfering in the administration of
the army, in economic conflicts, questions of food and transport, even
in the courts of justice. The soviets under pressure from the workers
decreed the eight-hour day, removed reactionary executives, ousted the
more intolerable commissars of the Provisional Government, conducted
searches and arrests, suppressed hostile newspapers. Under the influence
of continually increasing food difficulties and a goods famine, the
provincial soviets undertook to fix prices, forbid export from the
provinces and requisition provisions. Nevertheless at the head of the
soviets everywhere stood the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks who
rejected with indignation the Bolshevik slogan, “Power to the Soviets!”

Especially instructive in this connection is the activity of the soviet
in Tiflis, the very heart of the Menshevik Gironde which gave the
February revolution such leaders as Tseretelli and Cheidze, and
sheltered them afterwards when they had hopelessly squandered themselves
in Petrograd. The Tiflis Soviet, led by Jordania – afterwards head of
independent Georgia – found itself compelled at every step to trample on
the principles of the Menshevik Party in control of it, and act as
sovereign power. This soviet confiscated a private printing
establishment for its own uses, made arrests, took charge of
investigations and trials for political offences, established a bread
ration, and fixed the prices of food and the necessaries of life. That
contrast between official doctrine and real life, manifest from the very
first day, only continued to grow throughout March and April.

In Petrograd a certain decorum at least was observed – although not
always, as we have seen. The April days, however had unequivocally
lifted the curtain on the impotence of the Provisional Government,
showing that it had no serious support whatever in the capital. In the
last ten days of April the government was flickering and going out.
“Kerensky stated with anguish that the government was already
non-existent, that it did not work but merely discussed its condition”
(Stankevich). You might say in general about this government, that up to
the days of October in hard moments it was always undergoing a crisis,
and in the intervals between crises it was merely existing. Continually
“discussing its condition,” it found no time for business.

From the crisis created by the April rehearsal of future events, three
outcomes were theoretically possible. The power might have gone over
wholly to the bourgeoisie; that could have been achieved only through
civil war; Miliukov made the attempt, but failed. The power should have
gone over wholly to the soviets; this could have been accomplished
without any civil war whatever, merely by raising of hands – merely by
wishing it. But the Compromisers did not want to wish it, and the masses
still preserved their faith in the Compromisers, although it was badly
cracked. Thus both of the fundamental ways out – the bourgeois and the
proletarian – were closed. There remained a third possibility, the
confused, weak-hearted, cowardly half-road of compromise. The name of
that road was Coalition.

At the end of the April days the socialists had no thought of a
coalition. In general those people never foresaw anything. By the
resolution of April 21 the Executive Committee had officially converted
the double sovereignty from a fact into a constitutional principle. But
here again the owl of wisdom made her flight too late: this juridical
consecration of the March form of double sovereignty – the kings and the
prophets – was carried out just at the moment when this form had already
been exploded by the action of the masses. The socialists tried to close
their eyes to this. Miliukov relates that when the question of a
coalition was raised from the government side, Tseretelli said: “What
good will it do you if we enter your cabinet? We will be compelled, in
case you are stubborn, to withdraw from the ministry with a loud bang.”
Tseretelli was trying to frighten the liberals with his future “bang.”
As always in the fundamentals of their policies, the Mensheviks were
appealing to the interests of the bourgeoisie themselves. But the water
was up to their necks. Kerensky frightened the Executive Committee: “The
government is at present in an impossibly difficult situation: the
rumours of its resignation are no political by-play.” At the same time
there was pressure from the bourgeois circles. The Moscow city duma
passed a resolution in favour of coalition. On April 26, when the ground
was sufficiently prepared, the Provisional Government announced in a
special appeal the necessity of bringing in to the governmental work
“those active creative forces of the country which have not yet
participated in it.” The question was thus presented point-blank.

The feeling against coalition was nevertheless pretty strong. At the end
of April the following soviets declared themselves against the
participation of socialists in the government: Moscow, Tiflis, Odessa,
Ekaterinburg, Nizhni-Novgorod, Tver, and others. Their motives were very
clearly expressed by one of the Menshevik leaders in Moscow: If the
socialists enter the government, there will be nobody to lead the
movement of the masses “in a definite channel.” But it was difficult to
convey this idea to the workers and soldiers against whom it was
directed. The masses, in so far as they were not yet for the Bolsheviks,
stood solid for the entrance of socialists into the government. If it is
a good thing to have Kerensky as a minister, then so much the better six
Kerenskys. The masses did not know that this was called coalition with
the bourgeoisie, and that the bourgeoisie wanted to use these socialists
as a cover for their activities against the people. A coalition looked
different from the barracks and from the Mariinsky Palace. The masses
wanted to use the socialists to crowd out the bourgeoisie from the
government. Thus two forces tending in opposite directions united for a
moment in one.

In Petrograd a series of military units, among them an armoured car
division friendly to the Bolsheviks, declared in favour of coalition
government. The provinces voted for the coalition by an overwhelming
majority. The coalition tendency prevailed among the Social
Revolutionaries; they only feared to go into the government without the
Mensheviks. And finally, the army was in favour of coalition. One of its
delegates later – at the June congress of the soviets – expressed not at
all badly the attitude of the front toward the question of power: “We
thought that the groan which arose from the army when it learned that
the socialists would not enter the ministry to work with people whom
they did not trust, while the whole army was compelled to go on dying
with people whom it did not trust, must have been heard in Petrograd.”

The war was the deciding factor in this question, as in others. The
socialists had at first intended to sit out the war, as also the
sovereignty, and wait. But the war would not wait. The Allies would not
wait. The front did not want to wait any longer. Right in the middle of
the governmental crisis came delegates from the front and put up to
their leaders in the Executive Committee the question: Are we going to
fight or not? Which meant: Do you assume the responsibility for the war
or not? There was no dodging that question. The Entente was posing the
same question in the language of a half-threat.

The April offensive on the west European front cost the Allies heavily
and gave no results. A wavering was felt in the French army under the
influence of the Russian revolution and of the failure of its own
offensive from which so much had been hoped. The army, in the words of
Marshal Pétain, “was bending in our hands.” To stop this threatening
process the French Government had need of a Russian offensive – and
until that at least a firm promise of one. Aside from the material
relief to be gained, it was necessary as quickly as possible to snatch
the halo of peace from the Russian revolution, poison the hope in the
hearts of the French soldiers, compromise the revolution by associating
it with the crimes of the Entente, trample the banner of the Russian
workers’ and soldiers’ insurrection in the blood and mud of the
imperialist slaughter.

In order to attain this high aim, all possible levers were brought into
play. Among these levers not the last place was occupied by the
patriotic socialists of the Entente. The most experienced of them were
sent into revolutionary Russia. They arrived armed to the teeth with
obsequious consciences and boneless talk. “The foreign social-patriots,”
writes Sukhanov, “were received with open arms in the Mariinsky Palace,
Branting, Cachin, O’Grady, De Brouckère, and others felt at home there
and formed a united front with our ministers against the Soviet.” It
must be conceded that even the Compromisers’ Soviet was often ill at
ease with those gentlemen.

The Allied socialists made the rounds of the fronts. “General Alexeiev,”
wrote Vandervelde, “did everything in his power in order that our
efforts should be applied to the same end as were those undertaken a
little earlier by delegations of sailors from the Black Sea, by
Kerensky, Albert Thomas – that is to complete what he called the moral
preparation of the offensive.” The President of the Second International
and the former chief of staff of Nicholas the Second thus found a common
language in their struggle for the glorious ideals of democracy.
Renaudel, one of the leaders of French socialism, was able to cry out
with relief: “Now we can talk without blushing of the war of justice.”
It was three years before humanity learned that those people had
something to blush about.

On the 1st of May the Executive Committee, having passed through all the
stages of vacillation known to nature, decided by a majority of 41 votes
against 18, with 3 abstaining, to enter into a coalition government.
Only the Bolsheviks and a small group of Menshevik-Internationalists
voted against it.

It is not without interest that the victim of this closer rapprochement
was the recognised leader of the bourgeoisie, Miliukov. “I did not go
out, they put me out,” said Miliukov later, Guchkov had withdrawn
already on April 30, refusing to sign the _Declaration of the Rights of
the Soldier_. How dark it was in those days in the hearts of the
liberals is evident from the fact that the Central Committee of the
Kadet Party decided, in order to save the Coalition, not to insist upon
Miliukov’s remaining in the government. “The party betrayed its leader,”
writes the right Kadet, Isgoyev. The party, however, had no great
choice. The same Isgoyev remarks quite correctly, “At the end of April
the Kadet Party was smashed to pieces; morally it had received a blow
from which it would never recover.”

But on the question of Miliukov the Entente was to have the last word.
England was entirely willing that the Dardanelles patriot should be
replaced by a more temperate “democrat.” Henderson, who was in Petrograd
with authorisation to replace Buchanan as ambassador in case of need,
learning of the state of affairs, deemed this change unnecessary. As a
fact, Buchanan was exactly in the right place, for he was a resolute
opponent of annexations in so far as they did not coincide with the
appetites of Great Britain. “If Russia has no need of Constantinople,”
he whispered tenderly to Tereshchenko, “the sooner she announces this,
the better.” France at first supported Miliukov, but here Thomas played
his rôle, coming out after Buchanan and the Soviet leaders against
Miliukov. Thus that politician, hated by the masses, was abandoned by
the Allies, by the democrats, and lastly by his own party.

Miliukov really did not deserve such cruel punishment – at least not
from these hands. But the Coalition demanded a purification sacrifice.
They pictured Miliukov to the masses as that evil spirit who had been
darkening the universal triumphant procession towards democratic peace.
In cutting off Miliukov, the Coalition purified itself at one stroke
from the sins of imperialism. The staff of the Coalition Government, and
its programme, were approved by the Petrograd Soviet on May 5. The
Bolsheviks mustered 100 votes against it. “The meeting warmly greeted
the orator-ministers,” Miliukov ironically tells of this meeting. “It
greeted with the same stormy applause, however, ‘the old leader of the
first revolution’ Trotsky, who had arrived the day before from America,
and who sharply condemned the entrance of socialists into the ministry,
asserting that the ‘double sovereignty’ is not destroyed, but ‘merely
transferred into the ministry,’ and that the real single power which
will ‘save’ Russia will arrive only when ‘the next step is taken, the
transfer of power into the hands of the workers’ and soldiers’
deputies’; then will begin ‘a new epoch, an epoch of blood and iron, but
not in a struggle of nation against nation, but of the suffering and
oppressed class against the ruling classes.’” Such is Miliukov’s
rendering. In his conclusion Trotsky formulated three rules for the
policy of the masses “three revolutionary articles of faith: do not
trust the bourgeoisie; control the leaders; rely only on your own
force.” Speaking of this speech, Sukhanov remarks: “He evidently did not
expect any sympathy for his words.” And in truth the orator left the
hall amid far less applause than had greeted his entrance. Sukhanov,
very sensitive to what is going on in the _couloirs_ of the
intelligentsia, adds: “Although Trotsky did not belong to the Bolshevik
Party, rumours were already going around to the effect that he was worse
than Lenin.”

The socialists appropriated six portfolios out of fifteen. They wanted
to be in the minority. Even after deciding openly to enter the
government, they continued to play this game of give-away. Prince Lvov
remained Premier; Kerensky became Minister of War and Marine; Chernov,
Minister of Agriculture. Miliukov’s place as Minister of Foreign Affairs
was taken by Tereshchenko, a connoisseur of the ballet who had become
the confidential man at one and the same time of Kerensky and Buchanan.
They all three agreed in thinking that Russia could get along
exceptionally well without Constantinople. At the head of the Department
of Justice stood an insignificant lawyer, Pereverzev, who subsequently
acquired a passing glory in connection with the July incident of the
Bolsheviks. Tseretelli limited himself to the portfolio of Posts and
Telegraphs in order to keep his time for the Executive Committee.
Skobeleyv, becoming Minister of Labour, promised in the heat of the
excitement to cut down the profits of the capitalists one hundred per
cent. That phrase soon acquired wings. For the sake of symmetry the
Ministry of Trade and Industry was given to a great Moscow
industrialist, Konovalov. He brought along with him certain notables
from the Moscow Stock Exchange who received important government posts.
After two weeks, by the way, Konovalov resigned as a protest against the
“anarchy” in public economy. Skobelev, even before two weeks, had
renounced his attack on profits, and was busying himself with the
struggle against anarchy – quelling strikes, summoning the workers to
self-restraint. The Declaration of the new government consisted, as is
to be expected of all coalitions, of commonplaces. It referred to an
active foreign policy in the cause of peace, a solution of the food
question, and a getting ready to solve the land question. All this was
mere talk. The single serious point – at least from the standpoint of
intention – was the one about the preparation of the army “for defensive
and offensive activity to prevent the possible defeat of Russia and her
Allies.” In this was essentially summed up the whole meaning of the
Coalition, which was created as the last play of the Entente in Russia.

“The Coalition Government in Russia,” wrote Buchanan, “is for us the
last, and almost the only, hope for salvation of the military situation
on that front.” Thus behind the platforms, speeches, compromises and
votes of the liberal and democratic leaders of the February revolution,
stood an imperialist stage director in the person of the Entente. Being
obliged hastily to enter the government in the name of the interests of
the Entente front, which was hostile to the revolution, the socialists
took upon themselves about a third of the power and the whole war.

The new Minister of Foreign Affairs had to delay publishing for two
weeks the answers of the Allied governments to the declaration of March
27, in order to work out certain stylistic changes which would disguise
their polemic against the Declaration of the Coalition Cabinet. That
“active foreign policy in the cause of peace” expressed itself
thereafter in Tereshchenko’s zealously editing the texts of the
diplomatic telegrams drawn up for him by old-régime clerks. Crossing out
“claims” he would write “the demands of justice”; in place of
“safeguarding the interests” he would write “for the good of the
peoples.” Miliukov, with a slight grinding of teeth, said of his
successor: “The Allied diplomats knew that the ‘democratic’ terminology
of his despatches was a reluctant concession to the demands of the
moment, and treated it with indulgence.”

Thomas and the newly arrived Vandervelde did not sit with folded arms.
They zealously interpreted the “good of the peoples” in correspondence
with the needs of the Entente, and manipulated with a fair success the
simpletons of the Executive Committee. “Skobelev and Chernov,” reported
Vandervelde, “are energetically protesting against all thoughts of
premature peace.” No wonder Ribot, relying on such assistants, felt able
to announce to the French Parliament on May 9, that he intended to make
a satisfactory reply to Tereshchenko “without giving up anything.”

No, the real masters of the situation were not intending to give up
anything that was lying around loose. It was just in those days that
Italy announced the independence of Albania, and immediately placed her
under Italy’s protectorate. That was not a bad object lesson. The
Provisional Government had an idea of protesting – not so much in the
name of democracy, as because of the destruction of “equilibrium in the
Balkans.” But impotence compelled it for the time to bite its tongue.

The only new thing in the foreign policy of the Coalition was its hasty
rapprochement with America. This young friendship offered three not
unimportant advantages: the United States was not so compromised with
military depravities as France and England; the transatlantic republic
opened before Russia broad prospects in the matter of loans and military
supplies; finally, the diplomacy of Wilson – a mixture of knavery with
democratic piety – fell in admirably with the stylistic needs of the
Provisional Government. In sending the Root mission to Russia, Wilson
addressed the Provisional Government with one of his parish letters in
which he declared: “No people must be forced under sovereignty under
which it does not wish to live.” The aims of the war were defined by the
American President not too definitely, but beguilingly: “... to secure
the future peace of the world and the future welfare and happiness of
its people.” What could be better? Tereshehenko and Tseretelli needed
only that: fresh credits and the commonplaces of pacifism. With the help
of the first, and under cover of the second, they could make ready for
the offensive which the Shylock on the Seine was demanding with a
furious shaking of all his promissory notes.

On the 11th of May, Kerensky went to the front to open his agitation in
favour of an offensive. “A wave of enthusiasm is growing and spreading
in the army,” reported the new War Minister to the Provisional
Government, choking with the enthusiasm of his own speeches. On May 14,
Kerensky issued a command to the army: “You will go where your leaders
conduct you,” and in order to adorn this well-known and not very
attractive prospect for the soldier, he added: “You will carry on the
points of your bayonets – peace.” On May 22, the cautious General
Alexeiev, a man of no parts in any case, was removed, and replaced in
the position of commander-in-chief by the more flexible and enterprising
Brussilov. The democrats with all their power were preparing the
offensive – the grand catastrophe, that is, of the February revolution.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Soviet was the organ of the workers and soldiers – and soldiers here
means peasants. The Provisional Government was the organ of the
bourgeoisie. The Contact Commission was the organ of compromise. The
Coalition simplified this mechanism by converting the Provisional
Government itself into a contact commission. But the double sovereignty
was not in the least done away with. Whether Tseretelli was a member of
the Contact Commission or Minister of Posts – that did not decide
anything. There were in the country two incompatible state
organisations: the hierarchy of old and new officials appointed from
above crowned by the Provisional Government, and the system of elective
soviets reaching down to the most remote companies at the front. These
two state systems rested upon different classes which as yet were only
getting ready to settle their historic accounts. In entering the
Coalition, the Compromisers counted on a peaceful and gradual
dissolution of the power of the soviet system. They imagined that the
power of the soviets, concentrated in their persons, would now flow over
into the official government. Kerensky categorically assured Buchanan,
that “the soviets will die a natural death ...” This hope soon became
the official doctrine of the Compromise leaders. According to their
thought, the centre of gravity ought to be transferred to the new organs
of self-government. The place of the Central Committee should be
occupied by the Constituent Assembly. The Coalition Government was in
this way to become a bridge to the bourgeois parliamentary republic.

The trouble was that the revolution did not want to, and could not,
travel along this road. The fate of the new city dumas had given
unequivocal warning in this sense. These dumas had been elected upon the
widest possible franchise basis. The soldiers voted equally with the
civil population, women equally with men. Four parties took part in the
struggle. _Novoye Vremya_, the old official sheet of the czarist
government, one of the most dishonest newspapers in the world and that
is saying something – summoned the Rights, the nationalists, the
Octobrists, to vote for the Kadets. But when the political impotence of
the possessing classes became fully evident, the majority of the
bourgeois papers adopted the slogan: “Vote for anybody you please, only
not the Bolsheviks!” In all the dumas and zemstvos the Kadets were right
wing, the Bolsheviks a growing left minority. The majority, immense as
usual, belonged to the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks.

It would seem as if these new dumas, which differed from the soviets by
a broader representation, ought to have enjoyed great authority.
Moreover as socio-juridical institutions, the dumas had the immense
advantage of official government support. The militia, the food
supplies, the municipal transport, popular education, all were
officially in the hands of the duma. The soviet as a private
“institution” had neither budget nor rights. And nevertheless the power
remained with the soviets. The dumas turned out to be in the essence of
the matter municipal commissions of the soviets. This rivalry of the
soviet system with formal democracy was the more striking in its
outcome, in that it took place under the leadership of those same
parties, Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, who, ruling in the dumas
and the soviets alike, were profoundly convinced that the soviets ought
to give way to the dumas, and themselves did their best to promote the
process. The explanation of this remarkable phenomenon – about which
there was, very little speculation in the whirlpool of the actual events
– is simple: municipal governments, like any other institutions of
democracy, can function only on the basis of firmly established social
relations – that is, a definite property system. The essence of
revolution, however, is that it calls in question this, the very basis
of all bases. And its question can be answered only by an open
revolutionary test of the correlation of forces. The soviets, in spite
of the quality of their leadership, were the fighting organisations of
the oppressed classes who had consciously or half-consciously united to
transform the bases of the social structure. The municipal governments
gave equal representation to all classes of the population, reduced to
the abstraction of citizenship, and behaved in the revolutionary
situation very much like a diplomatic conference expressing itself in
qualified and hypocritical language while the hostile camps represented
by it are feverishly preparing for battle. In the everyday of the
revolution the municipal governments dragged out a half-fictitious
existence. But at critical moments, when the interference of the masses
was defining the further direction of events, these governments simply
exploded in the air, their constituent elements appearing on different
sides of a barricade. It was sufficient to contrast the parallel rôles
of the soviets and the municipal governments from May to October, in
order to foresee the fate of the Constituent Assembly.

The Coalition Government was in no hurry to summon that constituent
Assembly. The liberals being, notwithstanding the democratic arithmetic,
a majority in the government, were in no haste to become in the
Constituent Assembly a feeble right wing such as they were in the new
dumas. The special conference on the convocation of a Constituent
Assembly began work only at the end of May – three months after the
revolution. The liberal jurists divided every hair into sixteen parts,
shook up in their alembics all the different kinds of democratic
sediment, bickered endlessly about the elective rights of the army,
whether or not it would be necessary to give votes to the deserters,
numbering millions, and to the members of the czar’s family, numbering
tens. As to the date of the assembly, as little was said as possible. To
raise this question was considered in the conference a breach of
etiquette such as only Bolsheviks would commit.

Weeks passed, but in spite of the hopes and prophecies of the
Compromisers the soviets did not die out. At times, lulled and confused
by their leaders, they did fall into semi-prostration, but the first
signal of danger would bring them to their feet, and reveal to the eyes
of all that they were the real masters of the situation. While
attempting to sabotage the soviets, Social Revolutionaries and
Mensheviks were obliged in every important incident to recognise their
priority. This was expressed among other things by the fact that the
best forces of both parties were concentrated in the soviets. To the
municipal governments and the zemstvos they appointed people of the
second rank, technicians and administrators. The same thing was to be
observed among the Bolsheviks. The Kadets alone, not having access to
the soviets, concentrated their best forces in those institutions of
self-government. But that hopeless bourgeois minority was not able to
convert them into a real support.

Thus nobody considered the municipal governments their own institutions.
The sharpening antagonism between worker and boss, soldier and officer,
peasant and landlord, could not be openly brought up for discussion in
the municipal bodies or zemstvos as was done in their own circles by the
soviets on the one side, and by “private” meetings of the State Duma and
all kinds of conferences of the “enfranchised” politicians on the other.
One can talk over petty details with an enemy, but not matters of life
and death.

If you accept the Marxian formula according to which a government is a
committee of the ruling class, then you must admit that the genuine
“committees” of the classes struggling for power were to be found
outside the Coalition Government. As regards the soviets, represented in
the government as a minority, that was perfectly obvious. But it was no
less true of the bourgeois majority. The liberals were totally unable to
discuss in a serious and businesslike way in the presence of socialists
the questions of most moment to the bourgeoisie. The crowding out of
Miliukov, the acknowledged and indubitable leader of the bourgeoisie,
around whom a staff of property owners had united, had a symbolic
character, completely revealing the fact that the government was in
every sense of the word eccentric. Life revolved around two axes, one of
which was to the left and one to the right of the Mariinsky Palace.

Not daring to say what they thought in the staff of the government, the
ministers lived in an atmosphere of conventions created by themselves.
The double sovereignty concealed by a coalition became a school of
two-mindedness, two-heartedness and every possible kind of duplicity.
The Coalition Government in the course of the next six months lived
through a whole series of crises, reconstructions and reshufflings, but
its fundamental features, impotence and hypocrisy, survived to the day
of its death.



CHAPTER 19 THE OFFENSIVE


 

In the army as in the country there was a continual political regrouping
of forces, the lower ranks moving to the left, the upper to the right.
Just as the Executive Committee was becoming an instrument of the
Entente for taming the revolution, the soldiers’ committees, having
arisen to represent the soldiers against the commanding staff, were
being converted into assistants of the commanding staff against the
soldiers.

The membership of these committees was variegated. There were not a few
patriots who sincerely identified the war with the revolution,
courageously joined an offensive imposed from above, and laid down their
heads in an alien cause. Beside them stood the heroes of the phrase,
regimental and divisional Kerenskys. Finally, there were not a few petty
cheats and chair-warmers who got into the committees to keep out of the
trenches, always on a hunt for privileges. Every mass movement,
especially in its first stages, inevitably raises up on its crest all
these human varieties. But the compromise period was especially rich in
such loud talkers and chameleons. People form programmes but programmes
also form people. The school of “contact” politics becomes in a
revolution a school of trickery and intrigue.

The two-power régime made it impossible to create a military force. The
Kadets were hated by the mass of the people, and were compelled in the
army to re-title themselves Social Revolutionaries. The democracy could
not resurrect the army for the same reason that it could not take over
the power. The one was inseparable from the other. As a curiosity, which
nevertheless very clearly illumines the situation, Sukhanov remarks that
the Provisional Government did not organise a single parade for the
soldiers in Petrograd. The liberals and generals did not want the
soviets to participate in their parade, but perfectly well understood
that without the soviets a parade as impossible. The higher officers
were clinging closer and closer to the Kadets, biding the time when more
reactionary parties might lift their heads. The petty bourgeois
intelligentsia could give the army a considerable number of lower
officers, as they had done under czarism, but they could not create a
commanding corps in their own image, for they had no image of their own.
As the whole further course of the revolution showed, it was only
possible either to take the commanding corps as it was from the nobility
and the bourgeoisie, as the Whites did, or bring forward and train up a
new one on the basis of proletarian recruiting, as did the Bolsheviks.
The petty bourgeois democracy could do neither one thing nor the other.
All they could do was to persuade, plead and deceive everybody and when
nothing came of it, turn over the power in despair to the reactionary
officers, and let them teach the people the correct revolutionary ideas.

One after the other the ulcers of the old society broke out and
destroyed the organism of the army. The problem of nationality in all
its forms – and Russia is rich in nationality – went deeper and deeper
into the soldier mass, which was made up less than half of Great
Russians. National antagonisms intercrossed and interwove in all
directions with class antagonisms. The policy of the government in the
sphere of nationalities, as in all others, was vacillating, confused,
and therefore seemed doubly treacherous. Certain generals flirted with
national formations such as the “Mussulman Corps with French discipline”
on the Rumanian front. These new national units did as a rule prove the
most sturdy of the old army, for they were formed under a new idea and a
new banner. This national cement however did not last long. Class
struggles soon broke it. But the very process of these national
formations, threatening to affect half the army, reduced it to a fluid
condition, decomposing the old units before it succeeded in welding the
new. Thus misfortune came from all sides.

Miliukov writes in his history that the army was ruined by “conflict
between ‘revolutionary’ ideas and normal military discipline, between
‘democratisation of the army’ and the ‘preservation of its fighting
power’” – in which statement, by “normal” discipline is to be understood
that which existed under czarism. A historian ought to know, it would
seem, that every great revolution brings ruin to the old army, a result
of the clash, not of abstract disciplinary principles, but of living
classes. A revolution not only permits strict discipline in an army, but
creates it. However, this discipline cannot be established by
representatives of the class which the revolution has overthrown.

“Surely, the fact is evident,” wrote one wise German to another on
September 26, 1851, “that a disorganised army and a complete breakdown
of discipline has been the condition as well as the result of every
victorious revolution.” The whole history of humanity proves this simple
and indubitable law. But along with the liberals, the Russian socialists
– with the experience of 1905 behind them – did not understand this,
although they called the two Germans, one of whom was Frederick Engels
and the other Karl Marx, their teachers. The Mensheviks seriously
believed that the army after making a revolution would continue the war
under the old command. And those people called the Bolsheviks Utopian!

General Brussilov at a conference at headquarters in the beginning of
May succinctly characterised the condition of the commanding staff: 15
to 20 per cent had adapted themselves to the new order through
conviction; a part of the officers were beginning to flirt with the
soldiers and incite them against the commanding staff; but the majority,
about 75 per cent, could not adapt themselves, were offended, were
hiding in their shells, and did not know what to do. The overwhelming
mass of the officers were, in addition, good-for-nothing from a purely
military point of view.

At a conference with the generals, Kerensky and Skobelev zealously
apologised for the revolution, which, alas, “was continuing” and must be
taken into consideration. To this the Black Hundred general Gurko
answered the ministers moralisingly: “You say the revolution is
continuing. Listen to us. Stop the revolution, and let us, the military,
do our duty to the end.” Kerensky went to meet the generals with all his
heart – until one of them, the valorous Kornilov, almost strangled him
in his embraces.

Compromisism in a time of revolution is a policy of feverish scurrying
back and forth between classes. Kerensky was the incarnation of
scurrying back and forth. Placed at the head of an army, an institution
unthinkable without a clear and concise régime, Kerensky became the
immediate instrument of its disintegration. Denikin publishes a curious
list of changes of personnel in the high commanding staff – changes
which missed the mark, although nobody really knew, and least of all
Kerensky, where the mark was. Alexeiev dismissed the commander-in-chief
at the front, Ruszky, and the army commander Radko-Dmitriev, for
weakness and indulgence to the committees, Brussilov removed for the
same reason the panic-stricken. Yudenaich. Kerensky dismissed Alexeiev
himself and the commanders-in-chief at the front, Gurko and Dragomirov,
for resisting democratisation of the army. On the same grounds Brussilov
removed General Kaledin, and was himself subsequently relieved for
excessive indulgence to the committees, Kornilov left the command of the
Petrograd district through inability to get along with the democracy.
This did not prevent his appointment to the front, and subsequently to
the supreme, command. Denikin was removed from the post of chief of
staff under Alexeiev for his obviously feudal administration, but was
soon after named commander-in-chief of the western front. This game of
leap-frog, showing that the people at the top did not know what they
wanted, gradually extending downward to the companies, hastened the
breakdown of the army.

While demanding that soldiers obey the officers, the commissars
themselves did not trust them. At the very height of the offensive, at a
meeting of the soviet at headquarters in Moghilev, one of the members of
the soviet declared in the presence of Kerensky and Brussilov:
“Eighty-eight per cent of the officers of the staff are giving rise by
their activities to a danger of counter-revolutionary manifestations.”
This was no secret to the soldiers. They had had plenty of time to get
acquainted with their officers before the revolution.

Throughout May the reports of the commanding staff from top to bottom
consist of variations on one single theme: “The attitude to the
offensive is in general adverse, and especially in the infantry.”
Sometimes they add: “A little better in the cavalry and hearty enough in
the artillery.”

At the end of May when the troops were already marshaled for the
offensive, the commissar with the 7th Army telegraphed to Kerensky: “In
the 12th Division, the 48th regiment has gone out in full force. The
45th and 46th regiments, with only half of the front-line companies. The
47th refuses to go out. Of the regiments of the 13th Division, the 50th
came out almost in full force. The 51st promises to come out tomorrow,
the 49th did not come out as ordered, and the 52nd refused to come out
and arrested all its officers.” The same picture was to be observed
almost everywhere. To the report of the commissar, the government
answered: “Disband the 45th, 46th, 47th and 52nd regiments,
court-martial those who incited the officers and soldiers to
disobedience.” That sounded terrible, but did not frighten anybody. The
soldiers who did not want to fight were not afraid either of disbandment
or of court-martial. In deploying the soldiers it was often necessary to
send one detachment against another. The instrument of repression would
most often be the Cossacks, as under the czar. But they were now led by
socialists: it was a question, you see, of defending the revolution.

On June 4, less than two weeks before the beginning of the offensive,
the chief of the headquarters staff reported: “The northern front is
still in a ferment, fraternisation continues, the infantry is opposed to
the offensive ... On the western front the situation is indefinite ...
On the south-western a certain improvement of mood is noticeable ... On
the Rumanian no special improvement is observable, the infantry does not
want to advance.”

On June 11, 1917, the commander of the 61st regiment writes: “The
officers and I have nothing left to do but save ourselves, because there
has arrived from Petrograd a soldier of the 5th Company, a Leninist ...
Many of the best soldiers and officers have already fled.” The
appearance in the regiment of one Leninist was enough to start the
officers running away. It is clear that the arriving soldier played the
part of the crystal in a saturate solution. However, we must not think
that the talk here is necessarily of a Bolshevik. In those days the
commanding staff called every soldier a Leninist who raised his voice
more boldly than others against the offensive. Many of those “Leninists”
still sincerely believed that Lenin had been sent by Wilhelm. The
commander of the 61st regiment tried to frighten his soldiers with
punishment at the hands of the government. One of the soldiers answered:
“We overthrew the former government, we’ll kick out Kerensky.” That was
new talk. They were nourished on Bolshevik agitation, but went far
beyond it.

From the Black Sea fleet, which was under the leadership of Social
Revolutionaries and was considered by contrast to the Kronstadt sailors
a bulwark of patriotism, a special delegation of 800 men was sent out
through the country at the end of April with a brisk student, Batkin,
dressed up as a sailor, at the head. There was a good deal of the
masquerade in that delegation but there was also a more sincere impulse.
The delegation was selling to the country the idea of war to victory.
But with every week the listeners became more hostile. And just as these
Black Sea sailors were beginning to lower the tone of their pro-war
sermons, a Baltic delegation arrived in Sebastopol to preach peace. The
Northerners had more success in the south than the Southerners in the
north. Under the influence of the Kronstadt sailors, the Sebastopol
sailors undertook on June 8 to disarm the commanding staff and arrest
their worst-hated officers.

At a meeting of the soviet Congress on June 9, Trotsky asked how it
could happen that “in that model Black Sea fleet which had sent
patriotic deputations throughout the country, in that nest of organised
patriotism, an explosion of this nature could occur at such a critical
moment? What does this prove?” He received no answer.

The headless and brainless condition of the army tortured everybody –
soldiers, commanders and committee-men. To their all the need of some
way out became unbearable. To the chiefs it seemed that the offensive
would overcome this reign of bedlam and bring definiteness. And to a
certain extent this was true. While Tseretelli and Chernov expressed
themselves in Petrograd in favour of the offensive with all the careful
modulations of the democratic rhetoric, the committee-men at the front
had to wage a campaign hand-in-hand with the officers against the new
régime in the army – a régime incompatible with War, but without which
the revolution was unthinkable. The results of the change were soon
visible. “With every day that passed, the members of the committee were
noticeably moving to the right,” recounts one of the naval officers,
“but at the same time there was an obvious decline in their authority
among the soldiers and sailors.” It happens, however, that soldiers and
sailors are just what is needed for a war.

Brussilov, with Kerensky’s approval, undertook the formation of shock
battalions of volunteers, thus frankly acknowledging the incapacity of
the army to fight. All sorts of elements immediately attached themselves
to this enterprise – for the most part adventurers like Captain
Muraviev, who subsequently, after the October revolution, swung round to
the left Social Revolutionaries, and then after a stormy and in its way
brilliant career, betrayed the Soviet power, and died of a bullet shot,
either from a Bolshevik or from his own hand. It is needless to say that
the counter-revolutionary officers greedily seized upon the shock
battalion idea as a legal way of mustering their own forces. The idea
got almost no response, however, in the soldier mass. Some women in
search of adventure created a women’s battalion of “Black Death
Hussars.” One of these battalions became Kerensky’s last armed force in
the defence of the Winter Palace in October. But all this gave very
little help to the cause of crushing German militarism – as the task was
described.

The offensive promised by the staff to the Allies for early spring had
been postponed from week to week. But now the Entente firmly refused to
accept any further postponements. In pressing for an immediate offensive
the Allies did not mince methods. Along with the pathetic adjurations of
Vandervelde, they employed the threat to stop sending military supplies.
The Italian consul-general in Moscow announced to the press – not the
Italian, but the Russian press – that in case of a separate peace on the
part of Russia, the Allies would give Japan a free hand in Siberia. The
liberal papers – not the Rome, but the Moscow papers – printed these
insolent threats with patriotic rapture, making them apply not to a
separate peace, but to a delayed offensive. In other respects the Allies
did not stand upon ceremony: for instance, they sent artillery that was
known to be damaged. Thirty-five per cent of the weapons received from
abroad did not survive two weeks of moderate shooting. England was
shutting down on credits; but then America, the new benefactor, without
the knowledge of England, offered the Provisional Government on the
security of the new offensive a credit of $75,000,000. Although
supporting the demands of the Allies by waging a frantic agitation for
the offensive, the Russian bourgeoisie withheld its own confidence from
the offensive by refusing to subscribe to the Liberty loan. The
overthrown monarchy utilised this incident to remind the public of its
existence. In a declaration in the name of the Provisional Government,
Romanov expressed a desire to subscribe to the loan, but added: “The
extent of the subscription will depend on the question whether the
treasury supplies money to support the members of the czar’s family.”
All this was read by the army, which knew very well that the majority of
the Provisional Government, as also a majority of the upper officers,
were still hoping for a restoration. Justice demands the observation
that in the Allied camp not all agreed with Vandervelde, Thomas and
Cachin in pushing the Russian army over the precipice. There were
warning voices. “The Russian army is nothing but façade,” said General
Pétain, “it will fall to pieces if it makes a move.” The American
mission, for another example, expressed the view. But other
considerations prevailed. It was necessary to take the heart out of the
revolution. “The German fraternisation,” explained Painlevé later, “had
caused such ravages that to leave the Russian army inactive would risk
its rapid disintegration.” The political preparation for the offensive
was at first carried on by Kerensky and Tseretelli, in secrecy even from
their closest colleagues. In the days when these half-consecrated
leaders were still continuing to spout about the defence of the
revolution, Tseretelli was more and more firmly insisting on the
necessity that the army make ready for active service. The longest to
resist – that is, the coyest – was Chernov. At a meeting of the
Provisional Government on May 17, the “rural minister,” as he called
himself, was asked with heat whether it was true that he had expressed
himself at a certain meeting on the subject of the offensive without the
necessary sympathy. It transpired that Chernov answered as follows: “The
offensive does not concern me, a man of politics; that is a question for
the strategists at the front.” Those people were playing hide-and-seek
with the war, as with the revolution. But only for the time being.

The preparation for the offensive was accompanied, of course, by a
redoubled struggle against the Bolsheviks. They were being accused now
oftener and oftener of working for a separate peace. The possibility
that a separate peace would be the only way out, was evident in the
whole situation – the weakness and exhaustion of Russia in comparison
with the other warring countries. But nobody had yet measured the
strength of the new factor, revolution. The Bolsheviks believed that the
prospect of a separate peace could be avoided only in case the force and
authority of revolution were boldly and conclusively set against the
war. For this was needed first of all a break with our own bourgeoisie.
On June 9, Lenin announced at the congress of the soviets: “When they
say that we are striving for a separate peace, that is not true. We say:
No separate peace, not with any capitalists, and least of all with the
Russian capitalists. But the Provisional Government has made a separate
peace with the Russian capitalists. Down with that separate peace!”
“Applause,” remarks the report. That was the applause of a small
minority at the congress, and for that reason especially fervent.

In the Executive Committee some still lacked decision, others wanted to
hide behind the more authoritative institutions. At the last moment it
was resolved to bring to Kerensky’s attention the undesirability of
giving the order for the offensive before the question had been decided
upon by the soviet congress. A declaration introduced at the very first
session of the congress by the Bolshevik faction had stated: “An
offensive can only utterly disorganise the army, bringing one part into
antagonism with the other, and the Congress should either immediately
oppose this counter-revolutionary onslaught, or else frankly assume the
whole responsibility for this policy.”

The decision of the soviet congress in favour of the offensive was
merely a democratic formality. Everything was already prepared. The
artillery had for a long time been aimed at the enemy’s positions. On
June 16, in an order to the army and the fleet, Kerensky, referring to
the commander-in-chief as “our leader fanned by the wings of victory,”
demonstrated the necessity of “an immediate and decisive blow,” and
concluded with the words “I command you – forward!” In an article
written on the eve of the offensive, commenting on the declaration of
the Bolshevik faction at the soviet congress, Trotsky wrote: “The policy
of the government completely undermines the possibility of successful
military action ... The material premises for an offensive are extremely
unfavorable. The organisation of supplies for the army reflects the
general economic collapse, against which a government constituted like
the present one cannot undertake a single radical measure. The spiritual
premises of the offensive are still more unfavorable. The government ...
has exposed before the army ... its incapacity to determine Russia’s
policy independently of the will of the imperialist Allies. No result is
possible but the progressive breakdown of the army ... The mass
desertions ... are ceasing in the present conditions to be the result of
depraved individual wills, and are becoming an expression of the
complete incapacity of the government to weld the revolutionary army
with inward unity of purpose ...” Pointing out further that the
government could not make up its mind “to an immediate annulment of
landlordship – that is, to the sole measure which would convince the
most backward peasant that this revolution is his revolution,” the
article concluded: “In such material and spiritual conditions an
offensive must inevitably have the character of an adventure.”

The commanding staff was almost unanimous in thinking that the
offensive, hopeless from a military point of view, was dictated by
political considerations. Denikin after making the rounds of his front
reported to Brussilov: “I haven’t the slightest belief in the success of
the offensive.” A supplementary element of hopelessness was introduced
by the good-for-nothingness of the commanding staff itself. Stankevich,
an officer and a patriot, testifies that the technical dispositions of
things made victory impossible regardless of the morale of the troops:
“The offensive was organised in a manner beneath criticism.” A
delegation of officers came to the leaders of the Kadet Party with the
president of the officers’ union, the Kadet Novosiltsev, at its head,
and warned them that the offensive was doomed to failure, and would mean
only the extermination of the best units. The higher powers waved away
these warnings with general phrases: “A last spark of hope remains,”
said the chief of the headquarters staff, the reactionary general
Lukomsky, “that perhaps a beginning of successful battles will change
the psychology of the masses, and the officers will be able to seize the
reins that have been torn from their hands.” That was their main
purpose, to get hold of those reins.

The chief blow was to be delivered, according to a plan worked out long
before, by the forces of the south-western front in the direction of
Lvov; the work of the northern and western fronts was to help this
operation. The advance was to have begun simultaneously on all fronts.
It was soon evident that this plan was far beyond the powers of the
command. They decided to start off one front after the other, beginning
with those of secondary importance. But that too proved impossible.
“Then the supreme command,” says Denikin, “decided to give up all idea
of planned strategy, and had to allow the fronts to begin operations
whenever they were ready.” All was left to the will of Providence. Only
the icons of the czarina were lacking. They tried to replace them with
the icons of democracy. Kerensky travelled everywhere, appealing and
pronouncing benedictions. The offensive began: June 16 on the south
western front, July 7 on the western, 9th on the Rumanian. The advance
of the last three fronts was in reality fictitious, coinciding with the
beginning of the collapse of the principal one, the south-western.

Kerensky reported to the Provisional Government: “Today is the great
triumph of the revolution. On June 18th the Russian revolutionary army
with colossal enthusiasm assumed the offensive.” “The long expected
advance has arrived,” wrote the Kadet organ _Rech_, “which has at one
stroke restored the Russian revolution to its best days.” On the 19th
the old man Plekhanov acclaimed to a patriotic manifestation: “Citizens,
if I ask you what day this is, you will say ‘Monday.’ But that is a
mistake. Today is the resurrection day.[1] Resurrection of our country
and of the whole world. Russia, having thrown off the yoke of czarism,
has decided to throw off the yokes of the enemy.” Tseretelli said on the
same day at the soviet congress: “A new page is opening in the history
of the great Russian revolution. The success of our revolutionary army
ought to be welcomed not only by the Russian democracy, but ... by all
those who are really striving to fight against imperialism.” The
patriotic democracy had opened all its taps. The newspapers meanwhile
carried joyful news: “The Paris Bourse greets the Russian offensive with
a rise in all Russian securities.” Those socialists were trying to
estimate the stability of the revolution by the stock-ticker. But
history teaches that bourses feel better the worse it goes with
revolutions.

The workers and the garrison of the capital were not for one minute
infected by this wave of artificially warmed-over patriotism. Its sole
arena was the Nevsky Prospect. “We went out on the Nevsky,” relates the
soldier Chinenov in his memoirs, “and tried to agitate against the
offensive. Some of the bourgeois took after us with their umbrellas ...
We grabbed them and dragged them into the barracks ... and told them
that tomorrow they would be sent to the front.” That was a preliminary
symptom of the advancing explosion of civil war. The July days were
drawing near.

On the 21st of June a machine gun regiment in Petrograd resolved in
general meeting: “In the future we will send forces to the front only
when the war shall have a revolutionary character.” In answer to the
threat of disbandment, the regiment answered that it would not hesitate
to disband “the Provisional Government and the other organisations which
support it.” Here again a threatening note far in advance of the
Bolshevik agitation. The _Chronicle of the Revolution_ remarks under
date of June 23: “Detachments of the 2nd Army have occupied the first
and second line trenches of the enemy ...” And right beside this: “At
the Baranovsky factory (6,000 men) there were re-elections to the
Petrograd Soviet. In place of three Social Revolutionaries, three
Bolsheviks were elected.”

By the end of the month the physiognomy of the Petrograd Soviet had
already considerably changed. It is true that on June 20 the Soviet
adopted a resolution of greeting to the advancing army. But with what
majority? – 472 votes against 271, with 39 abstaining. That is a totally
new correlation of forces, something we have not seen before. The
Bolsheviks, together with the left groups of Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries, constitute already two-fifths of the Soviet. This means
that in the factories and barracks the opponents of the offensive are
already an indubitable majority.

The Vyborg district soviet adopted a resolution on June 24 every word of
which strikes like a heavy hammer: “We ... protest against the adventure
of the Provisional Government, which is conducting an offensive for the
old robber treaties ... and we lay the whole responsibility for this
policy on the Provisional Government and the Menshevik and Social
Revolutionary parties supporting it.” Having been pushed out after the
February insurrection into the backyard, the Vyborg district was now
confidently advancing to the leading position. The Bolsheviks already
completely dominated the Vyborg Soviet.

Everything now on the fate of the offensive – that is that is upon the
trench soldiers. What changes had the offensive made in the
consciousness of those who were supposed to carry it through? They had
been irrepressibly longing for peace. But the rulers had succeeded to a
certain degree – at least among a part of the soldiers and for a short
time – in converting this very longing into a readiness to advance.

After the revolution the soldiers had expected from the new power a
swift conclusion of peace, and had been ready until then to defend the
front. The peace did not come. The soldiers resorted to attempts at
fraternisation with the Germans and Austrians, partly under the
influence of Bolshevik agitation, but chiefly seeking their own road to
peace. But a drive had been opened against fraternisation from all
sides. And moreover it was discovered that the German soldiers were
still far from casting off obedience to their officers. Fraternisation,
not having led to peace, dwindled rapidly.

There was on the front at that time a _de facto_ armistice. The Germans
availed themselves of it for a wholesale transfer of troops to the
western front. The Russian soldiers noticed how the enemy trenches were
emptied, machine guns removed, cannon carted away. Upon this rested the
plan of the “moral preparation for the offensive.” It was systematically
suggested to the soldiers that the enemy was completely weakened, that
he had no force left, that America was pressing upon him from the west,
and that we had only to give a small push on our side, and the enemy
front would crumple and we would have peace. The authorities did not
believe this for a single minute, but they calculated that once having
put its hand to the war machine, the army would not be able to let go.

Having failed of their goal, both through the diplomacy of the
Provisional Government and through fraternisation, a part of the
soldiers undoubtedly inclined to this third scheme: to give that push
which would make the war crumble into dust. One of the front delegates
to the congress reported exactly in this way the mood of the soldiers:
“At present we have before us a thinned out German front; there are at
present no cannon; and if we advance and overthrow the enemy then we
will be close to the wished-for peace.”

The enemy at first actually did seem extremely weak, and retired without
accepting the battle, which incidentally the attackers were not able to
give. But instead of crumbling, the enemy regrouped and concentrated his
forces. Penetrating a few score kilometers inland, the Russian soldiers
discovered a picture sufficiently familiar to them in the experience of
the preceding years: the enemy was waiting for them in new and
reinforced positions. Here it became evident that although the soldiers
had agreed to give a push in the direction of peace, they were not in
the least desirous of war. Having been dragged into it by a combination
of force, moral pressure, and most of all deceit, they so much the more
indignantly turned back.

“After an artillery fire unprecedented on the Russian side in its
intensity and power,” says the Russian historian of the World War,
General Zayonchkovsky, “the troops occupied the enemy positions almost
without loss and did not wish to go any farther. There began a steady
desertion and withdrawal of whole units from their positions.” A
Ukrainian leader, Doroshenko, former commissar of the Provisional
Government in Galicia, tells how after the seizure of the cities Calich
and Kalush: “In Kalush there immediately occurred a frightful pogrom of
the local population – but only of Ukrainians and Jews, they did not
touch Poles. Some experienced hand guided the pogrom, pointing out with
special care the local Ukrainian cultural and educational institutions.”
The pogrom was participated in by “the better class of troops, the least
depraved by the revolution” – those carefully picked for the offensive.
But what still more clearly shows its face in this affair is the
leadership of the offensive – the old czarist commanders, experienced
organisers of pogroms.

On July 9 the committees and commissars of the 11th Army telegraphed the
government: “A German attack begun on July 6 against the 11th Army front
is developing into an overwhelming catastrophe ... In the morale of the
troops, only recently induced to move by the heroic efforts of a
minority, a sharp and ruinous break has occurred. The aggressive
flare-up is rapidly exhausting itself. The majority of the troops are
now in a state of increasing disintegration. There is nothing left of
authority or obedience. Persuasions and arguments have lost their force.
They are answered with threats and sometimes with death.”

The commander-in-chief of the south-western front, with the agreement of
the commissars and committees, gave an order to shoot those running
away. On June 12 the commander-in-chief of the western front, Denikin,
returned to his headquarters, as he says, “with despair in my heart, and
with a clear consciousness of the complete collapse of the last
flickering hope for ... a miracle.”

The soldiers did not want to fight. The rear troops, to whom the
weakened units turned for replacements after occupying the enemy
trenches, answered: “What did you advance for anyway? Who told you to?
It’s time to end the war, not attack.” The commander of the 1st Siberian
Corps, considered one of the best commanders, reported how at nightfall
the soldiers began to abandon the unattacked first line in crowds and
whole companies. “I understood that we, the officers, were powerless to
alter the elemental psychology of the soldier masses, and I sobbed
bitterly and long.” One of the companies refused even to toss a leaflet
to the enemy announcing the capture of Galich, until a soldier could be
found who could translate the German text into Russian. In that it
expressed the utter lack of confidence of the soldier mass in its ruling
staff, both the old one and the new February one. A century of taunts
and violence had burst to the surface like a volcano. The soldiers felt
themselves again deceived. The offensive had not led to peace but war.
The soldiers did not want war. And they were right. Patriots hiding in
the rear were branding the soldiers as slackers and baiting them. But
the soldiers were right. They were guided by a true national instinct,
refracted through the consciousness of men oppressed, deceived,
tortured, raised up by a revolutionary hope and again thrown back into
the bloody mash. The soldiers were right. A prolongation of the war
could give the Russian people nothing but new victims, humiliation,
disasters – nothing but an increase of domestic and foreign slavery.

The patriotic press of 1917 – not only the Kadet but also the socialist
press – was tireless in contrasting the Russian soldiers, cowards and
deserters, with the heroic battalions of the great French revolution.
This testifies not only to a failure to understand the dialectic of a
revolutionary process, but also to a crude ignorance of history.

The remarkable warriors of the French revolution and empire frequently
began their careers as breakers of discipline, disorganisers – Miliukov
would say, as Bolsheviks. The future Marshal Davout spent many months of
1789-90 as Lieutenant d’Avout destroying the “normal” discipline in the
garrison of Hesdin, driving out the commanding staff. Throughout France
up to the middle of 1790 a complete disintegration of the whole army was
taking place. The soldiers of the Vincennes regiment compelled their
officers to eat with them. The fleet drove out their officers. Twenty
regiments did various deeds of violence upon their officers. At Nancy
three regiments locked their highest officers in prison. Beginning with
1790 the leaders of the French revolution never tire of repeating on the
subject of soldier excesses: “The executive power is guilty, because it
has not removed officers hostile to the revolution.” It is remarkable
that both Mirabeau and Robespierre spoke in favour of dismissing the
entire old corps of officers. The former was trying the more quickly to
establish a firm discipline, the latter wanted to disarm the
counter-revolution. But both understood that the old army could not
survive.

To be sure, the Russian revolution, in contrast with the French, took
place in a time of war. But you cannot infer from this an exception to
the historic law noted by Engels. On the contrary, conditions of
prolonged and unsuccessful war could only hasten and sharpen the process
of revolutionary disintegration of the army. That miserable and criminal
offensive of the democrats did the rest. The soldiers were now saying,
to the last man “Enough of bloodshed! What good are land and freedom if
we are not here?” When enlightened pacifists try to abolish war by
rationalistic arguments they are merely ridiculous, but when the armed
masses themselves bring weapons of reason into action against a war,
that means that the war is about over.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. The Russian word for Sunday is “Resurrection.”



CHAPTER 20 THE PEASANTRY


 

The subsoil of the revolution was the agrarian problem. In the antique
land system, born directly out of serfdom, in the traditional power of
the landlord, the close ties between landlord, local administration and
caste zemstvo, lay the roots of the most barbarous features of Russian
life which had their crown in the Rasputin monarchy. The muzhik, age-old
support of orientalism, proved also its first victim.

In the first weeks after the February revolution, the village remained
almost inert. Those of the most active age were at the front. The
elderly generation left at home too well remembered how revolutions end
in punitive expeditions. The village was silent, and therefore the city
was silent about the village. But the spectre of a peasant war hung over
the nests of the landlords from the first March days. Out of the most
aristocratic – that is backward and reactionary – provinces a cry for
help was heard almost before the real danger appeared. The liberals
sensitively reflected the fright of the landlords. The Compromisers
reflected the mood of the liberals. “It would be dangerous,”
rationalises the left radical, Sukhanov, just after the revolution, “to
force the agrarian problem in the next few weeks; and moreover there is
not the slightest need of it.” As we know, Sukhanov likewise thought it
would be dangerous to force the question of peace, or of the eight-hour
day. To hide from difficulties is simpler. Moreover, the landlords were
afraid a shake-up of land relations would reflect itself harmfully upon
the spring sowing and the provisioning of the cities. The Executive
Committee sent telegrams to the localities recommending that they should
not “become absorbed in the agrarian question to the neglect of food
supplies to the cities.”

In many regions the landlords, frightened by the revolution, abstained
from the spring sowing. With a heavy food crisis throughout the country,
those empty fields themselves seemed to cry for a new owner. The
peasantry stirred dimly. Hoping little from the new power, the landlords
hastened to dispose of their properties. The kulaks began zealously to
buy up these estates, figuring that as peasants they would escape
forcible expropriation. Many of these land sales were notoriously
fictitious. It was assumed that private holdings below a certain norm
would be spared; in view of this, the landlords artificially divided
their property into small allotments, creating dummy owners. Not
infrequently the lands were transferred to foreigners, citizens of the
allied or neutral countries. Kulak speculation and landlord trickery
threatened to leave nothing of the public land by the time the
Constituent Assembly was convoked.

The villages saw these manoeuvres. Hence their demand: stop all land
sales by decree. Peasant delegates kept pouring into the cities to the
new authorities seeking land and justice. It happened to the ministers
more than once, after their exalted debates and ovations, to run into
the grey figures of peasant deputies at the doorway. Sukhanov tells how
one of these delegates with tears in his eyes beseeched the citizen
minister to promulgate a law protecting the land from being sold off. He
was impatiently interrupted by Kerensky excited and pale: “I said it
would be done, and that means it will be ... and you needn’t look at me
with those suspicious eyes.” Sukhanov, who was present at this scene,
adds: “I report this verbatim. And Kerensky was right: the muzhik did
look with suspicious eyes at the eminent people’s minister and leader.”
In this short dialogue between a peasant who is still asking but no
longer trusting, and the radical minister gesturing away the peasant’s
distrust, is contained the inevitability of the February régime’s
collapse.

The act creating land committees as organs of preparation for agrarian
reform was published by the first Minister of Agriculture, the Kadet
Shingarev. The main land committee, presided over by the liberal
bureaucratic professor, Postnikov, consisted chiefly of Narodniks who
feared more than anything else to appear less moderate than their
president. Local land committees were established in the, provinces,
counties and rural districts. Whereas the Soviets, which took hold
rather slowly in the villages, were considered private organisations,
these committees had a governmental character. But the more indefinite
their functions were according to the act, the harder it was for them to
resist the pressure of the peasants. The lower a committee stood in the
general hierarchy – the nearer, that is, to the land – the sooner it
became an instrument of the peasant movement.

Toward the end of March there began to flow into the capital the first
alarming tidings of the peasants’ entrance upon the scene. The Novgorod
commissar telegraphed of disorders caused by a certain corporal
Panasiuk, of “unwarranted arrests of landlords,” etc. In Tambov province
a crowd of peasants, with certain furloughed soldiers at their head, had
sacked a landlord's estate. The first communications were doubtless
exaggerated. The landlords certainly magnified these conflicts in their
complaints, running ahead of the actual events. But one thing is beyond
doubt; namely, that the leading rôle in the peasant movement was played
by the soldier, who brought home from the front and from the city
barracks a spirit of initiative.

One of the district land committees of Kharkov province decided, on
April 5, to conduct a search for weapons among the landowners. That
already smacks of the coming civil war. A disturbance arising in
Skopinsky county, Riazan province, is explained by the commissar as due
to a decree of the executive committee of a neighbouring county
establishing compulsory rental to the peasants of the landlords’ lands.
“The agitation of students in favour of tranquillity until the
Constituent Assembly, has had no success.” Thus we learn that the
students, who had summoned the peasants in the first revolution to a
campaign of terror, such being the tactic of the Social Revolutionaries
at that time, were now, in 1917, preaching lawfulness and tranquillity –
to be sure, without success.

The commissar of Simbirsk province draws the picture of a more developed
peasant movement: The district and village committees – of which
something will be said later – are arresting the landlords, banishing
them from the province, calling out the workers from the landlords’
fields, seizing the land, establishing arbitrary rentals. “The delegates
sent by the Executive Committee are taking their stand on the side of
the peasants.” At the same time there begins a movement of the communal
peasants against the individual landowners – against strong peasants,
that is, who had detached themselves and taken up individual holdings on
the basis of Stolypin’s law of November 9, 1906. “The situation in the
provinces menaces the sowing of the fields.” As early as April, the
Simbirsk province commissar can see no way out but immediately to
declare the land national property, the terms on which it is to be used
to be defined later by the Constituent Assembly.

From Kashir county, just outside Moscow, come complaints that the
executive committee is inciting the population to the seizure without
indemnity of the church, monastery and landlords’ estates. In Kursk
province the peasants are removing the war-prisoners from work on the
estates, and even locking them up in the local jail. After the peasant
congresses, the peasants in the Penza province, inclining to a literal
interpretation of the Social Revolutionary resolution on land and
freedom, begin to violate a recently concluded contract with the
landlords. At the same time they make an assault on the new organs of
power. “Upon the organisation of the district and county executive
committees in March, the intelligentsia composed the majority of their
staffs, but afterwards” – reports the commissar of Penza – “voices began
to be heard against the intelligentsia, and by the middle of April the
staff of the committees everywhere was exclusively composed of peasants
whose tendency on the land question was clearly lawless.” A group of
landlords of the neighbouring Kazan province complains to the
Provisional Government of the impossibility of carrying on their
business, because the peasants are calling off their workers, stealing
seed, in many localities carrying off the movables of the estate, not
permitting the landlord to cut wood in his own forest, threatening him
with violence and death. “There are no courts; everybody does as he
wishes; sensible people are terrorised.” The Kazan landlords already
know who is guilty of this anarchy: “The instructions of the Provisional
Government are unknown in the village, but Bolshevik leaflets are widely
distributed.” However, there was no lack of instructions from the
Provisional Government. In a telegram of March 20, Prince Lvov proposed
to the commissars to create district committees as organs of the local
power, recommending that they should draw into the work of these
committees “the local landowners and all the intellectual forces of the
village.” It was proposed to organise the whole state structure in the
manner of a system of chambers of conciliation. The commissars, however,
were soon weeping about the crowding out of the “intellectual forces.”
The muzhik obviously did not trust his county and district Kerenskys.

On April 3, Prince Lvov’s substitute, Prince Yurussov – the Ministry of
the Interior was adorned, we see, with lofty titles – recommends that no
arbitrary acts shall be permitted, and especially “the freedom of every
proprietor to dispose of his own land” – sweetest of all freedoms –
shall be defended. Ten days later Prince Lvov himself considers it
necessary to do something, and recommends to the commissars “to put a
stop to every manifestation of violence and robbery with the whole power
of the law.” Again two days later, Prince Yurussov instructs the
provincial commissars “to take measures for the protection of the stud
farms from lawless acts, explaining to the peasants ... and so forth.”
On April 18, Prince Yurussov is troubled because the war-prisoners
working for the landlords are beginning to present immoderate demands,
and instructs the commissars to penalise these insolent fellows on the
basis of the authority formerly enjoyed by the czar’s governors.
Circulars, instructions, telegraphic directions pour down from above in
a continual shower. On May 12 Prince Lvov enumerates in a new telegram
the unlawful activities which are unceasing throughout the country:
arbitrary arrests, searches; removals from office, from management of
estates, from administration of factories and shops; wrecking of
properties; pillage, insubordination, hooliganism; acts of violence
against official personages; imposition of taxes upon the population
inciting one part of the population against another, etc., etc. All such
forms of activity must be recognised as clearly unlawful and in certain
cases even anarchistic ...” The characterisation is not very clear, but
the conclusion is: “That the most decisive measures must be taken.” The
provincial commissars resolutely issued orders to the counties, the
counties brought pressure to bear on the district committees, and all of
them together revealed their impotence in the face of the muzhiks.

Almost everywhere the nearest military detachments had a hand in the
business. Oftenest indeed they took the initiative. The movement assumed
widely different forms, according to local conditions and the sharpness
of the struggle. In Siberia, where there were no landlords, the peasants
took possession of the church and monastery lands. In other parts of the
country, too, the clergy had a hard time. In the pious province of
Smolensk, under the influence of soldiers arriving from the fronts, the
priests and the monks were arrested. Local organisations were often
compelled to go farther than they wanted to, merely to prevent the
peasants from taking incomparably more radical steps. Early in May a
county executive committee of Samara province appointed a social trustee
over the property of Count Orlov-Davidov, thus protecting it from the
peasants. Since the decree promised by Kerensky forbidding the sale of
lands never did appear, the peasants began to stop these sales in their
own way, preventing surveys of the land. Confiscation of the landlords’
weapons, even their hunting weapons, was spreading wider and wider. The
peasants of Minsk province, complains the commissar, “take the
resolutions of a peasant congress for law.” Yes, and how could they take
them otherwise? Those congresses were the sole real power in the
localities. Thus is revealed the vast dissonance between the Social
Revolutionary intelligentsia drowning in words, and the peasantry
demanding action.

Towards the end of May the far steppes of Asia billowed up. The Kirghiz,
from whom the czardom used to take away their best lands for the benefit
of its servants, arose now against the landlords, suggesting that they
hand over at once the stolen goods. “This view is gaining ground in the
steppes,” reported the Akmolinsk commissar. At the opposite end of the
country, in Lifland province, a county executive committee sent a
commission to investigate the sacking of the property of Baron Stahl von
Holstein. The commission declared the disorders insignificant and the
presence of the baron in the county undesirable for the public
tranquillity, and proposed: To forward him along with the baroness to
Petrograd and place them at the disposal of the Provisional Government.
Thus arose one of the innumerable conflicts between the local and the
central powers, between the Social Revolutionaries down below and the
Social Revolutionaries on top.

A report of May 27 from Pavlograd county in Ekaterinoslav province
paints an almost idyllic picture of law and order: The members of the
land committee are explaining to the population all misunderstandings
and thus “preventing any kind of excess.” Alas, this idyll will last but
a few weeks. The head of one of the Kostroma monasteries bitterly
complained at the end of May against a requisition by the peasants of a
third of his horned cattle. The reverend monk should have been more
meek: he will soon bid farewell to the other two-thirds.

In Kursk province there began a persecution of the individual settlers
who had refused to return to the commune. In the hour of its great land
revolution, its “Black Division,” the peasantry wanted to act as a
single whole. Inner distinctions might prove an obstacle; the commune
must stand forth as one man. The fight for the landlord’s land was
therefore accompanied by acts of violence against the separate farmer –
the land individualist.

On the last day of May, a soldier, Samoilov, was arrested in Perm
province for inciting to non-payment of land taxes. Soldier Samoilov
will soon be arresting others. During a religious procession in one of
the villages in Kharkov province, a peasant Grichenko chopped down with
an axe before the eyes of the entire village the revered icon of St.
Nicholas. Thus all kinds of protests arise and express themselves in
action. An anonymous naval officer and landlord, in his _Notes of a
White Guard_, gives an interesting picture of the evolution of the
village in the first months of the revolution. To all offices “almost
everywhere they elected at first men from the bourgeois layers.
Everybody was striving for but one thing – to maintain order.” The
peasants, to be sure, made demands for the land, but during the first
two or three months without violence. You could hear everywhere such
phrases as “We do not want to rob, we want to get it by agreement,” etc.
In these reassuring affirmations the ear of the lieutenant caught a note
of “concealed threat.” And in truth, although the peasantry in the first
period did not resort to violence, still in relation to the so-called
intellectual forces “they immediately began to reveal their disrespect.”
This half-waiting attitude continued, according to the White Guard,
until May or June, “after which a sharp change was to be observed – a
tendency appeared to quarrel with the provisional regulations, to put
things through to suit themselves.” In other words, the peasants gave
the February revolution approximately three months grace on the
promissory notes of the Social Revolutionaries, after which they began
to collect their own way.

A soldier, Chinenov, who had joined the Bolsheviks, made two trips from
Moscow after the revolution to his home in Orel. In May the Social
Revolutionaries were dominant in the district. The muzhiks in many
localities were still paying rent to the landlords. Chinenov organised a
Bolshevik nucleus of soldiers, peasant farmhands and poor peasants. The
nucleus advocated the cessation of rent payments and a distribution of
land among the landless. They immediately registered the landlords’
meadow lands, divided them among the villages, and mowed them. “The
Social Revolutionaries sitting in the district committees cried out
against the illegality of our act, but did not renounce their own share
of the hay.” As the village representatives would give up their offices
through fear of responsibility, the peasants would select new ones who
were more resolute. The latter were by no means always Bolsheviks. By
direct pressure the peasants were producing a split in the Social
Revolutionary Party, dividing the revolutionary elements from the
functionaries and careerists. Having mowed the manorial hay, the muzhiks
turned to the fallow land and began to divide it for the fall sowing.
The Bolshevik nucleus decided to look over the manorial granaries and
send the reserves of grain to the hungering capital. The resolution of
the nucleus was carried out because it coincided with the mood of the
peasants. Chinenov brought with him to his homeland some Bolshevik
literature, a thing nobody had ever heard of until he arrived. “The
local intelligentsia and the Social Revolutionaries,” he said, “spread a
rumour that I was bringing with me a great deal of German gold and that
I would bribe the peasants.” The same process developed on a small as on
a large scale. The districts had their Miliukovs, their Kerenskys, and
... their Lenins.

In Smolensk province the influence of the Social Revolutionaries began
to grow after the Provincial Congress of peasant deputies, which
declared itself, as was to be expected, for a transfer of land to the
people. The peasants swallowed this decision whole, but in distinction
from their leaders they swallowed it in earnest. Thenceforward the
number of Social Revolutionaries in the villages increased continuously.
“Anyone who had been in the Social Revolutionary faction at any
congress,” relates one of the local party workers, “considered himself
either a Social Revolutionary, or something very much like it.” In the
county seat there were two regiments, also under the influence of the
Social Revolutionaries. The district land committee began to plow the
landlord’s land and mow his meadows. The provincial commissar, a Social
Revolutionary, Efimov, issued threatening orders. The village was
bewildered. Why, didn’t this same commissar tell us that the peasants
themselves are now the government and that only he who works the land
can benefit by it? But as a matter of fact at the direction of this
Social Revolutionary commissar, Efimov, 16 district land committees out
of 17, in Yelnin county alone, were brought to trial in the coming
months for seizing the landlords’ land. Thus, in its own way, the
romance between the Narodnik intelligentsia and the people drew to its
_denouément_. In the whole county there were not more than three or four
Bolsheviks. Their influence grew quickly, however, crowding out or
splitting the Social Revolutionaries.

An All-Russian Peasant Congress was convoked in Petrograd at the
beginning of May. The representation was largely upper crust, and in
many cases accidental. If the workers’ and soldiers’ congresses
continually lagged behind the course of events and the political
evolution of the masses, it is needless to say how far the
representation of a scattered peasantry lagged behind the actual mood of
the Russian villages. As delegates there appeared, on the one hand,
Narodnik intellectuals of the extreme right, associated with the
peasantry chiefly through commercial co-operatives or the reminiscences
of childhood. The genuine “people,” on the other hand, were represented
by the better off upper strata of the villages, kulaks, shopkeepers,
peasant co-operators. The Social Revolutionaries dominated this congress
absolutely, and moreover in the person of their extreme right wing. At
times, however, even they paused in fright before the reeking mixture of
land greed and political “blackhundred-ism” which exuded from some of
the deputies. In regard to the landlord problem an extremely radical
position was formulated by this congress: “Conversion of all land into
national property for equal working use, without any indemnity.” To be
sure, the _kulak_ understood equality only in the sense of his equality
with the landlord, not at all in the sense of his equality with the
hired hands. However, this little misunderstanding between the
fictitious socialism of the Narodniks and the agrarian democratism of
the muzhiks would come out in the open only in the future.

The Minister of Agriculture, Chernov, burning with a desire to present
an Easter egg to the Peasant Congress, vainly busied himself with the
project of a decree forbidding land sales. The Minister of Justice,
Pereverzev, also counting himself something of a Social Revolutionary,
issued instructions during the very days of the congress that in the
various localities no obstacles should be put in the way of land sales.
On this subject the peasant deputies raised a noise. But the matter did
not move forward a step. The Provisional Government of Prince Lvov would
not agree to lay a hand on the landlords’ estates. The socialists did
not want to lay a hand on the Provisional Government. And least of all
was the staff of the congress capable of finding a way out of the
contradiction between its appetite for land and its reactionism.

On the 20th of May, Lenin spoke at the Peasant Congress. It seemed, says
Sukhanov, as though Lenin had landed in a pit of crocodiles. “However,
the little muzhiks listened attentively and very likely not without
sympathy, although they did not dare show it.” The same thing was
repeated in the soldiers’ section, which was extremely hostile to the
Bolsheviks. In the style of the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks,
Sukhanov tries to give Lenin’s tactics on the land question an anarchist
tint. This is not so far from the attitude of Prince Lvov, who was
always inclined to regard infringements of landlord rights as anarchist
activities. According to this logic, the revolution as a whole is
equivalent to anarchy. In reality Lenin’s way of posing the question was
far deeper than it seemed to his critics. The instruments of the
agrarian revolution, and primarily of the seizure of the landed estates,
were to be the soviets of peasants’ deputies with the land committees
subject to them. In Lenin’s eyes these soviets were the organs of a
future state power, and that too a most concentrated power – namely, the
revolutionary dictatorship. This is certainly far from anarchism, from
the theory and practice of non-government. Lenin said on April 28 “We
favour an immediate transfer of the land to the peasants, with the
highest degree of organisation possible. We are absolutely against
anarchist seizures.” Why, then, are we unwilling to await the
Constituent Assembly? For this reason: “The important thing for us is
revolutionary initiative; the laws should be the result of it. If you
wait until the law is written, and do not yourselves develop
revolutionary energy, you will get neither law nor land.” Are not these
simple words the voice of all revolutions?

After a month’s sitting, the Peasant Congress elected as a permanent
institution an executive committee composed of two hundred sturdy
village petty bourgeois and Narodniks of the professorial or trader
type, adorning them at the summit with the decorative figures of
Breshkovskaia, Chaikovsky, Vera Figner and Kerensky. As president they
elected the Social Revolutionary, Avksentiev, a man made for provincial
banquets, but not for a peasant war.

Henceforward the more important questions were taken up at joint
sessions of the two executive committees, that of the worker-soldiers
and that of the peasants. This combination entailed a great
strengthening of the right wing which blended directly with the Kadets.
In all cases where it was necessary to bring pressure against the
workers, come down on the heads of the Bolsheviks, or threaten the
independent Kronstadt republic with whips and scorpions, the two hundred
hands, or rather the two hundred fists, of the peasant executive
committee would be lifted like a wall. Those people were fully in accord
with Miliukov, that it was necessary to “make an end” of the Bolsheviks.
But in regard to the landed estates, they had the views not of liberals,
but of muzhiks, and this brought them into opposition with the
bourgeoisie and the Provincial Government. The Peasant Congress had not
had time to disperse, when complaints began to arrive that its
resolutions were being taken seriously in the localities and that
peasants were going about the business of appropriating the land and
equipment of the landlords. It was simply impossible to hammer into
those stubborn peasant skulls the difference between words and deeds.

The Social Revolutionaries, frightened, sounded the retreat. At the
beginning of June, at their Moscow congress, they solemnly condemned all
arbitrary seizures of land: we must wait for the Constituent Assembly.
But their resolution proved impotent, not only to stop, but even to
weaken the agrarian movement. The matter was further greatly complicated
by the fact that in the Social Revolutionary party itself there was no
small number of elements actually ready to go the limit with the muzhiks
against the landlords. These left Social Revolutionaries, not yet having
made up their minds to break with the party, helped the muzhiks get
around the law, or at least interpret it in their own fashion.

In Kazan province, where the peasant movement assumed especially stormy
proportions, the left wing of the Social Revolutionaries defined itself
sooner than in other places. At their head stood Kalegaev, subsequently
Commissar of Agriculture in the Soviet Government during the bloc
between the Bolsheviks and the Social Revolutionaries. From the middle
of May there began in Kazan province a systematic transfer of land to
the district committees. This measure was adopted most boldly of all in
Spassk county, where a Bolshevik stood at the head of the peasant
organisations. The provincial authorities complained to the centre about
the agrarian agitation carried on by Bolsheviks coming from Kronstadt,
and added that the pious nun Tamara was arrested for “making
objections.”

From the province of Yorenezh the commissar reported on June 2:
“Incidents of lawbreaking and illegal activity in the province are
growing more numerous every day, especially in the agrarian matter.” In
Penza province also, the seizures of land were becoming more insistent.
One of the district land committees in Kaluga province deprived the
monastery of half of its meadow lands, and upon the complaint of the
abbot the county committee resolved: that the meadows should be taken as
a whole. It is not often that the higher institution proves more radical
than the lower. In Penza province an abbess, Maria, weeps over the
seizure of the nunnery’s land. “The local authorities are powerless.”

In Viatka province the peasants closed up the property of the
Skoropadskys, the family of the future Ukrainian _hetman_, and “until
the decision of the question of landed property” resolved that nobody
should touch the forests, and that the income from the property should
be paid into the public treasury. In a series of other localities the
land committees not only lowered the rent five or six times, but
directed that it should not be paid to the landlords, but placed at the
disposal of the committees until the question should be settled by the
Constituent Assembly. This was not a lawyer’s but a muzhik’s way – that
is, a serious way – of postponing the question about land reforms until
the Constituent Assembly. In Saratov province the peasants who only
yesterday forbade the landlords to cut down the forests have today begun
to fell the trees themselves. Oftener and oftener the peasants are
seizing the church and monastery lands, especially where there are few
landlords. In Lifland, the Lettish farm workers, along with soldiers of
the Lettish Battalion, undertake an organised seizure of the baronial
lands.

The lumber kings from Vitebsk province cry loudly that the measures
adopted by the land committees are destroying the lumber industry and
preventing them from supplying the needs of the front. Those no less
disinterested patriots, the landlords of the Poltava province, grieve
over the fact that agrarian disorders are making it impossible for them
to supply provisions for the army. Finally a congress of horse breeders
in Moscow gives warning that peasant seizures are threatening with
gigantic misfortunes the studs of the Fatherland. In those days the
Procuror of the Holy Synod, the same one who called the members of that
sacred institution “idiots and scoundrels,” complains to the government
that in Kazan province the peasants are taking away from the monks not
only lands and cattle, but also the flour necessary for the holy bread.
In Petrograd province, two steps from the capital, the peasants drive
the lessee out of a property and begin to run it themselves. The
wide-awake Prince Yurussov again telegraphs on June 2 to the four winds:
“In spite of a series of demands from me ... etc., etc. ... I again ask
you to take the most decisive measures.” The prince only forgets to say
what measures.

In those times, when a gigantic job of tearing up the deepest roots of
medievalism and serfdom was under way throughout the whole country, the
Minister of Agriculture, Chernov, was gathering in his chancelleries
materials for the. Constituent Assembly. He intended to introduce the
reform no otherwise than on the basis of the most accurate agricultural
data and statistics of all possible kinds, and therefore kept urging the
peasants with the sweetest of voices to wait until his exercises were
finished. This did not, however, prevent the landlords from kicking out
the “Rural Minister” long before he had completed his sacramental
tables.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

On the basis of the archives of the Provisional Government young
investigators have concluded that in March the agrarian movement had
arisen with more or less strength in only 84 counties. In April, it had
seized 174 counties; in May, 236; in June, 280; in July, 325. These
figures, however, do not give a complete picture of the actual growth of
the movement, because in each county the struggle assumed from month to
month more and more stubborn and broad mass character.

In that first period, from March to July the peasants in their
overwhelming majority are still refraining from direct acts of violence
against the landlords, and from open seizures of the land. Yakovlev, the
leader of the above-mentioned investigations, now People’s Commissar of
Agriculture of the Soviet Union, explains the comparatively peaceful
tactics of the peasants by their trustfulness toward the bourgeoisie.
This explanation must be declared invalid. To say nothing of the
continual suspiciousness of the muzhik toward the city, the authorities
and cultivated society, a government headed by Prince Lvov could not
possibly dispose the peasants to trustfulness. If the peasants during
this first period hardly ever resort to measures of open violence, and
are still trying to give their activities the form of legal or
semi-legal pressure, this is explained by their very distrustfulness of
the government, combined with an insufficient trust in their own powers.
The peasants are only pacing the take-off, feeling out the ground,
measuring the resistance of the enemy – bringing pressure upon the
landlords from all directions. “We do not want to rob,” they recite, “we
want to do everything nicely.” They are not appropriating the meadow,
but only cutting the hay. They are only compelling the landlords to rent
them the land, but are themselves establishing the price. Or with a
similar compulsion they are “buying” the land – but at a price
designated by themselves. All these legal coverings, none too convincing
to the landlord or the liberal jurists, are dictated in reality by a
concealed but deep distrust of the government. “You won’t get it by
being good,” says the muzhik to himself, “and force is dangerous – let’s
try foxiness.” He would prefer, of course, to expropriate the landlord
with his own consent.

“Throughout all these months,” insists Yakovlev, “there prevails a
wholly unique method of ‘Peaceful’ struggle with the landlord, a thing
never before seen in history, a result of the peasants’ trust in the
bourgeoisie and the government of the bourgeoisie.” These methods here
declared to have been never before seen in history, are in reality the
typical and inevitable methods historically obligatory throughout the
entire planet in the initial stages of a peasant war. The attempt to
disguise its first rebel steps with legality, both sacred and secular,
has from time immemorial characterised the struggle of every
revolutionary class, before it has gathered sufficient strength and
confidence to break the umbilical cord which bound it to the old
society. This is more completely true of the peasantry than of any other
class, for even in its best periods the peasantry advances in
semi-darkness, looking upon its city friends with distrustful eyes. It
has good reasons for this. The friends of an agrarian movement in its
first steps are the agents of the liberal and radical bourgeoisie. And
while promoting a part of the peasant demands, these friends are
nevertheless alarmed for the fate of bourgeois property rights, and
therefore try their best to lead the peasant uprising on to the rails of
bourgeois legality.

Long before the revolution, other factors operate in the same direction.
From the milieu of the nobility itself there arise preachers of
conciliation. Leo Tolstoy looked deeper into the soul of the muzhik than
anybody else. His philosophy of non-resistance to evil by violence was a
generalisation of the first stages of the muzhik revolution. Tolstoy
dreamed of a day when it would all come to pass “without robbery, by
mutual consent.” He built up a religious foundation under this tactic in
the form of a purified Christianity. Mahatma Gandhi is now fulfilling
the same mission in India, only in a more practical form. If we go
backward from the present day we shall have no difficulty in finding,
similar “never before seen in history” phenomena in all sorts of
religious, national, philosophical and political disguises, beginning
with Biblical times and still earlier.

The peculiarity of the peasant uprising of 1917 lay only in the fact
that the agents of bourgeois legality were people who called themselves
socialists, and also revolutionists. But it was not they who determined
the character of the peasant movement and its rhythm. The peasants
followed the Social Revolutionaries only in so far as they could secure
from them adequate formulas for a settlement with the landlord. At the
same time the Social Revolutionaries served them in the capacity of a
juridical disguise: this was, after all, the party of Kerensky, Minister
of Justice and afterwards War Minister, and of Chernov, Minister of
Agriculture. The delay in the promulgation of the necessary decrees
would be explained by the district and county Social Revolutionaries as
due to the resistance of the landlords and liberals. They would assure
the peasants that “our people” in the government are doing their very
best. To this of course the muzhik had no answer. But not suffering in
the least from that precious “trustfulness,” he deemed it necessary to
help “our people” from below, and he did this so thoroughly that “our
people” up above soon began to feel their very joints cracking.

The weakness of the Bolsheviks in relation to the peasant was temporary,
and due to the fact that the Bolsheviks did not share the peasant
illusions. The village could come to Bolshevism only through experience
and disappointment. The strength of the Bolsheviks lay in the fact that
on the agrarian question, as on others, they were free of the divergence
between word and deed.

General sociological considerations could not yield an a priori decision
as to whether the peasantry as a whole were capable of rising against
the landlords or not. The strengthening of capitalist tendencies in
agriculture during the period between the two revolutions, the dividing
off of a layer of wealthy farmers from the primitive commune, the
extraordinary growth of rural co-operation administered by well-off and
rich peasants – all this made it impossible to say with certainty which
of two tendencies would weigh the most in the revolution: the agrarian
caste antagonism between the peasantry and the nobility, or the class
antagonism within the peasantry itself.

Lenin upon his arrival took a very cautious position upon this question.
“The agrarian movement,” he said on April 14, “is only a prophecy, not a
fact ... We must be prepared for a union of the peasantry with the
bourgeoisie.” That was not a thought accidentally tossed off. On the
contrary, Lenin insistently repeated it in many connections. At a party
conference on April 24, he said attacking the “old Bolsheviks” who had
accused him of underestimating the peasantry: “It is not permissible for
a proletarian party to rest its hopes at this time on a community of
interest with the peasantry. We are struggling to bring the peasantry
over to our side, but they now stand to a certain degree consciously –
on the side of the capitalists.” This demonstrates among other things
how far Lenin was from that theory of an eternal harmony of interest
between proletariat and peasantry subsequently attributed to him by the
epigones. While admitting the possibility that the peasantry, as a
caste, might act as a revolutionary factor, Lenin nevertheless was
getting ready in April for a less favourable variant; namely, a stable
bloc of the landlords, bourgeoisie and broad layers of the peasantry.
“To try to attract the peasant now,” he said, “means to throw ourselves
on the mercy of Miliukov.” Hence the conclusion: “Transfer the centre of
gravity to the soviets of farm-hand deputies.”

But the more favourable variant was realised. The agrarian movement from
being a prophesy became a fact, revealing for a brief moment, but with
extraordinary force, the superiority of the caste ties of the peasantry
over the capitalistic antagonisms. The soviets of farm-hand deputies
attained significance only in a few localities, chiefly the Baltic
provinces. The land committees, on the contrary, became the instruments
of the whole peasantry, who with their heavy-handed pressure converted
them from chambers of conciliation into weapons of agrarian revolution.

This fact that the peasantry as a whole found it possible once more –
for the last time in their history – to act as a revolutionary factor,
testifies at once to the weakness of capitalist relations in the country
and to their strength. The bourgeois economy had not yet by any means
sucked up the land relations of medieval serfdom. At the same time the
capitalist development had gone so far that it had made the old forms of
landed property equally unbearable for all layers of the village. The
interweaving of landlord and peasant property – quite often consciously
arranged in such a way as to convert the landlord’s rights into a trap
for the whole commune – the frightful striped ownership of the village
land, and finally the very recent antagonism between the land commune
and the individualist owners – all this together created an unbearable
tangle of land relationships from which it was impossible to escape by
way of halfhearted legislative measures. Moreover, the peasants felt it
more deeply than any agrarian theoreticians could. The experience of
life handed down through a series of generations led them all to the
same conclusion: we must bury both hereditary and acquired rights in the
land, erase all boundary marks, and hand over the land, purged of
historic deposits, to those who work it. This was the meaning of the
muzhik’s aphorism: the land is no man’s, the land is God’s. And in this
same spirit the peasantry interpreted the Social Revolutionary
programme: socialisation of the land. All Narodnik theories to the
contrary notwithstanding, there was not in this one grain of socialism.
The most audacious of agrarian revolutions has never yet by itself
overstepped the bounds of the bourgeois régime. That socialisation which
was to guarantee to each toiler his “right to the land,” was with the
preservation of unrestricted market relations, an utter Utopia.
Menshevism criticised this Utopia from the liberal-bourgeois point of
view. Bolshevism, on the other hand, exposed the progressive democratic
tendency which was finding in these theories of the Social
Revolutionaries a Utopian expression. This exposure of the genuine
historic meaning of the Russian agrarian movement was one of the
greatest services of Lenin.

Miliukov wrote that for him, “as a sociologist and investigator of
Russian historic evolution” – that is, a man surveying the course of
events from a height – “Lenin and Trotsky are leading a movement far
nearer to Pugatchev and Razin, to Bolotnikov – to the eighteenth and
seventeenth centuries of our history – than to the last word in European
anarcho-syndicalism.” That dole of truth which is contained in this
assertion of the liberal sociologist – leaving aside his reference to
“anarcho-syndicalism” which was dragged in here for some unknown reason
– militates not against the Bolsheviks, but rather against the Russian
bourgeoisie, their belatedness and political insignificance. The
Bolsheviks are not to blame that those colossal peasant movements of
past ages did not lead to a democratisation of social relations in
Russia – without cities to lead them it was unattainable! – nor are the
Bolsheviks to blame that the so-called liberation of the peasants in
1861 was carried out in such a way as to involve stealing of the
communal land, enslavement of the peasant to the state, and complete
preservation of the caste system. One thing is true: the Bolsheviks were
obliged to carry through in the first quarter of the twentieth century
that which was not carried through – or not even undertaken at all – in
the seventeenth, eighteenth and nineteenth centuries. Before taking up
their own great task, they had to clear the ground of the historic
rubbish of the old ruling classes and the old ages. We may add that the
Bolsheviks at least fulfilled this preliminary task most
conscientiously. This Miliukov will now hardly venture to deny.



CHAPTER 21 SHIFTS IN THE MASSES


 

In the fourth month of its existence the February régime was already
choking from its own contradictions. June had begun with the all-Russian
congress of the soviets, whose task was to create a political cover for
the advance on the front. The beginning of the advance coincided in
Petrograd with a gigantic demonstration of workers and soldiers
organised by the Compromisers against the Bolsheviks, but which turned
out to be a Bolshevik demonstration against the Compromisers. The
growing indignation of the masses led after two weeks to another
demonstration, which broke out without any summons from above, led to
bloody encounters, and has gone into history under the name of “the July
days.” Taking place exactly halfway between the February and the October
revolutions, the July semi-insurrection closes the former and
constitutes a kind of dress rehearsal for the latter. We shall end this
volume on the threshold of the July days, but before passing over to
those events whose arena in June was Petrograd, it is necessary to have
a glance at certain processes which were taking place in the masses.

To a certain liberal who had affirmed at the beginning of May that the
more the government moves to the left, the more the country moves to the
right – meaning by “country,” of course, “the possessing classes” –
Lenin replied: “the ‘country’ of workers and poorer and poorest
peasants, I assure you, citizen, is a thousand times farther to the left
than the Chernovs and Tseretellis, and a hundred times farther than we.
Live a little and you will see.” Lenin estimated that the workers and
peasants were “a hundred times” farther to the left than the Bolsheviks.
This may seem a little unfounded: the workers and soldiers were still
supporting the Compromisers, and the majority of them were on their
guard against the Bolsheviks. But Lenin was delving deeper. The social
interests of the masses, their hatred and their hope, were still only
seeking a mode of expression. The policy of the Compromisers had been
for then a first stage. The masses were immeasurably to the left of the
Chernovs and Tseretellis, but were themselves still unconscious of their
radicalism. Lenin was right in asserting that the masses were to the
left of the Bolsheviks, for the party in its immense majority had not
yet realised the mightiness of the revolutionary passions that were
simmering in the depths of the awakening people. The indignation of the
masses was nourished by the dragging-out of the war, the economic ruin
and the malicious inactivity of the government.

The measureless European-Asiatic plain had become a country only thanks
to railroads. The war struck them most heavily of all. Transport was
steadily breaking down; the number of disabled locomotives on certain
roads had reached 50 per cent. At headquarters learned engineers read
reports to the effect that no later than in six months the railroad
transport would be in a state of complete paralysis. In these
calculations there was a certain amount of conscious spreading of panic.
But the breakdown of transport had really reached threatening
dimensions. It had created tie-ups on the roads, intensified the
disturbance of commodity exchange, and augmented the high cost of
living.

The food situation in the cities was becoming worse and worse. The
agrarian movement had established its centre in 43 provinces. The flow
of grain to the army and the towns was dangerously dwindling. In the
more fertile regions, to be sure, there were still tens and hundreds of
millions of poods of surplus grain, but the purchasing operations at a
fixed price gave extremely unsatisfactory results: and moreover it was
difficult to deliver the ready grain to the centres owing to the
breakdown of transport. From the autumn of 1916 on, an average of about
one half of the expected provision trains arrived at the front.
Petrograd, Moscow and other industrial centres received no more than 10
per cent of what they needed. They had almost no reserves. The standard
of living of the city masses oscillated between under-nourishment and
hunger. The arrival of the Coalition Government was signalised with a
democratic order forbidding the baking of white bread. It will be
several years after that before the “French roll” will again appear in
the capital. There was not enough butter. In June the consumption of
sugar was cut down by definite rationing for the whole country.

The mechanism of the market, broken by the war, had not been replaced by
that state regulation to which the advanced capitalist governments had
been compelled to resort, and which alone permitted Germany to hold on
through four years of war.

Threatening symptoms of economic collapse appeared at every step. The
fall in productivity in the factories was caused, aside from the
breakdown of transport, by the wearing out of equipment, the lack of raw
materials and supplies, the flux of personnel, bad financing and the
universal uncertainty.

The principal plants were still working for the war. Orders had been
distributed for two or three years ahead. Meantime the workers were
unwilling to believe that the war would continue. The newspapers were
publishing appalling figures of war profits. The cost of living was
rising. The workers were awaiting a change. The technical and
administrative personnel of the factories were uniting in unions and
advancing their demands. In this sphere the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries dominated. The régime of the factories was
disintegrating. All joints were weakening. The prospects of the war and
of the national economy were becoming misty, and property rights
unreliable. Profits were falling off, dangers growing, the bosses losing
their taste for production under the conditions created by the
revolution. The bourgeoisie as a whole was entering upon a policy of
economic defeatism. Temporary losses and deficits due to economic
paralysis were in their eyes the overhead expenses of a struggle with
the revolution which threatened the foundations of “culture.” At the
same time the virtuous press was accusing the workers from day to day of
maliciously sabotaging industry, stealing raw materials, unnecessarily
burning up fuel in order to produce stoppages. The falsity of these
accusations exceeded all bounds, and since this was the press of a party
which actually stood at the head of the Coalition power, the indignation
of the workers naturally transferred itself to the Provisional
Government.

The industrialists had not forgotten the experience of 1905 when a
correctly organised lockout actively supported by the government had not
only broken up the struggle of the workers for an eight-hour day, but
also had rendered the monarchy an invaluable service in the matter of
wiping out the revolution. The question of a lockout was now again
brought up for discussion at a Council of the Congresses of Industry and
Trade – thus innocently they named the fighting organ of trustified and
syndicated capital. One of the leaders of industry, the engineer
Auerbach, explained later in his memoirs why the idea of a lockout was
rejected: “This would have looked like a blow at the rear of the army
... The consequences -of such a step, _in the absence of governmental
support,_ looked to the majority very dark.” The whole misfortune lay in
the absence of a “real” government. The Provisional Government was
paralysed by the Soviet; the reasonable leaders of the Soviet were
paralysed by the masses; the workers in the factories were armed;
moreover, almost every factory had in the neighbourhood a friendly
regiment or battalion. In these circumstances these gentlemen
industrialists considered a lockout “odious in its national aspect.” But
they did not by any means renounce the idea of an offensive, but merely
adapted it to existing circumstances, giving it not a simultaneous, but
a creeping character. According to the diplomatic expression of
Auerbach, the industrialists “finally came to the conclusion that an
object lesson would be given by life itself, in the form of an
inevitable gradual closing of the factories, so to speak, one at a time
– a thing which soon did actually occur.” In other words, renouncing a
demonstrative lockout as involving “an enormous responsibility,” this
Council of the United Industries recommended to its members to close up
the enterprises one at a time, seeking out a respectable pretext.

This plan of a creeping lockout was carried out with remarkable system.
Leaders of Capital like the Kadet Kutler, a former Minister in the
cabinet of Witte, read significant reports about the breakdown of
industry, laying the blame, not on the three years of war, but on the
three months of revolution. “In the course of two or three weeks,”
prophesied the impatient newspaper _Rech,_ “the shops and factories will
begin to shut down one after another,” A threat was here dressed up in
the form of a prophecy. Engineers, professors, journalists started a
campaign in both the general and the specialised press, in which a
bridling of the workers was presented as the fundamental condition of
salvation. The minister-industrialist Konovalov had declared on the 17
of May, just before his demonstrative withdrawal from government: “If
there does not soon come a sobering up of cloudy heads ... we will
witness a stoppage of tens and hundreds of plants.”

In the middle of June a Congress of Trade and Industry demands of the
Provisional Government “a radical break with the system of developing
the revolution.” We have already heard this demand made by the generals:
“Stop the Revolution.” But the industrialists make it more concise: “The
source of all evil is not only the Bolsheviks, but also the socialist
parties. Only a firm iron hand can save Russia.”

Having prepared the political setting, the industrialists passed from
words to deeds. In the course of March and April, 129 small plants
involving 9,000 workers were shut down; in May, 108 with a like number
of workers; in June, 125 plants with 38,000 workers were shut down; in
July, 206 plants threw out on the streets 48,000 workers. The lockout
developed in a geometric progression. But that was only a beginning.
Textile Moscow got into motion after Petrograd, and the provinces after
Moscow. The manufacturers would refer to an absence of fuel, raw
materials, accessories, credits. The factory committees would interfere
in the matter and in many cases indubitably establish the fact of a
malicious dislocation of industry with the goal of bringing pressure on
the workers, or holding up the government for subsidies. Especially
impudent were the foreign capitalists acting through the mediation of
their embassies. In several cases the sabotage was so obvious that as a
result of the exposures of the shop committees the industrialists found
themselves compelled to re-open the factories, thus laying bare one
contradiction after another. The revolution soon arrived at the chief of
them all: that between the social character of industry and the private
ownership of its tools and equipment. In the interests of victory over
the workers, the entrepreneur closes the factory as though it were a
question of a mere snuff box, and not an enterprise necessary to the
life of the whole nation.

The banks, having successfully boycotted the Liberty Loan, took a
militant attitude against fiscal encroachments on big capital. In a
letter addressed to the Ministry of Finance the bankers “prophesied” a
flow of capital abroad and a transfer of papers to the safes in case of
radical financial reforms. In other words the banker-patriots threatened
a financial lockout to complete the industrial one. The government
hastened to accede: after all, the organisers of this sabotage were
respected people who had been compelled as the result of the war and the
revolution to risk their capital, and not any old Kronstadt sailors who
risked nothing but their heads.

The Executive Committee could not fail to understand that the
responsibility for the economic fate of the country, especially since
the open association of the socialists in the government, would lie in
the eyes of the masses upon the ruling Soviet majority. The economic
department of the Executive Committee had worked out a broad programme
of state regulation of the economic life. Under pressure of the
threatening situation, the proposals of very moderate economists had
proved much more radical than their authors. “For many branches of
industry,” read this programme, “the time is ripe for a state trade
monopoly (bread, meat, salt, leather); for others, the conditions are
ripe for the formation of regulating state trusts (coal, oil, metals,
sugar, paper); and finally, for almost all branches of industry
contemporary conditions demand a regulative participation of the state
in the distribution of raw materials and finished products, and also in
the fixation of prices ... Simultaneously with this it is necessary to
place under control ... all credit institutions.”

On May 16, the Executive Committee with its bewildered political
leadership adopted the proposals of the economists almost without
debate, and backed them up with a unique warning addressed to the
government: It should take upon itself “the task of a planned
organisation of the national industry and labour,” calling to memory
that in consequence of the non fulfilment of this task “the old régime
fell and it had been necessary to reorganise the Provisional
Government.” In order to pump up their courage the Compromisers were
scaring themselves.

“The programme is excellent,” wrote Lenin, “both the control and the
governmentalising of the trusts, also the struggle with speculation, and
liability for labour ... It is necessary to recognise this programme of
‘frightful’ Bolshevism, for no other programme and no other way out of
the actually threatening terrible collapse can be found….” However, the
whole question was: Who was to carry out this excellent programme? Would
it be the Coalition? The answer was given immediately. The day after the
adoption by the Executive Committee of the economic programme, the
Minister of Trade and Industry, Konovalov, resigned and slammed the door
behind him. He was temporarily replaced by the engineer Palchinsky, a no
less loyal but more energetic representative of big capital. The
minister-socialists did not even dare seriously propose the programme of
the Executive Committee to their liberal colleagues. Chernov, you
remember, was vainly trying to get the government to adopt a veto on
land sales. In answer to its growing difficulties, the government, on
its side, brought forward a programme of unloading Petrograd, that is,
transferring shops and factories into the depths of the country. This
programme was motivated both by military considerations – the danger
that the Germans might seize the capital – and by economic: Petrograd
was too far from the sources of fuel and raw materials. This unloading
would have meant the liquidation of the Petrograd industries for a
series of months and years. The political aim was to scatter throughout
the whole country the vanguard of the working class. Parallel with this
the military power brought forward one pretext after another for
deporting from Petrograd the revolutionary military units.

Palchinsky tried with all his might to convince the workers’ section of
the Soviet of the advantages of an unloading. To accomplish this task
against the will of the workers was impossible. But the workers would
not agree. The unloading scheme got forward as little as the regulation
of industry. The breakdown was going deeper. Prices were rising. The
silent lockout was broadening, and therewith unemployment. The
government was marking time. Miliukov wrote later: “The ministry was
simply swimming with the current, and the current was running in the
Bolshevik channel.” Yes, the current was running in the Bolshevik
channel.

The proletariat was the chief motive force of revolution. At the same
time the revolution was giving shape to the proletariat. And the
proletariat was badly in need of this.

We have observed the decisive rôle of the Petrograd workers in the
February days. The most militant positions were occupied by the
Bolsheviks. Immediately after the overturn, however, the Bolsheviks
retired into the background. The Compromise parties advanced to the
front of the political stage. They turned over the power to the liberal
bourgeoisie. Patriotism was the countersign of this bloc. Its assault
was so strong that at least one half of the leaders of the Bolshevik
Party capitulated to it. With Lenin’s arrival the course of the party
changed abruptly, and thereafter its influence grew swiftly. In the
armed April demonstration the front ranks of the workers and soldiers
were already trying to break the chain of the Compromisers. But after a
first effort they fell back. The Compromisers remained at the helm.

Later on, after the October revolution, a good deal was written to the
effect that the Bolsheviks owed their victory to the peasant army, tired
of the war. That is a very superficial explanation. The opposite
statement would be nearer to the truth: If the Compromisers got a
dominant position in the February revolution, it is thanks most of all
to the unusual place occupied in the life of the country by a peasant
army. If the revolution had developed in peace time, the leading rôle of
the proletariat would have had from the beginning a far more sharply
expressed character. Without the war the revolutionary victory would
have come later, and if you do not count the victims of the war, would
have been paid for at a higher price. But it would not have left a place
for an inundation of compromising patriotic moods. At any rate, the
Russian Marxists who had prophesied long before these events a conquest
of the proletariat in the course of the bourgeois revolution did not
take for their starting point the temporary moods of the army, but the
class structure of the Russian society. That prophecy was wholly
confirmed. But the fundamental correlation of classes was refracted
through the war and temporarily shifted by the pressure of the army –
that is, by an organisation of declassed and armed peasants. It was just
this artificial social formation which so extraordinarily strengthened
the hold of the petty bourgeois compromise policy, and made possible an
eight-months’ period of experiments, weakening to the country and the
revolution.

However, the question as to the roots of compromisism is not exhausted
by reference to the peasant army. In the proletariat itself, in its
make-up, its political level, we must seek supplementary causes for the
temporary entrenchment of the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries. The
war brought vast changes in the constitution and mood of the working
class. If the preceding years had been a time of revolutionary afflux,
the war sharply broke off that process. The mobilisation was thought out
and conducted not only from a military, but still more from a police
viewpoint. The government made haste to clean out from the industrial
districts the more active and restless groups of workers. We may
consider it established that the mobilisation of the first months of war
tore away from the industries as many as 40 per cent of the workers,
chiefly the skilled workers. Their absence, having a very damaging
effect on the course of production, called out hot protests from the
industrialists in proportion to their high profits from the war
industries. A further destruction of the workers’ cadres was thus
stopped. The workers indispensable to the industries remained in the
capacity of men on military duty. The breaches effected by the
mobilisation were made up by immigrants from the villages, small-town
people, badly qualified workers, women, boys. The percentage of women in
industry rose from 32 to 40 per cent.

The process of renewal and dilution of the proletariat reached its
extreme dimensions in the capital. For the years of the war, 1914-17,
the number of workers in large enterprises, those hiring more than 500,
almost doubled in the Petrograd province. In consequence of the
liquidation of plants and factories in Poland, and especially in the
Baltic states, and still more in consequence of the general growth of
the war industries, there were concentrated in Petrograd by 1917 about
400,000 workers in plants and factories. Out of these, 335,000 were in
the one hundred and forty giant plants. The more militant elements of
the Petrograd proletariat played no small part at the front in giving
form to the revolutionary moods of the army. But those yesterday’s
immigrants from the villages who replaced them, often well-to-do
peasants and shopkeepers hiding from the front, women and boys, were far
more submissive than the ranking workers. To this we must add that the
qualified workers who found themselves in the position of men on
military duty – and of these there were hundreds of thousands – observed
an extraordinary caution through fear of being thrown over to the front.
Such was the social basis of the patriotic mood, which had prevailed
with a part of the workers even under the czar. But there was no
stability in this patriotism. The merciless military and police
repression, the redoubled exploitation, defeats at the front, and
industrial breakdown, pushed the workers into the struggle. Strikes
during the war were predominantly economic in character, however, and
distinguished by far more moderation than before the war. The weakening
of the class was increased by the weakening of its party. After the
arrest and exile of the Bolshevik Duma deputies, there was carried out
with the help of a previously prepared hierarchy of provocateurs a
general smash-up of the Bolshevik organisations, from which the party
did not recover until the February revolution. During 1915 and 1916 the
diluted working class had to go through an elementary school of struggle
before the partial economic strikes and demonstrations of hungry women
could in February 1917 fuse in a general strike, and draw the army into
an insurrection.

The Petrograd proletariat thus entered the February revolution not only
in a heterogeneous condition, not yet having amalgamated its constituent
parts, but with a lowered political level even of its advanced layers.
In the provinces it was still worse. It was this revival of political
illiteracy and semi-illiteracy in the proletariat, caused by the war,
which created the second condition necessary for the temporary dominance
of the Compromise parties.

A revolution teaches and teaches fast. In that lies its strength. Every
week brings something new to the masses. Every two months creates an
epoch. At the end of February, the insurrection. At the end of April, a
demonstration of the armed workers and soldiers in Petrograd. At the
beginning of July, a new assault, far broader in scope and under more
resolute slogans. At the end of August, Kornilov’s attempt at an
overthrow beaten off by the masses. At the end of October, conquest of
power by the Bolsheviks. Under these events, so striking in their
rhythm, molecular processes were taking place, welding the heterogeneous
parts of the working class into one political whole. In this again the
chief rôle was played by the strike.

Frightened by the lightning of revolution striking in the midst of their
bacchanalia of war profits, the industrialists made concessions in the
first weeks to the workers. The Petrograd factory owners even agreed,
with qualifications and exceptions, to the eight-hour day. But that did
not quiet things, since the standard of living continually sank. In May
the Executive Committee was obliged to concede that with the increasing
cost of living the situation of the workers “borders for many categories
upon chronic starvation.” The mood in the worker districts was becoming
more and more nervous and tense. What depressed them most of all was the
absence of prospects. The masses are capable of enduring the heaviest
deprivations when they understand what for, but the new régime was more
and more revealing itself to them as a mere camouflage of the old
relations against which they had revolted in February. This they would
not endure.

The strikes were especially stormy among the more backward and exploited
groups of workers. Laundry workers, dyers, coopers, trade and industrial
clerks, structural workers, bronze workers, unskilled workers,
shoemakers, paper-box makers, sausage makers, furniture workers, were
striking, layer after layer, throughout the month of June. The
metal-workers were beginning, on the contrary, to play a restraining
rôle. To the advanced workers it was becoming more and more clear that
individual economic strikes in the conditions of war, breakdown and
inflation could not bring a serious improvement, that there must be some
change in the very foundations. The lockout not only made the workers
favourable to the demand for the control of industry, but even pushed
them toward the thought of the necessity of taking the factories into
the hands of the state. This inference seemed the more natural in that
the majority of private factories were working for the war, and that
alongside them were state enterprises of the same type. Already in the
summer of 1917 delegations began to arrive in the capital from the far
ends of Russia, delegations of workers and clerks, with a plea that the
factories should be taken over by the treasury, since the shareholders
had stopped financing them. But the government would not hear of this;
consequently it was necessary to change the government. The Compromisers
opposed this. The workers began to shift their front against the
Compromisers. The Putilov factory with its 40,000 workers was a
stronghold of the Social Revolutionaries during the first months of the
revolution. But its garrison did not long defend it against Bolsheviks.
At the head of the Bolshevik attack most often was to be seen
Volodarsky, a tailor in the past. A Jew who had spent some years in
America and spoke English well, Volodarsky was a magnificent mass
orator, logical, ingenious and bold. His American intonation gave a
unique expressiveness to his resonant voice, ringing out concisely at
meetings of many thousands. “From the moment of his arrival in the Narva
district,” says the worker Minichev, “the ground in the Putilov factory
began to slip under the feet of the Social Revolutionary gentlemen, and
in the course of something like two months the Putilov workers had gone
over to the Bolsheviks.”

The growth of strikes, and of the class struggle in general, almost
automatically raised the influence of the Bolsheviks. In all cases where
it was a question of life-interests the workers became convinced that
the Bolsheviks had no ulterior motives, that they were concealing
nothing, and that you could rely on them. In the hours of conflict all
the workers tended toward the Bolsheviks, the non-party workers, the
Social Revolutionaries, the Mensheviks. This is explained by the fact
that the factory and shop committees, waging a struggle for the life of
their factories against the sabotage of the administration and the
proprietors, went over to the Bolsheviks much sooner than the Soviet. At
a conference of the factory and shop committees of Petrograd and its
environs at the beginning of June, the Bolshevik resolution won 885 out
of 421 votes. This fact went by utterly unnoticed in the big newspapers.
Nevertheless it meant that in the fundamental questions of economic life
the Petrograd proletariat, not yet having broken with the Compromisers,
had nevertheless as a fact gone over to the Bolsheviks.

At the June conference of trade unions it became known that in Petrograd
there were over 50 unions with no less than 250,000 members. The metal
workers’ union numbered about 190,000 workers; its membership had
doubled in the course of the one month of May. The influence of the
Bolsheviks in the union had grown still more swiftly. All the
by-elections to the soviets showed a victory for the Bolsheviks. By the
1st of June in the Moscow Soviet there were already 206 Bolsheviks
against 176 Mensheviks and 110 Social Revolutionaries. The same shifts
occurred in the provinces, only more slowly. The membership of the party
was growing steadily. At the end of April the Petrograd organisation had
15,000 members. By the end of June, over 82,000.

The workers’ section of the Petrograd Soviet had at that time already a
Bolshevik majority. But at a joint session of both sections the soldier
delegates overweighed the Bolsheviks. _Pravda_ was more and more
insistently demanding general elections: “The 500,000 Petrograd workers
have four times fewer delegates in the Soviet than the 150,000 soldiers
of the Petrograd garrison.”

At the June congress of the Soviets Lenin demanded serious measures of
struggle against lockouts, plunderings and organised disruption of
economic life on the part of the industrialists and bankers. “Publish
the profits of the capitalist gentlemen, arrest fifty or a hundred of
the biggest millionaires. It will be enough to hold them for a few
weeks, even on such privileged terms as Nicholas Romanov is held, with
the simple aim of compelling them to reveal the threads, the tricky
manipulations, the filth, and selfishness, which even under the new
government are costing our country millions.” To the Soviet leaders
Lenin’s proposal seemed monstrous. “You imagine that you can alter the
laws of economic life by acts of violence against individual
capitalists?” The circumstance that these industrialists were dictating
the laws by way of a conspiracy against the nation was considered a part
of the due order of things. Kerensky, who came down on Lenin with
thunderous indignation, did not hesitate a month later to arrest many
thousands of workers who differed with the industrialists in their
understanding of the “laws of economic life”.

The bond between economics and politics was being revealed. The state,
accustomed to appear in the quality of a mystic principle, was operating
now oftener and oftener in its most primitive form, that is, in the form
of detachments of armed men. The workers in various parts of the country
were subjecting the bosses who refused to make concessions or even
negotiate, now to enforced appearance before the soviet, now to house
arrest. It is no wonder that the workers’ militia became an object of
special hatred to the possessing classes.

The initial decision of the Executive Committee to arm ten per cent of
the workers had not been carried out. But the workers succeeded in
arming partially just the same, and moreover the more active elements
got into the ranks of the militia. The leadership of the workers’
militia was concentrated in the hands of the factory committees, and the
leadership of the factory committees was coming over more and more into
the hands of the Bolsheviks. A worker of the Moscow factory,
Postavshchik, relates: “On the 1st of June as soon as the new Factory
Committee was elected with a Bolshevik majority ... a detachment of
eighty men was formed, which in the absence of weapons drilled with
sticks, under the leadership of an old soldier, Comrade Levakov.”

The press accused the militia of acts of violence, requisitions, and
illegal arrests. It is indubitable that the militia did employ violence:
it was created exactly for that. Its crime consisted, however, in
resorting to violence in dealing with representatives of that class
which was not accustomed to be the object of violence and did not want
to get accustomed to it.

In the Putilov factory, which played the leading rôle in the struggle
for higher wages, a conference assembled on the 23rd of June, in which
participated representatives of the Central Council of Factory and Shop
Committees, the Central Bureau of the Trade Unions and 73 plants. Under
the influence of the Bolsheviks the conference recognised that the
strike of a factory under the given conditions might entail an
“unorganised political struggle of the Petrograd workers,” and therefore
proposed to the Putilov workers to “restrain their legitimate
indignation and prepare their forces for a general attack.”

On the eve of that important conference the Bolshevik faction had warned
the Executive Committee: “A mass of 40,000 may any day strike and come
into the street. It would already have done so if our party had not
restrained it. And moreover there is no guarantee that in the future we
can restrain it. But a coming out of the Putilov men – there can be no
doubt of it – will inevitably bring after it an action of the majority
of the workers and soldiers.”

The leaders of the Executive Committee judged these warnings to be
demagogy, or else simply let them go in one ear and out the other,
preserving their tranquillity. They themselves had almost ceased to
visit the factories and barracks, since they had succeeded in making
themselves odious in the eyes of the soldiers and workers. Only the
Bolsheviks enjoyed sufficient authority to make it possible for them to
restrain the workers and soldiers from scattered action. But the
impatience of the masses was already sometimes directed even against the
Bolsheviks.

Anarchists appeared in the factories and in the fleet. As always in the
face of great events and great masses, they exposed their organic
bankruptcy. They found it the more easy to reject the state power in
that they completely failed to understand the significance of the
soviets as organs of a new state. Moreover, stunned by the revolution,
they most often simply kept mum on the subject of the state. They
revealed their bankruptcy for the most part by encouraging petty
flare-ups. The economic blind alley and the growing embitterment of the
Petrograd workers gave certain points of support to the anarchists.
Incapable of seriously appraising the correlation of forces on a
national scale, ready to regard every little impulse from below, as the
last stroke of salvation, they sometimes accused the Bolsheviks of
irresolution and even of compromisism. But beyond grumbling they usually
did not go. The response of the masses to the action of the anarchists
sometimes served the Bolsheviks as a gauge of the steam pressure of the
revolution.

The sailors who had met Lenin at the Finland station declared two weeks
later, under patriotic pressure from all sides: “If we had known ... by
what ways he came to us, instead of rapturous cries of hurrah! we would
have made heard our indignant shouts: ’Down with you! Back to the
country you came through.’” The soldiers’ soviets in the Crimea
threatened one after another to prevent with armed fists Lenin’s entry
into that patriotic peninsula, where he had no idea of going. The
Volynsky regiment, the coryphee of February 27, in the heat of the
moment even resolved to arrest Lenin, so that the Executive Committee
found itself obliged to take its own measures against such an event.
Moods of this kind had not finally dissipated up to the June offensive,
and they flared up sharply again after the July days. At the same time
in the most far-away garrisons and the most remote parts of the front
the soldiers were speaking more and more boldly in the language of
Bolshevism, often enough never guessing it. The Bolsheviks in the
regiments were only single individuals, but the Bolshevik slogans were
penetrating deeper. They seemed to be coming up spontaneously in all the
country. Liberal observers saw nothing in this but ignorance and chaos.
_Rech_ wrote: “Our Fatherland is veritably turning into a sort of
madhouse, where those possessed are in action and command, and people
who have not yet lost their reason stand aside in fright and cling along
the walls.” In exactly these words the “moderates” have poured out their
souls in all revolutions. The Compromisers’ press comforted itself that
the soldiers in spite of all misunderstanding did not want to have
anything to do with the Bolsheviks. Meanwhile the unconscious Bolshevism
of the mass, reflecting the logic of evolution, was constituting the
inconquerable power of the Lenin party.

The soldier Pireiko relates how at the elections at the front to the
congress of soviets, after a three-day debate, only Social
Revolutionaries were elected. But right after that, notwithstanding the
protest of the leaders, the soldiers adopted a resolution in favour of
taking the land from the landlords, without waiting for the Constituent
Assembly. “In general on questions which the soldiers understood, they
were inclined farther to the left than the most extreme of extreme
Bolsheviks.” That is what Lenin had in mind when he said that the masses
“are a hundred times to the left of us.”

A clerk in a motor-cycle shop somewhere in the Tauride province tells
how not infrequently after reading the bourgeois, papers, the soldiers
would abuse some sort of unknown creatures called Bolsheviks, and then
immediately take up the discussion of the necessity of stopping the war,
seizing the land from the landlords, etc. These were those same patriots
who swore not to let Lenin into the Crimea. The soldiers in the gigantic
rear garrisons were chafing. A vast accumulation of idle people
impatiently awaiting a change in their fate created a nervous condition
which expressed itself in a continuous readiness to bring their
discontent out into the street, in wholesale tramway rides and an
epidemical chewing of sunflower seeds. The soldier with his trench-coat
thrown over his shoulders, with a seedshell on his lip, became the most
hated image to the bourgeois press. This man whom in war time they had
crudely flattered, naming him no less than hero – which did not prevent
their flogging this hero at the front – he whom after the February
revolution they had lifted aloft as a liberator, became suddenly a thug,
a traitor, a gunman, a German agent. Really, there was no vileness that
the patriotic press would not attribute to the Russian soldiers and
sailors.

All the Executive Committee did was to justify itself, struggle with
anarchy, abate excesses, distribute frightened questionnaires and moral
instructions. The president of the soviet in Czaritsyn – that city was
considered a nest of anarcho-Bolshevism – to a questionnaire from the
centre as to the state of affairs, answered with a clean-cut phrase:
“The more the garrison goes to the left, the more the everyday man goes
to the right.” You can extend this formula from Czaritsyn to the whole
country. The soldier is moving to the left, the bourgeois to the right.

Every soldier who expressed a little more boldly than the rest what they
were all feeling, was so persistently shouted at from above as a
Bolshevik that he was obliged in the long run to believe it. From peace
and land the soldiers’ thoughts began to pass over to the question of
power. Responsiveness to the scattered slogans of Bolshevism changed
into a conscious sympathy for the Bolshevik Party. In the Volynsky
regiment, which in April had intended to arrest Lenin, the mood shifted
in the course of two months in favour of the Bolsheviks. The same in the
Egersky and Litovsky regiments. The Lettish sharpshooters had been
brought into being by the autocracy in order to use for the ends of war
the hatred of parcelled-out peasants and farm-hands against the Baltic
barons. These regiments fought magnificently. But that spirit of class
hatred on which the monarchy thought to rely, found a road of its own.
The Lettish sharpshooters were among the first to break with the
monarchy, and afterwards with the Compromisers. As early as May 17, the
representatives of eight Lettish regiments almost unanimously adhered to
the Bolshevik slogan: “All Power to the Soviets.” In the further course
of the revolution they will play a mighty rôle.

An unknown soldier writes from the front: “Today, June 13, we had a
little meeting at headquarters, and they talked of Lenin and Kerensky.
The soldiers for the most part were for Lenin, but the officers said
that Lenin was very ’bourgui.’” After the collapse of the offensive
Kerensky’s name became utterly hateful to the army.

On June 21 the military students in Peterhof marched through the streets
with banners and placards: “Down with the Spies,” “Long Live Kerensky
and Brussilov.” It was Brussilov, of course, that the military students
themselves stood for. Soldiers of the 4th Battalion attacked the
military students and roughhoused them, scattering the demonstration.
The placard in honour of Kerensky was what provoked the most hatred.

The June demonstration greatly accelerated the political evolution of
the army. The popularity of the Bolsheviks, the only party which had
raised its voice in advance against the offensive, began to grow with
extraordinary speed. It is true that the Bolshevik papers only with
great difficulty found access to the army. Their circulation was
extremely small in comparison with the liberal press and the patriotic
press in general. “There is not even one of your papers to be seen
anywhere,” writes to Moscow a clumsy soldier’s hand, “and we only make
use of the rumour of your papers. They sprinkle us here with free
bourgeois papers, carrying them along the front in whole bales.” But it
was just these patriotic papers which gave the Bolsheviks an
incomparable popularity. Every case of protest from the oppressed, of
land seizure, of accounts squared with the hated officers, these papers
attributed to Bolsheviks. The soldiers concluded that the Bolsheviks are
a righteous folk.

The commissar of the 12th Army reports to Kerensky at the beginning of
July as to the mood of the soldiers: “Everything is in the long run
blamed on the bourgeois ministers and the Soviet, which has sold out to
the bourgeoisie. But in general in the immense mass is an opaque
darkness; I am unhappy to report that even the newspapers are but little
read lately; complete distrust of the printed word: ‘They write pretty,’
‘They are good at the tall talk.’” In the first months the reports of
the patriotic commissars were ordinarily a hymn to the revolutionary
army, its consciousness, its discipline. Then, after four months of
uninterrupted disappointments, when the army had lost confidence in the
government orators and journalists, these same commissars discovered in
it nothing but opaque darkness.

The more the garrison moves to the left, the more the everyday man moves
to the right. Stimulated by the offensive, counter-revolutionary unions
sprang up in Petrograd like mushrooms after rain. They gave themselves
names, one more resonant than the other: Union of the Honour of the
Fatherland, Union of Military Duty, Battalion of Freedom, Organisation
of the Spirit, etc. These admirable signboards concealed the ambitions
and attempts of the nobility, the officers, the officialdom, the
bureaucracy, the bourgeoisie. Some of these organisations, such as the
Military League, the Union of the Cavaliers of St. George, or the
Volunteers’ Division, were the finished nuclei of a military plot.
Coming forward as flaming patriots, these knights of “honour” and “the
spirit” not only found easy access to the Allied Missions, but even at
times received governmental subsidies, a thing which had in its day been
refused to the Soviet as a “private organisation.” One of the offshoots
of the family of the newspaper magnate Suvorin undertook the publication
in those days of a _Little Newspaper,_ which as an organ of “independent
socialism” advocated an iron dictatorship, advancing Admiral Kolchak as
its candidate. The more solid press, without as yet quite dotting its
i’s, tried in every way to create a popularity for Kolchak. The further
career of the admiral testifies that already in the summer of 1917 there
was a broad plan connected with his name, and that there were
influential circles behind Suvorin’s back.

In obedience to a simple tactical calculation, the reaction, aside from
certain individual explosions, pretended that it was directing its blows
only against Leninists. The word “Bolshevik” became a synonym for
satanic origin. Just as before the revolution the czarist commanders had
put the responsibility for all misfortunes, including their own
stupidity, upon German spies and more particularly upon “Yids,” so now,
after the collapse of the June offensive, the blame for failure and
defeat was unceasingly laid upon Bolsheviks. In this matter democrats
such as Kerensky and Tseretelli were almost in nowise distinguished, not
only from liberals like Miliukov, but from outspoken feudalists like
General Denikin.

As always happens when contradictions are intensified to the limit but
the moment of explosion has not yet come, the grouping of political
forces revealed itself more frankly and clearly not on fundamental
questions, but on accidental side issues. One of the lightening rods for
the diversion of political passions in those days was Kronstadt. That
old fortress which was to have been a loyal sentry at the sea gates of
the imperial capital, had in the past more than once lifted the banner
of revolt. In spite of ruthless vengeances, the flame of rebellion never
went out in Kronstadt. It flared up threateningly after the revolution.
The name of this naval fortress soon became on the pages of the
patriotic press a synonym of the worst aspect of the revolution, a
synonym of Bolshevism. In reality, the Kronstadt Soviet was not yet
Bolshevik. It contained in May 107 Bolsheviks, 112 Social
Revolutionaries, 30 Mensheviks, and 97 non-party men. But these were
Kronstadt Social Revolutionaries and Kronstadt non-party men, living
under high pressure: a majority of them on important questions followed
the Bolsheviks.

In the political sphere the Kronstadt sailors were not inclined either
toward manoeuvring or toward diplomacy. They had their own rule: no
sooner said than done. It is no wonder that in relation to a phantom
government they tended toward an extremely simplified method of action.
On May 13 the soviet resolved: “The sole power in Kronstadt is the
Soviet of Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies.” The removal of the
government commissar, the Kadet Pepelyaev, who occupied the position of
fifth wheel in a wagon, passed off in the fortress totally unnoticed.
Model order was maintained. Card playing in the city was forbidden. All
brothels were closed, and their inmates deported. Under threat of
“confiscation of property and banishment to the front,” the soviet
forbade drunkenness in the streets. The threat was more than once
carried into action.

Tempered in the terrible régime of the czarist fleet and the naval
fortress, accustomed to stern work, to sacrifices, but also to fury,
these sailors, now when the curtain of the new life was beginning to
rise before them, a life in which they felt themselves to be the coming
masters, tightened all their sinews in order to prove themselves worthy
of the revolution. They thirstily threw themselves upon both friends and
enemies in Petrograd and almost dragged them by force to Kronstadt, in
order to show them what revolutionary seamen are in action. Such moral
tension could not of course last for ever, but it lasted a long time.
The Kronstadt sailors became a kind of fighting crusaders of the
revolution. But what revolution? Not that, in any case incarnated in the
minister Tseretelli and his commissar Pepelyaev. Kronstadt stood there
as a herald of the advancing second revolution. For that reason it was
hated by all those for whom the first revolution had been more than
enough.

The peaceful and unnoticed removal of Pepelyaev was portrayed in the
press of the existing order almost as an armed insurrection against the
unity of the state. The government complained to the Soviet. The Soviet
immediately appointed a delegation to exert influence. The machine of
the double sovereignty came into action with a creak. On May 24 the
Kronstadt Soviet, with Tseretelli and Skobelev present, agreed, upon the
insistence of the Bolsheviks, to acknowledge that in prolonging its
struggle for the power of the soviets, it was practically obliged to
submit to the power of the Provisional Government until the power of the
soviets was established throughout the land. However, the next day,
under pressure from the sailors, indignant at this submissiveness, the
Soviet announced that the ministers had received only an “explanation”
of the point of view of Kronstadt which remained unchanged. This was
clearly a tactical mistake, but one behind which nothing was concealed
except revolutionary ambition.

It was decided up above to make use of this lucky chance to give the
Kronstadters a lesson, making them pay at the same time for their
previous sins. The prosecutor, of course, was Tseretelli. With
heartbreaking references to his prison days Tseretelli thundered
especially against the Kronstadters for holding eighty officers behind
the fortress bars. All the virtuous press backed him up. However, even
the Compromisist, that is, the ministerial, papers had to acknowledge
that it was a question of “direct embezzlement” and of “men who carried
fist rule to a point of horror.” “The sailor witnesses” – according to
_Izvestia_, the official paper of Tseretelli himself “testify to the
putting down (by the arrested officers) of the insurrection of 1906, to
mass shootings, to barges filled with the corpses of men executed and
drowned in the sea, and to other horrors ... They tell of these things
quite simply as of everyday events.”

The Kronstadters stubbornly refused to give up the arrestees to the
government, to whom the hangmen and the peculators of noble birth were
incomparably nearer than were those tortured sailors of 1906 and other
years. It was no accident that the Minister of Justice, Pereverzev, whom
Sukhanov mildly describes as “one of the most suspicious figures in the
Coalition Government,” systematically liberated from the Peter and Paul
fortress the vilest agents of the czarist political police. The
democratic upstarts were above all striving to compel the reactionary
bureaucracy to acknowledge their nobleness.

To Tseretelli’s indictment the Kronstadters answered in their appeal:
“The officers, gendarmes and police arrested by us in the days of the
revolution have themselves declared to representatives of the government
that they have nothing to complain of in the treatment they have
received from the prison management. It is true that the prison
buildings of Kronstadt are horrible, but those are the same prisons
which were built by czarism for us. We haven’t any others. And if we
keep the enemies of the people in those prisons it is not out of
vengeance, but from considerations of revolutionary self-preservation.”

On the 27th of May the Petrograd Soviet tried the Kronstadters.
Appearing in their defence, Trotsky warned Tseretelli that in case of
danger “when a counter-revolutionary general tries to throw a noose
around the neck of the revolution, the Kadets will soap the rope, and
the Kronstadt sailors will come to fight and die with us.” This warning
came true three months later with unexpected literalness: when General
Kornilov raised his revolt and led troops against the capital, Kerensky,
Tseretelli and Skobelev summoned the Kronstadt sailors to defend the
Winter Palace. But what of that? In June the democratic gentlemen were
defending law and order against anarchy, and no arguments or prophecies
had weight with them. By a majority of 580 votes against 162, with 74
abstaining, Tseretelli carried through the Petrograd Soviet a resolution
denouncing the “apostasy” of “anarchist” Kronstadt from the
revolutionary democracy. No sooner had the impatiently awaited news
reached the Mariinsky Palace that this bull of excommunication had been
adopted than the government immediately cut off telephone communication
for private people between the capital and the fortress in order to
prevent the Bolshevik centre from influencing the Kronstadters, ordered
all the training ships to leave the Kronstadt waters, and demanded of
its soviet “unconditional submission.” The congress of peasant deputies
sitting at that time threatened to “refuse foodstuffs to Kronstadt.” The
reaction standing behind the back of the Compromisers sought a decisive
and, to the extent possible, a bloody settlement.

“The reckless step of the Kronstadt Soviet,” writes one of the young
historians, Yugov, “might have brought undesirable consequences. It was
necessary to find a suitable way to get out of the situation created.
With this aim Trotsky went to Kronstadt, where he addressed the soviet
and wrote a declaration which was adopted by the soviet and afterwards
carried unanimously – by Trotsky at a meeting on Yakorny Square.”
Preserving their position in principle, the Kronstadters yielded upon
the practical issue.

The peaceful settlement of the conflict left the bourgeois press
completely beside themselves: There is anarchy in the fortress; the
Kronstadters are printing their own money – fantastic specimens of it
were reproduced in the papers – they are plundering state property, the
women are nationalised, robberies and drunken orgies are in progress.
The sailors, so proud of their austere order, doubled their horny fists
on reading these papers which in millions of copies were distributing
slanders against them throughout all Russia.

Having got the Kronstadt officers in their hands the judicial
institutions of Pereverzev freed them one after another. It would be
very instructive to find out how many of them subsequently participated
in the civil war, and how many sailors, soldiers, workers and peasants
were shot and hung by them. Unfortunately, we are not here in a position
to carry out this instructive census.

The authority of the government was saved. But the sailors soon got
satisfaction for the indignities suffered. From all corners of the
country there began to arrive resolutions of greeting to Red Kronstadt:
from individual left soviets, from factories, regiments, mass-meetings.
The first machine-gun regiment demonstrated in solid ranks on the
streets of Petrograd its respect for the Kronstadters “for their firm
attitude of non-confidence in the Provisional Government.”

Kronstadt was getting ready, however, to take a more significant
revenge. The baiting of the bourgeois press had made it a factor of
all-national importance. “Fortifying itself in Kronstadt,” writes
Miliukov, “Bolshevism with the help of suitably trained agitators threw
out widely over Russia a net of propaganda. Kronstadt emissaries were
sent also to the front, where they undermined discipline, and to the
rear, into the villages, where they incited to the sacking of estates.
The Kronstadt Soviet gave these emissaries special mandates: ‘N. N. has
been sent to his province to be present with the right of a deciding
vote in the county, district and village committees, and also to speak
at meetings and call meetings at his own discretion where ever he wants
to,’ with ‘the right to bear arms, with unhindered and free
transportation on all railroads and steamships.’ And therewith ‘the
inviolability of the person of the said agitator is guaranteed by the
Soviet of the City of Kronstadt.’ ”

In exposing the undermining work of the Baltic sailors Miliukov only
forgets to explain how and why, notwithstanding the presence of learned
authorities, institutions and newspapers, solitary sailors armed with
this strange mandate of the Kronstadt Soviet travelled all over the
country without hindrance, found food and lodging everywhere, were
admitted to all popular meetings, everywhere attentively listened to,
and left the imprint of a sailor’s hand on the events of history. The
historian in the service of liberal politics does not ask himself this
simple question. But the Kronstadt miracle was thinkable only because
the sailors far more deeply expressed the demands of historic evolution
than the very intelligent professors. The semi-literate mandate was, to
speak in the language of Hegel, real because it was reasonable, whereas
the subjectively most intelligent plans were spectral because the reason
of history was not even camping in them for the night.

The soviets lagged behind the shop committees. The shop committees
lagged behind the masses. The soldiers lagged behind the workers. Still
more the provinces lagged behind the capital. Such is the inevitable
dynamic of a revolutionary process, which creates thousands of
contradictions only in order accidentally and in passing, as though in
play, to resolve them and immediately create new ones. The party also
lagged behind the revolutionary dynamic – an organisation which has the
least right to lag, especially in a time of revolution. In such workers’
centres as Ekaterinburg, Perm, Tula, Nizhni-Novgorod, Sormovo, Kolomna,
Yuzovka, the Bolsheviks separated from the Mensheviks only at the end of
May. In Odessa, Nikolaev, Elisavetgrad, Poltava and other points in the
Ukraine, the Bolsheviks did not have independent organisations even in
the middle of June. In Baku, Zlatioust, Bezhetsk, Kostroma, the
Bolsheviks divided from the Mensheviks only towards the end of June.
These facts cannot but seem surprising when you take into consideration
that within four months the Bolsheviks are going to seize the power. How
far the party during the war had fallen behind the molecular process in
the masses, and how far the March leadership of Kamenev and Stalin
lagged behind the gigantic historic tasks! The most revolutionary party
which human history until this time had ever known was nevertheless
caught unawares by the events of history. It reconstructed itself in the
fires, and straightened out its ranks under the onslaught of events. The
masses at the turning point were “a hundred times” to the left of the
extreme left party. The growth of the Bolshevik influence, which took
place with the force of a natural historical process, reveals its own
contradiction upon a closer examination, its zigzags, its ebbs and
flows. The masses are not homogeneous, and moreover they learn to handle
the fire of revolution only by burning their hands and jumping away. The
Bolsheviks could only accelerate the process of education of the masses.
They patiently explained. And history this time did not take advantage
of their patience.

While the Bolsheviks were resolutely winning the shops, factories and
regiments, the elections to the democratic dumas gave an enormous and
apparently growing advantage to the Compromisers. This was one of the
sharpest and most enigmatical contradictions of the revolution. To be
sure, the duma of the Vyborg district, which was purely proletarian,
prided itself upon its Bolshevik majority. But that was an exception. In
the city elections of Moscow in June, the Social Revolutionaries got
more than 60 per cent of the votes. They themselves were astonished at
this figure, for they could not but feel that their influence was
swiftly dwindling. In the effort to understand the mutual relation
between the real development of the revolution and its reflection in the
mirrors of democracy the Moscow elections have an extraordinary
interest. The vast layers of workers and soldiers were already hastily
shaking off their Compromisist illusions. Meanwhile, the broadest layers
of the small town people were also beginning to stir. For these
scattered masses the democratic elections offered almost the first, and
in any case one of the very rare opportunities to show themselves
politically. While the worker, yesterday’s Menshevik or Social
Revolutionary, gave his vote to the Bolshevik Party and drew the soldier
along with him, the cabman, the deliveryman, the janitor, the market
woman, the shopkeeper, his assistant, the teacher, in performing so
heroic a deed as giving their vote to the Social Revolutionaries, for
the first time emerged from political non-existence. The petty bourgeois
layers belatedly voted for Kerensky because he personified in their eyes
the February revolution, which had only today seeped down to them. With
its 60 per cent Social Revolutionary majority the Moscow Duma glowed
with the last flare of a dying luminary. It was so also with all the
other organs of democratic self-administration. Having barely arrived,
they were already stricken with the impotence of belatedness. That meant
that the course of the revolution depended upon the workers and
soldiers, and not upon that human dust which had been kicked up and was
dancing in the whirlwind of the revolution.

Such is the deep and at the same time simple dialectic of the
revolutionary awakening of the oppressed classes. The most dangerous of
the aberrations of the revolution arises when the mechanical accountant
of democracy balances in one column yesterday, today and tomorrow, and
thereby impels the formal democrats to look for the head of the
revolution where in reality is to be found its very heavy tail. Lenin
taught his party to distinguish head from tail.



CHAPTER 22 THE SOVIET CONGRESS AND THE JUNE DEMONSTRATION


 

The first congress of the soviets, which sanctioned the offensive for
Kerensky, assembled in Petrograd on June 3 in the building of the Cadet
Corps. There were 820 delegates with a vote and 268 with a voice. They
represented 305 local soviets, 53 district and regional organisations at
the front, the rear institutions of the army, and a few peasant
organisations. The right to a vote was accorded to Soviets containing
not less than 25,000 men. Soviets containing from 10,000 to 25,000 had a
voice. On the basis of this rule – by the way, none too strictly
observed – we may assume that over 20,000,000 people stood behind the
soviets. Out of 777 delegates giving information as to their party
allegiance, 285 were Social Revolutionaries, 248 Mensheviks, 105
Bolsheviks; a few belonged to less important groups. The left wing – the
Bolsheviks, and the Internationalists adhering to them – constituted
less than a fifth of the delegates. The congress consisted for the most
part of people who had registered as socialists in March but got tired
of the revolution by June. Petrograd must have seemed to them a town
gone mad.

The Congress began by ratifying the banishment of Grimm, an unhappy
Swiss socialist who had been trying to save the Russian revolution and
the German social democracy by means of back-stage negotiations with the
Hohenzollern diplomats. The demand of the left wing that they take up
immediately the question of the coming offensive was rejected by an
overwhelming majority. The Bolsheviks looked like a tiny group. But on
that very day and perhaps hour, a conference of the factory and shop
committees of Petrograd adopted, also with an overwhelming majority, a
resolution that only a government of soviets could save the country.

The Compromisers, no matter how near-sighted they were, could not help
seeing what was happening around them every day. In the session of June
4 the Bolshevik-hater, Lieber, evidently under the influence of the
provincials, denounced the good-for-nothing commissars of the government
to whom the power had not been surrendered in the provinces. “A whole
series of functions of the governmental organs have as a result gone
over into the hands of the soviets, even when the soviets did not want
them.” Those people had to complain to somebody even against themselves.

One of the delegates, a school teacher, complained to the congress that
after four months of revolution there had not been the slightest change
in the sphere of education. All of the old teachers, inspectors,
directors, overseers of districts, many of them former members of the
Black Hundreds, all of the old school programmes, reactionary textbooks,
even the old assistant ministers, remained peacefully at their posts.
Only the czar’s portraits had been removed to the attics, and these
might any day be stuck back in their places.

The congress could not make up its mind to lift a hand against the State
Duma, or against the State Council. Its timidity before the reaction was
covered up by the Menshevik orator Bogdanov with the remark that the
Duma and the Soviet are “dead and non-existent organisations anyway.”
Martov, with his polemical wit, answered: “Bogdanov proposes that we
should declare the Duma dead but not make any attempt upon its life.”

The congress, in spite of its solid government majority, proceeded in an
atmosphere of alarm and uncertainty. Patriotism had grown rather damp
and gave out only lazy flashes. It was obvious that the masses were
dissatisfied, and the Bolsheviks were immeasurably stronger throughout
the country, and especially in the capital, than at the congress.
Reduced to its elements, the quarrel between the Bolsheviks and the
Compromisers invariably revolved around the question: With whom shall
the democrats side, the imperialists or the workers? The shadow of the
Entente stood over the congress. The question of the offensive was
predetermined; the democrats had nothing to do but accede.

“At this critical moment,” preached Tseretelli, “not one social force
ought to be thrown out of the scales, so long as it may be useful to the
cause of the people.” Such was the justification for a coalition with
the bourgeoisie. Seeing that the proletariat, the army, and the
peasantry were upsetting their plans at every step, the democrats had to
open a war against the people under guise of a war against the
Bolsheviks. Thus Tseretelli had declared the Kronstadt sailors apostates
in order not to throw out of his scales the Kadet Pepelyaev. The
coalition was ratified by a majority of 543 votes against 126, with 52
abstaining.

The work of this enormous and flabby assembly in the Cadet Corps was
distinguished by grandeur in the matter of declarations, and
conservative stinginess in practical tasks. This laid on all its
decisions a stamp of hopelessness and hypocrisy. The congress recognised
the right of all Russian nationalities to self-determination, but gave
the key to this problematic right not to the oppressed nations
themselves, but to a future Constituent Assembly, in which the
Compromisers hoped to be in a majority and capitulate before the
imperialists, exactly as they had done in the government.

The congress refused to pass a decree on the eight-hour day. Tseretelli
explained this side-stepping by the difficulty of reconciling the
interests of the different layers of the population. As though any
single great need in history was ever accomplished by “reconciling
interests,” and not by the victory of progressive interests over
reactionary!

Grohman, a Soviet economist, introduced toward the end of the congress
his inevitable resolution: as to the oncoming economic catastrophe and
the necessity of governmental regulation. The congress adopted this
ritual resolution, but only so that everything might remain as before.

“Having deported Grimm,” wrote Trotsky, on the 7th of June, “the
congress returned to the order of the day. But capitalistic profits
remain as before inviolable for Skobelev and his colleagues. The food
crisis is getting sharper every hour. In the diplomatic sphere the
government is taking blow after blow. And finally this so hysterically
proclaimed offensive is obviously getting ready to come down on the
nation, a monstrous adventure.

“We should be willing to watch peacefully the sanctified activities of
the ministers – Lvov–Tereshchenko–Tseretelli – for a number of months.
We need time for our own preparations. But the underground mole digs too
fast. With the help of the ‘socialist’ ministers the problem of power
may rise before the members of this congress a great deal sooner than
any of us imagine”

Trying to shield themselves from the masses with a higher authority, the
leaders dragged the congress into all current conflicts, pitilessly
compromising it in the eyes of the Petrograd workers and soldiers. The
most resounding episode of this kind was the incident about the summer
home of Durnovo, an old czarist bureaucrat who had made himself famous
as Minister of the Interior by putting down the revolution of 1905. The
vacant home of this hated, and moreover dirty-handed, bureaucrat was
seized by workers’ organisations on the Vyborg side – chiefly because of
the enormous gardens which became a favourite playground for children.
The bourgeois press represented the place as a lair of pogromists and
hold-up men – the Kronstadt of the Vyborg district. No one took the
trouble to find out what the facts were. The government, carefully
avoiding all important questions, undertook with fresh passion to rescue
this house. They demanded sanction for the heroic undertaking from the
Executive Committee, and Tseretelli of course did not refuse. The
Procuror gave an order to evict the group of anarchists from the place
in twenty-four hours. Learning about the military activities in
preparation, the workers sounded the alarm. The anarchists on their side
threatened armed resistance. Twenty-eight factories proclaimed a protest
strike. The Executive Committee issued a proclamation accusing the
Vyborg workers of aiding the counter-revolution. After all these
preliminaries a representative of justice and the militia penetrated
into the lions’ den. They found complete order reigning; the house was
occupied by a number of workers’ educational organisations. They were
compelled to withdraw in shame. This history had, however, a further
development.

On the 9th of June a bomb was exploded at the congress: in the morning’s
edition of _Pravda_ appeared an appeal for a demonstration on the
following day. Cheidze, who knew how to get scared, and was therefore
inclined to scare others, announced in a voice from the tomb: “If
measures are not taken by the congress, tomorrow will be fatal.” The
delegates lifted their heads in alarm.

The idea of a showdown between the Petrograd workers and soldiers and
the congress was suggested by the whole situation. The masses were
urging on the Bolsheviks. The garrison especially was seething – fearing
that in connection with the offensive they would be distributed among
the regiments and scattered along the front. To this was united a bitter
dissatisfaction with the _Declaration of the Rights of the Soldier_,
which had been a big backward step in comparison with _Order No.1_, and
with the régime actually established in the army. The initiative for the
demonstration came from the military organisation of the Bolsheviks. Its
leaders asserted, and quite rightly as events showed, that if the party
did not take the leadership upon itself, the soldiers themselves would
go into the streets. That sharp turn in the mood of the masses, however,
could not be easily apprehended, and hence there was a certain
vacillation in the ranks of the Bolsheviks themselves. Volodarsky was
not sure that the workers would come out on the street. There was fear,
too, as to the possible character of the demonstration. Representatives
of the military organisation declared that the soldiers, fearing attacks
and reprisals, would not go out without weapons. “What will come out of
the demonstration?” asked the prudent Tomsky, and demanded supplementary
deliberations. Stalin thought that “the fermentation among the soldiers
is a fact; among the workers there is no such definite mood,” but
nevertheless judged it necessary to show resistance to the government.
Kalinin, always more inclined to avoid than welcome a battle, spoke
emphatically against the demonstration, referring to the absence of any
clear motive, especially among the workers: “The demonstration will be
purely artificial.” On June 8, at a conference with the representatives
of the workers’ sections, after a series of preliminary Votes, 131 hands
against 6 were finally raised for the demonstration, with 22 abstaining.

The work of preparation was carried on up to the last moment secretly,
in order not to permit the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks to
start a counter-agitation. That legitimate measure of caution was
afterwards interpreted as evidence of a military conspiracy. The Central
Council of Factory and Shop Committees joined in the decision to
organise the demonstration. “Upon the insistence of Trotsky and against
the objection of Lunacharsky,” writes Yugov, “the Committee of the
Mezhrayontzi decided to join the demonstration.” Preparations were
carried on with boiling energy.

The manifestation was to raise the banner of “Power to the Soviets.” The
fighting slogan ran: “Down with the Ten Minister-Capitalists” That was
the simplest possible expression for a break-up of the coalition with
the bourgeoisie. The procession was to march to the Cadet Corps where
the congress was sitting. This was to emphasise that the question was
not of overthrowing the government, but of bringing pressure on the
Soviet leaders.

To be sure, other ideas were expressed at the preliminary conferences of
the Bolsheviks. For instance, Smilga, then a young member of the Central
Committee, proposed that they should not “hesitate to seize the Post
Office, telegraph, and arsenal, if events developed to the point of a
clash.” Another participant in the conference, a member of the Petrograd
Committee, Latsis, comments in his diary upon the rejection of Smilga’s
proposal: “I cannot reconcile myself ... I arrange with comrades
Semashko and Rakhia to be fully armed in case of necessity and seize the
railroad terminals, arsenals, banks, post and telegraph offices, with
the help of a machine-gun regiment.” Semashko was the officer of a
machine-gun regiment. Rakhia, a worker, one of the militant Bolsheviks.

The existence of such moods is easily understandable. The whole course
of the party was toward a seizure of power, and the question was merely
of appraising the present situation. An obvious break in favour of the
Bolsheviks was taking place in Petrograd, but in the provinces the same
process was going slower. Moreover the front needed the lesson of an
advance before it could shake off its distrust of the Bolsheviks. Lenin
therefore stood firm on his April position: “Patiently explain.”

Sukhanov in his _Notes_ describes the plan of the demonstration of June
10, as a direct device of Lenin for seizing the power “if the situation
proves favourable.” As a matter of fact, only individual Bolsheviks
tried to put the matter this way, aiming according to the ironic
expression of Lenin, “just a wee bit too far to the left.” Strangely
enough, Sukhanov does not even try to compare his arbitrary guesses with
the political line of Lenin expressed in innumerable speeches and
articles. [see Appendix III for more information on this]

The Bureau of the Executive Committee immediately presented the
Bolsheviks with a demand to call off the demonstration. On what grounds?
Only the state power, obviously, could formally forbid a demonstration;
but the state power did not dare think of it. How could the Soviet,
itself a “private organisation,” led by a bloc composed of two political
parties, prevent a third party from demonstrating? The Bolshevik Central
Committee refused to accede to the demand, but decided to emphasise more
sharply the peaceful character of the demonstration. On the 9th of June,
a Bolshevik proclamation was pasted up in the workers’ districts. “We
are free citizens, we have the right to protest, and we ought to use
this right before it is too late. The right to a peaceful demonstration
is ours.”

The Compromisers carried the question before the congress. It was at
that moment that Cheidze pronounced his words about the fatal outcome,
and that it would be necessary for the congress to sit all night. A
member of the presidium, Gegechkori, also one of the sons of the
Gironde, concluded his speech with a rude cry in the direction of the
Bolsheviks: “Take your dirty hands off a glorious cause!” They did not
give the Bolsheviks time, though it was demanded, to take up the
question in a meeting of their faction. The congress passed a resolution
forbidding all demonstrations for three days. Besides being an act of
violence with relation to the Bolsheviks, this was an act of usurpation
with relation to the government. The soviets continued to steal the
power from under their own pillow.

Miliukov was speaking at this time at a Cossack conference, and called
the Bolsheviks “the chief enemies of the Russian revolution.” Its chief
friend, he allowed them to infer, was Miliukov himself, who just before
February had agreed to accept defeat from the Germans rather than
revolution from the Russian people. To a question from the Cossacks as
to the attitude towards Leninists, Miliukov answered: “It’s time to make
an end of these people.” The leader of the bourgeoisie was in too great
a hurry. However, he really could not afford to waste time.

Meanwhile meetings were being held in factories and regiments, adopting
resolutions to go into the streets the next day with the slogan “All
Power to the Soviets.” Under the noise of the soviet and Cossack
congresses, the fact passed unnoticed that 37 Bolsheviks were elected to
the duma of the Vyborg district, only 22 from the Social
Revolutionary-Menshevik bloc, and 4 Kadets.

Confronted with the categorical resolution of the congress – and
moreover with a mysterious reference to a threatening blow from the
right – the Bolsheviks decided to reconsider the question. They wanted a
peaceful demonstration, not an insurrection, and they could not have any
motive for converting a forbidden demonstration into a
half-insurrection. On its side the presidium of the congress decided to
take measures. Several hundred delegates were grouped in tens and sent
out to the workers’ districts and the barracks to prevent the
demonstration. They were to meet in the morning at the Tauride Palace
and compare notes. The executive committee of the peasant deputies
joined in this expedition, appointing 70 from its membership.

Thus, in however unexpected a manner, the Bolsheviks achieved their
goal. The delegates of the congress found themselves obliged to get
acquainted with the workers and soldiers of the capital. If the mountain
was not allowed to come to the prophet, the prophet at least went to the
mountain. The meeting proved instructive in the highest degree. In the
_Izvestia_ of the Moscow Soviet, a Menshevik correspondent paints the
following picture: “All night long, without a wink of sleep, a majority
of the congress, more than 500 members, dividing themselves into tens,
travelled through the factories and shops and military units of
Petrograd, urging everybody to stay away from the demonstration ... The
congress had no authority in a good many of the factories and shops, and
also in several regiments of the garrison ... The members were
frequently met in a far from friendly manner, sometimes hostilely, and
quite often they were sent away with insults.” This official Soviet
organ does not exaggerate in the least. On the contrary, it gives a very
much softened picture of this nocturnal meeting of two different worlds.

The Petrograd masses at least left no doubt among the delegates as to
who was able henceforth to summon a demonstration, or to call it off.
The workers of the Putilov factory agreed to paste up the declaration of
the congress against the demonstration only after they learned from
_Pravda_ that it did not contradict the resolution of the Bolsheviks.
The first machine gun regiment – which played the leading rôle in the
garrison, as did the Putilov factory among the workers – after hearing
the speeches of Cheidze and Avksentiev representing the two executive
committees, adopted the following resolution: “In agreement with the
Central Committee of the Bolsheviks and their military organisation, the
regiment postpones its action.”

This brigade of pacifiers arrived at the Tauride Palace after their
sleepless night in a condition of complete demoralisation. They had
assumed that the authority of the congress was inviolable, but had run
into a stone wall of distrust and hostility. “The masses are thick with
Bolsheviks.” “The attitude to the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries
is hostile.” “They trust only _Pravda_.” “In some places they shouted:
’We are not your comrades.’” One after another the delegates reported
how, although they had called off the battle, they were defeated.

The masses submitted to the decision of the Bolsheviks, but not without
protest and indignation. In certain factories they adopted resolutions
of censure of the Central Committee. The more fiery members of the party
in the sections tore up their membership cards. That was a serious
warning.

The Compromisers had motivated their three-day veto of demonstrations by
references to a monarchist plot, which hoped to avail itself of the
action of the Bolsheviks; they mentioned the participation in it of a
part of the Cossack congress and the approach to Petrograd of
counter-revolutionary troops.

It is not surprising if after calling off the demonstration the
Bolsheviks demanded an explanation as to this conspiracy. In place of an
answer the leaders of the congress accused the Bolsheviks themselves of
a conspiracy. They found this happy way out of the situation.

It must be acknowledged that on the night of June 10 the Compromisers
did discover a conspiracy, and one which shook them badly – a conspiracy
of the masses with the Bolsheviks against the Compromisers. However, the
submission of the Bolsheviks to the resolution of the congress
encouraged them and permitted their panic to turn into madness. The
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries decided to show an iron energy. On
the 10th of June the Menshevik paper wrote: “It is time to brand the
Leninists as traitors and betrayers of the revolution.” A representative
of the Executive Committee appeared at the Cossack congress and
requested them to support the Soviet against the Bolsheviks. He was
answered by the chairman, the ataman of the Urals, Dutov: “We, Cossacks,
will never go against the Soviet.” Against the Bolsheviks the
reactionaries were ready to go hand in hand even with the Soviet – in
order the better to strangle it later on.

On June 11 there assembles a formidable court of justice: the Executive
Committee, members of the presidium of the congress, leaders of the
factions – in all about a hundred men. Tseretelli as usual appears in
the rôle of prosecutor. Choking with rage, he demands deadly measures,
and scornfully waves away Dan, who is always ready to bait the
Bolsheviks, but still not quite ready to destroy them. “What the
Bolsheviks are now doing is not ideological propaganda, but a
conspiracy. The Bolsheviks must excuse us. Now we are going to adopt
different methods of struggle ... _We have got to disarm the
Bolsheviks._ We cannot leave in their hands those two great technical
instruments which they have possessed up to now. We cannot leave machine
guns and rifles in their hands. We will not tolerate conspiracies.” That
was a new note. What did it mean exactly to disarm the Bolsheviks?
Sukhanov writes on this subject: “The Bolsheviks really did not have any
special stores of weapons. All the weapons were actually in the hands of
soldiers and workers, the immense mass of whom were following the
Bolsheviks. Disarming the Bolsheviks could mean only disarming the
proletariat. More than that, it meant disarming the troops.”

In other words, that classic moment of the revolution had arrived when
the bourgeois democracy, upon the demand of the reaction, undertakes to
disarm the workers who had guaranteed the revolutionary victory. These
democratic gentlemen, among whom were well-read people, had invariably
given their sympathy to the disarmed, not to the disarmers – so long as
it was a question of reading old books. But when this question presented
itself in reality, they did not recognise it. The mere fact that
Tseretelli, a revolutionist, a man who had spent years at hard labour, a
Zimmerwaldist of yesterday, was undertaking to disarm the workers, had
some difficulty in making its way into people’s heads. The hall was
stunned into silence. The provincial delegates nevertheless felt that
someone was pushing them into an abyss. One of the officers went into
hysterics.

No less pale than Tseretelli, Kamenev rose in his seat and cried out
with a dignity the strength of which was felt by the audience: “Mr.
Minister, if you are not merely talking into the wind, you have no right
to confine yourself to speech. Arrest me, and try me for conspiracy
against the revolution.” The Bolsheviks left the hall with a protest,
refusing to participate in this mockery of their own party. The
tenseness in the hall became almost unbearable. Lieber hastened to the
aid of Tseretelli. Restrained rage was replaced by hysterical fury.
Lieber called for ruthless measures. “If you want to win the masses who
follow the Bolsheviks, then break with Bolshevism.” But he was heard
without sympathy, even with a half-hostility.

Impressionable as always, Lunacharsky immediately tried to find a common
ground with the majority: Although the Bolsheviks had assured him that
they had in mind only a peaceful demonstration, nevertheless his own
experience had convinced him that “it was a mistake to organise a
demonstration”; however, we must not sharpen the conflicts. Without
pacifying his enemies, Lunacharsky irritated his friends.

“We are not fighting with the left tendency,” said Dan jesuitically – he
was the most experienced, but also most futile of the leaders of the
swamp. “We are fighting with the counter revolution. It is not our fault
if behind your shoulders stand the agents of Germany.” The reference to
Germans was merely a substitute for an argument. Of course these
gentlemen could not point to any agents of Germany.

Tseretelli wanted to deal a blow; Dan merely wanted to show his fist. In
its helplessness the Executive Committee sided with Dan. The resolution
offered to the congress next day had the character of an exceptional law
against Bolsheviks, but without immediate practical inferences.

“You can have no doubt after the visit of your delegates to the
factories and regiments,” said a declaration addressed to the congress
in writing by the Bolsheviks, “that if the demonstration did not take
place, it was not because of your veto, but because our party called it
off ... The fiction of a military conspiracy was created by the members
of the Provisional Government in order to carry out the disarming of the
proletariat of Petrograd and the disbanding of the Petrograd garrison
... Even if the state power went over wholly into the hands of the
Soviet – which we advocate – and the Soviet tried to put fetters upon
our agitation, that would not make us passively submit; we should go to
meet imprisonment and other punishments in the name of the idea of
international socialism which separates us from you.”

The Soviet majority and the Soviet minority confronted each other breast
to breast three days as though for a decisive battle. But both sides
stepped back at the last moment. The Bolsheviks gave up the
demonstration. The Compromisers abandoned the idea of disarming the
workers.

Tseretelli remained in the minority among his own people. But
nevertheless from his point of view he was right. The policy of union
with the bourgeoisie had arrived at a point where it became necessary to
paralyse the masses who were not reconciled to the coalition. To carry
the Compromise policy through to a successful end – that is, to the
establishment of a parliamentary rule of the bourgeoisie – demanded the
disarming of the workers and soldiers. But Tseretelli was not only
right. He was besides that powerless. Neither the soldiers nor the
workers would have voluntarily given up their arms. It would have been
necessary to employ force against them. But Tseretelli was already
without forces. He could procure them, if at all, only from the hands of
the reaction. But they, In case of a successful crushing of the
Bolsheviks, would have immediately taken up the job of crushing the
Compromise soviets, and would not have failed to remind Tseretelli that
he was a former hard-labour convict and nothing more. However, the
further course of events will show that even the reaction did not have
forces enough for this.

Politically Tseretelli grounded his argument for fighting the Bolsheviks
upon the assertion that they were separating the proletariat from the
peasantry. Martov answered him: Tseretelli does not get his guiding
ideas “from the depth of the peasantry. A group of right Kadets, a group
of capitalists, a group of landlords, a group of imperialists, the
bourgeoisie of the West” – these are the ones who are demanding the
disarmament of the workers and soldiers. Martov was right: the
possessing classes have more than once in history hidden their
pretensions behind the backs of a peasantry.

From the moment of publication of Lenin’s April theses, a reference to
the danger of isolating the proletariat from the peasants became the
principal argument of all those who wanted to drag the revolution
backward. It was no accident that Lenin compared Tseretelli to the “old
Bolsheviks.”

In one of his works of the year 1917, Trotsky wrote on this theme: “The
isolation of our party from the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks,
even its extreme isolation, even by way of solitary confinement, would
still in no case mean the isolation of the proletariat from the
oppressed peasantry and the oppressed city masses. On the contrary, a
sharp demarcation of the policy of the revolutionary proletariat from
the treacherous apostacy of the present leaders of the Soviet, can alone
bring a saving political differentiation into the peasant millions, draw
away the poor peasants from the traitorous leadership of the aggressive
Social Revolutionary type of muzhik and convert the socialist
proletariat into genuine leaders of the national plebeian revolution.”

But Tseretelli’s totally false argument remained alive. On the eve of
the October revolution it reappeared with redoubled force as the
argument of many “old Bolsheviks” against the uprising. Several years
later when the intellectual reaction against October began, Tseretelli’s
formula became the chief theoretical weapon of the school of the
epigones.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

At the same session of the congress which condemned the Bolsheviks in
their absence, a representative of the Mensheviks unexpectedly moved to
appoint for the following Sunday, the 18th of June, a manifestation of
workers and soldiers in Petrograd and other important cities, in order
to demonstrate to the enemy the unity and strength of the democracy. The
motion was carried, although not without bewilderment. Something over a
month later Miliukov fairly well explained this unexpected turn on the
part of the Compromisers: “In delivering Kadet speeches at the congress
of the soviets, in disorganising the armed demonstration of June 10 ...
the minister-socialists felt that they had gone too far in our
direction, that the ground was slipping under their feet. They got
frightened and backed away abruptly toward the Bolsheviks.” The decision
to hold a demonstration on June 18 was, of course not a step in the
direction of the Bolsheviks, but an attempt to turn toward the masses as
against the Bolsheviks. Their nocturnal experience with the workers and
soldiers bad caused a certain amount of trepidation among the heads of
the soviets. Thus, for instance, in direct opposition to what had been
in mind at the beginning of the congress, they hastily produced in the
name of the government a resolution calling for the abolition of the
State Duma and the summoning of a Constituent Assembly for the 30th of
September. The slogans of the demonstration were chosen with this same
idea of not causing any irritation to the masses: “Universal Peace,”
“Immediate Convocation of a Constituent Assembly,” “Democratic
Republic.” Not a word either about the offensive or the coalition. Lenin
asked in _Pravda_: “And what has become of ‘Complete confidence to the
Provisional Government,’ gentlemen? ... Why does your tongue stick in
your throat?” This irony was accurately to the point: the Compromisers
did not dare demand of the masses confidence in that government of which
they themselves were members.

The Soviet delegates, having a second time made the rounds of the
workers’ districts and the barracks, gave wholly encouraging reports on
the eve of the demonstration to the Executive Committee. Tseretelli, to
whom these communications restored his equilibrium and inclination
towards complacent sermonising, addressed some remarks to the
Bolsheviks:

“Now we shall have an open and honest review of the revolutionary forces
... Now we shall see whom the majority is following, you or us.” The
Bolsheviks had accepted the challenge even before it was so incautiously
formulated. “We shall join the demonstration on the 18th,” wrote
_Pravda_, “in order to struggle for those aims for which we had intended
to demonstrate on the 10th.”

The line of march – evidently in memory of the funeral procession of
three months before, which had been, at least superficially, a gigantic
manifestation of the unity of the democracy – again led to Mars Field
and the grave of the February martyrs. But aside from the line of march
nothing whatever was reminiscent of those earlier days. About 400,000
people paraded, considerably less than at the funeral: absent from the
Soviet demonstration were not only the bourgeoisie with whom the soviets
were in coalition, but also the radical intelligentsia, which had
occupied so prominent a place in the former parades of the democracy.
Few but the factories and barracks marched.

The delegates of the congress, assembled on Mars Field, read and counted
the placards. The first Bolshevik slogans were met half-laughingly –
Tseretelli had so confidently thrown down his challenge the day before.
But these same slogans were repeated again and again. “Down with the Ten
Minister-Capitalists!” “Down with the Offensive” “All Power to the
Soviets!” The ironical smiles froze, and then gradually disappeared.
Bolshevik banners floated everywhere. The delegates stopped counting the
uncomfortable totals. The triumph of the Bolsheviks was too obvious.
“Here and there,” writes Sukhanov, “the chain of Bolshevik banners and
columns would be broken by specifically Social Revolutionary or official
Soviet slogans. But these were drowned in the mass. Soviet officialdom
was recounting the next day ‘how fiercely here and there the crowd tore
up banners bearing the slogan “Confidence to the Provisional
Government.”’” There is obvious exaggeration in this. Only three small
groups carried placards in honour of the Provisional Government: the
circle of Plekhanov, a Cossack detachment, and a handful of Jewish
intellectuals who belonged to the Bund. This threefold combination,
which gave the impression with its variegated membership of a political
curio, seemed to have set itself the task of publicly exhibiting the
impotence of the régime. Under the hostile cries of the crowd the
Plekhanovites and the Bund lowered their placards. The Cossacks were
stubborn, and their banners were literally torn from them by the
demonstrators, and destroyed. “The stream which had been flowing quietly
along until then,” writes _Izvestia_, “turned into a veritable river at
the flood, just at the point of overflowing its banks.” That was the
Vyborg section, all under the banners of the Bolsheviks. “Down with the
Ten Minister-Capitalists” One of the factories carried a placard: “The
right to Life is Higher than the rights of Private Property.” This
slogan had not been suggested by the party.

Dismayed provincials were looking everywhere for their leaders. The
latter lowered their eyes or simply went into hiding. The Bolsheviks
went after the provincials. Does this look like a gang of conspirators?
The delegates agreed that it did not. “In Petrograd you are the power,”
they conceded in a totally different tone from that in which they had
spoken at the official sessions, “but not in the provinces, not at the
front. Petrograd cannot go against the whole country.” That’s all right,
answered the Bolsheviks, your turn will soon come – the same slogans
will be raised.

“During this demonstration,” wrote the old man Plekhanov, “I stood on
Mars Field beside Cheidze: I saw in his face that he was not deceiving
himself in the least about the significance of the astonishing number of
placards demanding the overthrow of the capitalist ministers. It was
emphasised as though intentionally by the veritably imperious commands
with which some of the Leninists addressed him as they passed by like
people celebrating a holiday.” The Bolsheviks certainly had ground for a
holiday feeling. “Judging by the placards and slogans of the
demonstrators,” wrote Gorky’s paper, “the Sunday demonstration revealed
the complete triumph of Bolshevism among the Petersburg proletariat.” It
was a great victory, and moreover it was won on the arena and with the
weapons chosen by the enemy. While sanctioning the offensive,
recognising the coalition, and condemning the Bolsheviks, the soviet
congress had called the masses on its own initiative into the streets.
They came with the announcement: We don’t want either offensive or
coalition; we are for Bolshevism. Such was the political meaning of the
demonstration. No wonder the papers of the Mensheviks, who had initiated
the demonstration, asked themselves mournfully the next day: Who
suggested that unhappy idea?

Of course not all the workers and soldiers in the capital took part in
the demonstration, and not all the demonstrators were Bolsheviks. But by
this time not one of them wanted a coalition. Those workers who still
remained hostile to Bolshevism did not know what to oppose to it. Their
hostility was thus converted into a watchful neutrality. Under the
Bolshevik slogans marched no small number of Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries who had not yet broken with their party, but had already
lost faith in its slogans.

The demonstration of June 18 made an enormous impression on its own
participants. The masses saw that the Bolsheviks had become a power, and
the vacillating were drawn to them. In Moscow, Kiev, Kharkov,
Ekaterinoslav, and many other provincial towns the demonstrations
revealed an immense growth of the influence of the Bolsheviks.
Everywhere the same slogans were advanced, and they struck at the very
heart of the February régime. It was impossible not to draw conclusions.
It seemed as though the Compromisers had nowhere to go. But the
offensive helped them at the very last moment. On the 19th of June,
there was a patriotic demonstration on the Nevsky under the leadership
of Kadets, and with a portrait of Kerensky. In the words of Miliukov,
“It was so different from what happened on the same street the day
before that there mingled with the feeling of triumph an involuntary
feeling of uneasiness.” Legitimate feeling! But the Compromisers gave a
sigh of relief. Their thoughts immediately soared above both
demonstrations in the form of a democratic synthesis. Those people were
fated to drain the cup of illusion and humiliation to the dregs.

In the April days two simultaneous demonstrations, one revolutionary and
the other patriotic, had gone to meet each other, and their clash
resulted in casualties. The hostile demonstrations of the 18th and 19th
of June followed one after the other. There was no direct clash then.
But a clash was not to be avoided. It had only been postponed for two
weeks.

The anarchists, not knowing how else to show their independence, availed
themselves of the demonstration of June 18 for an attack on the Vyborg
prisons. The prisoners, a majority of them criminal, were liberated
without a fight and without casualties – and not from one prison, but
from several simultaneously. It seems obvious that the attack had not
caught the administration unawares – that the administration had gladly
gone halfway to meet actual and pretended anarchists. That whole
enigmatical episode had nothing whatever to do with the demonstration.
But the patriotic press linked them together. The Bolsheviks proposed to
the congress of soviets a strict investigation of the manner in which
460 criminals had been let loose from various prisons. However, the
Compromisers could not permit themselves this luxury: they were afraid
they would run into men higher up in the administration and their own
allies in a political bloc. Moreover, they had no desire to defend their
own demonstration against malicious slanders.

The Minister of Justice, Pereverzev – who had disgraced himself a few
days before in connection with the summer house of Durnovo – decided to
have vengeance, and under the pretext of a search for escaped convicts
made a new raid on the place. The anarchists resisted; one of them was
killed, and the house wrecked. The workers of the Vyborg side,
considering the house their own, sounded the alarm. Several factories
quit work; the alarm spread to other sections and even to the barracks.

The last days of June pass in a continual commotion. A machine gun
regiment prepares for an immediate attack on the Provisional Government.
Workers from the striking factories make the rounds of the regiments
calling them into the streets. Bearded peasants in soldiers’ coats, many
of them grey-haired, pass in processions of protest along the pavements:
these middle-aged peasants are demanding that they be discharged for
work in the fields. The Bolsheviks are carrying on an agitation against
going into the streets: The demonstration of the 18th has said all that
can be said: in order to produce a change, demonstrating is not enough;
and yet the hour of revolution has not yet struck. On the 22nd of June,
the Bolshevik press appeals to the garrison: “Do not trust any summons
to action in the street delivered in the name of the Military
Organisation.” Delegates are arriving from the front with complaints of
violence and punishments. Threats to reorganise the unsubmissive
regiments pour oil on the fire. “In many regiments the soldiers are
sleeping with weapons in their hands,” says a declaration of the
Bolsheviks to the Executive Committee. Patriotic demonstrations, often
armed, lead to street fights. These are small discharges of the
accumulated electricity. Neither side directly intends to attack: the
reaction is too weak, the revolution is not yet fully confident of its
power. But the streets of the town seem paved with explosive material. A
battle hovers in the air. The Bolshevik press explains and restrains.
The patriotic press gives away its fright with an unbridled baiting of
Bolsheviks. On the 25th, Lenin writes: “This universal wild cry of spite
and rage against the Bolsheviks is the common complaint of Kadets,
Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks against their own flabbiness. They
are in a majority. They are the government. They are all together in a
bloc. And they see that nothing comes of it. What can they do but rage
against the Bolsheviks?”



CHAPTER 23 CONCLUSION


 

In the first pages of this work we tried to show how deeply the October
revolution was rooted in the social relations of Russia. Our analysis,
far from having been accommodated _ex post facto_ to the achieved
events, was on the contrary made by us long before the revolution –
indeed before its prologue of 1905.

In the further pages we tried to see how the social forces of Russia
revealed themselves in the events of the revolution. We recorded the
activity of the political parties in their interrelations with the
classes. The sympathies and antipathies of the author may be set aside.
A historic exposition has a right to demand that its objectivity be
recognised if, resting upon accurately established facts, it reproduces
their inner connection on the basis of the real development of social
relations. The inner causal order of the process thus coming to life
becomes itself the best proof of the objectivity of the exposition.

The events of the February revolution passing before the reader have
confirmed our theoretical prognosis for the time being by one half at
least – through a method of successive elimination. Before the
proletariat came to power all the other variants of the political
development were subjected to the test of life and thrown aside as
worthless.

The government of the liberal bourgeoisie with Kerensky as a democratic
hostage, proved a total failure. The “April days” were the first candid
warning addressed by the October to the February revolution. The
bourgeois Provisional Government was replaced after this by a Coalition
whose fruitlessness was revealed on every day of its existence, In the
June demonstration summoned by the Executive Committee on its own
initiative, although perhaps not quite voluntarily, the February
revolution tried to measure strength with the October and suffered a
cruel defeat. The defeat was the more fatal in that it occurred in the
Petrograd arena, and at the hands of those same workers and soldiers who
had achieved the February revolution and turned it over to the rest of
the country. The June demonstration proved that the workers and soldiers
of Petrograd were on their way to a new revolution whose aims were
inscribed on their banners. Unmistakable signs testified that all the
rest of the country, although with an inevitable delay, would catch up
with Petrograd. Thus by the end of its fourth month the February
revolution had already exhausted itself politically. The Compromisers
had lost the confidence of the soldiers and workers. A conflict between
the leading soviet parties and the soviet masses now became inevitable.
After the manifestation of June 18, which was a peaceful test of the
correlation of forces of the two revolutions, the contradiction between
them must inevitably take an open and violent form.

Thus arose the “July days.” Two weeks after the demonstration which had
been organised from above, the same workers and soldiers went out into
the street on their own initiative and demanded of the Central Executive
Committee that it seize the power. The Compromisers flatly refused. The
July days led to street encounters and casualties, and ended with the
dispersion of the Bolsheviks who were declared responsible for the
bankruptcy of the February régime. That resolution which Tseretelli had
introduced on June 11 and which was then voted down – to declare the
Bolsheviks beyond the law and disarm them – was carried out in full at
the beginning of July. The Bolshevik papers were shut down; the
Bolshevik military units were dissolved. The workers were disarmed. The
leaders of the party were declared hirelings of the German Staff. One of
them went into hiding, the others were locked up in jail.

But just this “victory” of the Compromisers over the Bolsheviks
completely revealed the impotence of the democracy. Against the workers
and soldiers the democrats were compelled to employ notoriously
counter-revolutionary units, hostile not only to the Bolsheviks, but
also to the Soviet: the Executive Committee already had no troops of its
own.

The liberals drew from this the correct conclusion, which Miliukov
formulated in the form of an alternative: Kornilov or Lenin? The
revolution actually left no more room for the empire of the golden mean.
The counter-revolution was saying to itself: now or never. The supreme
commander-in-chief, Kornilov, raised a rebellion against the revolution
under the guise of a campaign against the Bolsheviks. Just as all forms
of the legal opposition before the revolution had adopted the camouflage
of patriotism – that is, the necessities of the struggle against the
Germans – so now all forms of legal counter-revolution adopted as
camouflage the necessities of the struggle against the Bolsheviks.
Kornilov had the support of the possessing classes and their party, the
Kadets. This did not hinder, but rather promoted, the result that the
troops deployed against Petrograd by Kornilov were defeated without a
fight, capitulated without an encounter, went up in vapour like a drop
falling on a hot stove-lid. Thus the attempt at a revolution _from the
right_ was made, and moreover by a man standing at the head of the army.
The correlation of forces between the possessing classes and the people
was tested in action. In the choice between Kornilov and Lenin, Kornilov
fell like a rotten fruit, although Lenin was still at that time
compelled to re main in deep hiding.

What variant after that still remained unused, untried, untested? The
variant of Bolshevism. Actually after the Kornilov attempt and its
inglorious collapse, the masses stormily and decisively swung over to
the Bolsheviks. The October revolution advanced with a physical
necessity. In distinction from the February revolution, which has been
called bloodless although it cost Petrograd a considerable number of
victims, the October revolution was actually achieved in the capital
without bloodshed. Have we not the right to ask: What further
demonstration could be given of the deep natural inevitability of the
October revolution? Is it not clear that this revolution can seem the
fruit of adventurism and demagogy only to those whom it damaged at the
most sensitive point, the pocketbook? The bloody struggle breaks out
only after the conquest of power by the Bolshevik soviets when the
overthrown classes, with material support from the governments of the
Entente, make desperate efforts to get back what they have lost. Then
come the years of civil war. The Red Army is created, the hungry country
is put under the régime of military communism and converted into a
Spartan war camp. The October revolution step by step lays down its
road, beats back all enemies, passes over the solution of its industrial
problems, heals the heaviest wounds of the imperialist and civil war,
and achieves gigantic successes in the sphere of the development of
industry. There arise before it, however, new difficulties flowing from
its isolated position with mighty capitalistic lands surrounding it.
That belatedness of development which had brought the Russian
proletariat to power, has imposed upon that power tasks which in their
essence cannot be fully achieved within the framework of an isolated
state. The fate of that state is thus wholly bound up with the further
course of world history.

This first volume, dedicated to the February revolution, shows how and
why that revolution was bound to come to nothing, The second volume will
show how the October revolution triumphed.



CHRONOLOGICAL TABLE FOR VOLUME ONE


 

  1774

  Pugatchev Rebellion of Cossacks and peasants.

  1825

  Dekabrist (Decembrist) uprising against czarism led by liberal
  officers.

  1848

  _The Communist Manifesto_ published by Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels:
  The foundation of revolutionary socialism or communism

  1861

  Peasant Reform; abolition of serfdom in Russia.

  1864

  “The International” (first international organisation of socialist
  workers) established by Marx and others.

  1871

  The Paris Commune.

  1882

  Plekhanov publishes first pamphlet introducing Marxian socialism into
  Russia.

  1905

  The Revolution of 1905 in Russia. First organisation of soviets by
  Russian workers.

  _(January 9)_ "Bloody Sunday": workers led by Father Gapon and
  carrying a petition to the czar [Nicholas II], are mowed down by the
  czar’s troops.

  1914

  _(August 1)_ – World War begins. Germany declares war against Russia.

  _(November 4)_ – Bolshevik deputies in the State Duma arrested and
  sent to Siberia

  1915

  _(April)_ – Russian revolutionary internationalist paper, _Nashe
  Slovo_, appears in Paris with Trotsky on the editorial staff.

  _(September)_ – International socialist congress in Zimmerwald,
  Switzerland.

  1916

  _(May)_ – Second Congress of socialist internationalists at Kienthal.

  1917

  _(January 9)_ – Street meetings and a printers’ strike celebrate the
  anniversary of “Bloody Sunday”

  _(February 14)_ – The last State Duma assembles.

  _(February 23)_ – Celebration of International Woman’s Day begins the
  revolution.

  _(February 24)_ – Two hundred thousand workers on strike in Petrograd.

  _(February 25)_ – General strike in Petrograd. Shootings and arrests
  of revolutionists.

  _(February 26)_ Duma dissolved by the czar [Nicholas II]. The deputies
  disperse but decide not to leave town.

    Tens of thousands of workers in the streets.

    Mutiny of the Guard regiments.

    Formation of the Soviet of Workers’ deputies.

    Formation of Provisional Committee of the Duma.

  _(February 28)_ – Arrest of the czar’s ministers.

    Capture of Schlusselberg Prison.

    First issue of _Izvestia_ – “The News of the Soviet.”

  _(March 1)_ – _Order No. 1_ is issued to the soldiers.

      Formation of the soldiers’ section of the Soviet.

      First session of the Moscow Soviet.

  _(March 2)_ – The czar abdicates in favour of the Grand Duke Mikhail.

      The Provisional Government is formed by the Provisional Committee
      of the Duma, with the support of the Soviet and with Kerensky a
      Minister of Justice.

  _(March 3)_ – The Grand Duke Mikhail abdicates.

      The Provisional Government announces the revolution to the world
      by radio.

  _(March 5)_ – the first issue of _Pravda_, central organ of the
  Bolshevik Party.

  _(March 6)_ – The Provisional Government declares amnesty for
  political prisoners.

  _(March 8)_ – The czar arrested at Moghilie.

  _(March 14)_ – Address of the Soviet _To the people of the whole
  world_ declaring for peace without annexations or indemnities.

  _(March 23)_ – Funeral of the martyrs of the revolution.

  _(March 29)_ – All-Russian conference of the Soviets.

  _(April 3)_ – Lenin, Zinoviev and other Bolshevik arrive from
  Switzerland.

  _(April 4)_ – Lenin’s _April Theses_ outlining his policy of
  proletarian revolution.

  _(April 18)_ – Celebration of the international socialist holiday of
  May 1.

      Foreign Minister Miliukov sends a note to the Allies promising war
      to victory on the old terms.

  _(April 20)_ – Armed demonstrations of protest against the note of
  Miliukov— the “April Days”

  _(April 24)_ – Beginning of an All-Russian conference of the Bolshevik
  Party.

  _(May 1)_ – The Petrograd Soviet votes for a coalition government.

  _(May 2)_ – Miliukov resigns.

  _(May 4)_ – Trotsky arrives from America, seconding the policies of
  Lenin.

      An All-Russian Congress of Peasants’ Deputies opens in Petrograd.

  _(May 5)_ – Coalition government is organised with Kerensky as
  Minister of War.

  _(May 17)_ – The Kronstadt Soviet declares itself the sole governing
  power in Kronstadt.

  _(May 25)_ – All-Russian Congress of the Social Revolutionary party.

  _(May 30)_ – First conference of factory and shop committees opens in
  Petrograd.

  _(June 3)_ – First All-Russian Congress of Soviets.

  _(June 16)_ – Kerensky orders Russian armies to take the offensive.

  _(June 18)_ – A demonstration called by the Mensheviks and Social
  Revolutionaries turns out to be a Bolshevik demonstration.

  _(June 19)_ – Patriotic demonstration on Nevsky Prospect, carrying
  portrait of Kerensky.

  _(July 3-5)_ – “July Days” – semi-insurrection followed by attempted
  stamping out of Bolshevism in Petrograd.

Note: Russian dates are given according to the old (Julian) calender.
Add 13 days to find the date according to the (Gregorian) calender that
is now international.



VOLUME 1: APPENDIX I (TO THE CHAPTER _PECULIARITIES OF RUSSIA’S DEVELOPMENT_)


 

The question of the peculiarities of Russia’s historic development, and,
bound up therewith, the question of its future destinies, lay at the
bottom of all the debates and groupings of the Russian intelligentsia
throughout almost the whole of the nineteenth century. Slavophilism and
westernism resolved this question in opposite ways but with similar
dogmatism. They were replaced by the theories of the Narodniks and
Marxism. Before the Narodnik theory conclusively faded out under the
influence of bourgeois liberalism, it long and stubbornly defended the
idea of a completely unique course of development for Russia, a detour
around capitalism. In this sense the Narodniks continued the Slavophile
tradition, purging it however of monarchist-churchly-Pan-Slavic
elements, and giving it a revolutionary-democratic character.

In the essence of the matter the Slavophile conception, with all its
reactionary fantasticness, and also Narodnikism, with all its democratic
illusions, were by no means mere speculations, but rested upon
indubitable and moreover deep peculiarities of Russia’s development,
understood one-sidedly however and incorrectly evaluated. In its
struggle with Narodnikism, Russian Marxism, demonstrating the identity
of the laws of development for all countries, not infrequently fell into
a dogmatic mechanisation discovering a tendency to pour out the baby
with the bath. This tendency is revealed especially sharply in many of
the works of the well-known Professor Pokrovsky.

In 1922 Pokrovsky came down upon the historic conception of the author
which lies at the basis of the theory of Permanent Revolution, We
consider it useful, at least for readers interesting themselves not only
in the dramatic course of events but also in revolutionary doctrine, to
adduce here the more essential excerpts from our answers to Professor
Pokrovsky published in two issues of the central organ of the Bolshevik
Party, _Pravda_, July 1 and 2,1922:

CONCERNING THE PECULIARITIES OF RUSSIA’S HISTORIC DEVELOPMENT

Pokrovsky has published an article dedicated to my book: _1905_, which
demonstrates – negatively, alas! – what a complex matter it is to
_apply_ methods of historic materialism to living human history, and
what a rubber-stamp affair is often made out of history even by such
deeply erudite people as Pokrovsky. The book which Pokrovsky criticises
was directly called out by a desire to establish historically and
justify theoretically the slogan of the conquest of power by the
proletariat, as against the slogan of a bourgeois democratic republic,
and also that of a democratic government of the proletariat and the
peasantry ... This line of thought produced a very great theoretic
indignation on the part of no small number of Marxists, indeed an
overwhelming majority of them. Those who expressed this indignation were
not only Mensheviks, but also Kamenev and Rozhkov (a
Bolshevik-historian). Their point of view in broad outlines was as
follows: The political rule of the bourgeoisie must precede the
political rule of the proletariat; the bourgeois democratic republic
must be a prolonged historic schooling for the proletariat; the attempt
to jump over this stage is adventurism; if the working class in the West
has not yet conquered the power, how can the Russian proletariat set
itself this task? etc., etc. From the point of view of this
pseudo-Marxism, which confines itself to historical mechanisms, formal
analogies, converting historic epochs into a logical succession of
inflexible social categories (feudalism, capitalism, socialism,
autocracy, bourgeois republic, dictatorship of the proletariat) – from
this point of view the slogan of the conquest of power by the working
class in Russia must have seemed a monstrous departure from Marxism.
However, a serious empirical evaluation of the social forces as they
stood in 1903 – 05 powerfully suggested the entire viability of a
struggle for a conquest of power by the working class. Is this a
peculiarity, or is it not? Does it assume profound peculiarities in the
whole historical development or does it not? How does it come that such
a task arose before the proletariat of Russia – that is, the most
backward (with Pokrovsky’s permission) country of Europe?

And in what consists the backwardness of Russia? Merely in the fact that
Russia is belatedly repeating the history of the western European
countries? But in that case would it be possible to talk of a conquest
of power by the Russian proletariat? This conquest, however (we permit
ourselves to remember), was actually made. Where lies the essence of all
this? In that the indubitable and irrefutable belatedness of Russia’s
development under influence and pressure of the higher culture from the
West, results not in a simple repetition of the Western European
historic process, but in the creation of profound _peculiarities_
demanding independent study.

This deep uniqueness in our political situation, which led to the
victorious October revolution before the beginning of the revolution in
Europe, had its roots in the peculiar correlation of forces among the
different classes and the state power. When Pokrovsky and Rozhkov
quarrelled with the Narodniks or liberals, demonstrating that the
organisation and policy of czarism was determined by the economic
development and the interests of the possessing classes, they were
fundamentally right. But when Pokrovsky tries to repeat this against me,
he simply hits the wrong mark.

The result of our belated historic development, in the conditions of the
imperialist encirclement, was that our bourgeoisie did not have time to
push out czarism before the proletariat had become an independent
revolutionary force.

But for Pokrovsky the very question which constitutes for us the central
theme of the investigation, does not exist.

Pokrovsky writes: ’To portray the Moscow Russ of the sixteenth century
on a background of general European relations of that time is an
extremely alluring enterprise. There is no better way to refute the
prejudices prevailing until now even in Marxist circles about the
‘primitiveness’ of those economic foundations upon which the Russian
autocracy arose,” And further: “To present this autocracy in its real
historic connections, as one of the aspects of commercial-capitalist
Europe ... that is an undertaking not only of extraordinary interest to
the historian, but also of extraordinary educational importance for the
reading public: there is no more radical way of putting an end to the
legend of ‘peculiarities’ of the Russian historic process.” Pokrovsky as
we see, flatly denies the primitiveness and backwardness of our economic
development, and therewith relegates the peculiarities of the Russian
historic process to the sphere of legend. And the whole trouble is that
Pokrovsky is completely hypnotised by the comparatively broad
development of trade noticed by him and also by Rozhkov in sixteenth
century Russia. It is hard to understand how Pokrovsky could make such a
mistake. You might indeed imagine that trade is the basis of economic
life and its infallible measuring rod. The German economist Karl Bucher
twenty years ago tried to find in trade (the path between the producer
and the consumer) a criterion of the whole economic development. Struve,
of course, hastened to transport this “discovery” into the Russian
economic science. At that time the theory of Bücher met a perfectly
natural opposition from the Marxists. We find the criteria of economic
development in production – in technique and the social organisation of
labour – and the path followed by the product from the producer to the
consumer we regard as a secondary phenomenon, whose roots are to be
found in that same production.

The large scope, at least in a spatial sense, of Russian trade in the
sixteenth century – however paradoxical from the standpoint of the
Bücher-Struve criterion – is explained exactly by the extraordinary
primitiveness of Russian economy. The West European city was a
craft-guild and trade-league city; our cities were above all
administrative, military, consequently consuming, and not producing,
centres. The craft-guild culture of the West formed itself on a
relatively high level of economic development when all the fundamental
processes of the manufacturing industries had been distinguished from
agriculture, and had been converted into independent crafts, had created
their own organisations, their own focuses – the cities – and at first a
limited (belonging to local districts), but nevertheless stable, market.
At the basis of the medieval European city therefore lay a comparatively
high differentiation of industry, giving rise to regular interrelations
between the city centre and its agricultural periphery. Our economic
backwardness, on the other hand, found its expression in the fact that
craft, not yet separated from agriculture, preserved the form of home
industry. Here we were nearer to India than to Europe, just as our
medieval cities were nearer to the Asiatic than the European type, and
as our autocracy, standing between the European absolutism and the
Asiatic despotism, in many features approached the latter.

With the boundlessness of our spaces and the sparseness of the
population (also a sufficiently objective sign, it would seem, of
backwardness) the exchange of products presupposed a mediating role of
trade-capital on the broadest scale. This scale was possible exactly
because the West stood at a far higher level of development, had its own
innumerable demands, sent out its merchants and its goods, and therewith
stimulated our trade turnover with its extremely primitive, and in a
certain measure barbarian, economic basis. Not to see this immense
peculiarity of our historic development means not to see our whole
history.

My Siberian boss (I spent two months entering _poods_ and _arshines_ in
his ledger), Jacob Andreievich Chernykh – this was not in the sixteenth
century, but at the very beginning of the twentieth – enjoyed an almost
unlimited rulership within the limits of Kirensky county, thanks to his
trade operations. Jacob Andreievich bought up furs from the Tunghuz and
bought in the parish contributions in kind from the priests of more
remote districts, imported calico from the Irbitsk and Nizhni-Novgorod
market, and above all supplied vodka. (In the Irkutsk province at that
epoch the monopoly had not yet been introduced.) Jacob Andreievich was
illiterate, but a millionaire (according to the value of the decimal in
those days, not now). His “dictatorship,” as the representative of trade
capital, was indubitable. He even always talked of “my little Tunghuzi.”
The city of Kirensk, like Verkholensk and Nizhni-Ilimsk, was a residence
of sheriffs and magistrates, _kulaks_ in hierarchical dependence one
upon another, all kinds of officials, and a few wretched artisans. An
organised handicraft as the basis of city economic life I did not find
there, neither guilds, nor guild holidays, nor trade leagues, although
Jacob Andreievich counted himself a member of the “second League.”
Really this live bit of Siberian reality carries us far deeper into an
understanding of the historic peculiarities of Russia’s development than
what Pokrovsky says on this subject. That is a fact. The trade
operations of Jacob Andreievich extended from the midstream of the Lena
and its eastern tributaries to Nizhni-Novgorod and even Moscow. Few
trades of Continental Europe can mark off such distances on their maps.
However, this trade dictator – this “king of clubs,” in the language of
the Siberian farmers – was the most finished and convincing incarnation
of our industrial backwardness, barbarism, primitiveness, sparseness of
population, scatteredness of peasant towns and villages, impassable
country roads, creating around the counties, districts and villages in
the spring and autumn floods a two-months’ swampy blockade, of our
universal illiteracy, etc., etc. And Chernykh had risen to his
commercial importance on the basis of the Siberian (mid-Lensky)
barbarism, because the West – “Rassea,” “Moskva” – was exerting
pressure, and was taking Siberia in tow, creating a combination of nomad
economic primitiveness with alarm clocks from Warsaw.

The guild craft was the basis of the medieval city culture, which
radiated also into the village. Medieval science, scholasticism,
religious reformation, grew out of a craft-guild soil. We did not have
these things. Of course the embryo symptoms, the signs, can be found,
but in the West these things were not signs but powerful cultural
economic formations with a craft-guild basis. Upon this basis stood the
medieval European city, and upon this it grew and entered into the
conflict with the church and the feudal lords, and brought into play
against the lords the hand of the monarchy. That same city created the
technical premises for standing armies in the shape of firearms.

Where were our craft-guild cities even in a remote degree similar to the
western cities? Where was their struggle with the feudal lords? And was
the foundation for the development of the Russian autocracy laid by a
struggle of the industrial-commercial city with the feudal lord? By the
very nature of our cities we had no such struggle, just as we had no
Reformation. Is this a peculiarity or is not it?

Our handicraft remained at the stage of home industry – that is, did not
split off from peasant agriculture. Our Reformation remained at the
stage of the peasant sect, because it found no leadership from the
cities. Primitiveness and backwardness here cry to the heavens ...

Czarism arose as an independent state organisation (again only
relatively independent within the limits of the struggle of living
historic forces on an economic foundation), not thanks to a struggle of
powerful feudal cities with powerful lords, but in spite of the complete
industrial feebleness of our cities and thanks to the feebleness of our
feudal lords.

Poland in her social structure stood between Russia and the West, just
as Russia stood between Asia and Europe. The Polish cities knew already
much more of guild craft than ours did, but they did not succeed in
rising high enough to help the kingly power break the barons. The state
power remained in the immediate hands of the nobility. The result:
complete impotence of the state and its disintegration.

What has been said of czarism relates also to capital and the
proletariat. I cannot understand why Pokrovsky directs his rage only
against my first chapter dealing with czarism. Russian capitalism did
not develop from handicraft through manufacture to the factory, because
European capital, at first in the trade form and afterwards in the
finance and industrial form, poured down on us during that period when
Russian handicraft had not in the mass divided itself from agriculture.
Hence the appearance among us of the most modern capitalist industry in
an environment of economic primitiveness: the Belgian or American
factory, and round about it settlements, villages of wood and straw,
burning up every year, etc. The most primitive beginnings and the latest
European endings. Hence the mighty role of West European capital in
Russian industry; hence the political weakness of the Russian
bourgeoisie; hence the ease with which we settled accounts with the
Russian bourgeoisie; hence our further difficulties when the European
bourgeoisie interfered.

And our proletariat? Did it pass through the school of the medieval
apprentice brotherhoods? Has it the ancient tradition of the guilds?
Nothing of the kind. It was thrown into the factory cauldron snatched
directly from the plough. Hence the absence of conservative tradition,
absence of caste in the proletariat itself, revolutionary freshness:
hence – along with other causes – October, the first workers’ government
in the world. But hence also illiteracy, backwardness, absence of
organisational habits, absence of system in labour, of cultural and
technical education. All these minuses in our cultural economic
structure we are feeling at every step.

The Russian state encountered the military organisation of Western
nations standing on a higher political and cultural level. Thus Russian
capital in its first step ran into the far more developed and powerful
capital of the West and fell under its leadership. Thus the Russian
working class in its first steps also found ready weapons worked out by
the experience of the West European proletariat; the Marxian theory, the
trade union, the political party. Whoever explains the character and
policy of the autocracy merely by the interests of the Russian
possessing classes forgets that besides the more backward, poorer and
more ignorant exploiters in Russia, there were the richer and more
powerful exploiters in Europe. The possessing classes of Russia had to
encounter the possessing classes of Europe, hostile or semi-hostile.
This encounter was mediated through a state organisation. Such an
organisation was the autocracy. The whole structure and history of the
autocracy would have been different if it had not been for the European
cities, European gunpowder (for we did not invent it), if it had not
been for the European stock markets.

In the last epoch of its existence the autocracy was not only an organ
of the possessing classes of Russia, but also of the organisation of
European stock markets for the exploitation of Russia. This double role
again gave it a very considerable independence. A sharp expression of
this is the fact that the French Bourse made a loan for the support of
the autocracy in 1905 against the will of the party of the Russian
bourgeoisie.

Czarism was shattered in the imperialist war. And why? Because it had
under it a too low-grade productive foundation (“primitiveness”). In
military-technical matters czarism tried to fall in line with more
perfected models. It was every way assisted in this by the more rich and
cultured Allies. Thanks to this fact czarism had at its disposal the
most finished weapons of war, but it had not, and could not have, the
capacity to reproduce these weapons and transport then (and the human
masses also) on railroads and waterways with sufficient speed. In other
words, czarism was defending the interests of the ruling classes of
Russia in the international struggle, while relying upon a more
primitive economic basis than her enemies and allies.

Czarism exploited this basis during the war mercilessly – devoured, that
is to say, a far greater percentage of the national wealth and the
national income than her mighty enemies and allies. This fact finds its
confirmation on the one hand in the system of war debts, on the other in
the complete ruin of Russia ...

All these circumstances, which immediately pre-determined the October
revolution, the victory of the proletariat and its future difficulties,
remain totally unexplained by the commonplaces of Pokrovsky.



VOLUME 1: APPENDIX II (TO THE CHAPTER _RE-ARMING THE PARTY_)


 

In a New York daily paper, _Novy Mir_, published for the Russian workers
in America, the author of this book attempted an analysis and a
prognosis of the development of the revolution on the basis of the scant
information supplied by the American press. “The inner history of the
developing events,” wrote the author on March 6, 1917 (old style), “is
known to us only in fragments and hints which have crept into the
official despatches.” The series of articles devoted to the revolution
begins on February 27 and breaks off on March 14 with the departure of
the author from New York. We reproduce below a series of excerpts from
these articles in chronological order, which will give an idea of the
views of the revolution with which the author arrived in Russia on May
4.

FEBRUARY 27:

“The disorganised, compromised, disintegrated government at the top, the
army shaken to the depths, the discontent, uncertainty and fear among
the ruling classes, deep bitterness in the popular masses, the
numerically developed proletariat tempered in the fire of events – all
this gives us the right to say that we are witnessing the beginning of
the second Russian revolution. Let us hope that many of us will be
participants in it.”

MARCH 3:

“The Rodziankos and Miliukovs have begun talking too soon about law and
order; not tomorrow will tranquillity descend on billowing Russia.
Stratum after stratum now, the country will arise – all the oppressed,
destitute, robbed by czarism and the ruling classes – throughout the
whole measureless space of the whole Russian prison of the people. The
Petrograd events are only beginning. At the head of the popular masses
the Russian revolutionary proletariat will fulfill its historic task: it
will drive out the monarchical and aristocratic reaction from all its
refuges, and stretch out its hand to the proletariat of Germany and all
Europe. For it is necessary to liquidate not only czarism, but also the
war.”

“Now the second wave of the revolution will roll over the heads of the
Rodziankos and Miliukovs, busy with their attempts to restore order and
come to terms with monarchy. From its own depths the revolution will
produce its government, a revolutionary organ of the people marching to
victory. Both the chief battles and the chief sacrifices are in the
future, and only after them will come complete and genuine victory.”

MARCH 4:

“The long-restrained discontent of the masses has broken to the surface
so late, on the 32nd month of the war, not because there stood before
the masses a police bulwark, very much shaken during the war, but
because all the liberal institutions and organs including their
social-patriotic hangers-on, have exercised an enormous political
pressure upon the less conscious layers of the workers, suggesting to
them the necessity of ’patriotic’ discipline and order.”

“Now only (after the victory of the insurrection) came the turn of the
Duma. The czar tried at the last moment to disperse it. And it would
have submissively dispersed ‘following the precedent of former years,’
if it had been able to. But the capitals were already in the control of
the revolutionary people, that same people who, against the will of the
liberal bourgeoisie, come out into the street to fight. The army was
with the people. And if the bourgeoisie had not made an attempt to
organise their power, a revolutionary government would have issued from
the midst of the insurrectionary worker masses. That Duma of June 3
would never have ventured to snatch the power from the hands of czarism,
but it could not help making use of the created interregnum: the
monarchy had temporarily disappeared from the face of the earth and a
revolutionary power was not yet created.”

MARCH 6:

“An open conflict between the forces of revolution at whose head stands
the city proletariat, and the anti-revolutionary liberal bourgeoisie
temporarily in power, is absolutely inevitable. You can, of course – and
the liberal bourgeois and mountain socialist of the philistine type are
heartily busy about it – pile up many pitiful words on the subject of
the immense advantages of national unity over class split. But nobody
has yet succeeded with such incantations in removing social
contradictions and stopping the natural development of a revolutionary
struggle.”

“Already at this moment, immediately, the revolutionary proletariat
ought to oppose its revolutionary institutions, the soviets of workers’,
soldiers’ and peasants’ deputies, to the executive institutions of the
Provisional Government. In this struggle the proletariat, uniting around
itself the rising popular masses, ought to make its direct goal the
conquest of power. Only a revolutionary workers’ government will have
the will and ability, even during the preparation for a Constituent
Assembly, to carry out a radical democratic clean-up throughout the
country, reconstruct the army from top to bottom, convert it into a
revolutionary militia and demonstrate in action to the lower ranks of
the peasants that their salvation lies only in supporting a
revolutionary workers’ régime.”

MARCH 7:

“While the clique of Nicholas II held the power, dynastic and
reactionary aristocratic interests had the last word in foreign policy.
For just this reason in Berlin and Vienna they were continually hoping
for a separate peace with Russia. But now the interests of naked
imperialism are inscribed on the governmental banners. ‘The czar’s
government is no more,’ the Guchkovs and Miliukovs are telling the
people, ‘Now you must pour out your blood for the all-national
interests.’ But by national interests the Russian imperialists mean the
getting back of Poland, the conquest of Galicia, Constantinople,
Armenia, Persia. In other words, Russia now takes her place in the joint
ranks of imperialism with other European states, and first of all with
her allies, England and France.”

“The proletariat of Russia cannot possibly reconcile the transition from
a dynastic aristocratic imperialism to a purely bourgeois régime with
this butchery. The international struggle against the world butchery and
imperialism is now our task more than ever before.”

“The imperialist boast of Miliukov – to crush Germany, Austria-Hungary
and Turkey – now plays perfectly into the hands of the Hohenzollerns and
Hapsburgs, Miliukov will now play the role of a garden scarecrow in
their hands. Before the new imperialistic-liberal government undertakes
reforms in the army, it will help the Hohenzollern raise the patriotic
spirit and restore the ‘national unity’ of the German people, now
cracking in all its seams. If the German proletariat should get the
right to think that the whole Russian people, and among them the chief
force of the revolution – the Russian proletariat – stands behind its
new bourgeois government, that would be a terrible blow to our
colleagues, the revolutionary socialists of Germany.”

“It is the straight duty of the revolutionary proletariat of Russia to
show that behind the evil imperialist will of the liberal bourgeoisie
there is no strength, for it has no support in the worker masses. The
Russian revolution ought to reveal its authentic face before the whole
world – that is, its irreconcilable hostility not only to the dynastic
aristocratic reaction, but to liberal imperialism.”

MARCH 8:

“Under the banner ‘Salvation of the Country’ the liberal bourgeois is
trying to keep the revolutionary leadership of the people in his hands,
and with this aim is dragging after him on a tow-line not only the
Trudovik Kerensky, but evidently also Cheidze, representative of the
opportunist elements of the social democracy.”

“The agrarian question will drive a deep wedge into the present
aristocratic bourgeois social-patriotic bloc. Kerensky will have to
choose between the ‘liberal,’ the 3rd of June[1] men, who want to steal
the whole revolution for capitalist goals, and the revolutionary
proletariat, which will unfold to its full width the programme of
agrarian revolution – that is, confiscation in behalf of the people of
the czarist, landlord, appanage, monastery and church lands. What
personal choice Kerensky makes will make no difference ... It is another
matter with the peasant masses, the rural lower ranks. To bring them
over to the side of the proletariat is the most urgent unpostponable
task.”

“It would be a crime to try to accomplish this task (the bringing over
the peasantry) by adapting our policy to the national-patriotic
limitedness of the village: the Russian worker would commit suicide if
he paid for his union with the peasant at the price of a breaking of his
ties with the European proletariat. But there is no political need for
this; we have a more powerful weapon in our hands: whereas the present
Provisional Government[2] and the ministry of Lvov, Guchkov, Miliukov,
Kerensky, are compelled – in the name of a preservation of their unity –
to side-step the agrarian question, we can and must present it in its
full stature before the peasant masses of Russia.

“‘Since agrarian reform is impossible, we are for the imperialist war,’
said the Russian bourgeoisie after the experience of 1905-07.

“‘Turn your back to the imperialist war, opposing to it the agrarian
revolution!’ we will say to the peasant masses, referring to the
experience of 1914-17.

“This same question, the land question, will play an immense role in
uniting the proletarian cadres of the army with its peasant depths. ‘The
land of the landlords, and not Constantinople.’ the soldier proletarian
will say to the soldier peasant, explaining to him whom and what the
imperialist war is serving. And upon the success of our agitation and
struggle against the war – above all among the workers, and in the
second place among the peasant and soldier masses – will depend the
answer to the question how soon the liberal imperialist government can
be replaced by a revolutionary workers’ government resting directly upon
the proletariat, and the rural lower ranks adhering to it.”

“The Rodziankos, Gochkovs, Miliukovs will bend all their efforts to get
a Constituent Assembly in their image. The strongest trump in their hand
will be the slogan of the common national war against an external enemy.
They will now talk, of course, about the necessity of defending the
‘conquests of the revolution’ against destruction by the Hohenzollerns.
And the social patriots will join the song.”

“‘If we had something to defend’ we will say. The first thing is to
insure the revolution against the domestic enemy. We must, without
waiting for the Constituent Assembly, sweep out the monarchic and feudal
rubbish to the last corner. We must teach the Russian peasant not to
trust the promises of Rodzianko and the patriotic lies of Miliukov. We
must unite the peasant millions against the liberal imperialists under
the banner of agrarian revolution and the republic. Only a revolutionary
government relying on the proletariat, which will remove the Guchkovs
and Miliukovs from power, can carry out this work to the full. This
workers’ government will bring into play all the instruments of state
power in order to raise to their feet, educate, and unite the most
backward and dark depths of the toiling masses of the city and village.”

“‘And if the German proletariat does not rise? What shall we do then?’
That is, you assume that the Russian revolution can go by without
affecting Germany – even in case our revolution puts a workers’
government in power? But surely that is utterly improbable.
‘Yes, but suppose it happens?’ If the improbable should happen, if the
conservative social-patriotic organisation should prevent the German
working class from rising against its ruling classes in the coming
epoch, then of course the Russian working class would defend its
revolution with arms in its hands. The revolutionary workers’ government
would wage war against the Hohenzollerns, summoning the brother
proletariat of Germany to rise against the common enemy. In exactly the
same way the German proletariat, if in the coming epoch it came to
power, would not only have the ‘right,’ but would be obliged, to wage
war against Guchkov and Miliukov in order to help the Russian worker
settle accounts with his imperialist enemy. In both these situations the
war conducted by a proletarian government would be only an armed
revolution. It would be a question not of the ‘defence of the
government,’ but of the defence of the revolution, and its
transplantation into other countries.”

It is hardly necessary to demonstrate that in the above extended
excerpts from popular articles to be read by workers, the same view of
the development of the revolution is expounded as that which found its
expression in Lenin’s _Theses of April 4_.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In connection with the crisis which the Bolshevik Party went through in
the first two months of the February revolution, it is not superfluous
to adduce here a quotation from an article written by the author of this
book in 1909 for the Polish journal of Rosa Luxemburg:

“If the Mensheviks, starting from the abstraction ‘Our revolution is a
bourgeois revolution,’ arrive at the idea of adapting the whole tactic
of the proletariat to the conduct of the liberal bourgeoisie, even to
the point of a conquest by it of the state power, then the Bolsheviks,
starting from an equally bare abstraction ‘a democratic and not a
socialist dictatorship,’ will arrive at the idea of a bourgeois
democratic self-limitation of the proletariat in whose hands the
governmental power will be found. To be sure, the difference between
them on this question is very considerable: while the anti-revolutionary
sides of Menshevism are expressed in their full strength even now, the
anti-revolutionary traits of Bolshevism threaten a great danger only in
the case of a revolutionary victory.”

After 1923 those words were widely used by the epigones in their
struggle against “Trotskyism.” As a matter of fact they give – eight
years before the event – a perfectly accurate characterisation of the
conduct of the present epigones in the case of a revolutionary victory.

The party issued from the April crisis with honour, having settled
accounts with the “anti-revolutionary traits” of its right flank. For
this reason the author in 1922 supplemented the passage quoted above
with the following remark:

“This, as is well known, did not happen, because under the leadership of
Lenin Bolshevism carried out (not without inner struggle) its
intellectual rearmament upon this all-important question in the spring
of 1917 – that is, before the conquest of power.”

Lenin, in April 1917, in his struggle with the opportunist tendencies of
the dominant layer of the Bolsheviks, wrote:

“The Bolshevik slogans and ideas _in general_ are completely confirmed,
but _concretely_ things have shaped themselves _other wise_ than anybody
(no matter who) could have expected – more originally, uniquely,
variously. To ignore, to forget this fact would mean to be like those
‘old Bolsheviks’ who have more than once already played a pitiful role
in the history of our party, meaninglessly repeating a formula _learned
by rote_ instead of _studying_ the unique living reality. Whoever talks
_now_ only of a ‘revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the
proletariat and peasantry’ is lagging behind Life. He has by that very
fact _gone over_ actually to the bourgeoisie against the proletarian
class struggle. Him we must put away in the archives of ‘Bolshevik’
pre-revolutionary curiosities (you might call them the archives of the
‘old Bolsheviks’).”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Members of the Duma which issued from the state overturn of June 3,
1907.

2. By Provisional Government the American press meant Provisional
Committee of the Duma.



VOLUME 1: APPENDIX III (TO THE CHAPTER _THE SOVIET CONGRESS AND THE JUNE DEMONSTRATION_)


 

To Professor A. Kaun, The University of California.

You ask me how correctly Sukhanov describes my meeting in May 1917 with
the editors of _Novy Zhizn_, a newspaper nominally directed by Maxim
Gorky. In order that what follows may be understood, I must say a few
words as to the general character of the seven-volume _Notes of the
Revolution_ by Sukhanov. With all the faults of that work (wordiness,
impressionism, political shortsightedness) which make the reading of it
at times unbearable, it is impossible not to recognise the
conscientiousness of the author which renders his _Notes_ a valuable
source for the historian. Jurists know, however, that the
conscientiousness of a witness by no means guarantees the reliability of
his testimony. It is necessary to take into consideration his level of
development, his vision, hearing, memory, his mood at the moment of the
event, etc. Sukhanov is an impressionist of the intellectual type, and
like the majority of such people lacks the ability to understand the
political psychology of men of a different mould. Notwithstanding the
fact that he himself in 1917 stood in the left wing of the Compromise
camp, and so in close neighbourhood to the Bolsheviks, he was and
remained, with his Hamlet temperament, the very opposite of a Bolshevik.
There lives always in him a feeling of hostile revulsion from integrated
people, people who know firmly what they want and where they are going.
All of this brings it about that Sukhanov in his _Notes_ quite
conscientiously piles up mistake after mistake so soon as he tries to
understand the springs of action of the Bolsheviks, or reveal their
motivation behind the scenes. At times it seems as though he consciously
confuses simple and clear questions. In reality he is organically
incapable, at least in politics, of finding the shortest distance
between two points.

Sukhanov wastes no little strength in the effort to contrast my line
with Lenin’s. Being very sensitive to the moods of the _couloir_ and the
gossip of intellectual circles – in which, by the way, lies one of the
merits of the _Notes,_ which contain much material for characterising
the psychology of the liberal, radical, and socialistic upper circles –
Sukbanov naturally nourished a hope that disagreements would arise
between Lenin and Trotsky – the more so that this must lighten somewhat
the unenviable fate of _Novy Zhizn,_ standing between the Social
Patriots and the Bolsheviks. In his _Notes_ Sukhanov is still living in
the atmosphere of those unrealised hopes under the form of political
recollections and _ex post facto_ guesses.

Peculiarities of personality, temperament, style, he tries to interpret
as a political line.

In connection with the abandoned Bolshevik manifestation of June 10, and
more especially the armed demonstration of the July days, Sukhanov tries
throughout many pages to demonstrate that Lenin was directly striving in
those days for a seizure of power by way of conspiracy and insurrection,
while Trotsky by contrast was striving for the real power of the soviets
in the person of the then dominant parties, that is, the Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks. There is not a shadow of foundation for
all this.

At the first congress of the soviets on June 4, Tseretelli during his
speech remarked in passing: “In Russia at the present moment there is
not one political party which would say, Give us the power in our
hands.” At that moment a voice was heard from the benches:

“There is!” Lenin did not like to interrupt orators, and did not like to
be interrupted. Only serious considerations could have impelled him to
abandon on that occasion his customary restraint. According to
Tseretelli’s logic, when the nation gets into a tangle of enormous
difficulty, the first thing to do is to try to slip the power to others.
In this lay the cleverness of the Russian Compromisers who after the
February uprising slipped the power to the liberals. To a not very
attractive fear of responsibility, Tseretelli was giving the colour of
political disinterestedness and extraordinary far-sightedness. To a
revolutionist who believes in the mission of his party such cowardly
swanking is absolutely intolerable. A revolutionary party which is
capable in difficult conditions of turning away from the power, deserves
only contempt.

In a speech at that same session Lenin explained his reply from the
benches: “The Citizen Minister of Posts and Telegraph (Tseretelli) said
that there is no political party in Russia which would express its
readiness to take upon itself the whole power. I answer there is. No
party can decline to do that, and our party does not decline. It is
ready at any minute to take the whole power. (Applause and laughter.)
You may laugh all you want to, but if the Citizen Minister puts this
question to us he will get the proper answer.” It would seem as though
Lenin’s thought is transparent through and through.

At the same congress of the soviets, speaking after the Minister of
Agriculture, Peshekhonov, I expressed myself as follows: “I do not
belong to the same party with him (Peshekhonov) but if they told me that
a ministry was to be formed out of twelve Peshekhonovs, I should say
that this was an immense step forward.”

I do not think that at that time, amid those events, my words about a
ministry of Peshekhonovs could be understood as an antithesis to Lenin’s
readiness to take power: Sukhanov appears as an _ex post facto_
theoretican of this pretended antithesis. Interpreting the Bolshevik
preparation of the demonstration of June 10 in favour of the power of
the soviets as a preparation for the seizure of power, Sukhanov writes:
“Lenin two or three days before the manifestation publicly stated that
he was ready to take the power in his hands. But Trotsky said at the
same time that he would like to see twelve Peshekhonovs is power. That
is the difference. But nevertheless I assume that Trotsky was drawn into
the affair of June 10 ... Lenin was not then inclined to enter a
decisive engagement without the dubious ‘Mezhdurayonets’. For Trotsky
was to him a kind of monumental partner in a monumental game, and in his
own party after Lenin himself there was nothing – for a long, long, long
distance.”

This whole passage is full of contradictions. According to Sukhanov,
Lenin would seem to have been really intending what Tseretelti accused
him of: “An immediate seizure of power by the proletarian minority.” A
proof of such Blanquism Sukhanov sees, if you can believe it, in those
words of Lenin about the readiness of the Bolsheviks to take the power
in spite of all difficulties. But if Lenin had really intended on June
10 to seize the power by way of a conspiracy, he would hardly have
forewarned his enemies of this at a plenary session of the soviets on
June 4. It should hardly be necessary to recall that from the first day
of his arrival in Petrograd, Lenin had been telling the party that the
Bolsheviks could assume the task of overthrowing the Provisional
Government only after winning a majority in the soviets. In the April
days Lenin decisively opposed those Bolsheviks who advanced the slogan
“Down with the Provisional Government” as the task of the day. Lenin’s
reply of June 4 had only one meaning: We, the Bolsheviks, are ready to
take the power even today if the workers and soldiers give us their
confidence: in this we are distinguished from the Compromisers who,
possessing the confidence of the workers and soldiers, dare not take the
power.

Sukhanov contrasts Trotsky with Lenin as a realist with a Blanquist.
“Without accepting Lenin, one could fully agree to Trotsky’s
presentation of the question.” At the same time Sukhanov announces that:
“Trotsky was drawn into the affair of June 10” – that is, to the
conspiracy for the seizure of power. Having discovered two lines where
there were not two, Sukhanov cannot deny himself the pleasure of
afterward uniting these two lines in one in order to be able to convict
me of adventurism. This is a unique and somewhat platonic revenge for
the disappointed hope of the left intelligentsia for a split between
Lenin and Trotsky.

On the placards which had been prepared by the Bolsheviks for the
cancelled demonstration of June 10, and which were afterwards carried by
the demonstrators of June 18, a central place was occupied by the slogan
“Down with the Ten Minister-Capitalists.” Sukhanov, in the quality of
aesthete, admires the simple expressiveness of this slogan, but in his
quality of statesman he reveals an incomprehension of its meaning. In
the government besides the “ten Minister-Capitalists” there were also
six Minister-Compromisers. The Bolshevik placards had nothing to say of
them. On the contrary, according to the sense of the slogan, the
Minister-Capitalists were to be replaced by Minister-Socialists,
representatives of the Soviet majority. It was exactly this sense of the
Bolshevik placards that I expressed before the Soviet Congress: Break
your bloc with the liberals, remove the bourgeois ministers and replace
them with your Peshekhonovs. In proposing to the Soviet majority to take
the power, the Bolsheviks did not, of course, bind themselves in the
least as to their attitude to these Peshekhonovs; on the contrary, they
made no secret of the fact that within the frame of the Soviet democracy
they would wage an implacable struggle – for a majority in the soviets
and for the power.

But all this is after all mere A-B-C. Only the above-mentioned traits of
Sukhanov – not so much as a person but as a type – can explain how this
participant and observer of events could get so hopelessly mixed up upon
so serious and at the same time so simple a question.

In the light of this analysis of a political episode it is easy to
understand the false light which Sukhanov throws upon my meeting which
interests you with the editors of _Novy Zhizn._ The moral of my
encounter with the circle of Maxim Gorky is expressed by Sukhanov in the
concluding phrase which he puts in my mouth:

"Now I see that nothing remains for me but to found a paper together
with Lenin.” The inference is that only my inability to reach an
agreement with Gorky and Sukhanov – that is, with people whom I never
regarded as either men of politics or revolutionists – compelled me to
find my way to Lenin. It is only necessary to formulate this idea in
order to demonstrate its absurdity.

Incidentally, how characteristic of Sukhanov is the phrase, “found a
paper together with Lenin” – as though the tasks of a revolutionary
policy reduced themselves to the founding of a newspaper. For anybody
with a minimum of creative imagination, it ought to be clear that I
could not so think or so define my tasks.

In order to explain my visit to the newspaper circle of Gorky, it is
necessary to remember that I arrived in Petrograd at the beginning of
May, something over two months after the revolution, a month after the
arrival of Lenin. During this time many things had adjusted and defined
themselves. I had to have a direct, and so to say empirical orientation,
not only in the fundamental forces of the revolution, in the moods of
the workers and soldiers, but also in all the groupings and political
shades of “educated” society. The visit to the editors of _Novy Zhizn_
was for me a small political reconnoitre executed with a view to finding
out the forces of attraction and repulsion possessed by this “left”
group, the chances of splitting off certain elements, etc. A short
conversation convinced me of the complete hopelessness of this circle of
literary wiseacres, for whom revolution reduced itself to the problem of
the leading editorial. And, besides that, since they were accusing the
Bolsheviks of self-isolation, laying the blame for this upon Lenin and
his April Theses, I undoubtedly must have told them that with all their
speeches they had only once more demonstrated to me that Lenin was
completely right in isolating the party from them, or rather isolating
them from the party. This conclusion, which I had to emphasise with
special energy for the sake of its effect upon Riazanov and Lunacharsky,
who participated in the conversation, and who were opposed to a union
with Lenin, evidently supplied the occasion for Sukhanov’s version.

* * *

It goes without saying that you are completely right in assuming that I
would in no case have agreed in the autumn of 1917 to speak about a
Gorky jubilee from the tribune of the Petrograd Soviet. Sukhanov did
well that time at least in renouncing one of his fantastic ideas: to
induce me on the eve of the October insurrection to take part in a
celebration of Gorky, who stood on the other side of the barricades.

 



THE HISTORY OF THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION


[Red Flag]



VOLUME TWO: THE ATTEMPTED COUNTER-REVOLUTION



INTRODUCTION TO VOLUMES TWO AND THREE


 

Russia was so late in accomplishing her bourgeois revolution that she
found herself compelled to turn it into a proletarian revolution. Or in
other words: Russia was so far behind the other countries that she was
compelled, at least in certain spheres, to out-strip them. That seems
inconsistent, but history is full of such paradoxes. Capitalist England
was so far in advance of other countries, that she had to trail behind
them. Pedants think that the dialectic is an idle play of the mind. In
reality it only reproduces the process of evolution, which lives and
moves by way of contradictions.

The first volume of this work should have explained why that
historically belated democratic régime which replaced tzarism proved
wholly unviable. The present volumes are devoted to the coming to power
of the Bolsheviks. Here too the fundamental thing is the narrative. In
the facts themselves the reader ought to find sufficient support for the
inferences.

By this the author does not mean to say that he has avoided sociological
generalizations. History would have no value if it taught us nothing.
The mighty design of the Russian revolution, the consecutiveness of its
stages, the inexorable pressure of the masses, the finishedness of
political groupings, the succinctness of slogans, all this wonderfully
promotes the understanding of revolution in general, and therewith of
human society. For we may consider it proven by the whole course of
history that society, torn as it is by inner contradictions,
conclusively reveals in a revolution not only its anatomy, but also its
“soul.”

In a more immediate manner the present work should promote an
understanding of the character of the Soviet Union. The timeliness of
our theme lies not only in that the October revolution took place before
the eyes of a generation still living – although that of course has no
small significance – but in the fact that the régime which issued from
the revolution still lives and develops, and is confronting humanity
with ever new riddles. Throughout the whole world the question of the
soviet country is never lost sight of for a moment. However, it is
impossible to understand any existent thing without a preliminary
examination of its origin. For large-scale political appraisals an
historic perspective is essential.

The eight months of the revolution, February to October 1917, have
required three volumes. The critics, as a general rule, have not accused
us of prolixity. The scale of the work is explained rather by our
approach to the material. You can present a photograph of a hand on one
page, but it requires a volume to present the results of a microscopic
investigation of its tissues. The author has no illusion as to the
fullness or finishedness of his investigation. But nevertheless in many
cases he was obliged to employ methods closer to the microscope than the
camera.

At times, when it seemed to us that we were abusing the patience of the
reader, we generously crossed out the testimony of some witness, the
confession of a participant or some secondary episode, but we afterward
not infrequently restored much that had been crossed out. In this
struggle for details we were guided by a desire to reveal as concretely
as possible the very process of the revolution. In particular it was
impossible not to try to make the most of the opportunity to paint
history from the life.

Thousands and thousands of books are thrown on the market every year
presenting some new variant of the personal romance, some tale of the
vacillations of the melancholic or the career of the ambitious. The
heroine of Proust requires several finely-wrought pages in order to feel
that she does not feel anything. It would seem that one might, at least
with equal justice, demand attention to a series of collective historic
dramas which lifted hundreds of millions of human beings out of
non-existence, transforming the character of nations and intruding
forever into the life of all mankind.

The accuracy of our references and quotations in the first volume no one
has so far called in question: that would indeed be difficult. Our
opponents confine themselves for the most part to reflections upon the
topic of how personal prejudice may reveal itself in an artificial and
one-sided selection of facts and texts. These observations, although
irrefutable in themselves, say nothing about the given work, and still
less about its scientific methods. Moreover we take the liberty to
insist firmly that the coefficient of subjectivism is defined, limited,
and tested not so much by the temperament of the historian, as by the
nature of his method.

The purely psychological school, which looks upon the tissue of events
as an interweaving of the free activities of separate individuals or
their groupings, offers, even with the best intentions on the part of
the investigator, a colossal scope to caprice. The materialist method
disciplines the historian, compelling him to take his departure from the
weighty facts of the social structure. For us the fundamental forces of
the historic process are classes; political parties rest upon them;
ideas and slogans emerge as the small change of objective interests. The
whole course of the investigation proceeds from the objective to the
subjective, from the social to the individual, from the fundamental to
the incidental. This sets a rigid limit to the personal whims of the
author.

When a mining engineer finds magnetic ore in an uninvestigated region by
drilling, it is always possible to assume that this was a happy
accident: the construction of a mine is hardly to be recommended. But
when the same engineer, on the basis, let us say, of the deviation of a
magnetic needle, comes to the conclusion that a vein of ore lies
concealed in the earth, and subsequently actually strikes ore at various
different points in the region, then the most cavilling skeptic will not
venture to talk about accidents. What convinces is the system which
unites the general with the particular.

The proof of scientific objectivism is not to be sought in the eyes of
the historian or the tones of his voice, but in the inner logic of the
narrative itself. If episodes, testimonies, figures, quotations, fall in
with the general pointing of the needle of his social analysis, then the
reader has a most weighty guarantee of the scientific solidity of his
conclusions. To be more concrete: the present author has been true to
objectivism in the degree that his book actually reveals the
inevitability of the October revolution and the causes of its victory.

The reader already knows that in a revolution we look first of all for
the direct interference of the masses in the destinies of society. We
seek to uncover behind the events changes in the collective
consciousness. We reject wholesale references to the spontaneity” of the
movement, references which in most cases explain nothing and teach
nobody. Revolutions take place according to certain laws. This does not
mean that the masses in action are aware of the laws of revolution, but
it does mean that the changes in mass consciousness are not accidental,
but are subject to an objective necessity which is capable of theoretic
explanation, and thus makes both prophecy and leadership possible.

Certain official soviet historians, surprising as it may seem, have
attempted to criticize our conception as idealistic. Professor
Pokrovsky, for example, has insisted that we underestimate the objective
factors of the revolution. “Between February and October there occurred
a colossal economic collapse.” “During this time the peasantry ... rose
against the Provisional Government.” It is in these “objective shifts,”
says Pokrovsky, and not in fickle psychic processes, that one should see
the motive force of the revolution. Thanks to a praiseworthy
incisiveness of formulation, Pokrovsky exposes to perfection the
worthlessness of that vulgarly economic interpretation of history which
is frequently given out for Marxism.

The radical turns which take place in the course of a revolution are as
a matter-of-fact evoked, not by those episodic economic disturbances
which arise during the events themselves, but by fundamental changes
which have accumulated in the very foundations of society throughout the
whole preceding epoch. The fact that on the eve of the overthrow of the
monarchy, as also between February and October, the economic collapse
was steadily deepening, nourishing and whipping up the discontent of the
masses – that fact is indubitable and has never lacked our attention.
But it would be the crudest mistake to assume that the second revolution
was accomplished eight months after the first owing to the fact that the
bread ration was lowered during that period from one-and-a-half to
three-quarters of a pound. In the years immediately following the
October revolution the food situation of the masses continued steadily
to grow worse. Nevertheless the hopes of the counter-revolutionary
politicians for a new overturn were defeated every time. This
circumstance can seem puzzling only to one who looks upon the
insurrection of the masses as a “spontaneous” – that is, as a herd –
mutiny artificially made use of by leaders. In reality the mere
existence of privations is not enough to cause an insurrection; if it
were, the masses would be always in revolt. It is necessary that the
bankruptcy of the social régime, being conclusively revealed, should
make these privations intolerable, and that new conditions and new ideas
should open the prospect of a revolutionary way out. Then in the cause
of the great aims conceived by them, those same masses will prove
capable of enduring doubled and tripled privations.

The reference to the revolt of the peasantry as a second “objective
factor” shows a still more obvious misunderstanding. For the proletariat
the peasant war was of course an objective circumstance – insofar as the
activity of one class does in general become an external stimulus to the
consciousness of another. But the direct cause of the peasant revolt
itself lay in changes in the consciousness of the villages; a discovery
of the character of these changes makes the content of one chapter of
this book. Let us not forget that revolutions are accomplished through
people, although they be nameless. Materialism does not ignore the
feeling, thinking and acting man, but explains him. What else is the
task of the historian?[1]

Certain critics from the democratic camp, inclined to operate with the
help of indirect evidence, have looked upon the “ironic” attitude of the
author to the compromise leaders as the expression of an undue
subjectivism vitiating the scientific character of his exposition. We
venture to regard this criterion as unconvincing. Spinoza’s principle,
“not to weep or laugh, but to understand” gives warning against
inappropriate laughter and untimely tears. It does not deprive a man,
even though he be a historian, of the right to his share of tears and
laughter when justified by a correct understanding of the material
itself. That purely individualistic irony which spreads out like a smoke
of indifference over the whole effort and intention of mankind, is the
worst form of snobbism. It rings false alike in artistic creations and
works of history. But there is an irony deep laid in the very relations
of life. It is the duty of the historian as of the artist to bring it to
the surface.

A failure of correspondence between subjective and objective is,
generally speaking, the fountain-source of the comic, as also the
tragic, in both life and art. The sphere of politics less than any other
is exempted from the action of this law. People and parties are heroic
or comic not in themselves but in their relation to circumstances. When
the French revolution entered its decisive stage the most eminent of
Girondists became pitiful and ludicrous beside the rank-and-file
Jacobin. Jean-Marie Rolland, a respected figure as factory inspector of
Lyons, looks like a living caricature against the background of 1792.
The Jacobins, on the contrary, measure up to the events. They may evoke
hostility, hatred, horror – but not irony.

The heroine of Dickens who tried to hold back the tide with a broom is
an acknowledged comic image because of the fatal lack of correspondence
between means and end. If we assert that this person symbolizes the
policies of the compromise parties in the revolution, it may seem an
extravagant exaggeration. And yet Tseretelli, the actual inspirator of
the dual-power régime, confessed to Nabokov, one of the liberal leaders,
after the October revolution: “Everything we did at that time was a vain
effort to hold back a destructive elemental flood with a handful of
insignificant chips.” Those words sound like spiteful satire, but they
are the truest words spoken by the Compromisers about themselves. To
renounce irony in depicting “revolutionists” who tried to hold back a
revolution with chips, would be to plunder reality and betray
objectivism for the benefit of pedants.

Peter Struve, a monarchist from among the former Marxists, wrote as an
émigré: “Only Bolshevism was logical about revolution and true to its
essence, and therefore in the revolution it conquered.” Miliukov, the
leader of liberalism, made approximately the same statement: “They knew
where they were going, and they went in the direction which they had
chosen once for all, toward a goal which came nearer and nearer with
every new, unsuccessful experiment of compromisism.” And finally, one of
the white émigrés not so well known, trying in his own way to understand
the revolution, has expressed himself thus: “Only iron people could take
this road ... only people who were revolutionists by their very
‘profession’ and had no fear of calling into life the all-devouring
spirit of riot and revolt.” You may say of the Bolsheviks with still
more justice what was said above about the Jacobins. They were adequate
to the epoch and its tasks; curses in plenty resounded in their
direction, but irony would not stick to them – it had nothing to catch
hold of.

In the introduction to the first volume it was explained why the author
deemed it suitable to speak of himself as a participant of the events in
the third person, and not the first. This literary form, preserved also
in the second and third volumes, does not in itself of course offer a
defense against subjectivism, but at least it does not make subjectivism
necessary. Indeed it reminds one of the obligation to avoid it.

On many occasions we hesitated long whether to quote this or that remark
of a contemporary, characterizing the rôle of the author in the flow of
events. It would have been easy to renounce any such quotation, were
nothing greater involved than the rules of correct tone in polite
society. The author of this book was president of the Petrograd Soviet
after the Bolsheviks won a majority there, and he was afterward
president of the Military Revolutionary Committee which organized the
October uprising. These facts he neither wishes nor is able to erase
from history. The faction now ruling in the Soviet Union has of late
years dedicated many articles, and no few books, to the author of this
work, setting themselves the task of proving that his activity was
steadily directed against the interests of the revolution. The question
why the Bolshevik party placed so stubborn an “enemy” during the most
critical years in the most responsible posts remains unanswered. To pass
these retrospective quarrels in complete silence would be to renounce to
some extent the task of establishing the actual course of events. And to
what end? A pretense of disinterestedness is needful only to him whose
aim is slyly to convey to his readers conclusions which do not flow from
the facts. We prefer to call things by their whole name as it is found
in the dictionary.

We will not conceal the fact that for us the question here is not only
about the past. Just as the enemy in attacking a man’s prestige are
striking at his program, so his own struggle for a definite program
obliges a man to restore his actual position in the events. As for those
who are incapable of seeing anything but personal vanity in a man’s
struggle for great causes and for his place under the banner, we may be
sorry for them but we will not undertake to convince them. In any case
we have taken measures to see to it that “personal” questions should not
occupy a greater place in this book than that to which they can justly
lay claim.

Certain of the friends of the Soviet Union – a phrase which often means
friends of the present Soviet powers and that only so long as they
remain powers – have reproached the author for his critical attitude to
the Bolshevik party or its individual leaders. Nobody, however, has made
the attempt to refute or correct the picture given of the condition of
the party during the events. For the information of these “friends” who
consider themselves called to defend against us the rôle of the
Bolsheviks in the October revolution, we give warning that our book
teaches not how to love a victorious revolution after the event in the
person of the bureaucracy it has brought forward, but only how a
revolution is prepared, how it develops, and how it conquers. A party is
not for us a machine whose sinlessness is to be defended by state
measures of repression, but a complicated organism which like all living
things develops in contradictions. The uncovering of these
contradictions – among them the waverings and mistakes of the general
staff – does not in our view weaken in the slightest degree the
significance of that gigantic historic task which the Bolshevik party
was the first in history to take upon its shoulders.

L. TROTSKY
Prinkipo
May 13, 1932.

P.S. The critics have already paid their tribute to Max Eastman’s
translation. He has brought to his work not only a creative gift of
style, but also the carefulness of a friend. I subscribe with warm
gratitude to the unanimous voice of the critics.

L.T.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. News of the death of M.N. Pokrovsky, with whom we have had to do
battle more than once in the course of these two volumes, arrived after
our work was finished. Having come over to Marxism from the liberal camp
when already a finished scholar, Pokrovsky enriched the most recent
historic literature with precious works and beginnings. But nonetheless
he never fully mastered the method of dialectic materialism. It is a
matter of simple justice to add that Pokrovsky was a man not only of
high gifts and exceptional erudition, but also of deep loyalty to the
cause which he served.



CHAPTER 24 THE JULY DAYS: PREPARATION AND BEGINNING


 

In 1915, the war cost Russia 10 billion roubles; in 1916, 19 billion;
during the first half of 1917, 10½ billion; by the beginning of 1918,
the national debt would have amounted to 60 billion – would have almost
equaled, that is, the entire wealth of the country, estimated at 70
billion. The Central Executive Committee was preparing an appeal for a
war loan, under the sugary name of “Liberty Loan,” while the government
was arriving at the not very complicated conclusion that without an
immense new foreign loan, it not only could not pay for its foreign
orders, but could not even handle its domestic obligations. The
liability side of the trade balance was continually on the rise. The
Entente was evidently getting ready to leave the ruble wholly to its
fate. On the very day when the appeal for a Liberty Loan filled the
first page of the Soviet _Izvestia_, the government _Vyestnik_ announced
a sharp drop in the value of the ruble. The printing presses could no
longer keep up with the tempo of inflation. For the old respectable bank
notes, about which there still clung a glamour of their former buying
power, they were getting ready to substitute those red bottle-labels
which came to be known as “kerenkies.” Both the bourgeois and the
worker, each in his own way, embodied in that name a slight note of
disgust.

In words the government had adopted a program of state regulation of
industry, and had even established towards the end of June some
lumbering institutions for this purpose. But the word and deed of the
February régime, like the spirit and flesh of the pious Christian, were
in a continual state of conflict. These appropriately hand-picked
regulative institutions were more concerned to protect the capitalist
from the caprices of a shaky and tottering state power, than to curb the
interests of private persons. The administrative and technical personnel
of industry was becoming stratified; the upper layers, frightened by the
leveling tendencies of the workers, were going over decisively to the
side of the capitalist. The workers had acquired an attitude of disgust
toward the war orders by which the disintegrating factories had been
guaranteed for a year or two in advance. But the capitalists also were
losing their taste for a production which promised more trouble than
profits. The deliberate closing-down of the factories from above was now
becoming systematic. Metal production was cut down 40 per cent; the
textile industry, 20 per cent. The supply of all the necessities of life
was inadequate. Prices were rising at a pace with inflation and the
decline of industry. The workers were aspiring towards a control of that
administrative-commercial mechanism which in concealment from them
decides their destinies. The Minister of Labor, Skobelev, was preaching
to the workers in wordy manifestos the inadvisability of their
interference in the administration of the factories. On June 24,
_Izvestia_ told about a new proposal for the closing of a series of
plants. Similar news was arriving from the provinces. Railroad transport
was stricken even more heavily than industry. Half of the locomotives
were in need of capital repairs; the greater part of the rolling stock
was at the front; fuel was lacking. The Ministry of Communications was
in a continual state of struggle with the railroad workers and clerks.
The supply of foodstuffs was steadily on the decrease. In Petrograd, the
flour reserve was adequate for ten or fifteen days; in other centers,
for little longer. With the semi-paralysis of rolling stock and the
impending threat of a railroad strike, this meant a continual danger of
famine. The future contained no glimmer of hope. This was not what the
workers had expected from the revolution.

Things were still worse, if that is possible, in the sphere of politics.
Indecisiveness is the worst possible condition in the life of
governments, nations, classes – as also of individuals. A revolution is
the most ruthless of all methods of solving historic problems. To
introduce evasiveness into a revolution is the most destructive policy
imaginable. The party of revolution dare not waver – no more than a
surgeon dare who has plunged a knife into a sick body. However, that
double régime – or régime of duplicity – which issued from the February
overturn was indecisiveness organized. Everything was going against the
government. Its qualified friends were becoming opponents; its
opponents, enemies; its enemies were taking arms. The counterrevolution
was mobilizing quite in the open – inspired by the central committee of
the Kadet party, the political staff of all those who had something to
lose. The Head Committee of the League of Officers at General
Headquarters in Moghiliev, representing about a hundred thousand
discontented commanders, and the Council of the Union of Cossack troops
in Petrograd, were the two military levers of the counter-revolution.
The State Duma, in spite of the decision of the June congress of the
soviets, had resolved to continue its “private conferences.” Its
Provisional Committee supplied a legal covering for the
counter-revolutionary work, which was broadly financed by the banks and
by the embassies of the Entente. The Compromisers were threatened with
dangers both right and left. Glancing uneasily in these two directions,
the government secretly resolved to make a disbursement for the
organization of a public intelligence service – that is, a secret
political police. At about this same time, in the middle of June, the
government designated September 17 as the date for elections to the
Constituent Assembly. The liberal press, in spite of the participation
of Kadets in the ministry, waged a stubborn campaign against this
officially designated date – in which nobody believed and which nobody
seriously defended. The very image of the Constituent Assembly, so
bright in the first days of March, had dissolved and grown dim.
Everything was going against the government, even its own thin-blooded
good intentions. Only on the 30th of June did it muster the courage to
dismiss those aristocratic guardians over the villages, the zemsky
nachalniks[1], whose very name had been hateful to the whole country
ever since the day of their establishment by Alexander III. And this
enforced and belated partial reform only stamped the Provisional
Government with a brand of contemptible cowardice. The nobility were by
this time recovering from their fright. The landed proprietors were
uniting and bringing pressure to bear. Toward the end of June, the
Provisional Committee of the Duma addressed to the government a demand
that decisive measures be taken to protect the landlords from peasants
incited by the “criminal element.” On the first of July there met in
Moscow an All-Russian Congress of Landed Proprietors, containing an
overwhelming majority of nobles. The government wriggled and tried to
hypnotize with words, now the muzhiks, now the landlords.

Worst of all, however, was the situation at the front. The offensive
against the enemy, which had also become Kerensky’s decisive play in a
domestic struggle, was dying in convulsions. The soldiers did not want
to fight. The diplomats of Prince Lvov were afraid to look the diplomats
of the Entente in the eyes. They needed a loan to the point of
desperation. In order to make a show of firmness, the condemned and
impotent government waged an offensive against Finland, carrying it
through, as it did all of its very dirtiest work, by the hands of the
socialists. At the same time a conflict had arisen with the Ukraine and
was moving towards an open break.

Those days were far away when Albert Thomas sang hymns to the luminous
revolution and to Kerensky. At the beginning of July the French
ambassador, Paléologue, who smelled too strongly of the aromas of the
Rasputin salons, was replaced by the “radical” Noulens. The journalist,
Claude Anet, gave the new ambassador an introductory lecture on
Petrograd. Opposite the French embassy – he told him – across the Neva,
spreads the Vyborg district. “This is a district of big factories which
belongs wholly to the Bolsheviks. Lenin and Trotsky reign there as
masters.” In that same district are located the barracks of the Machine
Gun regiment, numbering about 10,000 men and over 1,000 machine guns.
Neither the Social Revolutionaries nor the Mensheviks have access to the
barracks of that regiment. The remaining regiments are either Bolshevik
or neutral. “If Lenin and Trotsky want to take Petrograd, what will stop
them?” Noulens listened with astonishment. “How can the government
tolerate such a situation?” “But what can it do?” answered the
journalist. “You must understand that the government has no power but a
moral one, and even that seems to me very weak ...”

Finding no channel, the aroused energy of the masses spent itself in
self-dependent activities, guerrilla manifestations, sporadic seizures.
The workers, soldiers and peasants were trying to solve in a partial way
those problems which the power created by them had refused to solve.
More than anything else, indecisiveness in their leaders exhausts the
nerves of the masses. Fruitless waiting impels them to more and more
insistent knockings at that door which will not open to them, or to
actual outbreaks of despair. Already in the days of the congress of
soviets, when the provincials could hardly withhold the hands of their
leaders stretched out against Petrograd, the workers and soldiers had
plenty of opportunity to find out what was the feeling and attitude
toward them of the soviet leaders. Tseretelli, following Kerensky, had
become not only an alien, but a hated figure to the majority of the
Petrograd workers and soldiers. On the fringes of the revolution there
was a growing influence of the anarchists, whose chief rôle so far had
been played in the self-constituted revolutionary committee in the
summer home of Durnovo. But even the more disciplined layers of the
workers – even broad circles of the party – were beginning to lose
patience or at least listen to those who had lost it. The manifestation
of June 18 had revealed to everybody that the government was without
support. “Why don’t they get busy up there?” the soldiers and workers
would ask, having in mind not only the compromise leaders but also the
governing bodies of the Bolsheviks.

Under inflation prices the struggle for wages was exciting the workers
and getting on their nerves. During June this question became especially
sharp in the giant Putilov factory, where 36,000 men worked. On June 21
a strike of skilled workers broke out in certain parts of the factory.
The fruitlessness of these scattered outbreaks was only too clear to the
party. On the next day a meeting of representatives of the principal
workers’ organizations, led by the Bolsheviks, and of 70 factories,
announced that “the cause of the Putilov workers is the cause of the
whole Petrograd proletariat,” but appealed to the Putilov men to
“restrain their legitimate indignation.” The strike was postponed. But
the following 12 days brought no change. The factory masses were
seething, seeking an outlet. Every plant had its conflict, and all these
conflicts tended upward toward the government. A report of the trade
union of the Locomotive Brigade to the Minister of Communications reads:
“For the last time we announce: patience has its limit; we simply cannot
live in such conditions ...” That was a complaint not only against want
and hunger, but against duplicity, characterlessness, false dealing. The
report protests with especial rage against the “endless exhorting of us
to the duties of a citizen and to self-restraint in starvation.”

The March transfer of power by the Executive Committee to the
Provisional Government had been made on the condition that the
revolutionary troops should not be removed from the capital. But those
days were far in the past. Thc garrison had moved to the left, the
ruling soviet circles to the right. The struggle with the garrison had
never disappeared from the order of the day. Although no whole units
were transferred from the capital, nevertheless the more revolutionary –
under the pretext of strategic necessities – were systematically
weakened by a pumping-out of replacement companies. Rumors from the
front of the disbandment of more and more units for disobedience, for
refusal to carry out military orders, were continually arriving at the
capital. Two Siberian divisions – and were not the Siberian
sharpshooters long considered the finest? – had to be disbanded by
military force. In a case of mass disobedience in the Fifth Army only –
that nearest the capital – 87 officers and 12,725 soldiers were
arraigned. The Petrograd garrison – accumulator of discontent from the
front, the village, the workers’ districts, and the barracks – was in a
continual ferment. Bearded men in their forties were demanding with
hysterical insistence that they be sent home for work in the fields. The
regiments distributed through the Vyborg district – the 1st Machine Gun,
the 1st Grenadier, the Moscow, the 180th Infantry, and others – were
continually washed by the hot springs of the proletarian suburb.
Thousands of workers were passing the barracks, among them no small
number of the tireless agitators of Bolshevism. Under those dirty and
dilapidated walls impromptu meetings were being held almost
continuously. On the 22nd of June, before the patriotic manifestations
called out by the offensive had died out, an automobile of the Executive
Committee incautiously drove through the Sampsonevsky Prospect, carrying
the placard: “Forward for Kerensky!” The Moscow regiment stopped the
agitators, tore up the placard, and turned over the patriotic automobile
to the Machine Gun regiment.

In general the soldiers were more impatient than the workers – both
because they were directly threatened with a transfer to the front, and
because it was much harder for them to understand considerations of
political strategy. Moreover, each one had his rifle; and ever since
February the soldier had been inclined to overestimate the independent
power of a rifle. An old worker-Bolshevik, Lizdin, told later how the
soldiers of the 180th Reserve regiment said to him: “What are they doing
there, fast asleep in Kshesinskaia’s Palace? Come on, let’s kick out
Kerensky!” At meetings of the regiments, resolutions would be adopted
continually, proclaiming the necessity of taking final action against
the government. Delegations from individual factories would come to a
regiment with the query: Will the soldiers go into the streets? The
machine-gunners sent representatives to the other units of the garrison
with an appeal to rise against the prolongation of the war. The more
impatient of these delegates added: The Pavlov and Moscow regiments and
forty thousand Putilov men are coming out “tomorrow.” Official
admonitions from the Executive Committee had no effect. The danger was
growing every minute that Petrograd, lacking the support of the front
and the provinces, would be broken down bit by bit. On the 21st of June,
Lenin appealed in _Pravda_ to the Petrograd workers and soldiers to wait
until events should bring over the heavy reserves to the side of
Petrograd. “We understand your bitterness, we understand the excitement
of the Petersburg workers, but we say to them: Comrades, an immediate
attack would be inexpedient.” On the next day a private conference of
leading Bolsheviks – standing, apparently, “to the left” of Lenin – came
to the conclusion that in spite of the mood of the soldier and worker
masses, they must not give battle: “Better wait until the ruling parties
have disgraced themselves completely with their offensive, and then the
game is ours.” Thus reports the district organizer, Latsis, one of the
most impatient in those days. The Central Committee was oftener and
oftener compelled to send agitators to the troops and the factories to
restrain them from untimely action. With an embarrassed shake of the
head, the Vyborg Bolsheviks would complain to their friends: “We have to
play the part of the fire hose.” Appeals to come into the street did not
cease, however, for a single day. Some of them were obviously
provocative in character. The Military Organization of the Bolsheviks
felt compelled to address the soldiers and workers with an appeal: “Do
not trust any summons to go into the street in the name of the Military
Organization. The Military Organization is not summoning you to action.”
And then, even more insistently: “Demand of any agitator or orator who
summons you to come out in the name of the Military Organization
credentials signed by the president and secretary.”

On the famous Yakorny Square in Kronstadt, where the anarchists were
more and more confidently lifting their voices, one ultimatum was drawn
up after another. On the 23rd of June, delegates from Yakorny Square,
acting over the head of the Kronstadt soviet, demanded from the Ministry
of Justice the liberation of a group of Petrograd anarchists,
threatening, in case their demand was not granted, that the sailors
would march on the prison. Upon the following day, representatives from
Oranienbaum informed the Ministry of Justice that their garrison was as
much disturbed about the arrests in the summer home of Durnovo as
Kronstadt, and that they were “already cleaning the machine guns.” The
bourgeois press caught these threats on the wing, and shook them under
the very noses of their compromisist allies. On June 26, delegates from
the Grenadier Guard regiment came from the front to their reserve
battalion with the announcement: “The regiment is against the
Provisional Government and demands the transfer of power to the soviets,
it declines the offensive begun by Kerensky, and expresses an
apprehension lest the Executive Committee has gone over along with the
minister-socialists to the side of the Bourjui.” The organ of the
Executive Committee published a reproachful account of this visit.

Not only Kronstadt was boiling like a kettle, but also the whole Baltic
fleet with its principal base in Helsingfors. The head boss of the
Bolsheviks in the fleet was undoubtedly Antonov-Ovseenko, who years ago
as a young officer had taken part in the Sebastopol insurrection of
1905. A Menshevik during the reaction years, an
emigrant-internationalist during the war, a colleague of Trotsky on
_Nashe Slovo_, in Paris, he joined the Bolsheviks after his return from
abroad. Politically shaky, but personally courageous – impulsive and
disorderly, but capable of initiative and improvisation –
Antonov-Ovseenko, although still little known in those days, was to play
by no means the smallest rôle in the future events of the revolution.
“We in the Helsingfors committee of the Party,” he relates in his
memoirs, “understood the necessity of restraint and serious preparation.
We had directions to that effect, moreover, from the Central Committee.
But we saw the utter inevitability of an explosion, and were looking
with alarm towards Petersburg.” And in Petersburg the elements of an
explosion were piling up day by day. The 2nd Machine Gun regiment, which
was less advanced than the first, adopted a resolution demanding the
transfer of power to the Soviet. The 3rd Infantry regiment refused to
send out fourteen replacement companies. Meetings in the barracks were
acquiring a more and more stormy character. A meeting of the Grenadier
regiment on July 1st was signalized by the arrest of the president of
the committee, and by the obstructive heckling of the Menshevik orators:
Down with the offensive! Down with Kerensky! At the focus of the
garrison stood the machine gun men. It was they who opened the sluices
for the July flood.

We have already met with the name of the 1st Machine Gun regiment in the
events of the first month of the revolution. Arriving shortly after the
overturn, having marched from Oranienbaum to Petrograd upon its own
initiative “for the defense of the revolution,” this regiment
immediately ran into the opposition of the Executive Committee, which
adopted a resolution: to send the regiment back with thanks to
Oranienbaum. The machine-gunners flatly refused to leave the capital:
“Counter-revolutionists might attack the Soviet and restore the old
régime.” The Executive Committee surrendered, and several thousand
machine-gunners remained in Petrograd along with their machine guns.
They took up their quarters in the House of the People, and wondered
what their further destiny was to be. They had among them, however, a
good many Petrograd workers, and therefore by no accident the Bolshevik
Committee took upon itself the care of these machine-gunners. Through
its intercession they were assured provisions from Peter and Paul
fortress. A friendship began. It soon became indestructible. On the 21st
of June, the machine-gunners introduced at a mass meeting a resolution:
“In the future detachments shall be sent to the front only when the war
has a revolutionary character.” On the 2nd of July, the regiment called
a farewell meeting in the House of the People for the “last” replacement
company to depart for the front. The speakers were Lunacharsky and
Trotsky. The authorities tried subsequently to attribute unusual
significance to this accidental fact. Responses were made in the name of
the regiment by the soldier, Zhilin, and the old Bolshevik
non-commissioned officer, Lashevich. The mood was exalted. They
denounced Kerensky and swore fealty to the revolution – but nobody made
any practical proposal for the immediate future. However, during those
last days the city persisted in expecting something to happen. The “July
Days” were casting their shadow before them. “Everywhere,” Sukhanov
remembers, “in all corners, in the Soviet, in the Mariinsky Palace, in
people’s apartments, on the public squares and boulevards, in the
barracks, in the factories, they were talking about some sort of
manifestation to be expected, if not today, tomorrow ... Nobody knew
exactly who was going to manifest what, or where, but the city felt
itself to be upon the verge of some sort of explosion.” And the
explosion did actually come. The stimulus was given from above – from
the ruling circles.

On the same day when Trotsky and Lunacharsky were speaking to the
machine gun men about the bankruptcy of the coalition, four Kadet
ministers exploded the coalition by withdrawing from the government.
They chose as pretext an agreement which their compromisist colleagues
had concluded with the Ukraine, an agreement unacceptable to their
imperial ambitions. The real cause of this demonstrative break lay in
the fact that the Compromisers had been dilatory about bridling the
masses. The moment chosen was suggested by the collapse of the offensive
– not yet officially acknowledged, but no longer a matter of doubt to
the well-informed. These Liberals considered it expedient to leave their
left allies face to face with defeat, and with the Bolsheviks. The rumor
of the resignation of the Kadets immediately spread through the capital,
and generalized all the existing conflicts politically in one slogan –
or rather, one cry to heaven: “Let us have an end of this coalition
rigmarole!” The soldiers and workers considered that all other questions
– that of wages, of the price of bread, and of whether it is necessary
to die at the front for nobody knows what – depended upon the question
who was to rule the country in the future, the bourgeoisie or their own
Soviet. In these expectations there was a certain element of illusion –
in so far, at least, as the masses hoped with a change of power to
achieve an immediate solution of all sore problems. But in the last
analysis they were right: the question of power determined the direction
of the revolution as a whole, and that means that it decided the fate of
everyone in particular. To imagine that the Kadets may not have foreseen
the effect of this act of open sabotage of the Soviet would be decidedly
to underestimate Miliukov. The leader of liberalism was obviously trying
to drag the Compromisers into a difficult situation from which they
could make a way out only with bayonets. In those days Miliukov firmly
believed that the situation could be saved with a bold bloodletting.

On the morning of July 3, several thousand machine-gunners, after
breaking up a meeting of the company and regimental committees of their
regiment, elected a chairman of their own and demanded immediate
consideration of the question of an armed manifestation. The meeting was
a storm from the first moment. The problem of the front intercrossed
with the crisis in the government. The chairman of the meeting, a
Bolshevik, Golovin, tried to apply the brakes, proposing that they have
a preliminary talk with other units and with the Military Organization.
But every suggestion of delay set the soldiers on edge. There appeared
at this meeting the anarchist, Bleichman, a small but colorful figure on
the background of 1917, with a very modest equipment of ideas but a
certain feeling for the masses – sincere in his limited and ever
inflammable intelligence – his shirt open at the breast and curly hair
flying out on all sides. Bleichman was greeted at such meetings with a
certain amount of semi-ironical sympathy. The workers, it is true,
treated him somewhat coolly, a little impatiently – specially the
metalworkers. But the soldiers smiled delightedly at his speeches,
nudging each other with their elbows and egging the orator on with pithy
comments. They plainly liked his eccentric looks, his unreasoning
decisiveness, and his Jewish-American accent sharp as vinegar. By the
end of June, Bleichman was swimming in all these impromptu meetings like
a fish in a river. His opinion he had always with him: It is necessary
to come out with arms in our hands. Organization? “The street will
organize us.” The task? “To overthrow the Provisional Government just as
it overthrew the tzar although no party was then demanding it.” These
speeches perfectly met the feelings of the machine-gunners at that
moment – and not theirs alone. Many of the Bolsheviks did not conceal
their satisfaction when the lower ranks pressed forward against their
official admonition. The progressive workers remembered that in February
their leaders had been ready to beat a retreat just on the eve of the
victory; that in March the eight hour day had been won by action from
below; that in April Miliukov had been thrown out by regiments who went
into the street on their own initiative. A recollection of these facts
augmented the tense and impatient mood of the masses.

The Military Organization of the Bolsheviks, being promptly informed
that a meeting of the machine-gunners was at the boiling point, sent
over one agitator after another. Soon came Nevsky himself, the leader of
the Military Organization, a man respected by the soldiers. They seemed
to listen to him. But the mood of that endless meeting changed with its
ingredients. “It was an immense surprise to us,” relates Podvoisky,
another leader of the Military Organization, “when at seven o’clock in
the evening a horseman galloped up to inform us that ... the
machine-gunners had again resolved to come out.” In place of the old
regimental committee they had elected a provisional revolutionary
committee consisting of two men from each company under the presidency
of ensign Semashko. Specially appointed delegates were already making
the rounds of the shops and regiments with an appeal for support. The
machine-gunners had not forgotten, either, to send their men to
Kronstadt. In this way, one step below the official organizations, and
partly under their protection, new temporary relations were established
between the more restive regiments and the factories. The masses had no
intention of breaking with the Soviet; on the contrary, they wanted the
Soviet to seize the power. Still less did the masses intend to break
with the Bolshevik party. But they did feel that the party was
irresolute. They wanted to get their shoulder under it – shake a fist at
the Executive Committee, give the Bolsheviks a little shove. Thus
impromptu systems of representation were created, new knots were tied,
new centers of activity formed – not permanently, but for the given
situation. Changes in circumstance and mood were taking place so fast
and sharply, that even such extremely flexible organizations as the
soviets inevitably lagged behind, and the masses were compelled at every
new turn to create auxiliary organs for the demands of the moment. In
the course of these improvisations accidental and not always reliable
elements would often spring into prominence. The anarchists poured oil
on the fire. But so did some of the new and impatient Bolsheviks.
Provocateurs also undoubtedly mixed in – perhaps also German agents, but
surest of all the agents of the 100 per cent Russian secret police. How
can one analyze the complicated web of a mass movement into its separate
threads? The general character of the event emerges at least with
complete clarity. Petrograd was feeling its strength, was straining at
the leash, not glancing round at either the provinces or the front, and
even the Bolshevik party was no longer able to hold it back. Only
experience could teach them.

In calling the factories and regiments into the street, the delegates of
the machine-gunners did not forget to add that the manifestation was to
be armed. Yes, and how could it be otherwise? You wouldn’t present
yourself unarmed to the blows of an enemy? Moreover – and this perhaps
was the chief thing – we must show our force, and a soldier without
weapons is not a force. Upon this point all the regiments and all the
factories were of one mind: if we do go out, we must go with plenty of
lead. The machine-gunners lost no time: having started a big job, they
intended to push it through as fast as possible. The report of a Court
of Inquiry subsequently characterized the activities of ensign Semashko,
one of the principal leaders of the regiment in these words: “He
demanded automobiles from the factories, armed them with machine guns,
sent them to the Tauride Palace and other points, designating the route,
personally led out his regiment from the barracks into the town, rode
out to the reserve battalion of the Moscow regiment to persuade it to
come out, in which he was successful, promised the soldiers of the
Machine Gun regiment support from the regiments of the Military
Organization, kept in continual touch with this organization, quartered
in the house of Kshesinskaia, and with the leader of the Bolsheviks,
Lenin, dispatched sentries for the protection of the Military
Organization ...” The reference to Lenin here is inserted only to fill
out the picture. Lenin was not in Petrograd either on that day or the
days preceding. Since the 29th of June he had been ill in a bungalow in
Finland. But for the rest, the compressed language of the military court
official conveys not at all badly the feverish preparations of the
machine-gunners. In the yard of the barracks a no less feverish work was
going on. They were giving out rifles to the soldiers who did not
possess them, giving bombs to some, installing three machine guns with
operators on each motor truck supplied by the factories. The regiment
was to go into the street in full military array.

And just about the same thing was going on in the factories. Delegates
would arrive from the machine-gunners, or from a neighboring factory,
and summon the workers into the street. It would seem as though they had
been waiting for the delegates. Work would stop instantly. A worker of
the Renaud Factory tells this story: “After dinner a number of machine
gun men came running with the request that we give them some motor
trucks. In spite of the protest of our group (the Bolsheviks), we had to
give up the cars ... They promptly loaded the trucks with ‘Maxims’
(machine guns) and drove down the Nevsky. At this point we could no
longer restrain our workers ... They all, just as they were, in
overalls, rushed straight outdoors from the benches ...” The protests of
the factory Bolsheviks were not always, we may assume, very insistent.
The longest struggle took place at the Putilov Factory. At about two in
the afternoon a rumour went round that a delegation had come from the
machine gun unit, and was calling a meeting. About ten thousand men
assembled. To shouts of encouragement, the machine-gunners told how they
had received an order to go to the front on the 4th of July, but they
had decided “to go not to the German front, against the German
proletariat, but against their own capitalist ministers.” Feeling ran
high. “Come on, let’s get moving!” cried the workers. The secretary of
the factory committee, a Bolshevik, objected, suggesting that they ask
instructions from the party. Protests from all sides: “Down with it!
Again you want to postpone things. We can’t live that way any longer.
Towards six o’clock came representatives from the Executive Committee,
but they succeeded still less with the workers. The meeting continued,
the everlasting nervous obstinate meeting of innumerable masses seeking
a way out and unwilling to be told that there is none. It was proposed
that they send a delegation to the Executive Committee – still another
delay, but, as before, the meeting did not disperse. About this time a
group of workers and soldiers brought news that the Vyborg Side was
already on its way to the Tauride Palace. To hold them back longer was
impossible. They decided to go. A Putilov worker, Efimov, ran to the
district committee of the party to ask: “What shall we do?” The answer
he got was: “We will not join the manifestation, but we can’t leave the
workers to their fate. We must go along with them.” At that moment
appeared a member of the committee, Chudin, with the word that the
workers were going out in all the districts, and that it was up to the
party men to “maintain order.” In this way the Bolsheviks were caught up
by the movement and dragged into it, looking around the while for some
justification for an action which flatly contravened the official
decision of the party.

By seven o’clock the industrial life of the capital was at a complete
standstill. Factory after factory came out, lined up and armed its
detachment of the Red Guard. “Amid an innumerable mass of workers,”
relates the Vyborg Worker, Metelev, “hundreds of young Red Guards were
working away loading their rifles. Others were piling cartridges into
the cartridge-chambers, tightening up their belts, tying on their
knapsacks or cartridge boxes, adjusting their bayonets. And the workers
without arms were helping the Red Guards get ready ...” Sampsonevsky
Prospect, the chief artery of the Vyborg Side, was packed full of
people. To the right and left of it stood solid columns of workers. In
the middle of the Prospect marched the Machine Gun regiment, the spinal
column of the procession. At the head of each company went an automobile
truck with its Maxims. After the Machine Gun regiment came the workers.
Covering the manifestation as a rear guard, came detachments of the
Moscow regiment. Over every detachment streamed a banner: “All Power to
the Soviets!” The funeral procession in March and the First of May
demonstration were probably more numerous, but the July procession was
incomparably more eager, more threatening, and more homogeneous in its
composition. “Under the red banners marched only workers and soldiers,”
writes one of the participants. “The cockades of the officials, the
shiny buttons of students, the hats of ‘lady sympathizers’ were not to
be seen. All that belonged to four months ago, to February. In today’s
movement there was none of that. Today only the common slaves of capital
were marching.” As before, automobiles flew through the streets in all
directions full of armed workers and soldiers – delegates, agitators,
reconnoiterers, telephone men, and detachments for calling out workers
and regiments. They all held their bayonets advanced. The bristling
motor trucks completed a picture of the February days, electrifying
some, terrorizing others. The Kadet Nabokov writes: “The same insane,
dumb, beastlike faces which we all remember from the February days” –
that is, the days of that very revolution which the liberals had
officially pronounced glorious and bloodless. By nine o’clock seven
regiments were already moving toward the Tauride Palace. They were
joined on the way by columns from the factories and by new military
detachments. The movement of the Machine Gun regiment developed a
colossal power of contagion. The “July days” had begun.

Meetings were held on the march. Shots rang out. According to a worker,
Korotkov, “they dragged out of a cellar on the Liteiny a machine gun and
an officer whom they killed on the spot.” All conceivable rumours ran
ahead of the demonstration. Fears rayed out from it on all sides like
beams of light. What imaginable thing was not reported over the
telephones from the frightened central districts? It was said that about
eight o’clock in the evening an armed automobile dashed up to the Warsaw
station seeking Kerensky who had left that very day for the front,
intending to arrest him, but that the train had gone and the arrest did
not occur. That episode was subsequently repeated more than once as
proving a conspiracy. Just who was in the automobile and who discovered
its mysterious intentions, has nevertheless remained unknown. On that
evening automobiles with armed men were careering in all directions –
doubtless, therefore, in the vicinity of the Warsaw station. Strong
words were to be heard about Kerensky in many places. This evidently
served as a basis for the myth – if it was not indeed simply
manufactured out of whole cloth.

_Izvestia_ sketched the following outline of the events of July 3rd: “At
five o’clock in the afternoon there came out, armed, the First Machine
Gun, a part of the Moscow, a part of the Grenadier, and a part of the
Pavlovsky regiments. They were joined by crowds of workers ... By eight
o’clock in the evening, separate parts of regiments began to pour
towards the Palace of Kshesinskaia, armed to the teeth and with red
banners and placards demanding the transfer of power to the soviets.
Speeches were made from the balcony ... At ten-thirty a meeting was held
on the square in front of the Tauride Palace ... The troops elected a
deputation to the All-Russian Central Executive Committee which
presented in their name the following demands: Removal of the ten
bourgeois ministers, all power to the soviets, cessation of the
offensive, confiscation of the printing plants of the bourgeois press,
the land to be state property, state control of production.” Aside from
certain prunings – “parts of regiments” instead of regiments, “crowds of
workers” instead of entire factories – you may say that the official
report of Tseretelli and Dan does not distort the general picture of
what happened. In particular it correctly notes the two focal points of
the demonstration: the private residence of Kshesinskaia and the Tauride
Palace. Both spiritually and physically the movement revolved around
those two antagonistic centers: It came to the house of Kshesinskaia for
instructions, leadership, inspirational speeches; to the Tauride Palace
it came to present demands and even to threaten a little with its power.

At three o’clock in the afternoon, two delegates from the
machine-gunners came to an all-city conference of the Bolsheviks,
sitting that day in the house of Kshesinskaia, with the information that
their regiment had decided to come out. Nobody had expected this, and
nobody wanted it. Tomsky declared: “The regiments which have come out
have acted in an uncomradely manner, not having invited the Central
Committee of our party to consider the question of a manifestation. The
Central Committee proposes to the conference: in the first place, to
issue an appeal in order to hold back the masses; in the second, to
prepare an address to the Executive Committee urging them to take the
power in their hands. It is impossible to talk of a manifestation at
this moment unless we want a new revolution.” Tomsky, an old
worker-Bolshevik who had certified his loyalty to the party with years
at hard labor – famous subsequently as leader of the trade unions – was
in general more inclined by character to restrain the masses from action
than summon them to it. But on this occasion he was merely carrying out
the thought of Lenin: “It is impossible to talk of a manifestation at
this moment unless we want a new revolution.” Even the attempt at a
peaceful demonstration on June 10th had been denounced by the
Compromisers as a conspiracy. An overwhelming majority of the conference
was at one with Tomsky. We must at all costs postpone the final
conflict. The offensive at the front is holding the whole country at
high tension. Its failure is inevitable – as also the determination of
the government to throw all the responsibility for the defeat upon the
Bolsheviks. We must give the Compromisers time to ruin themselves
completely. Volodarsky answered the machine-gunners in the name of the
conference to the effect that the regiment must submit to the decisions
of the party. The machine-gunners departed with a protest. At four
o’clock the Central Committee confirmed the decision of the conference.
Its members dispersed to the districts and factories to restrain the
masses from going out. Appeals to the same effect were sent to _Pravda_
to be printed on the front page the following morning. Stalin was
appointed to bring the decision to the attention of the joint session of
the Executive Committees. There remains, therefore, no doubt whatever as
to the intention of the Bolsheviks. Their Central Committee addressed an
appeal to the workers and soldiers: “Unknown persons ... are summoning
you into the streets under arms,” and that proves that the summons does
not come from any one of the soviet parties ... Thus the central
committees – both of the party and the Soviet – proposed, but the masses
disposed.

At eight o’clock in the evening, the Machine Gun regiment, and soon
after it the Moscow regiment, came up to the palace of Kshesinskaia.
Popular Bolsheviks – Nevsky, Lashevich, Podvoisky – speaking from the
balcony, tried to send the regiments home. They were answered from
below: _Doloi! Doloi!_ Such cries the Bolshevik balcony had never yet
heard from the soldiers; it was an alarming sign. Behind the regiments
the factories began to march up: “All Power to the Soviets!” “Down with
the ten minister capitalists!” Those had been the banners of June 18th,
but now they were hedged with bayonets. The demonstration had become a
mighty fact. What was to be done? Could the Bolsheviks possibly stand
aside? The members of the Petrograd committee, together with the
delegates to the conference and representatives from the regiments and
factories, passed a resolution: to reconsider the question, to end all
fruitless attempts to restrain the masses and guide the developing
movement in such a way that the governmental crisis may be decided in
the interests of the people; with this goal, to appeal to the soldiers
and workers to go peacefully to the Tauride Palace, elect delegates, and
through them present their demands to the Executive Committee. The
members of the Central Committee who were present sanctioned this change
of tactics. This new decision, announced from the balcony, was met with
welcoming shouts and with singing of the _Marseillaise_. The movement
had been legalized by the party. The machine-gunners could heave a sigh
of relief. A part of the regiment immediately went to the Peter and Paul
fortress to influence its garrison, and in case of necessity protect
from its blows the Palace of Kshesinskaia, which was separated from the
fortress only by the narrow Kronverksky canal.

The principal ranks of the demonstration moved out into the Nevsky, the
artery of the bourgeoisie, bureaucracy and officers, as though into a
foreign country. From the sidewalks, windows, balconies, thousands of
eyes looked out with no good wishes. Regiment pressed upon factory,
factory upon regiment. Fresh masses arrived continually. All the
banners, in gold letters on red, cried out with one voice: “All Power to
the Soviets!” The procession brimmed the Nevsky and poured like a river
at the flood to the Tauride Palace. The placards “Down with the war!”
provoke the bitterest hostility from the officers – among them many
war-invalids. Waving their arms and straining their voices, students,
college girls, officials, endeavor to persuade the soldiers that German
agents behind them are aiming to let Wilhelm’s troops into Petrograd to
strangle freedom. To these orators their own conclusions seem
irrefutable. “They are deceived by spies,” say the officials, pointing
at the workers, and the workers’ answer is a surly growl. “Led astray by
fanatics!” say the more indulgent. “Ignorant elements,” others agree.
But the workers have their own way of measuring things. They did not
learn from German spies those ideas which have brought them into the
streets today. The demonstrators impolitely push aside their importunate
tutors, and move forward. This drives the patriots of the Nevsky out of
their heads. Shock groups, led for the most part by war-cripples and
Cavaliers of St. George, fall upon individual sections of the
demonstration, trying to snatch away the banners. Clashes occur here and
there. The atmosphere grows hot. Shots ring out. One, and then another.
From a window? From the Anichkin Palace? The pavement answers with a
volley in the air, aimed nowhere. In a short time the whole street is in
confusion. At about midnight – relates a worker from the “Vulcan”
Factory – as the Grenadier regiment was passing through the Nevsky in
the vicinity of the Public Library, somebody opened fire on them from
somewhere, and the shooting continued several minutes. A panic followed.
The workers began to scatter into the side streets. The soldiers lay
down under fire – they had learned that in the war school. That midnight
scene on the Nevsky, with Grenadier Guards lying down on the pavement,
was a fantastic spectacle. Neither Pushkin nor Gogol, singers of the
Nevsky, ever imagined it thus. Moreover, there was reality in this
fantasia: dead and wounded men stayed there on the pavement.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

THE TAURIDE was living a life of its own in those days. In view of the
resignation of the Kadets, both Executive Committees, the
worker-soldier’s and the peasant’s, had met in joint session to consider
a discourse of Tseretelli on how to pour out the coalition bath without
the baby. The secret of this operation would undoubtedly have been
discovered in the long run, if the restless suburbs had not intervened.
A telephone communication about the manifestation under preparation by
the Machine Gun regiment produced frowns of anger and vexation on the
faces of the leaders. Can it be that the soldiers and workers will not
wait until our newspapers bring them salvation in the form of a
resolution? Oblique glances were cast in the direction of the
Bolsheviks. But for them too, this time, the demonstration was a
surprise. Kamenev, and other representatives of the party who happened
to be present, even agreed at the end of the day’s session to go to the
factories and barracks and attempt to restrain the masses from going
out. This gesture was afterward interpreted by the Compromisers as a
military trick. The Executive Committee as usual hastily adopted a
proclamation declaring any manifestation an act of treachery to the
revolution. But even so, how were they going to deal with the
governmental crisis? A way out was found: they would leave the mutilated
cabinet as it was, postponing the whole question until the provincial
members of the Executive Committee could be summoned. To drag things
out, to gain time for your own vacillations – is not that the most
ingenious of all political policies?

Only in their struggle against the masses did the Compromisers consider
it unwise to lose time. The official apparatus was immediately set in
motion to prepare arms against the “insurrection” – for so they named
the demonstration from the very beginning. The leaders searched
everywhere for armed forces to defend the government and the Executive
Committee. Over the signature of Cheidze and other members of the
præsidium, demands were sent to various military institutions to send to
the Tauride Palace armored cars, three-inch guns and shells. At the same
time almost every regiment received orders to send armed detachments for
the defense of the palace. But they did not stop there. Their bureau
telegraphed an order that same day to the front – to the Fifth Army,
stationed nearest the capital – to “send to Petrograd a cavalry
division, a brigade of infantry, and armored cars.” The Menshevik,
Voitinsky, to whom was allotted the task of protecting the Executive
Committee, let the whole thing out later in his retrospective survey:
“The entire day of July 3rd was spent in getting together troops to
fortify the Tauride Palace ... Our problem was to bring in at least a
few companies ... At one time we had absolutely no forces. Six men stood
at the doors of the Tauride Palace without power to hold back the crowd
...” And again: “On the first day of the demonstration we had at our
disposal only a hundred men – we had no other forces. We sent out
commissars to all the regiments with a request to give us soldiers to
form a patrol. But each regiment looked to the next to see what it was
going to do. We were compelled at whatever cost to put a stop to this
outrage, and we summoned troops from the front.” It would be difficult,
even with malice aforethought, to devise a more vicious satire upon the
Compromisers. Hundreds of thousands of demonstrators were demanding the
transfer of power to the soviets. Cheidze, standing at the head of the
soviet system and thus the logical candidate for premier, was hunting
for armed forces to employ against the demonstrators. This colossal
movement in favor of power to the democracy, was denounced by the
democratic leaders as an attack upon the democracy by an armed gang.

In the Tauride Palace at that same time the workers’ section of the
Soviet was meeting after a long intermission. In the course of the last
two months this section had so far changed its composition, as a result
of by-elections in the factories, that the Executive Committee had
well-grounded fears of a predominance of Bolsheviks. The artificially
delayed meeting of the section – finally called a few days before by the
Compromisers themselves – accidentally coincided with the armed
demonstration. In this the newspapers saw the hand of the Bolsheviks.
Zinoviev in a speech to the section convincingly developed the thought
that the Compromisers, being allies of the bourgeoisie, were unable and
unwilling to struggle against the counter-revolution, since that word
meant to them only individual manifestations of Black Hundred
hooliganism; it did not mean what it was – a political union of the
possessing classes for the purpose of strangling the soviets as centers
of the resistance of the toiling masses. His speech hit the mark. The
Mensheviks, finding themselves for the first time in a minority on
soviet soil, proposed that no decision should be arrived at, and that
they should disperse to the districts to preserve order. But it was
already too late! The news that armed workers and machine-gunners were
approaching the Tauride Palace produced a mighty excitement in the hall.
Kamenev ascended the tribune: “We did not summon the manifestation,” he
said. “The popular masses themselves came into the street ... But once
the masses have come out, our place is among them ... Our present task
is to give the movement an organized character.” Kamenev concluded with
a proposal that they elect a commission of twenty-five men for the
leadership of the movement. Trotsky seconded the motion. Cheidze feared
a Bolshevik commission, and vainly insisted that the question be turned
over to the Executive Committee. The debate became fiercer. Convinced
finally that all together they constituted only a third of the assembly,
the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries left the hall. This was
becoming a favorite tactic with the democrats; they began to boycott the
soviets from the moment they lost the majority there. A resolution
summoning the Executive Committee to take the power was adopted in the
absence of the opposition by 276 votes. Elections were immediately held
for the fifteen members of the commission. Ten places were left for the
minority – and these ten would remain unoccupied. This fact of the
election of a Bolshevik commission signified both to friends and enemies
that the workers’ section of the Petrograd soviet would henceforth
become a Bolshevik base. A vast step forward! In April the influence of
the Bolsheviks had extended to approximately a third of the Petrograd
workers; in the Soviet of those days they occupied a wholly
insignificant sector. Now, at the beginning of July, the Bolsheviks were
sending to the workers’ section about two-thirds of its members. That
meant that among the masses their influence had become decisive.

Through the streets leading to the Tauride Palace there is flowing a
steady column of working men and women and soldiers, with banners, songs
and bands playing. The light artillery comes along, its commander
reporting amid rapture that all the batteries of his division are at one
with the workers. The thoroughfares and square near the Tauride are
filled with people. All are trying to crowd in around the tribune at the
chief entrance to the palace. Cheidze comes out to the demonstrators
with the gloomy look of a man who has been unnecessarily torn from his
work. The popular soviet president is met with an unfriendly silence. In
a tired and hoarse voice Cheidze repeats those commonplaces which have
long puckered his mouth. Voitinsky, who comes out to help him, is no
better received. “Trotsky, however” – according to the account of
Miliukov – “having announced that the moment was now come when the power
should go over to the soviets, was met with loud applause.” This
sentence of Miliukov’s is purposely ambiguous. None of the Bolsheviks
declared that “the moment was come.” A machinist from the small Duflon
factory on the Petrograd side said later about that meeting under the
wall of the Tauride Palace: “I remember the speech of Trotsky, who said
that it was not yet time to seize the power in our hands.” The machinist
reports the essence of the speech more correctly than the professor of
history. From the lips of the Bolshevik orators the demonstrators
learned of the victory just won in the Workers’ Section, and that fact
gave them almost as palpable a satisfaction as would an entrance upon
the epoch of soviet power.

The joint session of the Executive Committees met again a little before
midnight. (Just then the grenadiers were lying down on the Nevsky.) On a
motion from Dan, it was resolved that only those could remain at the
meeting who should bind themselves in advance to defend and carry out
its decisions. This was a new note! From a workers’ and soldiers’
parliament, which was what the Mensheviks had declared the Soviet to be,
they were trying to convert it into an administrative organ of the
compromise majority. After they have become a minority – and this is
only two months away – the Compromisers will passionately defend the
principle of democracy in the soviet. Today, however – as indeed at all
decisive moments in social life – democracy is held in reserve. A number
of Mezhrayontsi[1] left the hall with a protest. The Bolsheviks were not
there; they were in the Palace of Kshesinskaia getting ready for
tomorrow. During the further course of the meeting the Mezhrayontsi and
the Bolsheviks appeared in the hall with the announcement that no one
could take from them the mandate given them by their electors. The
majority greeted this announcement with silence, and Dan’s resolution
was quietly dropped into oblivion. The session dragged out like a death
agony. In tired voices the Compromisers kept on assuring each other that
they were right. Tseretelli, in his character of Postmaster General,
entered a complaint against his employees: “I just now learned of the
strike of the postal and telegraph workers ... As to their political
demands, their slogans are the same: All Power to the Soviets!”

Delegates from the demonstrators, now surrounding the Tauride Palace on
all sides, demanded admission to the meeting. They were admitted with
alarm and hostility. The delegates, however, sincerely believed that
this time the Compromisers could not help coming to meet them. Had not
today’s issues of the Menshevik and Social Revolutionary papers, wrought
up over the resignation of the Kadets, themselves exposed the intrigues
and sabotage of their bourgeois allies? Moreover the workers’ section
had come out in favor of a soviet government. What else was there to
wait for? But their fervent appeals, in which hope still mingled with
indignation, dropped impotent and inappropriate into the stagnant
atmosphere of that parliament of compromise. The leaders had but one
thought: how quickest to get rid of their uninvited guests. To suggest
that they withdraw to the gallery, to drive them back into the street to
the demonstrators, would be indiscreet. In the gallery machine gun men
were listening with amazement to the evolving debate, which had only one
goal – to gain time. The Compromisers were waiting for reliable
regiments. “A revolutionary people is in the streets,” cried Dan, “but
that people is engaged in a counter-revolutionary work.” Dan was
supported by Abramovich, one of the leaders of the Jewish Bund, a
conservative pedant whose every instinct had been outraged by the
revolution. “We are witnesses to a conspiracy,” he asserts, in defiance
of the obvious, and he proposes to the Bolsheviks that they openly
announce that “this is their work.” Tseretelli deepens the discussion:
“To go out into the streets with the demand, ‘All Power to the Soviets’
– is that to support the soviets? If the soviets so desired, the power
could pass to them. There is no obstacle anywhere to the will of the
soviets ... Such a manifestation is not along the road of revolution,
but of counter-revolution.” These considerations the workers’ delegates
could not possibly understand. It seemed to them that the high-up
leaders were a little bit out of their heads. The meeting at last
resolved once more, by all votes except 11, that an armed manifestation
would be a stab in the back at the revolutionary army, etc., etc. The
meeting adjourned at five o’clock in the morning.

The masses were gradually gathered back into their districts. Armed
automobiles travelled all night, uniting regiments, factories and
district centers. As in the last days of February, the masses spent the
night casting the balance of the day’s struggle. But now they did this
with the aid of a complicated system of organizations – factory, party
and regimental – which conferred continually. In the districts it was
considered self-evident that the movement could not stop half way. The
Executive Committee had postponed the decision about the power. The
masses regarded that as wavering. The conclusion was clear: we must
bring more pressure to bear. A night session of Bolsheviks and
Mezhrayontsi[2], meeting in the Tauride Palace simultaneously with the
Executive Committees, also cast the balance of the day and tried to
foretell what the morrow would bring. Reports from the districts
testified that today’s demonstration had merely set the masses in
motion, presenting to their minds nakedly for the first time the
question of power. Tomorrow the factories and regiments would go after
the answer, and no force in the world could hold them in the suburbs.
The debate was not about whether to summon the masses to a seizure of
power – as enemies later asserted – but about whether to try to call off
the demonstration the next morning or to stand at the head of it.

Late in the night, or rather at about three o’clock in the morning, the
Putilov factory approached the Tauride Palace – a mass of eighty
thousand workers, many with wives and children. The procession had
started at eleven o’clock in the evening, and other belated factories
had joined it on the road. In spite of the late hour, there was such a
mass of people at the Narva Gate as to suggest that nobody stayed home
that night in the whole district. The women had exclaimed: “Everybody
must go – we will watch the houses.” At a signal from the belfry of the
Church of the Savior shots had rattled out as though from a machine gun.
From below a volley was fired at the belfry. “Near Gostiny Dvor a
company of junkers and students fell upon the demonstrators and tried to
tear away their placards. The workers resisted. The crowd piled up.
Somebody fired a shot. The writer of these lines got his head broken,
his sides and chest badly mashed by tramping feet.” These are the words
of the worker Efimov, already known to us. Passing across the whole
town, silent now, the Putilov men finally arrived at the Tauride Palace.
Thanks to the insistent efforts of Riazanov, closely associated at that
time with the trade unions, a delegation was admitted to the Executive
Committee. The throng of workers, hungry and dead-tired, scattered about
on the street and in the garden, a majority immediately stretching
themselves out, thinking to wait there for an answer. The entire Putilov
factory lying there on the ground at three o’clock in the morning around
the Tauride Palace, where the democratic leaders were waiting for the
arrival of troops from the front – that is one of the most startling
pictures offered by the revolution on this summit of the pass between
February and October. Twelve years before no small numbers of these same
workers had participated in the January procession to the Winter Palace
with icons and religious standards. Ages had passed since that Sunday
afternoon; other ages will pass during the next four months.

The sombre image of these Putilov workers lying down in the courtyard
hung over the conference of Bolshevik leaders and organizers as they
debated about the next day’s plans. Tomorrow the Putilovtsi will refuse
to work – yes, and what work would they be good for after the night’s
vigil? Zinoviev was summoned to the telephone. Raskolnikov had rung up
from Kronstadt to say that tomorrow early in the morning the garrison of
the fortress would start for Petrograd and nobody and nothing could stop
it. The young midshipman was holding on in suspense at the other end of
the wire: Would the central committee order him to break with the
soviets, and ruin himself in their eyes? To the picture of the Putilov
factory as a gypsy camp was thus joined the no less suggestive picture
of the sailors’ island getting ready in those sleepless hours of the
night to support workers’ and soldiers’ Petrograd. No, the situation was
too clear. There was no more room for wavering. Trotsky inquired for the
last time: Can we, nevertheless, try to make it an unarmed
demonstration? No, there can be no question of that. One squad of
Junkers can scatter tens of thousands of unarmed workers like a flock of
sheep. The soldiers and the workers, too, will regard that proposal as a
trap. The answer was categorical and convincing. All unanimously decided
to summon the masses in the name of the party to prolong the
demonstration on the next day. Zinoviev hastened to relieve the mind of
Raskolnikov, languishing at the other end of the telephone. An address
to the workers and soldiers was immediately drawn up: Into the streets!
The afternoon’s summons from the Central Committee to stop the
demonstration, was torn from the presses – but too late to replace it
with a new text. A white page in _Pravda_ the next morning will be
deadly evidence against the Bolsheviks: Evidently getting frightened at
the last moment, they withdrew the appeal for an insurrection; or maybe,
just the opposite – maybe they renounced an earlier appeal for a
peaceful demonstration in order to go in for insurrection. Meanwhile the
real decision of the Bolsheviks was issued on a separate leaflet. It
summoned the workers and soldiers “by way of a peaceful and organized
demonstration to bring their will to the attention of the Executive
Committees now in session.” No, that was not a summons to insurrection.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Appointed officials having both administrative and judicial power
over the local peasant population.

2. Members of the “Inter-district” organization to which the author at
that time belonged. – _Trans._



CHAPTER 25 THE JULY DAYS: CULMINATION AND ROUT


 

From that moment the direct leadership of the movement passed
conclusively into the hands of the Petrograd committee of the party,
whose chief force as an agitator was Volodarsky. The task of mobilizing
the garrison was assigned to the Military Organization. The direction of
this organization ever since March had been in the hands of two old
Bolsheviks to whom the organization was to owe much in its further
development. Podvoisky was a sharply outlined and unique figure in the
ranks of Bolshevism, with traits of the Russian revolutionary of the old
type – from the theological seminaries – a man of great although
undisciplined energy, with a creative imagination which, it must be
confessed, often went to the length of fantasy. The word “Podvoiskyism”
subsequently acquired on the lips of Lenin a friendly-ironical and
admonitory flavor. But the weaker sides of this ebullient nature were to
show themselves chiefly after the conquest of power, when an abundance
of opportunities and means gave too many stimuli to the extravagant
energy of Podvoisky and his passion for decorative undertakings. In the
conditions of the revolutionary struggle for power, his optimistic
decisiveness of character, his self-abnegation, his tirelessness, made
him an irreplaceable leader of the awakening soldiers. Nevsky, a
university instructor in the past, of more prosaic mould than Podvoisky,
but no less devoted to the party, in no sense an organizer, and only by
an unlucky accident made soviet Minister of Communications a year later,
attached the soldiers to him by his simplicity, sociability, and
attentive kindness. Around these leaders stood a group of close
assistants, soldiers and young officers, some of whom in the future were
to play no small rôle. On the night of July 4th the Military
Organization suddenly came forward to the center of the stage. Under
Podvoisky, who easily mastered the functions of command, an impromptu
general staff was formed. Brief appeals and instructions were issued to
all the troops of the garrison. In order to protect the demonstration
from attack, armored cars were to be placed at the bridges leading from
the suburbs to the capital and at the central crossings of the chief
streets. The machine-gunners had already, during that night, established
their own sentries at the Peter and Paul fortress. The garrisons of
Oranienbaum, Peterhoff, Krasnoe Selo and other points near the capital,
were informed of tomorrow’s demonstration by telephone and special
messenger. The general political leadership, of course, remained in the
hands of the Central Committee of the party.

The machine-gunners returned to their barracks at dawn, tired and, in
spite of the July weather, shivering. A night rain had soaked the
Putilov men also to the skin. The demonstrators did not assemble until
eleven o’clock in the morning. The military sections got there still
later. Today the 1st Machine Gun regiment was on the street to the last
man. But it will no longer play the rôle of initiator as it did
yesterday. The factories have moved into the front rank. Moreover, those
plants have been drawn into the movement which yesterday stood aside.
Where the leaders wavered or resisted, younger workers had compelled the
member-on-duty of the factory committee to blow the whistle as a signal
to stop work. In the Baltic factory, where Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries dominated, about four out of five thousand workers came
out. In the Skorokhod shoe factory, long considered a stronghold of the
Social Revolutionaries, the mood had so sharply changed that an old
deputy from that factory, a Social Revolutionary, did not dare show his
face for several days. All the factories struck and held meetings. They
elected leaders for the demonstration and delegates to present their
demands to the Executive Committee. Again hundreds of thousands moved in
radii toward the Tauride Palace, and again tens of thousands turned
aside on their way there to the Palace of Kshesinskaia. Today’s movement
was more impressive and organized than yesterday’s: the guiding hand of
the party was evident. But the feeling too was hotter today. The
soldiers and workers were out for a solution of the crisis. The
government was in despair, for on this second day of the demonstration
its impotence was even more obvious than on the first. The Executive
Committee was waiting for loyal troops, and getting reports from all
sides that hostile troops were moving on the capital. From Kronstadt,
from New Peterhoff, from Krasnoe Selo, from the Krasnaia Gorka fort,
from all the nearby centers, by land and sea, soldiers and sailors were
marching in with music, with weapons, and, worst of all, with Bolshevik
standards. A number of regiments were bringing their officers with them,
just as in the February days, pretending to be acting under their
command.

“The sitting of the government was not over,” relates Miliukov, “when
news came from the staff that there was shooting on the Nevsky. It was
decided to transfer the sitting to staff-headquarters. Here were Prince
Lvov, Tseretelli, Minister of Justice Pereverzev, and two assistants
from the Ministry of War. There was one moment when the situation of the
government seemed hopeless. The Preobrazhentsi, the Semenovtsi, and the
Izmailovtsi[1], who had not joined the Bolsheviks, announced to the
government that they would remain ‘neutral.’ On Palace Square, for the
defense of headquarters, there were to be found only war-invalids and a
few hundred Cossacks.” General Polovtsev published on the morning of
July 4th an announcement that he was going to cleanse Petrograd of armed
hordes. The inhabitants were strictly advised to lock their doors and
not go into the streets except in case of absolute necessity. This
threatening order fell flat. The commander of all the troops of the
district was able to bring out against the demonstrators only petty
detachments of Cossacks and junkers. In the course of the day they
caused some meaningless shootings and some bloody clashes. An ensign of
the First Don regiment guarding the Winter Palace reported subsequently
to a commission of inquiry: “We were ordered to disarm small groups of
people who passed by, no matter who they were, and also armed
automobiles. To carry out this order, we would run out of the palace on
foot from time to time and disarm people ...” The ingenuous tale of the
Cossack ensign correctly portrays the correlation of forces, and gives a
picture of the struggle. The “mutinous” troops came out of the barracks
in companies and battalions, taking possession of the streets and
squares. The government troops acted from ambush, or made raids in small
detachments – that is, they functioned exactly as insurrectionary bands
are supposed to. This exchange of rôles is explained by the fact that
almost the whole armed force of the government was hostile to it – or at
the best, neutral. The government was living by the authorization of the
Executive Committee; the power of the Executive Committee derived in
turn from the hopes of the masses that it might at last come to its
senses and take the power.

The demonstration attained its highest point with the appearance on the
Petrograd arena of the Kronstadt sailors. Delegates from the
machine-gunners had been working the day before in the garrison of the
naval fortress. A meeting had assembled in Yakorny Square, unexpectedly
to the local organization, on the initiative of some anarchists from
Petrograd. The Orators had appealed to the sailors to come to the help
of Petrograd. Roshal, a medical student, one of the young heroes of
Kronstadt and a favorite on Yakorny Square, had tried to make a speech
counseling moderation. Thousands of voices cut him off. Roshal,
accustomed to a different welcome, had been compelled to leave the
tribune. Not until night did it become known that in Petrograd the
Bolsheviks were calling the masses into the streets. That settled the
matter. The Left Social Revolutionaries – and in Kronstadt there could
be no right ones – announced that they intended to take part in the
demonstration. These people belonged to the same party with Kerensky,
who at that very moment was at the front collecting troops to put down
the demonstration. The mood at that night’s session of the Kronstadt
organization was such that even the timid commissar of the Provisional
Government, Parchevsky, voted for the march on Petrograd. A plan was
drawn up; transports were mobilized. For the necessities of this
political siege, two and a half tons of arms and ammunition were given
out from the stores. Crowded on tugs and passenger steamers, about
10,000 armed sailors, soldiers and workers came into the narrows of the
Neva at twelve o’clock noon. Disembarking on both sides of the river,
they formed a procession with bands playing and with rifles slung over
their shoulders. Behind the detachments of sailors and soldiers came
columns of workers from the Petrograd and Vassilievsky Island districts,
interspersed with companies of the Red Guard flanked by armored cars and
with innumerable standards and banners rising above them.

The Palace of Kshesinskaia was but two steps away. A little lank man,
black as tar, Sverdlov – one of the basic organizers of the party
elected to the Central Committee in the April conference – was standing
on the balcony and in a businesslike manner, as always, shouting down
instructions in his powerful bass voice: “Head of the procession,
advance – close up ranks – rear ranks come closer.” The demonstrators
were greeted from the balcony by Lunacharsky, a man always easily
infected by the moods of those around him, imposing in appearance and
voice, eloquent in a declamatory way – none too reliable, but often
irreplaceable. He was stormily applauded from below. But most of all the
demonstrators wanted to hear Lenin himself. He had been summoned that
morning, by the way, from his temporary Finland refuge. And the sailors
so insisted on having their will, that in spite of ill health Lenin
could not beg off. An irresistible wave of ecstasy, a genuine Kronstadt
wave, greeted the leader’s appearance on the balcony. Impatiently – and
as always with some embarrassment – awaiting the end of the greeting,
Lenin began speaking before the voices died down. His speech, which the
hostile press for weeks after growled over and tore to pieces in every
possible manner, consisted of a few simple phrases: a greeting to the
demonstrators; an expression of confidence that the slogan, “All Power
to the Soviets,” would conquer in the end, an appeal for firmness and
self-restraint. With renewed shouts the procession marched away to the
music of the band.

Between this holiday introduction and the next stage of the proceedings,
when blood began to flow, a curious episode intruded. The leaders of the
Kronstadt Left Social Revolutionaries noticed only after they arrived on
Mars Field a colossal standard of the Central Committee of the
Bolsheviks which had appeared at the head of the procession after the
stop at the Palace of Kshesinskaia. Burning with party rivalry, they
demanded its removal. The Bolsheviks refused. The Social Revolutionaries
then announced that they would withdraw entirely. However, none of the
sailors or soldiers followed the leaders. The whole policy of the Left
Social Revolutionaries consisted of such capricious waverings, now comic
and now tragic.

At the corner of the Nevsky and Liteiny, the rear guard of the
demonstration was suddenly fired on, and several people were wounded. A
more cruel fire occurred on the corner of the Liteiny and Panteleimonov
Street. The leader of the Kronstadt men, Raskolnikov, tells how “like a
sharp pain to the demonstrators was their uncertainty where the enemy
was, from what side he was shooting.” The soldiers seized their rifles.
Disorderly firing began in all directions. Several were killed and
wounded. Only with great difficulty was order restored in the ranks. The
procession again moved forward with music, but not a trace was left of
its holiday spirit. “There seemed to be a hidden enemy everywhere;
Rifles no longer rested peacefully on the left shoulder, but were held
ready for action.”

There were no few bloody encounters on that day in different parts of
the town. A certain number of them were doubtless due to
misunderstanding, confusion, stray shots, panic. Such tragic accidents
are one of the inevitable overhead expenses of a revolution – itself one
of the overhead expenses of historic progress. But an element of bloody
provocation was also indubitable in the July events. It was manifest in
those very days, and was subsequently confirmed. Says Podvoisky: “When
the demonstrating soldiers began to pass through the Nevsky and the
surrounding sections, inhabited for the most part by the bourgeoisie,
ominous indications of a clash began to appear: strange shots were
fired, nobody knew whence or by whom ... The columns were seized at
first with confusion, and then the least steady and self-restrained
began to open an irregular fire.” In the official _Izvestia_, the
Menshevik, Kantorovich, described the firing upon one of the workers’
columns in the following words: “A crowd of sixty thousand workers from
many factories was marching along Sadovaia Street. As they were passing
by a church, a bell tolled in the steeple and as though at a signal both
rifle and machine gun fire was opened from the roofs of the houses. When
the crowd of workers dashed to the other side of the street, shots came
also from the roofs opposite.” In those attics and roofs, where in
February Protopopov’s “Pharaohs” had posted themselves with machine
guns, members of the officers’ organizations were now at work. They were
attempting – and not without success – by firing on the demonstrators to
spread panic and produce clashes between the different military units
participating. When the houses from which shots came were searched,
machine gun nests were found, and sometimes also the gunners.

The chief instigators of the bloodshed, however, were the government
troops – powerless to put down the movement, but adequate for purposes
of provocation. At about eight o’clock in the evening, when the
demonstration was in full swing, two Cossack squadrons with flying
artillery rode up as a guard for the Tauride Palace. On the way they
stubbornly refused to enter into conversation with the demonstrators –
in itself a bad sign. These Cossacks seized armored automobiles wherever
they could and disarmed individual small groups. Cossack weapons on
streets occupied by workers and soldiers seemed an intolerable
challenge. Everything pointed to a clash. Near the Liteiny Bridge the
Cossacks drew near to a compact mass of the enemy, who had here, on the
road to the Tauride, succeeded in throwing up some sort of barrier.
There was a moment of ominous silence broken by shots from neighboring
houses. Then the fight began. “The Cossacks used up cartridges by the
box,” writes the worker, Metelev. “The workers and soldiers, scattering
to shelter, or simply lying down on the sidewalk under fire, replied in
the same fashion.” The soldiers’ fire compelled the Cossacks to retreat.
Having fought their way through to the quay along the Neva, they fired
three volleys from cannon – the cannon shots are also remarked upon by
_Izvestia_ – but under the long-range rifle fire they retired in the
direction of the Tauride Palace. Running into another workers’ column
the Cossacks received a decisive blow. Abandoning their cannon, horses,
rifles, they sought shelter in the entrances of bourgeois houses, or
dispersed altogether.

That encounter on Liteiny, an actual small battle, was the biggest
military episode of the July days, and stories about it are to be found
in the recollections of many demonstrators. Bursin, a worker of the
Ericcson factory which came out with the machinegunners, tells how upon
meeting them “the Cossacks immediately opened fire with their rifles.”
“Many workers were left lying dead, and it was here that I was struck by
a bullet, which passed through one leg and stopped in the other ... As a
memento of the July days I have my crutch and my useless leg.” In the
encounter on the Liteiny seven Cossacks were killed, and nineteen
wounded or knocked out by shell explosions. Among the demonstrators six
were killed, and about twenty wounded. Here and there lay the dead
bodies of horses.

We have an interesting testimony from the opposing camp. That same
ensign, Averin, who in the morning had made guerrilla attacks on the
regular troops of the mutineers, writes as follows: “At eight o’clock in
the evening we received an order from General Polovtsev to go out in two
companies with two field-guns to the Tauride Palace ... We got as far as
the Liteiny Bridge, upon which I saw armed workers, soldiers and sailors
... With my advance detachment I approached them and asked them to
surrender their weapons, but my request was not granted, and the whole
gang turned and ran across the bridge to the Vyborg side. I had not yet
started after them, when a small-sized soldier without shoulder straps
turned round and fired at me, but missed. That shot served as a signal,
and an irregular rifle fire was opened on us from all sides. The crowd
sent up a shout: ‘The Cossacks are shooting us.’ And that was the fact:
the Cossacks slid from their horses and began to shoot. They even
attempted to open fire with cannon, but the soldiers let go such a
hurricane of rifle fire that the Cossacks were compelled to retreat and
scatter through the town.” It is not at all impossible that some soldier
shot at the ensign; a Cossack officer could better expect a bullet than
a greeting from that July crowd. But it is easier to believe the
abundant testimony to the fact that the first shots came not from the
streets, but from ambush. A rank-and-file Cossack from the same squadron
as the ensign has testified with conviction that the Cossacks were shot
at from the direction of the District Court, and afterward from other
houses in Samursky Alley and on the Liteiny. In the official organ of
the Soviet, it was related that the Cossacks, before arriving at the
Liteiny Bridge, were fired on with machine guns from a stone house. The
worker, Metelev, asserts that when the soldiers searched that house they
found in the apartment of a general who lived there a store of
fire-arms, including two machine guns with cartridges. There is nothing
unlikely in that. By hook or crook quantities of all kinds of weapons
had been accumulated in the hands of the commanding staff during the war
period. And the temptation to sprinkle that “rabble” with a hail of lead
from above must have been great. To be sure, shots did fall among the
Cossacks, but there was a conviction among the July crowds that
counter-revolutionists were consciously shooting at the government
troops in order to incite them to ruthless action. Officers who only
yesterday possessed unlimited powers, recognize no limits to trickery
and cruelty when the civil war comes. Petrograd was swarming with secret
and semi-secret officer organizations enjoying lofty protection and
generous support. In a confidential report made by the Menshevik,
Lieber, almost a month before the July Days, it was asserted that the
officer-conspirators were in touch with Buchanan. Yes, and how could the
diplomats of the Entente help trying to promote the speedy establishment
of a strong power in Russia?

In all excesses the Liberals and Compromisers would see the hand of
“Anarcho-Bolsheviks” and German agents. The workers and soldiers, on the
other hand, confidently laid the responsibility for the July clashes and
victims upon patriotic provocateurs. Which side was right? The judgment
of the masses is of course not infallible. But it is a crude mistake to
imagine that the mass is blind and credulous. Where it is touched to the
quick, it gathers facts and conjectures with a thousand eyes and ears,
tests rumors by its own experience, selects some and rejects others.
Where versions touching a mass movement are contradictory, those
appropriated by the mass itself are nearest to the truth. It is for this
reason that international sycophants of the type of Hippolyte Taine, who
in studying great popular movements ignore the voices of the street, and
spend their time carefully collecting and sifting the empty gossip
produced in drawing-rooms by moods of isolation and fear, are so useless
to science.

The demonstrators again besieged the Tauride Palace and demanded their
answer. At the moment the Kronstadt men arrived, some group or other
brought Chernov out to them. Sensing the mood of the crowd, the
word-loving minister pronounced upon this one occasion a very brief
speech. Sliding over the crisis in the problem of power, he referred
scornfully to the Kadets who had withdrawn from the government. “Good
riddance!” he cried. Shouts interrupted him: “Then why didn’t you say so
before?” Miliukov even relates how “a husky worker, shaking his fist in
the face of the minister, shouted furiously: ‘Take the power, you
son-of-a-bitch, when they give it to you.’ Even though nothing more than
an anecdote, this expresses with crude accuracy the essence of the July
situation. Chernov’s answers have no interest; in any case, they did not
win him the hearts of the Kronstadters ... In just two or three minutes
someone ran into the hall where the Executive Committee was sitting, and
yelled that the sailors had arrested Chernov and were going to end him.
With indescribable excitement the Executive Committee delegated several
of its prominent members, exclusively internationalists and Bolsheviks,
to rescue the minister. Chernov testified subsequently before a
government commission that as he was descending from the tribune he
noticed in the entrance behind the columns a hostile movement of several
people. “They surrounded me and would not let me through to the door ...
A suspicious-looking person in command of the sailors who were holding
me back, kept pointing to an automobile standing near ... At that moment
Trotsky, emerging from the Tauride Palace, came up and mounting on the
front of the automobile in which I found myself, made a short speech.”
Proposing that Chernov be released, Trotsky asked all those opposed to
raise their hands. “Not one hand was raised. The group which had
conducted me to the automobile then stepped aside with a disgruntled
look. Trotsky, as I remember, said: ‘Citizen Chernov, nobody is
hindering you from going back.’ ... The general picture of this whole
episode leaves no doubt in my mind that there was here a planned attempt
of dark elements, acting over the heads of the general mass of the
workers and soldiers, to call me out and arrest me.”

A week before his own arrest Trotsky stated at a joint session of the
Executive Committees, “These facts are going into history and we will
try to establish them as they were ... I saw that a bunch of thugs was
standing around the entrance. I said to Lunacharsky and Riazanov that
those were _okhranniki_ [2] and they were trying to break into the
Tauride Palace (Lunacharsky from his seat: ‘That’s correct.’) ... I
would know them, I said, in a crowd of ten thousand.” In his testimony
of July 24th, Trotsky, already in solitary confinement in Kresty Prison,
wrote: “I was first minded to ride out of the crowd in the automobile
along with Chernov and those who wanted to arrest him, in order to avoid
conflict and panic in the crowd. But Midshipman Raskolnikov, running up
in extreme excitement, called to me: ‘That is impossible ... If you ride
away with Chernov, they will say tomorrow that the Kronstadters arrested
him. Chernov must be freed immediately.’ As soon as the trumpeter had
summoned the crowd to silence, and given me a chance to make a short
speech, which ended with the question: ‘Those here in favor of violence,
raise their hands,’ Chernov found it possible to go back immediately
into the palace without hindrance.” The testimony of these two
witnesses, who were at the same time the chief participants in the
adventure, exhausts the factual side of it. But that did not in the
least hinder the press hostile to the Bolsheviks from presenting the
Chernov incident, together with the “attempt” at an arrest of Kerensky,
as the most convincing of proofs that an armed insurrection had been
organized by the Bolsheviks. There was no lack of allusion also,
especially in oral agitation, to the fact that Trotsky had directed the
arrest of Chernov. That version even arrived at the Tauride Palace.
Chernov himself, who described the circumstances of his half-hour arrest
with sufficient accuracy in a secret document addressed to a Commission
of Inquiry, nevertheless refrained from making any public statement, in
order not to hinder his party from creating indignation against the
Bolsheviks. Moreover Chernov was a member of the government which put
Trotsky in prison. The Compromisers, to be sure, might have remarked
that a gang of dark conspirators would never have ventured upon so
insolent a plot as to arrest a minister in the middle of a crowd in
broad daylight, had they not hoped that the hostility of the mass to the
“victim” would be a sufficient protection. Such indeed to a certain
degree it was. Nobody around the automobile made of his own accord the
slightest attempt to liberate Chernov. If to supplement this, somebody
had somewhere arrested Kerensky, of course neither the workers nor
soldiers would have grieved about that either. In this sense the moral
sympathy of the masses for actual and imaginary attempts against the
socialist ministers did exist and give support to the accusations
against the Kronstadters. But the Compromisers were hindered from
drawing this candid conclusion by their worry about the relics of their
democratic prestige. While fencing themselves off with hostility from
the demonstrators, they continued nevertheless to be heads of the system
of workers’, soldiers’ and peasants’ soviets in the besieged Tauride
Palace.

At eight o’clock in the evening, General Polovtsev revived the hopes of
the Executive Committee by telephone: two Cossack squadrons with flying
artillery are on the way to the Tauride Palace. At last! But this time,
too, their expectations were disappointed. Telephone calls in all
directions only deepened their panic: the Cossacks had disappeared as
though by evaporation, and their horses, saddles and flying artillery
with them. Miliukov writes that towards evening there appeared “the
first results of the governmental appeal to the troops.” Thus, he adds,
the 176th regiment was said to be hastening to the Tauride Palace. This
remark, which sounds so accurate, is curiously characteristic of those
_qui pro quo_’s which inevitably arise in the first period of a civil
war when the two camps are still only beginning to divide. A regiment
did actually arrive at the Tauride Palace in campaign array: knapsacks
and folded coats on their backs, canteens and kettles at their belts.
The soldiers had got wet through on the way and were tired; they had
come from Krasnoe Selo. It was, too, the 176th regiment. But they had no
intention whatever of rescuing the government. Affiliated with the
Mezhrayontsi, this regiment had come out under the leadership of two
soldier Bolsheviks, Levinson and Medvediev, to win the power for the
soviets. It was immediately reported to the leaders of the Executive
Committee, sitting so-to-speak on pins and needles, that a regiment in
campaign array had arrived from a distance with its officers, and was
settling down to a well-earned rest beneath the windows of the palace.
Dan, dressed in the uniform of a military physician, went to the
commander with the request that he supply sentries for the defense of
the palace. The sentries were soon actually supplied. Dan, we may
imagine, communicated this fact with satisfaction to the præsidium, and
from that source it arrived in the newspapers. Sukhanov in his _Notes_
makes fun of the submissiveness with which a Bolshevik regiment
fulfilled the directions of a Menshevik leader – a further proof, he
thinks, of the “absurdity” of the July demonstration. In reality the
matter was both simpler and more complex. Having received the request
for sentries, the commander of the regiment turned to an assistant
commandant on duty in the palace, the young lieutenant, Prigorovsky. By
good or bad luck Prigorovsky was a Bolshevik, a member of the
Mezhrayontsy organization, and he immediately turned for advice to
Trotsky, who was occupying a point of observation with a small group of
Bolsheviks in one of the side rooms of the palace. It goes without
saying that Prigorovsky was advised to post the sentries immediately:
far better to have friends than enemies at the entrances and exits of
the palace! Thus it happened that the 76th regiment, having come out for
a demonstration against the government, defended the government against
demonstrators. If it had really been a question of insurrection,
Lieutenant Prigorovsky with four soldiers at his back could easily have
arrested the whole Executive Committee. But nobody thought of arresting
anybody. The soldiers of the Bolshevik regiment conscientiously
fulfilled their duty as sentries.

After the Cossack squadrons, who were the sole obstacle on the road to
the Tauride Palace, had been swept away, it seemed to many demonstrators
that victory was assured. In reality the chief obstacle was sitting in
the very palace itself. At the joint session of the Executive
Committees, which had begun at six o’clock in the evening, there were
present 90 representatives from 54 shops and factories. The five
orators, who were given the floor by agreement, began by protesting
against the denunciation of the demonstrators as counter-revolutionists
in the manifestoes of the Executive Committee. “You see what is written
on our standards,” said one. “Such are the decisions adopted by the
workers ... We demand the resignation of the ten minister-capitalists.
We have confidence in the Soviet, but not in those in whom the Soviet
has confidence ... We demand that the land be seized immediately, that
control of industry be established immediately. We demand a struggle
against the famine which threatens us ...” Another added: “This is not a
meeting, but a fully organized manifestation. We demand the transfer of
the land to the peasants. We demand an annulment of the orders directed
against the revolutionary army ... At this time when the Kadets have
refused to work with you, we ask you with whom further you want to
dicker. We demand that the power pass to the soviets.” The propaganda
slogans of the manifestation of June 18th had now become an armed
ultimatum of the masses. But the Compromisers were still bound with too
heavy chains to the chariot of the possessing classes. Power to the
soviets? But that means first of all a bold policy of peace, a break
with the Allies, a break with our own bourgeoisie, complete isolation,
and in the course of a few weeks, ruin. No! A responsible democracy will
not enter on the path of adventurism! “The present circumstances,” said
Tseretelli, “make it impossible in the Petrograd atmosphere to carry out
any new decisions whatever.” It remains, therefore, “to recognize the
government with the staff it has left ... to call an extraordinary
session of the soviets in two weeks ... in a place where it may be able
to work without interference, best of all in Moscow.”

But the course of the meeting was continually interrupted. The
Putilovtsi were knocking at the door of the palace: they came up only
towards evening, tired, irritated, in extreme excitement. “Tseretelli –
we want Tseretelli!” This mass, thirty thousand strong, sends its
representatives into the palace, somebody shouting after them that if
Tseretelli won’t come out of his own accord they must bring him out. It
is a long way from threat to action, but nevertheless the thing is
taking a rough turn, and the Bolsheviks hasten to interfere. Zinoviev
subsequently reported: “Our comrades proposed that I should go out to
the Putilov men ... a sea of heads such as I never saw before. Tens of
thousands of men were solidly packed together. The cries of ‘Tseretelli’
continued ... I began: ‘In place of Tseretelli, it is I who have come
out to you.’ Laughter. That changed the mood. I was able to make quite a
long speech ... And in conclusion I appealed to that audience to
disperse peacefully at once, keeping perfect order, and under no
circumstances permitting anyone to provoke them to any aggressive
action. The assembled workers applauded stormily, formed in ranks, and
began to disperse.” This episode offers the best possible illustration
of the keen discontent of the masses, their lack of any plan of attack,
and the actual rôle of the Bolshevik party in the July events.

During the moments when Zinoviev was exchanging views with the
Putilovtsi outdoors, a large group of their delegates, some of them with
rifles, burst stormily into the hall where the Executive Committees were
in session. The members of the Committees jumped up from their seats.
“Some of them did not reveal a sufficient courage and self-restraint,”
says Sukhanov, who has left a vivid description of this dramatic moment.
One of the workers, “a classic _sansculotte_ in cap and short blue
blouse without belt, with a rifle in his hand,” jumped up on the
speaker’s tribune, trembling with excitement and wrath: “‘Comrades! How
long are we workers going to stand for this treachery? You are making
bargains with the bourgeoisie and the landlords ... Here we are, thirty
thousand Putilovtsi ... We are going to have our will!’ Cheidze, before
whose nose the rifle was dancing, showed great presence of mind. Calmly
leaning down from his elevation, he thrust into the quivering hand of
the worker a printed manifesto: ‘Here, comrade, take this, please, and I
ask you to read it. It says here what the Putilov comrades should do
...’” In the manifesto it said nothing at all except that the
demonstrators ought to go home, as otherwise they would be traitors to
the revolution. And what else, indeed, was there left for the Mensheviks
to say?

In the agitation under the walls of the Tauride Palace – as everywhere
in the agitational whirlwind of that period – a great place was occupied
by Zinoviev, an orator of extraordinary power. His high tenor voice
would surprise you at first, but afterward win you with its unique
music. Zinoviev was a born agitator. He knew how to infect himself with
the mood of the masses, excite himself with their emotions, and find for
their thoughts and feelings a somewhat prolix, perhaps, but very
gripping expression. Enemies used to call Zinoviev the greatest
demagogue among the Bolsheviks. This was their usual way of paying
tribute to his strongest trait – his ability to penetrate the heart of
the _demos_ and play upon its strings. It is impossible to deny,
however, that being merely an agitator, and neither a theoretician nor a
revolutionary strategist, Zinoviev, when he was not restrained by an
external discipline, easily slid down the path of demagoguism – speaking
not in the philistine, but in the scientific sense of that word. That
is, he showed an inclination to sacrifice enduring interests to the
success of the moment. Zinoviev’s agitatorial quick scent made him an
extraordinarily valuable counselor whenever it was a question of
estimating political conjunctures – but nothing deeper than that. At
meetings of the party he was able to conquer, convince, bewitch,
whenever he came with a prepared political idea, tested in mass meetings
and, so-to-speak, saturated with the hopes and hates of the workers and
soldiers. On the other hand, Zinoviev was able in a hostile meeting –
even in the Executive Committee of those days – to give to the most
extreme and explosive thoughts an enveloping and insinuating form,
making his way into the minds of those who had met him with a
preconceived distrust. In order to achieve these invaluable results, he
had to have something more than a consciousness that he was right; he
had to have a tranquilizing certainty that he was to be relieved of the
political responsibility by a reliable and strong hand. Lenin gave him
this certainty. Armed with a prepared strategic formula containing the
very essence of a question, Zinoviev would adroitly and astutely
supplement it with fresh exclamations, protests, demands, just now
caught up by him on the street, in the factory or the barrack. In those
moments he was an ideal mechanism of transmission between Lenin and the
masses – sometimes between the masses and Lenin. Zinoviev always
followed his teacher except in a very few cases. But the hour of
disagreement was just that hour when the fate of the party, of the
class, of the country, was to be decided. The agitator of the revolution
lacked revolutionary character. When it was a question of conquering
minds and hearts Zinoviev remained a tireless fighter, but he suddenly
lost his fighting confidence when he came face to face with the
necessity of action. Here he drew back from the masses – from Lenin too
– responded only to voices of indecision, caught up every doubt, saw
nothing but obstacles. And then his insinuating, almost feminine voice,
losing its conviction, would expose his inner weakness. Under the walls
of the Tauride Palace in the July days, Zinoviev was extraordinarily
active, ingenious and strong. He raised the excitement of the masses to
its highest note – not in order to summon them to decisive action, but,
on the contrary, in order to restrain them. This corresponded to the
moment and to the policy of the party. Zinoviev was wholly in his
element.

The battle on the Liteiny produced a sharp break in the development of
the demonstration. Nobody was now watching the procession from window or
balcony. The more well-to-do part of the public, besieging the railroad
stations, were leaving town. The struggle in the streets turned into a
scattered skirmishing without definite aim. During the night there were
hand-to-hand fights between demonstrators and patriots, unsystematic
disarmings, transfers of rifles from one hand to another. Groups of
soldiers from the dispersed regiments functioned helter-skelter. “Shady
elements and provocateurs, attaching themselves to the soldiers, incited
them to anarchistic activities,” adds Podvoisky. On a hunt for those who
had shot from the roofs, groups of sailors and soldiers carried out
searches in the cellars. Here and there, under the pretext of a search,
plunderings would occur. On the other side deeds of a pogrom character
were perpetrated. Merchants furiously attacked the workers in those
parts of the town where they felt strong, and ruthlessly beat them up.
Says Afanassiev, a worker from the New Lessner factory: “With cries of
‘Beat the Yids and Bolsheviks! Drown them!’ the crowd attacked us and
gave it to us good.” One of the victims died in the hospital. Afanassiev
himself was dragged by sailors, bruised and bloody, from the
Ekaterininsky Canal.

Skirmishes, victims, fruitlessness of the struggle, and indefiniteness
of practical aim – that describes the movement. The Central Committee of
the Bolsheviks passed a resolution: to call on the workers and soldiers
to end the demonstration. This time that appeal, which was immediately
brought to the attention of the Executive Committee, met hardly any
opposition at all in the lower ranks. The masses ebbed back into the
suburbs, and they cherished no intention of renewing the struggle on the
following day. They felt that the problem of “Power to the Soviets” was
considerably more complicated than had appeared.

The siege of the Tauride Palace was conclusively raised. The nearby
streets stood empty. But the vigil of the Executive Committees
continued, with intermissions, with long-drawn-out speeches, meaningless
and fruitless. Only afterwards did it become clear that the Compromisers
were waiting for something. In neighboring rooms the delegates of the
factories and regiments were still languishing. “It was already long
after midnight,” relates Metelev, “and we were still waiting for a
‘decision’. Irritated with weariness and hunger, we were wandering
through the Alexandrovsky hall ... At four o’clock in the morning On the
5th of July our waiting came to an end ... Through the open doors of the
chief entrance to the palace burst in a noisy crowd of officers and
soldiers.” The whole building was filled with the brassy sounds of the
Marseillaise. The trampling of feet and the thunder of the band at that
hour before the dawn, caused an extraordinary excitement in the session
hall. The deputies leapt from their seats. A new danger? But Dan was in
the tribune. ”Comrades,” he shouted, “don’t get excited. There is no
danger. Those are regiments loyal to the revolution that have arrived.”
Yes, the reliable troops had arrived at last. They occupied the
corridors, viciously fell upon the few workers still remaining in the
palace, grabbed the weapons of those having them, arrested them and led
them away. Lieutenant Kuchin, a well-known Menshevik, ascended the
tribune in field uniform. The chairman, Dan, received him with open arms
to the triumphal notes of the band. Choking with delight, and scorching
the Lefts with their triumphant glances, the Compromisers seized each
other by the hand, opened their mouths wide, and poured out their
enthusiasm in the notes of the Marseillaise. “A classic picture of the
beginning of a counter-revolution,” angrily muttered Martov, who knew
how to see and understand many things. The political meaning of this
scene – recorded by Sukhanov – will become still more clear if you
remember that Martov belonged to the same party with Dan for whom it
represented the highest triumph of the revolution.

Only now, as they observed the joy of the majority bubbling like a
fountain, did the Left Wing of the Soviet begin to understand in a
downright way how isolated was this highest organ of the official
democracy when the genuine democracy came into the streets. For
thirty-six hours these people had been alternately disappearing behind
the scenes, running to a telephone booth to get in touch with
headquarters or with Kerensky at the front, to demand troops, to appeal,
to urge, to beseech, to dispatch agitators and ever more agitators, and
again to come back and wait. The danger was past, but the fear retained
its momentum. The tramping steps of the “loyal” at five o’clock in the
morning therefore sounded to their ears like a symphony of liberation.
At last from the tribune came frank speeches about the lucky putting
down of an armed revolt, and about the necessity of settling with the
Bolsheviks this time for good. That detachment which entered the Tauride
Palace had not come from the front, however, as many in the heat of the
moment thought. It had been hand-picked from the Petrograd garrison –
chiefly from the three most backward guard battalions, the
Preobrazhensky, the Semenovsky and the Izmailovsky. On the 3rd of June
these regiments had declared themselves neutral, and vain efforts had
been made to capture them with the authority of the government and the
Executive Committee. The soldiers sat gloomily in their barracks
waiting. Only in the afternoon of July 4th did the authorities at last
discover an effective means of influencing them. They showed the
Preobrazhentsi documents demonstrating as plain as 2+2=4 that Lenin was
a German spy. That moved them. The news flew round the regiments.
Officers, members of the regimental committee, agitators of the
Executive Committee, were active everywhere. The mood of the neutral
battalions changed. By dawn, when there was no longer any need of them,
it became possible to assemble them and lead them through the deserted
streets to the empty Tauride Palace. The Marseillaise was played that
night by the band of the Izmailovsky regiment – the same reactionary
regiment to which on December 3, 1905 had been intrusted the task of
arresting the first Petrograd Soviet of Workers’ Deputies, in session
with Trotsky in the chair. The blind director of the historic drama
achieves striking theatrical effects at every step without striving
after them; he simply gives a loose rein to the logic of events.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

WHEN the streets had been cleansed of the masses, the young government
of the revolution stretched out its gouty limbs. Workers’
representatives were arrested, weapons were seized, one district of the
town was cut off from another. At about six o’clock in the morning an
automobile stopped in front of the editorial office of _Pravda_.[3] It
was loaded with junkers and soldiers with a machine gun which was
immediately set up at the window. After the departure of these uninvited
guests the office was a picture of destruction: desk drawers smashed
open, the floor heaped with torn-up manuscripts, the telephones ripped
loose. The sentries and employees of the office had been beaten up and
arrested. A still more violent attack was made on the printing plant for
whose purchase the workers had been collecting money during the last
three months. The rotary presses were destroyed, monotypes ruined,
linotype machines smashed to pieces. The Bolsheviks were wrong, it
seems, when they accused the Kerensky government of lacking energy!

“Generally speaking, the streets had now become normal,” writes
Sukhanov. “There were almost no crowds or street meetings; almost all
the stores were open.” In the morning the summons of the Bolsheviks to
stop the demonstration – the last product of the destroyed printing
plant – was distributed. Cossacks and junkers were arresting sailors,
soldiers and workers on the streets, and sending them to jail or to the
guardhouses. In the stores and on the sidewalks the talk was of German
money. They arrested everybody who made a peep in defense of the
Bolsheviks. “It was no longer possible to declare Lenin an honest man –
they would take you to the police station.” Sukhanov as always appears
as an attentive observer of what is happening on the streets of the
bourgeoisie, the intelligentsia, the burghers. But things looked
different in the workers’ districts. The factories and shops were still
closed. The mood was vigilant. Rumors went round that troops had arrived
from the front. The streets of the Vyborg section were filled with
groups discussing what to do in case of attack. “The Red Guards and the
factory youth in general,” says Metelev, “were getting ready to
penetrate the Peter and Paul fortress and support the detachment
besieged there, concealing hand grenades in their pockets, in their
shoes, under their coats. They crossed the river in row-boats and partly
by the bridges.” The typesetter, Smirnov, from the Kolomensky district,
remembers: “I saw a tugboat with naval cadets coming down the Neva from
Duderhoff and Oranienbaum. Toward two o’clock the situation cleared up
in the bad sense ... I saw how the sailors one by one were returning to
Kronstadt along the back streets ... The story was being spread that all
Bolsheviks were German spies. A vile hue and cry was raised ...” The
historian, Miliukov, sums it all up with satisfaction: “The mood and
personnel of the public on the streets had completely changed. By
evening Petrograd was entirely tranquil.”

So long as the troops from the front had not arrived, Petrograd
headquarters, with the political co-operation of the Compromisers,
continued to disguise its intentions. In the afternoon some members of
the Executive Committee, with Lieber at their head, came to the Palace
of Kshesinskaia for a conference with the Bolshevik leaders. That visit
alone testified to a very peaceable feeling. According to the agreement
then arrived at, the Bolsheviks were to induce the sailors to return to
Kronstadt, to withdraw the machine gun company from Peter and Paul
fortress, and to remove the patrols and armored cars from their
positions. The government, on its part, promised not to permit any
pogroms or repressions against the Bolsheviks, and to liberate all
arrested persons except those who had engaged in criminal activities.

But the agreement did not last long. As the rumors spread about German
money and the approach of troops from the front, more and more
detachments and small groups were discovered in the garrison mindful of
their loyalty to the government and to Kerensky. They sent delegates to
the Tauride Palace or to the district staff. Finally echelons from the
front actually began to arrive. The mood in compromise spheres grew
fiercer and fiercer from hour to hour. The troops from the front had
arrived all ready to snatch the capital with bloody hands from the
agents of the Kaiser. Now that it was clear the troops were not needed,
it became necessary to justify sending for them. To avoid falling under
suspicion themselves, the Compromisers tried with all their might to
show the commanders that Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries belong to
the same camp with them, and that Bolsheviks are a common enemy. When
Kamenev tried to remind the members of the præsidium of the Executive
Committee about the agreement arrived at a few hours before, Lieber
answered in the tone of an iron-hearted statesman: “The correlation of
forces has now changed.” Lieber had learned from the popular speeches of
Lassalle that cannon is an important part of a constitution. A
delegation of Kronstadters headed by Raskolnikov was several times
summoned before the military commission of the Executive Committee,
where the demands, increasing from hour to hour, at last resolved
themselves into an ultimatum from Lieber: that they should agree at once
to the disarming of the Kronstadt men. “Departing from the session of
the military commission,” related Raskolnikov, “we renewed our
conferences with Trotsky and Kamenev. Lyev Davidovich (Trotsky) advised
us immediately and secretly to send the Kronstadters home. A decision
was adopted to send comrades around the barracks to warn the
Kronstadters that they were going to be forcibly disarmed.” A majority
of the Kronstadters got away in time. Only a few detachments remained in
the house of Kshesinskaia and the Peter and Paul fortress.

With the knowledge and consent of the minister-socialists, Prince Lvov
had already on July 4 given General Polovtsev a written order to “arrest
the Bolsheviks occupying the house of Kshesinskaia, clear out the house,
and occupy it with troops.” At this time, after the destruction of the
editorial office and printing plant, the question of the fate of the
central headquarters of the Bolsheviks became a very vital one. It was
necessary to put the residence in a state of defense. The Military
Organization appointed Raskolnikov commander of the building. He took
his duties in a broad way – in a Kronstadt way – sent requisitions for
cannon and even ordered a small warship to enter the mouth of the Neva.
Raskolnikov subsequently explained this step in the following manner:
“These military preparations were of course made on my part not merely
with a view to self-defense, since there was a smell in the air not only
of powder but of pogroms ... I also thought – and not, I believe,
without foundation – that one good warship in the mouth of the Neva
would be enough to considerably shake the resolution of the Provisional
Government.” All this is rather indefinite and none too serious. We may
rather assume that at five o’clock in the afternoon of July 5th the
leaders of the Military Organization, including Raskolnikov, had not yet
estimated the extent of the changes in the situation, and hence at that
moment, when the armed demonstration was compelled to beat a hasty
retreat in order not to turn into an armed insurrection imposed by the
enemy, some of the military leaders made certain accidental and not well
thought-out steps forward. The young Kronstadt leaders did in this first
action overreach themselves. But can you make a revolution without the
help of people who overreach themselves? Indeed, does not a certain
percentage of light-mindedness enter as a constituent part into all
great human deeds? This time it came to nothing more than instructions,
and these moreover were soon annulled by Raskolnikov himself. During
this time more and more alarming news was pouring into the place. One
man had seen in the windows of a house on the opposite shore of the Neva
machine guns aimed at the Palace of Kshesinskaia; another had observed a
column of armored automobiles travelling in the same direction; a third
brought news of the approach of a detachment of Cossacks. Two members of
the Military Organization were sent to the commander of the district to
negotiate. Polovtsev assured the emissaries that the raid on _Pravda_
had been made without his knowledge, and that no repressions were in
preparation against the Military Organization. In reality he was only
awaiting sufficient reinforcements from the front.

During this time, while Kronstadt was retreating, the Baltic Fleet as a
whole was still only getting ready to advance. The principal part of the
fleet was in the Finland waters, with a total of about 70,000 sailors.
An army corps was also located in Finland, and ten thousand Russian
workers were in the port factories of Helsingfors. That was a good-sized
fist of the revolution. The pressure of the sailors and soldiers was so
irresistible that even the Helsingfors committee of the Social
Revolutionaries had come out against the Coalition, and in consequence
all the soviet bodies of the fleet and army in Finland had unanimously
demanded that the Executive Committee take the power. In support of
their demand the Baltic men were ready at any moment to move into the
mouth of the Neva. They were restrained, however, by the fear of
weakening the naval line of defense, and making it easy for the German
fleet to attack Kronstadt and Petrograd.

But here something completely unexpected occurred. The Central Committee
of the Baltic Fleet – the so-called Centrobalt – called on the 4th of
July an extraordinary session of the ship committees at which the
president, Dybenko, read two secret orders just received by the fleet
commander and signed by the assistant minister of the navy Dudarev. The
first obliged the Admiral Verderevsky to send four destroyers to
Petrograd to prevent by force the landing of sailors from the side of
Kronstadt; the second demanded of the commander of the fleet that he
should not on any pretext permit the departure of ships from Helsingfors
to Kronstadt, not hesitating to sink disobedient ships with submarines.
Finding himself between two fires, and worried most of all about his own
head, the admiral anticipated events by turning over the telegram to the
Centrobalt with the announcement that he would not carry out the orders
even if countersigned by the Centrobalt. The reading of the telegram
startled the sailors. To be sure, they had been ready on any pretext to
abuse Kerensky and the Compromisers in no kind-hearted terms. But up to
now this had been in their eyes an intra-soviet struggle. A majority in
the Executive Committee belonged to the same parties as the majority in
the Regional Committee of Finland which had just come out for a soviet
government. It seemed clear enough that neither Mensheviks nor Social
Revolutionaries could possibly approve the sinking of ships which had
come out for the power of the Executive Committee. How could an old
naval officer like Dudarev get mixed up in a family quarrel of the
soviets, turning it into a naval battle? Only yesterday the big
battleships had been officially regarded as the bulwark of the
revolution – and this in contrast to the backward destroyers and
submarines, which had hardly been touched by revolutionary propaganda.
Could it be that the government now seriously intended to sink the
battleships with the help of the submarines?

These facts simply could not find their way into the stubborn skulls of
the sailors. That order which justifiably seemed to them to belong to
the realm of nightmare was nevertheless a legitimate July harvest of the
March sowing. Already in April the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries
had begun to appeal to the provinces against Petrograd, to the soldiers
against the workers, to the cavalry against the machine-gunners. They
had given the troops representative privileges in the soviets above the
factories; they had favored the small and scattered enterprises as
against the giants of the metal industry. Themselves representing the
past, they had sought support in backwardness of all kinds. With the
ground slipping under their feet, they were now inciting the rear guard
against the advance guard. Politics has its own logic, especially in
times of revolution. Pressed from all sides, the Compromisers had found
themselves obliged to direct Admiral Verderevsky to sink the more
advanced battleships. Unfortunately for the Compromisers, the backward
ones upon whom they were relying were more and more striving to catch up
to those in advance. The submarine command was no less indignant at
Dudarev’s orders than the commanders of the battleships.

The men at the head of Centrobalt were not at all of the Hamlet type.
They lost no time in passing a resolution, together with the members of
the ship committees, to send immediately to Petrograd the squadron
destroyer Orpheus, designated for the sinking of the Kronstadters, in
the first place to get information as to what was happening there, and
in the second “to arrest the Assistant-Minister of the Navy, Dudarev.”
However unexpected this decision may seem, it nevertheless clearly
reveals to what an extent the Baltic sailors were still inclined to
regard the Compromisers as a private opponent in contrast to any old
Dudarev whom they considered a public enemy. The Orpheus entered the
mouth of the Neva twenty-four hours after the ten thousand armed
Kronstadters had moored their vessels there. But “the correlation of
forces had changed.” For a whole day the crew was not permitted to
disembark. Only in the evening a delegation consisting of sixty-seven
sailors from the Centrobalt and the ship’s crews was admitted to the
joint session of the Executive Committees, then engaged in casting up
the first balance of the July Days. The victors were luxuriating in
their new victory. The spokesman, Voitinsky, was complacently describing
the hours of weakness and humiliation, in order the more sharply to
depict the triumph which followed. “The first unit which came to our
help,” he said, “was the armored cars. We firmly intended in case of
violence from the side of the armed gang to open fire ... Seeing the
extent of the danger threatening the revolution we issued an order to
certain units (on the front) to entrain and come to the capital ...” A
majority of that high assembly were breathing out hatred for the
Bolsheviks, and especially for the sailors. It was in this atmosphere
that the Baltic delegates arrived armed with an order for the arrest of
Dudarev. With a wild yelp, a pounding of fists on tables, and a stamping
of feet, the victors greeted the reading of the resolution of the Baltic
fleet. Arrest Dudarev? Why, this gallant captain of the first rank was
only fulfilling his sacred duty to the revolution, which they, the
sailors, the rebels, the counter-revolutionists, were stabbing in the
back! In a special resolution the joint session solemnly declared its
solidarity with Dudarev. The sailors looked at the orators and at each
other with startled eyes. Only at this moment did they begin to
understand what had been taking place before their eyes. The next day
the whole delegation was arrested, and completed its political education
in jail! Immediately after that, the president of the Centrobalt, the
non-commissioned naval officer Dybenko, who had followed them up, was
arrested, and after him also Admiral Verderevsky who had been summoned
to the capital to explain matters.

On the morning of the 6th the workers went back to work. Only the troops
summoned from the front were now demonstrating in the streets. Agents of
the Intelligence Service were examining passports and making arrests
right and left. A young worker, Voinov, who was distributing the
__Pravda_ Leaflet_, published in place of the destroyed Bolshevik paper,
was killed in the streets by a gang – perhaps composed of these same
intelligence men. The Black Hundred elements were acquiring a taste for
the putting down of revolts. Plundering, violence, and in some places
shooting continued in different parts of the city. In the course of the
day echelon after echelon arrived from the front – the Cavalier
Division, the Don Cossack regiment, the Uhlan division, the Izborsky,
the Malorossisky, the Dragoon regiment, and others. “The Cossack
divisions, arriving in great numbers,” writes Gorky’s paper, “were in a
very aggressive mood.” Machine-gunfire was opened on the newly arrived
Izborsky regiment in two parts of the city. In both cases the machine
guns were found in an attic; those guilty were not discovered. In other
places, too, the arriving troops were shot at. The deliberate madness of
this shooting deeply disturbed the workers. It was clear that
experienced provocateurs were greeting the soldiers with lead with a
view to anti-Bolshevik inoculation. The workers were eager to explain
this to the arriving soldiers, but they were denied access to them. For
the first time since the February days the junker or the officer stood
between the worker and soldier.

The Compromisers joyfully welcomed the arriving regiments. At a meeting
of representatives of the troops, in the presence of a great number of
officers and junkers, our friend Voitinsky unctuously explained: “Now
along Milliony Street troops and armored cars are travelling towards
Palace Square to place themselves at the disposal of General Polovtsev,
and this is our real strength upon which we rely.” To act as a political
covering, four socialist assistants were appointed to the commander of
the district: Avksentiev and Gotz from the Executive Committee, Skobelev
and Chernov from the Provisional Government. But that did not save the
commander. Kerensky subsequently boasted to the White Guards that on
returning from the front in the July Days, he had discharged General
Polovtsev for “irresolution.”

Now at last it was possible to solve the so long postponed problem: to
clean up that wasp’s nest of Bolsheviks in the house of Kshesinskaia. In
social life in general, and particularly in a time of revolution,
secondary facts which act upon the imagination sometimes acquire through
their symbolic meaning an enormous significance. Thus a
disproportionately large place in the struggle against the Bolsheviks
was occupied by the question of the “seizure” by Lenin of the Palace of
Kshesinskaia, a court ballerina famous not so much for her art as for
her relations with the male representatives of the Romanov dynasty. Her
private palace was the fruit of these relations – the foundation of
which was laid down, it seems, by Nicholas II when still heir to the
throne. Before the war, people gossiped with a tinge of envious
respectfulness about this den of luxury, spurs, and diamonds located
opposite the Winter Palace. But in wartime they more frequently
remarked: “Stolen goods.” The soldiers expressed themselves even more
accurately. Arriving at a critical age, the ballerina took up a career
in patriotism. The outspoken Rodzianko has this to say on that subject:
“The high commander-in-chief (the Grand Duke Nikolai Nikolaievich)
remarked that he was aware of the participation and influence in
artillery matters of the ballerina, Kshesinskaia, through whom various
firms had received orders.” It is no wonder if after the revolution the
abandoned Palace of Kshesinskaia failed to awaken benevolent feelings
among the people. In those times when the revolution was making an
insatiable demand for quarters, the government never dared lay its hands
on a single private residence. To requisition the peasants’ horses for
the war – that is one thing; to requisition vacant palaces for the
revolution – that is quite another. But the masses of the people saw it
otherwise.

On a search for suitable quarters, a reserve armored-car division had
run into the residence of Kshesinskaia in the first days of March, and
occupied it: the ballerina had an excellent garage. The division gladly
turned over the upper story of the building to the Petrograd committee
of the Bolsheviks. The friendship of the Bolsheviks with this
armored-car division supplemented their friendship with the
machine-gunners. The occupation of the palace, which occurred a few
weeks before the arrival of Lenin, passed almost unnoticed at first. The
indignation against the usurpers grew with the growth of the influence
of the Bolsheviks. The wild stories in the newspapers about how Lenin
was occupying the boudoir of the ballerina, and how all the decorations
of the palace had been shattered to pieces and torn up, were mere lies.
Lenin lived in the modest apartment of his sister. The ballerina’s
furnishings were put away by the commandant of the building and kept
under seal. Sukhanov, who visited the palace at the time of Lenin’s
arrival, has left an interesting description of the quarters. “The
chambers of the famous ballerina had a rather strange and inappropriate
look; the exquisite ceilings and walls did not harmonize at all with the
unpretentious furnishings, the primitive tables, chairs, and benches set
casually about according to the demands of business. In general there
was very little furniture. Kshesinskaia’s movable property had been put
away somewhere ...” Discreetly avoiding the question of the armored-car
division, the press represented Lenin as guilty of an armed seizure of
the house from the hands of a defenseless devotee of art. This theme was
developed in leading editorials and _feuilletons_. Tattered workers and
soldiers among those velvets and silks and beautiful rugs! All the
drawing-rooms of the capital shuddered with moral indignation. As once
the Girondists held the Jacobins responsible for the September murders,
the disappearance of mattresses in the barracks, and the campaign for an
agrarian law, so now the Kadets and democrats accused the Bolsheviks of
undermining the pillars of human morality and hawking and spitting on
the polished floors of the Palace of Kshesinskaia. The dynastic
ballerina became a symbol of culture trampled under the hoofs of
barbarism. This apotheosis gave wings to the lady herself, and she
complained to the court. The court decided that the Bolsheviks should be
removed from the premises. But that was not quite so easy to do. “The
armored cars on duty in the courtyard looked sufficiently imposing,”
remembers Zalezhsky, then a member of the Petrograd committee. Moreover
the Machine Gun regiment, and other units too, were ready in case of
need to back up the armored cars. On May 25, the bureau of the Executive
Committee, upon a complaint from the ballerina’s lawyer, recognized that
“the interests of the revolution demand submission to the decisions of
the court.” Beyond this platonic aphorism, however, the Compromisers did
not venture – to the extreme distress of the ballerina, who was not by
nature inclined to Platonism.

The Central Committee, the Petrograd committee, and the Military
Organization, continued to work in the palace side by side. “A
continuous mass of people crowded into the house of Kshesinskaia,” says
Raskolnikov. “Some would come on business to this or that secretariat,
others to the literature department, others to the editorial offices of
the soldiers’ _Pravda_, others to some meeting or other. Meetings took
place very often, sometimes continually – either in the spacious wide
hall below, or in the room upstairs with a long table which had
evidently been the dining-room of the ballerina.” From the palace
balcony, above which waved the impressive banner of the Central
Committee, orators carried on a continuous mass meeting, not only by day
but by night. Often out of the darkness some military detachment would
approach the building, or some crowd of workers with a demand for an
orator. Accidental groups of citizens would also stop before the
balcony, their curiosity aroused by some uproar in the newspapers.
During the critical days hostile manifestations would draw near to the
building for a time, demanding the arrest of Lenin and the driving out
of the Bolsheviks. Under the streams of people flowing past the palace
one felt the seething depths of the revolution. The house of
Kshesinskaia reached its apogee in the July days. “The chief
headquarters of the movement,” says Miliukov, “was not the Tauride
Palace, but Lenin’s citadel, the house of Kshesinskaia with its classic
balcony.” The putting down of the demonstration led fatally to the
break-up of this staff headquarters of the Bolsheviks.

At three o’clock in the morning there advanced against the house of
Kshesinskaia and the Peter and Paul fortress – separated from each other
by a strip of water – the reserve battalion of the Petrograd regiment, a
machine gun detachment, a company of Semenovtsi, a company of
Preobrazhentsi, the training squad of the Volynsky regiment, two cannon,
and a detachment of eight armored cars. At seven o’clock in the morning
an assistant of the commander of the district, the Social Revolutionary
Kuzmin, demanded that the house be vacated. Not wishing to surrender
their weapons, the Kronstadters, of whom there remained only a hundred
and twenty in the palace, dashed across to the Peter and Paul fortress.
When the government troops occupied the house, they found nobody there
but a few employees. There then remained the problem of the Peter and
Paul fortress. Young Red Guards, as we remember, had gone over from the
Vyborg district in order in case of need to help the sailors. “On the
fortress walls,” one of them relates, “stood a number of cannon,
evidently set up by the sailors in case anything should happen ... It
began to look like bloody doings.” But diplomatic negotiations settled
the problem peacefully. At the direction of the Central Committee,
Stalin proposed to the compromise leaders to adopt joint measures for
the bloodless termination of the action of the Kronstadt men. In company
with the Menshevik, Bogdanov, he had no difficulty in persuading the
sailors to accept Lieber’s ultimatum of the day before. When the
government armored cars approached the fortress, a deputation came out
of its gates announcing that the garrison would submit to the Executive
Committee. The weapons given up by the sailors and soldiers were carried
away in trucks. The disarmed sailors were sent to the barges for return
to Kronstadt. The surrender of the fortress may be considered the
concluding episode of the July movement. A bicycle brigade from the
front occupied the house of Kshesinskaia and the Peter and Paul
fortress. This brigade in its turn, will go over on the eve of the
October revolution, to the Bolsheviks.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Members of the regiments named Preobrazhensky, etc. – _Trans._

2. Agents of the tsarist secret police.

3. Official organ of the Bolshevik party.



CHAPTER 26 COULD THE BOLSHEVIKS HAVE SEIZED THE POWER IN JULY?


 

The demonstration forbidden by the government and the Executive
Committee had been a colossal one. On the second day not less than five
hundred thousand people participated. Sukhanov, who cannot find words
strong enough for the “blood and filth” of the July Days, nevertheless
writes: “Political results aside, it was impossible not to look with
admiration upon that amazing movement of the popular masses. Even while
deeming it fatal, one could not but feel a rapture in its gigantic
spontaneous scope.” According to the reckonings of the Commission of
Inquiry, 29 men were killed and 114 wounded – about an equal number on
each side.

That the movement had begun from below, irrespective of the Bolsheviks –
to a certain extent against their will – was at first recognized even by
the Compromisers. But on the night of July 3, and yet more on the
following day, official opinion began to change. The movement was
declared an insurrection, the Bolsheviks its organizers. “Under the
slogan, ‘All Power to the Soviets’,” writes Stankevich, a man close to
Kerensky, “there occurred an organized insurrection of the Bolsheviks
against the majority of the soviets, consisting at that time of the
defensist parties.” This charge of organizing an insurrection was
something more than a method of political struggle. During the month of
June those people had well convinced themselves of the strong influence
of the Bolsheviks on the masses, and they now simply refused to believe
that a movement of workers and soldiers could have surged up over the
heads of the Bolsheviks. Trotsky tried to explain the situation at a
session of the Executive Committee: “They accuse us of creating the mood
of the masses; that is wrong, we only tried to formulate it.” In books
published by their enemies after the October revolution, particularly in
Sukhanov, you will find it asserted that the Bolsheviks covered up their
actual aim only in consequence of the defeat of the July insurrection,
hiding behind the spontaneous movement of the masses. But could one
possibly conceal, like a buried treasure, the plans of an armed
insurrection which drew into its whirlpool hundreds of thousands of
people? Were not the Bolsheviks compelled in October to summon the
masses quite openly to insurrection, and to make preparations for it
before the eyes of all? If no one discovered such a plan in July, it is
only because there was none. The entry of the machine-gunners and
Kronstadters into the Peter and Paul fortress with the consent of its
permanent garrison – upon which “seizure” the Compromisers especially
insist – was not at all an act of armed insurrection. That building
situated on an island – a prison rather than a military post – might
perhaps serve as a refuge for men in retreat, but it offers nothing
whatever to attacking forces. In making their way to the Tauride Palace
the demonstrators passed calmly by the most important government
buildings – to occupy which the Putilov detachment of the Red Guard
would have been an adequate force. They took possession of the Peter and
Paul fortress exactly as they took possession of the streets, the sentry
posts, the public squares. An additional motive was its nearness to the
Palace of Kshesinskaia to whose aid it could have come in case of need.

The Bolsheviks made every effort to reduce the July movement to a
demonstration. But did it not, nevertheless, by the very logic of things
transcend these limits? This political question is harder to answer than
the criminal indictment. Appraising the July Days immediately after they
occurred, Lenin wrote: “An anti-government demonstration – that would be
the most formally accurate description of the events. But the point is
that this was no ordinary demonstration. It was something considerably
more than a demonstration and less than a revolution.” When the masses
once get hold of some idea, they want to realize it. Although trusting
the Bolshevik party, the workers, and still more the soldiers, had not
yet acquired a conviction that they ought to come out only upon the
summons of the party and under its leadership. The experiences of
February and April had taught them rather the opposite. When Lenin said
in May that the workers and peasants were a hundred times more
revolutionary than the party, he undoubtedly generalized this February
and April experience. But the masses had also generalized the experience
in their own way. They were saying to themselves: “Even the Bolsheviks
are dawdling and holding us back.” The demonstrators were entirely ready
in the July Days to liquidate the official government if that should
seem necessary in the course of business. In case of resistance from the
bourgeoisie they were ready to employ arms. To that extent there was an
element of armed insurrection. If, in spite of this, it was not carried
through even to the middle – to say nothing of the end – that is because
the Compromisers confused the whole picture.

In the first volume of this work we described in detail the paradox of
the February régime. The petty bourgeois democrats, Mensheviks and
Social Revolutionaries received the power from the hands of the
revolutionary people. They had not set themselves the task of winning
it. They had not conquered the power. They were put in possession of it
against their will. Against the will of the masses, they tried to hand
over this power to the imperialist bourgeoisie. The people did not trust
the Liberals, but they trusted the Compromisers. The Compromisers,
however, did not trust themselves. And in this they were in a way right.
Even in turning over the whole power to the bourgeoisie, the democrats
had continued to be somebody. But once they had seized the power in
their own hands, they would have become nothing at all. From the
democrats the power would almost automatically have slid into the hands
of the Bolsheviks. This was inevitable, for it was involved in the
organic insignificance of the Russian democracy.

The July demonstrators wanted to turn over the power to the soviets, but
for this the soviets had to agree to take it. Even in the capital,
however, where a majority of the workers and the active elements of the
garrison were already for the Bolsheviks, a majority in the Soviet –
owing to that law of inertia which applies to every representative
system – still belonged to those petty bourgeois parties who regarded an
attempt against the power of the bourgeoisie as an attempt against
themselves. The workers and soldiers felt clearly enough the contrast
between their moods and the policy of the Soviet – that is, between
their today and their yesterday. In coming out for a government of the
soviets, they by no means gave their confidence to the compromisist
majority in those soviets. But they did not know how to settle with this
majority. To overthrow it by violence would have meant to dissolve the
soviets instead of giving them the power. Before they could find the
path to a change of the personal composition of the soviets, the workers
and soldiers tried to subject the soviets to their will by the method of
direct action.

In a proclamation of the two Executive Committees on the subject of the
July Days, the Compromisers indignantly appealed to the workers and
soldiers against the demonstrators, who, they alleged, had “attempted by
force of arms to impose their will upon your elected representatives.”
As though the demonstrators and the electors were not merely two names
for the same workers and soldiers! As though electors have not a right
to impose their will upon those they have elected! And as though this
will consisted of anything else but the demand that they should fulfill
their duty – namely, get possession of the power in the interests of the
people! The masses concentrated around the Tauride Palace were shouting
into the ears of the Executive Committee the very same phrase which that
nameless worker had thrust up at Chernov with his horny fist: “Take the
power when they give it to you!” In answer the Compromisers sent for the
Cossacks. These gentlemen of the democracy preferred a civil war against
the people to a bloodless transfer of power into their own hands. It was
the White Guards who fired the first shots, but the political atmosphere
of the civil war was created by the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries.

Running into this armed resistance from the very institution to which
they wished to turn over the power, the workers and soldiers lost a
clear sense of their goal. From their mighty mass movement the political
axis had been torn out. The July campaign was thus reduced to a
demonstration partially carried out with the instruments of armed
insurrection. Or, it would be equally true to say: It was a semi –
insurrection, directed toward goals which did not permit other methods
than those proper to a demonstration.

Although declining the power, the Compromisers had not wholly given it
over to the Liberals. This was both because they feared them – the petty
bourgeois always fears the big bourgeois – and because they feared for
them. A pure Kadet ministry would have been immediately overthrown by
the masses. Moreover, as Miliukov rightly points out, “In struggling
against independent armed actions, the Executive Committee of the Soviet
was fortifying its own right, proclaimed in the tumultuous days of the
20th and 21st of April, to deploy at its own discretion the armed forces
of the Petrograd garrison.” The Compromisers were continuing to steal
the power from under their own pillows. In order to offer armed
resistance to those who had written on their banners “All Power to the
Soviets,” the Soviet was obliged actually to concentrate the power in
its hands.

The Executive Committee went even farther in the July Days: it formally
proclaimed its sovereignty. “If the revolutionary democracy deemed
necessary a transfer of all power into the hands of the soviets,” says
their resolution of July 4, “the decision of that question could belong
only to a plenary session of the Executive Committees.” While declaring
the demonstration in favor of the soviet power a counter-revolutionary
insurrection, the Executive Committee thus at the same time constituted
itself the supreme power, and decided the fate of the government.

When at dawn on the 5th of July the “loyal troops” entered the Tauride
Palace, their commander reported that his detachment submitted to the
Executive Committee wholly and without reserve. Not a word about the
government! But the rebels also wanted to submit to the Executive
Committee in the character of a sovereign power. In surrendering the
Peter and Paul fortress, the garrison considered it sufficient to
announce their submission to the Executive Committee. Nobody demanded a
submission to the official authority. The troops summoned from the front
also placed themselves wholly at the disposal of the Executive
Committee. Why, in that case, was there any shedding of blood?

If this conflict had taken place toward the end of the Middle Ages, both
sides in slaughtering each other would have cited the same text from the
Bible. Formalist historians would afterwards have come to the conclusion
that they were fighting about the correct interpretation of texts. The
craftsmen and illiterate peasants of the Middle Ages had a strange
passion, as is well known, for allowing themselves to be killed in the
cause of philological subtleties in the Revelations of Saint John, just
as the Russian Separatists submitted to extermination in order to decide
the question whether one should cross himself with two fingers or three.
In reality there lies hidden under such symbolic formulæ – in the Middle
Ages no less than now – a conflict of life interests which we must learn
to uncover. The very same verse of the Evangelist meant serfdom for
some, freedom for others.

But there is a far more fresh and modern analogy. In the June days of
1848 in France, the same shout went up on both sides of the barricades:
“Long live the Republic!” To the petty bourgeois idealist, therefore,
the June fight has seemed a misunderstanding caused by the inattention
of one side, the hot-headedness of the other. In reality the bourgeoisie
wanted a republic for themselves, the workers a republic for everybody.
Political slogans serve oftener to disguise interests than to call them
by name.

In spite of the paradoxical character of the February régime – scribbled
all over to boot with Marxian and Narodnik hieroglyphics by the
Compromisers – the actual interrelation of classes is easy enough to
see. It is only necessary to keep in view the twofold nature of the
compromise parties. The educated petty bourgeois oriented himself upon
the workers and peasants, but hobnobbed with the titled landlords and
owners of sugar factories. While forming a part of the soviet system,
through which the demands of the lower classes found their way up to the
official state, the Executive Committee served at the same time as a
political screen for the bourgeoisie. The possessing classes “submitted”
to the Executive Committee so long as it pushed the power over to their
side. The masses submitted to the Executive Committee, in so far as they
hoped it might become an instrument of the rule of workers and peasants.
Contradictory class tendencies were intersecting in the Tauride Palace
and they both covered themselves with the name of the Executive
Committee – the one through unconscious trustfulness, the other with
cold-blooded calculation. The struggle was about nothing more or less
than the question who was to rule the country, the bourgeoisie or the
proletariat?

But if the Compromisers did not want to take the power, and the
bourgeoisie did not have the strength to take it, maybe the Bolsheviks
could have seized the helm in July? In the course of those two critical
days the power in Petrograd completely dropped from the hands of the
governmental institutions. The Executive Committee then felt for the
first time its own complete impotence. In such circumstances it would
have been easy enough for the Bolsheviks to seize the power. They could
have seized the power, too, at certain individual points in the
provinces. That being the case, was the Bolshevik party right in
refraining from an insurrection? Might they not, fortifying themselves
in the capital and in certain industrial districts, have subsequently
extended their rule to the whole country? That is an important question.
Nothing gave more help to the triumph of imperialism and reaction in
Europe at the end of the war than those few months of Kerenskyism,
exhausting revolutionary Russia and immeasurably damaging her moral
authority in the eyes of the warring armies and of the toiling masses of
Europe who had been hopefully awaiting some new word from the
revolution. To shorten the birth pains of the proletarian revolution by
four months would have been an immense gain. The Bolsheviks would have
received the country in a less exhausted condition; the authority of the
revolution in Europe would have been less undermined. This would not
only have given the soviets an immense predominance in conducting the
negotiations with Germany, but would have exerted a mighty influence on
the fortunes of war and peace in Europe. The prospect was only too
enticing!

But nevertheless the leadership of the party was completely right in not
taking the road of armed insurrection. It is not enough to seize the
power – you have to hold it. When in October the Bolsheviks did decide
that their hour had struck, the most difficult days came after the
seizure of power. It requires the highest tension of the forces of the
working class to sustain the innumerable attacks of an enemy. In July
even the Petrograd workers did not yet possess that preparedness for
infinite struggle. Although able to seize the power, they nevertheless
offered it to the Executive Committee. The proletariat of the capital,
although inclining toward the Bolsheviks in its overwhelming majority,
had still not broken the February umbilical cord attaching it to the
Compromisers. Many still cherished the illusion that everything could be
obtained by words and demonstrations – that by frightening the
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries you could get them to carry out a
common policy with the Bolsheviks. Even the advanced sections of the
class had no clear idea by which roads it was possible to arrive at the
power. Lenin wrote soon after: “The real mistake of our party on the 3rd
and 4th of July, as events now reveal, was only this ... that the party
still considered possible a peaceful development of the political
transformation by way of a change of policy on the part of the soviets.
In reality the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries had already tangled
and bound themselves up by compromisism with the bourgeoisie, and the
bourgeoisie had become so counterrevolutionary, that there was no longer
any use talking about a peaceful development.”

If the proletariat was not politically homogeneous and not sufficiently
resolute, still less so was the peasant army. By its conduct on the 3rd
and 4th of July the garrison made it wholly possible for the Bolsheviks
to seize the power, but nevertheless there were neutral units which by
the evening of the 4th were decisively inclining to the side of the
patriotic party. By July 5, the neutral regiments had taken their stand
with the Executive Committee, and the regiments tending towards
Bolshevism were striving to assume a color of neutrality. It was this,
far more than the belated arrival of troops from the front, that gave a
free hand to the authorities. If the Bolsheviks in the heat of the
moment had seized the power on the evening of July 4th, the Petrograd
garrison would not itself have held it, and would have hindered the
workers from defending it against the inevitable blow from without.

The situation looked still less favorable in the active army. The
struggle for peace and land had made the army extremely hospitable,
especially since the June offensive, to the slogans of the Bolsheviks,
but the so-called “spontaneous” Bolshevism of the soldier was not in the
least identified in his consciousness with a definite party, with its
Central Committee, or its leaders. The soldiers’ letters of those times
clearly depict this condition of the army. “Remember, Messrs Ministers,
and all you chief leaders,” writes the crooked hand of a soldier from
the front, “we don’t understand very well about parties, only that the
future and the past are not far off. The Tzar sent you to Siberia and
sat you in jail, and we will sit you on our bayonets.” In these lines an
extreme bitterness against those higher up who are deceiving the
soldiers, is united with a recognition of the soldiers’ own
helplessness. “We don’t understand very well about parties.” The army
mutinied continually against the war and the officers, making use of
slogans from the Bolshevik dictionary. But it was far from ready to
raise an insurrection in order to give the power to the Bolshevik party.
For the subduing of Petrograd the government picked out reliable
detachments from the troops nearest the capital without encountering
active resistance from other detachments, and it transported the
echelons without resistance from the railroad workers. The discontented,
rebellious, easily excitable army was still formless politically. It
still contained too few compact Bolshevik nuclei capable of giving a
single direction to the thought and activity of the crumbly soldier
mass.

On the other hand the Compromisers, in order to turn the front against
Petrograd and the peasant rear, made successful use of that poisoned
weapon which in March the reaction had so carefully tried to bring to
bear against the Soviet. The Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks said
to the soldiers on the front: The Petrograd garrison, under the
influence of the Bolsheviks, is refusing to send replacements; the
workers do not want to work for the necessities of the front; if the
peasant listens to the Bolsheviks and seizes the land now, nothing will
be left for the men at the front. The soldiers needed some supplementary
experience before they would understand for whom the government was
saving the land, whether for the peasants at the front or the landlords.

Between Petrograd and the active army stood the provinces. Their
reaction to the July events serves in itself as a very important a
posteriori criterion for deciding the question whether the Bolsheviks
were right in refraining from a direct struggle for power in July. Even
in Moscow the pulse of the revolution was incomparably weaker than in
Petrograd. In the session of the Moscow committee of the Bolsheviks
stormy debates arose. Individuals belonging to the extreme left wing of
the party – such, for example, as Bubnov – proposed that they occupy the
Post Office, the telegraph and telephone stations, the editorial offices
of _Russkoe Slov_ – that is, that they take the road of insurrection.
The committee, very moderate in its general spirit, decisively rejected
these proposals, considering that the Moscow masses were not in the
least ready for such action. It was nevertheless decided to hold a
demonstration in spite of the veto of the Soviet. A considerable crowd
of workers marched to Skobelevsky Square with the same slogans as in
Petrograd, but with far from the same enthusiasm. The garrison reacted
by no means unanimously; individual units joined the procession, but
only one of them came fully armed. The artillery soldier, Davidovsky,
who subsequently took a serious part in the October struggles, testifies
in his memoirs that Moscow was not prepared for the July Days, and that
the leaders of the demonstration were left with a bad taste in their
mouths by its unsuccess.

In Ivanovo-Voznesensk, the textile capital where the soviet was already
under the leadership of the Bolsheviks, news came of the events in
Petrograd, accompanied by a rumor that the Provisional Government had
fallen. At a night session of the Executive Committee it was resolved,
as a preliminary measure, to establish control over the telephone and
telegraph. Work was stopped in the factories on July 6. Forty thousand
took part in the demonstration, many of them armed. When it was learned
that the Petrograd demonstration had not led to victory, the
Ivanovo-Voznesensk soviet hastily beat a retreat.

In Riga, under influence of the news from Petrograd, a clash occurred on
the night of July 6 between Lettish sharpshooters inclined towards
Bolshevism and the “Battalion of Death,” the patriotic battalion being
compelled to retire. The Riga soviet adopted on that same night a
resolution in favor of a government of the soviets. Two days later a
similar resolution was adopted in Ekaterinburg, the capital of the
Urals. The fact that this slogan of Soviet Power, which had been
advanced in the early months only in the name of the party, became
henceforward the program of individual local soviets indubitably meant a
gigantic step forward. But from resolutions in favor of a Soviet Power
to insurrection under the banner of the Bolsheviks, there was still a
considerable road to travel.

In certain parts of the country the Petrograd events served as a
stimulus to set off acute conflicts of a private character. In
Nizhni-Novgorod, where some soldiers on furlough had long been resisting
their entrainment for the front, junkers sent from Moscow to enforce
orders aroused the indignation of two local regiments by their violence.
Shooting followed, and men were killed and wounded. The junkers
surrendered and were disarmed. The authorities disappeared. A punitive
expedition set out from Moscow with three kinds of troops. At its head
was the commander of the Moscow district, the impulsive Colonel
Verkhovsky – a future War Minister of Kerensky – and the president of
the Moscow soviet, the old Menshevik Khinchuk, a man of no military
temper, the future head of the cooperatives, and afterward soviet
ambassador in Berlin. However, they found nobody to subdue, as a
committee elected by the mutinous soldiers had fully restored order by
the time they arrived.

In Kiev, during approximately the same hours of the same night, and on
the same ground – refusal to go to the front – soldiers of the regiment
named after the Hetman Polubotko mutinied to the number of five
thousand, seized a store of weapons, occupied the fortress and the
district headquarters, and arrested the commander and the head of the
militia. The panic in the city lasted several hours, until by the
combined efforts of the military authorities, a committee of social
organizations, and the institutions of the central Ukrainian Rada, the
arrested were liberated and the greater part of the mutinous troops
disarmed.

In far away Krasnoyarsk the Bolsheviks, thanks to the mood of the
garrison, felt so strong that, in spite of the wave of reaction already
gathering in the country, they held a demonstration on July 9, in which
eight to ten thousand people took part, a majority of them soldiers. A
detachment of 400 soldiers with artillery was moved against Krasnoyarsk
from Irkutsk, led by the district military commander, the Social
Revolutionary, Krakovetsky. During the two days of conferences and
negotiations necessitated by the two-power régime, the punitive
detachment became so demoralized by the soldiers’ agitation that the
commissar hastened to send them back to Irkutsk. But Krasnoyarsk was
upon the whole an exception.

In a majority of the provinces and county seats, the situation was
incomparably less favorable. In Samara, for instance, the local
Bolshevik organization, upon receiving news of the fights in the
capital, “awaited the signal for action, although there was almost
nobody they could count on.” One of the local members of the party says:
“The workers had begun to sympathize with the Bolsheviks” but it was
impossible to hope that they would go into a fight; it was still less
possible to count on the soldiers. As for the Bolshevik organizations:
“They were altogether weak; we were a mere handful. In the soviet of
workers deputies there were a few Bolsheviks, but in the soldiers’
soviet there was, it seems, not a single one; and moreover the soviet
consisted almost exclusively of officers.” The principal cause of this
weak and unfavorable reaction of the country lay in the fact that the
provinces, having received the February revolution from the hands of
Petrograd without a struggle, were far slower than the capital in
digesting new facts and ideas. An additional period was necessary before
the vanguard could draw up to its own position the heavy reserves.

Thus the state of the popular consciousness – decisive factor in a
revolutionary policy – made impossible the seizure of power by the
Bolsheviks in July. At the same time the offensive on the front impelled
the party to oppose the demonstration. The collapse of the offensive was
absolutely inevitable. As a fact it had already begun, but the country
did not yet know it. The danger was that if the party were incautious,
the government might lay the blame upon the Bolsheviks for the
consequences of its own madness. The offensive must be given time to
exhaust itself. The Bolsheviks had no doubt that the break in the mood
of the masses would be very abrupt when it came. Then it would be clear
what should be undertaken. Their reckoning was absolutely right. Events,
however, have their own logic which takes no account of political
reckonings, and this time events came down cruelly on the heads of the
Bolsheviks.

The failure of the offensive became catastrophic on the 6th of July,
when the Germans broke through the Russian troops on a front twelve
_versts_[1] long and to a depth of ten _versts_. The breach became known
in the capital on July 7, at the very height of the punitive and
repressive activities. Many months later, when passions ought to have
quieted down a little, or at least become a little more sensible,
Stankevich – not one of the most vicious enemies of Bolshevism – was
nevertheless still writing about the “mysterious sequence of events” to
be observed in the breach at Tarnopol following just after the July Days
in Petrograd. Those people did not see, or did not want to see, the real
sequence of events – the fact that a hopeless offensive begun under the
whip of the Entente could not but lead to military catastrophe and,
simultaneously therewith, to an outbreak of indignation in the masses
deceived in their hopes of the revolution. But what difference does it
make what the real concatenation of events was? The temptation to link
up the Petrograd manifestation with the misfortune at the front was too
strong. The patriotic press not only did not conceal the reverses, but
exaggerated them with all its might, not hesitating even to reveal
military secrets – printing the names of divisions and regiments and
indicating their position. “Beginning on July 8,” Miliukov confesses,
“the newspapers began purposely to print outspoken telegrams from the
front which struck Russian society like a clap of thunder.” And that was
their purpose – to shock, to frighten, to deafen, in order the more
easily to link up the Bolsheviks with the Germans.

Provocation undoubtedly played a certain rôle in the events at the front
as well as on the streets of Petrograd. After the February revolution
the government had thrown over into the active army a large number of
former gendarmes and policemen. None of them of course wanted to fight.
They were more afraid of the Russian soldiers than of the Germans. In
order to get their past forgotten, they would simulate the most extreme
moods of the army, incite the soldiers against the officers, come out
loudest of all against discipline, and often openly give themselves out
for Bolsheviks. Bound naturally together as accomplices, they created a
kind of special Brotherhood of Cowardice and Villainy. Through them
would penetrate and quickly spread through the army the most fantastic
rumors, in which ultra-revolutionism was combined with Black Hundredism.
In critical hours these creatures would give the first signals for
panic. The press more than once referred to this demoralizing work of
the police and gendarmes. No less frequent references of this kind are
to be found in the secret documents of the army itself. But the high
command remained silent, preferring to identify the Black Hundred
provocateurs with the Bolsheviks. And now, after the collapse of the
offensive, this method was legalized, and the Menshevik papers
endeavored not to fall behind the dirtiest sheets of the chauvinists.
With shouts about “Anarcho-Bolsheviks” and German agents, and about
former gendarmes, they succeeded for a time in drowning out the question
of the general condition of the army and of the policy of peace. “Our
deep breach on the Lenin front,” Prince Lvov openly boasted, “has
incomparably more importance for Russia in my firm opinion than the
breach made by the Germans on the southwestern front ...” The respected
head of the government was like Rodzianko, the Lord Chamberlain, in that
he did not know when to keep still.

If it had been possible to restrain the masses from demonstrating on
July 3-4, the demonstration would inevitably have broken out as a result
of the Tarnopol breach. However, a delay even of a few days would have
brought important changes in the political situation. The movement would
have assumed at once a broader scope, taking in not only the provinces
but also, to a considerable degree, the front. The government would have
been exposed politically, and would have found it incomparably more
difficult to lay the blame upon “traitors” in the rear. The situation of
the Bolshevik party would have been more advantageous in every respect.
However, even in that case the thing could not have been carried to the
point of an immediate conquest of power. Only this much, indeed, can be
confidently affirmed: If the July movement had broken out a week later,
the reaction would not have come off so victorious. It was just that
“mysterious sequence” of the date of the demonstration and the date of
the breach which counted heavily against the Bolsheviks. The wave of
indignation and despair rolling back from the front fell in with the
wave of shattered hopes radiating from Petrograd. The lesson received by
the masses in the capital was too severe for anyone to think of an
immediate renewal of the struggle. Moreover the bitter feelings caused
by the meaningless defeat sought expression, and the patriots succeeded
to a certain extent in directing it against the Bolsheviks.

In April, June, and July, the principal actors were the same: the
Liberals, the Compromisers and the Bolsheviks. At all these stages the
masses were trying to crowd the bourgeoisie out of the government. But
the difference in the political consequences of mass interference in the
several cases was enormous. It was the bourgeoisie who suffered in
consequence of the “April days.” The annexation policy was condemned –
in words at least; the Kadet party was humiliated; the portfolio of
foreign affairs was taken from it. In June the movement came to nothing.
A gesture was made against the Bolsheviks, but the blow was not struck.
In July the Bolshevik party was accused of treason, shattered, deprived
of food and drink. Whereas in April Miliukov had been forced out of the
government, in July Lenin was forced underground.

What was the cause of this sharp change occurring in a period of ten
weeks? It is quite obvious that in the ruling circles a serious shift
had occurred to the side of the liberal bourgeoisie. However, in that
same period – April to July – the mood of the masses had sharply shifted
to the side of the Bolsheviks. These two opposing processes developed in
close dependence one upon the other. The more the workers and soldiers
closed up around the Bolsheviks, the more resolutely were the
Compromisers compelled to support the bourgeoisie. In April the leaders
of the Executive Committee, worrying about their own influence, could
still come one step to meet the masses and throw Miliukov overboard –
supplying him, to be sure, with a reliable life-belt. In July the
Compromisers joined the bourgeoisie and the officers in raiding the
Bolsheviks. The change in the correlation of forces was thus caused this
time, too, by a shift of the least stable of political forces, the petty
bourgeois democracy – its abrupt movement to the side of the bourgeois
counter-revolution.

But if this is so, were the Bolsheviks right in joining the
demonstration and assuming responsibility for it? On July 3, Tomsky
expounded the thought of Lenin: “It is impossible to talk of a
manifestation at this moment unless we want a new revolution.” In that
case how could the party a few hours later stand at the head of an armed
demonstration without summoning the masses to a new revolution?
Doctrinaires will see inconsistency here – or still worse, political
light-mindedness. Sukhanov, for instance, sees the matter in this way,
and incorporates in his _Notes_ no few ironical references to the
vacillation of the Bolshevik leadership. The masses take part in events,
however, not at the bidding of doctrinaires, but at whatever time this
flows inevitably from their own political development. The Bolshevik
leadership understood that only a new revolution could change the
political situation, but the workers and soldiers did not yet understand
this. The Bolshevik leadership saw clearly that the heavy reserves – the
front and the provinces – needed time to make their own inferences from
the adventure of the offensive. But the advanced ranks were rushing into
the street under the influence of that same adventure. They combined a
most radical understanding of the task with illusions as to its methods.
The warnings of the Bolsheviks were ineffective. The Petrograd workers
and soldiers had to test the situation with their own experience. And
their armed demonstration was such a test. But the test might, against
the will of the masses, have turned into a general battle and by the
same token into a decisive defeat. In such a situation the party dared
not stand aside. To wash one’s hands in the water of strategical morals
would have meant simply to betray the workers and soldiers to their
enemies. The party of the masses was compelled to stand on the same
ground on which the masses stood, in order, while not in the least
sharing their illusions, to help them make the necessary inferences with
the least possible loss. Trotsky answered in the press the innumerable
critics of those days: “We do not consider it necessary to justify
ourselves before anybody for not having stood aside waiting while
General Polovtsev ‘conversed’ with the demonstrators. In any case our
participation could not possibly have increased the number of victims,
nor converted a chaotic armed manifestation into a political
insurrection.”

A prototype of the July Days is to be found in all the old revolutions –
with various, but generally speaking unfavorable, and frequently
catastrophic, results. This stage is involved in the inner mechanics of
a bourgeois revolution, inasmuch as that class which sacrifices most for
the success of the revolution and hopes the most from it, receives the
least of all. The natural law of the process is perfectly clear. The
possessing class which is brought to power by the revolution is inclined
to think that with this the revolution has accomplished its mission, and
is therefore most of all concerned to demonstrate its reliability to the
forces of reaction. This “revolutionary” bourgeoisie provokes the
indignation of the popular masses by those same measures with which it
strives to win the good will of the classes it has overthrown. The
disappointment of the masses follows very quickly; it follows even
before their vanguard has cooled off after the revolutionary struggle.
The people imagine that with a new blow they can carry through, or
correct, that which they did not accomplish decisively enough before.
Hence the impulse to a new revolution, a revolution without preparation,
without program, without estimation of the reserves, without calculation
of consequences. On the other hand those bourgeois layers which have
arrived at the power are in a way only waiting for a stormy outbreak
from below, in order to make the attempt decisively to settle accounts
with the people. Such is the social and psychological basis of that
supplementary semi-revolution, which has more than once in history
become the starting-point of a victorious counter-revolution.

On July 17, 1791, on the Champs de Mars, Lafayette fired on a peaceful
demonstration of republicans attempting to bring a petition to the
National Assembly which was engaged in screening the treachery of the
monarchical power, just as the Russian Compromisers one hundred and
twenty-six years later were screening the treachery of the Liberals. The
royalist bourgeoisie hoped with a timely bath of blood to settle
accounts with the party of the revolution forever. The republican
leaders, still not feeling strong enough for victory, declined the
battle and that was entirely reasonable. They even hastened to separate
themselves from the petitioners – and that was, to say the least,
unworthy and a mistaken policy. The régime of the bourgeois terror
compelled the Jacobins to quiet down for several months. Robespierre
took shelter with the carpenter Duplay. Desmoulins went into hiding.
Danton spent several weeks in England. But the royalist provocation
nevertheless failed: the settlement on the Champ de Mars did not prevent
the republican movement from going on to victory. The great French
revolution thus had its “July Days” – both in the political and the
calendar sense of the word.

Fifty-seven years later in France, the “July Days” came in June and were
incomparably more colossal and tragic. The so-called “June Days” of 1848
grew irresistibly out of the February overturn. The French bourgeoisie
had proclaimed in the hour of its victory “the right to labor” – just as
in 1789 it announced a great many admirable things, just as in 1914 it
swore that it was now waging its last war. Out of that vainglorious
“right to labor” arose those pitiful national sweatshops where a hundred
thousand workers, after winning the power for their bosses, got a wage
of twenty-three _sous_ a day. Only a few weeks later the republican
bourgeoisie, generous of phrase but stingy of money, could find no words
insulting enough for these “spongers living on a national starvation
dole. In the abundance of those February promises and the
cold-bloodedness of the pre-June provocations, the national traits of
the French bourgeoisie find admirable expression. But even without
provocation, the Parisian worker with the February weapons still in his
hands could not help reacting to the contrast between gorgeous program
and miserable reality – that intolerable contrast every day gnawing at
his stomach and his conscience. With what cool and barely concealed
calculation did Cavaignac before the eyes of the whole dominant society,
permit an insurrection to develop in order the better to drown it in
blood! No less than 12,000 workers were slaughtered by the republican
bourgeoisie, no less than 20,000 were imprisoned, in order to divest the
remainder of their faith in that “right to labor” which the bourgeoisie
had proclaimed. Without plan, without program, without leadership, the
movement of the June days of 1848 was like a mighty and unrestrainable
reflex action of the proletariat. Deprived of their most elementary
necessities and insulted in their highest hopes, the insurrectionary
workers were not only put down but slandered. The left democrat,
Flaucon, a follower of Ledru-Rollin, a predecessor of Tseretelli,
assured the National Assembly that the insurrectionaries had been bribed
by monarchists and foreign governments. The Compromisers of 1848 did not
even have to have a war atmosphere in order to discover English and
Russian gold in the pockets of the rebels. It was in this way that the
democrats laid down the road to Bonapartism.

The gigantic outbreak of the Commune bore the same relation to the
September overturn of 1870, as the June Days to the February revolution
of 1848. That March uprising of the Parisian proletariat was least of
all a matter of strategic calculation. It resulted from a tragic
combination of circumstances, supplemented by one of those acts of
provocation in which the French bourgeoisie is so inventive when fear
puts the spurs to its spiteful will. Against the plans of the ruling
clique, which wished above all to disarm the people, the workers wanted
to defend that Paris which they had first tried to make their own. The
National Guard had given them an armed organization – one very close to
the soviet type – and it had given them political leadership in the
person of its Central Committee. In consequence of unfavorable objective
conditions and political mistakes, Paris became opposed to France,
misunderstood, not supported, in part actually betrayed by the provinces
– and fell into the hands of the enraged men of Versailles with Bismarck
and Moltke behind their backs. The depraved and beaten officers of
Napoleon III proved indispensable hangmen in the service of the gentle
Marianne, whom the Prussians in heavy boots had just freed from the
embraces of a false Bonaparte. In the Paris Commune the reflex protest
of the proletariat against the deceitfulness of a bourgeois revolution
first rose to the height of proletarian revolution – but rose only to
fall immediately.

Spartacus Week in January 1919 in Berlin belonged to the same type of
intermediate, semi-revolution as the July Days in Petrograd. Owing to
the prevailing position of the proletariat in the German nation,
especially in its industry, the November revolution automatically
transferred the state sovereignty to the Workers’ and Soldiers’ Soviet.
But the proletariat was politically identical with the Social Democracy,
which in turn identified itself with the bourgeois régime. The
independent party occupied in the German revolution the place which in
Russia belonged to the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks. The thing
lacking was a Bolshevik party.

Every day after the 9th of November gave the German workers a vivid
feeling as though of something slipping from their hands, being
withdrawn, sliding through their fingers. The desire to keep what they
had won, to fortify themselves, to put up a resistance, was growing from
day to day. And this defensive tendency lay at the bottom of the January
fights of 1919. Spartacus Week began, not in the manner of a strategy
calculated by the party, but in the manner of a pressure from the
indignant lower ranks. It developed around a question of third-rate
importance, that of retaining the office of chief-of-police, although it
was in its tendencies the beginning of a new revolution. Both
organizations participating in the leadership, the Spartacus League and
the Left Independents, were taken unawares; they went farther than they
intended and at the same time did not go through to the end. The
Spartacus men were still too weak for independent leadership. The Left
Independents balked at those methods which could alone have brought them
to the goal, vacillated, and played with the insurrection, combining it
with diplomatic negotiations.

In number of victims the January defeat falls far below the colossal
figures of the “June Days” in France. However, the political importance
of a defeat is not measured only by the statistics of killed and
executed. It is enough that the young communist party was physically
beheaded, and the Independent Party demonstrated that by the very
essence of its methods it was incapable of leading the proletariat to
victory. From a larger point of view the “July Days” repeated themselves
in Germany in several different editions: the January week of 1919, the
March days of 1921, the October retreat of 1923. The whole subsequent
history of Germany derives from those events. The unachieved revolution
was switched over into Fascism.

At the present moment, while these lines are being written – early in
May 1931 – the bloodless, peaceful, glorious (the list of these
adjectives is always the same) revolution in Spain, is preparing before
our eyes its “June Days” – if you go by the French calendar – its “July
Days” by the Russian. The Provisional Government in Madrid, bathing in
phrases – a good part of them apparently translated from the Russian
language – is promising broad measures against unemployment and
land-hunger, but dares not touch a single one of the old social sores.
The coalition socialists are helping the republicans sabotage the tasks
of the revolution. Is it hard to foresee the feverish growth of
indignation among workers and peasants? The incompatible movements of
the mass revolution on the one hand, and the policy of the new ruling
classes on the other – that is the source of an irreconcilable conflict,
which as it develops will either bury the first, the April, revolution,
or lead to a second.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

ALTHOUGH the underlying mass of Russian Bolsheviks felt in July, 1917,
that beyond certain limits it was still impossible to go, still there
was no complete homogeneity of mood. Many workers and soldiers were at
times inclined to estimate the developing movement as a decisive action.
Metelev, in his memoirs written five years later, expresses himself
about the meaning of the events in the following words: “In that
insurrection our chief mistake was that we proposed to the compromisist
Executive Committee to seize the power ... We ought not to have
proposed, but to have seized the power ourselves. Our second mistake may
be considered to be this, that we spent almost two days marching in the
streets, instead of immediately occupying all the institutions, palaces,
banks, railroad stations, telegraph offices, arresting the whole
Provisional Government,” etc., etc. As applied to an insurrection those
words would be unanswerable, but to convert the July movement into an
insurrection would have meant almost certainly to bury the revolution.

The anarchists in summoning the masses to battle referred to the fact
that “the February revolution also took place without the leadership of
a party.” But the February revolution had its prepared tasks laid down
by the struggle of whole generations, and above the February revolution
stood an oppositional liberal society and a patriotic democracy ready to
receive the power. The July movement, on the contrary, would have had to
lay down a wholly new historic road-bed. The whole of bourgeois society,
the soviet democracy included, were implacably hostile to it. This basic
difference between the conditions of a bourgeois and a workers’
revolution, the anarchists did not see, or did not understand.

Had the Bolshevik party, stubbornly clinging to a doctrinaire appraisal
of the July movement as “untimely,” turned its back on the masses, the
semi-insurrection would inevitably have fallen under the scattered and
uncoordinated leadership of anarchists, of adventurers, of accidental
expressers of the indignation of the masses, and would have expired in
bloody and bootless convulsions. On the other hand, if the party, after
taking its place at the head of the machine-gunners and Putilov men, had
renounced its own appraisal of the situation as a whole, and glided down
the road to a decisive fight, the insurrection would indubitably have
taken a bold scope. The workers and soldiers under the leadership of the
Bolsheviks would have conquered the power – but only to prepare the
subsequent shipwreck of the revolution. The question of power on a
national scale would not have been decided, as it was in February, by a
victory in Petrograd. The provinces would not have caught up to the
capital. The front would not have understood or accepted the revolution.
The railroads and the telegraphs would have served the Compromisers
against the Bolsheviks. Kerensky and headquarters would have created a
government for the front and the provinces. Petrograd would have been
blockaded. Disintegration would have begun within its walls. The
government would have been able to send considerable masses of soldiers
against Petrograd. The insurrection would have ended, in those
circumstances, with the tragedy of a Petrograd Commune.

At the July forking of historic roads, the interference of the Bolshevik
party eliminated both fatally dangerous variants – both that in the
likeness of the June Days of 1848, and that of the Paris Commune of
1871. Thanks to the party’s taking its place boldly at the head of the
movement, it was able to stop the masses at the moment when the
demonstration began to turn into an armed test of strength. The blow
struck at the masses and the party in July was very considerable, but it
was not a decisive blow. The victims were counted by tens and not by
tens of thousands. The working class issued from the trial, not headless
and not bled to death. It fully preserved its fighting cadres, and these
cadres had learned much.

During the February overturn all the many preceding years work of the
Bolsheviks came to fruition, and progressive workers educated by the
party found their place in the struggle, but there was still no direct
leadership from the party. In the April events the slogans of the party
manifested their dynamic force, but the movement itself developed
independently. In June the enormous influence of the party revealed
itself, but the masses were still functioning within the limits of a
demonstration officially summoned by the enemy. Only in July did the
Bolshevik Party, feeling the pressure of the masses, come out into the
street against all the other parties, and not only with its slogans, but
with its organized leadership, determine the fundamental character of
the movement. The value of a close-knit vanguard was first fully
manifested in the July Days, when the party – at great cost – defended
the proletariat from defeat, and safeguarded its own future revolution.

“As a technical trial,” wrote Miliukov, speaking of the significance of
the July Days to the Bolsheviks, “the experience was for them
undoubtedly of extraordinary value. It showed them with what elements
they had to deal, how to organize these elements, and finally what
resistance could be put up by the government, the Soviet and the
military units ... It was evident that when the time came for repeating
the experiment, they would carry it out more systematically and
consciously.” Those words correctly evaluate the significance of the
July experiment for the further development of the policy of the
Bolsheviks. But before making use of these July lessons, the party had
to go through some heavy weeks, during which it seemed to the
shortsighted enemy that the power of Bolshevism was conclusively broken.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. A _verst_ is very nearly ²/3 of a mile.



CHAPTER 27 THE MONTH OF THE GREAT SLANDER


 

During that night of July 4, when the two hundred members of both
Executive Committees, the worker-soldiers’ and the peasants’, were
sitting around between fruitless sessions, a mysterious rumor arrived
among them. Material had been discovered connecting Lenin with the
German general staff; tomorrow the newspapers would publish the
documents. The gloomy augurs of the præsidium, crossing the hall on
their way to one of those endless conferences behind the scenes,
responded unwillingly and evasively even to questions from their nearest
friends. The Tauride Palace, already almost abandoned by the outside
public, was bewildered. “Lenin in the service of the German staff?”
Amazement, alarm, malicious pleasure, drew the delegates together in
excited groups. “It goes without saying,” says Sukhanov, who was very
hostile to the Bolsheviks in the July Days, “that not one person really
connected with the revolution doubted for an instant that these rumors
were all nonsense.” But those with a revolutionary past constituted an
insignificant minority among the members of the Executive Committee.
March revolutionists, accidental elements caught up by the first wave,
predominated even in the ruling soviet institutions. Among those
provincials – town-clerks, shopkeepers, heads of villages – deputies
were to be found with a definitely Black Hundred odor. These people
immediately began to feel at home: Just what was to be expected! They
had known it all along!

Alarmed by this unforeseen and too abrupt turn of events, the leaders
sparred for time. Cheidze and Tseretelli suggested to the newspapers by
telephone that they refrain from printing the sensational exposure as
“unverified.” The editors did not dare ignore this “request” from the
Tauride Palace – except one of them. The small yellow sheet published by
one of the sons of Suvorin, the powerful publisher of _Novoe Vremya_,
served up to its readers the next morning an official-sounding document
about Lenin’s receiving directions and money from the German government.
The censorship was thus broken, and within a day the whole press was
full of this sensation. Thus began the most incredible episode of a year
rich in events: The leaders of a revolutionary party, whose lives for
decades had been passed in a struggle against rulers, both crowned and
uncrowned, found themselves portrayed before the country and the whole
world as hired agents of the Hohenzollern. On a scale hitherto unheard
of, this slander was sown in the thick of the popular masses, a vast
majority of whom had heard of the Bolshevik leaders for the first time
only after the February revolution. Mud-slinging here became a political
factor of primary importance. This makes necessary an attentive
examination of its mechanism.

The primary source of this sensational document was the testimony of a
certain Ermolenko. The image of this hero is sufficiently delineated by
the official records: In the period from the Japanese War to 1913, he
was an agent of the Intelligence Service; in 1913, for reasons not
established, he was discharged from service with the title of ensign
from the ranks; in 1914 he was called to service in the army, gallantly
permitted himself to be captured, and became a police spy among the war
prisoners. The régime of a concentration camp was not to this spy’s
taste, however, and “at the insistence of his friends,” so he testifies,
he took service with the Germans – needless to say, with patriotic aims.
Here a new chapter opened in his life. On April 25 this ensign from the
ranks was “thrown over the Russian front” by the German military
authorities for the purpose of dynamiting bridges, reporting military
secrets, struggling for the independence of the Ukraine, and agitating
for a separate peace. The German officers, Captains Shiditsky and
Liebers, in contracting with Ermolenko for these services, informed him
in passing, without any practical necessity and evidently merely in
order to keep up his spirits, that besides the ensign himself, Lenin
would be working in Russia in the same direction. That was the
foundation of the whole affair.

Who – or what – suggested to Ermolenko his testimony about Lenin? Not
the German officers, in any case. A simple juxtaposition of dates and
facts will introduce us into the intellectual workshop of the ensign. On
April 4 Lenin issued his famous theses, constituting a declaration of
war against the February régime. On April 20-21 occurred the armed
demonstration against a continuance of the war. The attack upon Lenin at
that time became a veritable hurricane. On the 25th Ermolenko was
“thrown over” the front, and during the first half of May was getting in
contact with the Intelligence Service at headquarters. Ambiguous
newspaper articles demonstrating that the policy of Lenin was
advantageous to the Kaiser gave birth to the idea that Lenin was a
German agent. Officers and commissars at the front, struggling with the
irrepressible “Bolshevism” of the soldiers, were still less ceremonious
in their forms of expression when the talk was about Lenin. Ermolenko
promptly plunged into these waters. Whether he himself thought up the
dragged-in remark about Lenin, whether it was suggested to him by some
outside person, or whether it was cooperatively manufactured by
Ermolenko and the officials of the Intelligence Service, has no great
significance. The demand for slanders against the Bolsheviks had reached
such intensity that a supply could not fail to turn up. The chief of the
headquarters staff, General Denikin, future generalissimo of the White
Guards in the civil war – himself not very much higher in his outlook
than the agents of the tzarist secret service – attributed, or pretended
to attribute, great importance to the testimony of Ermolenko, and turned
it over to the War Minister on May 16 with an appropriate letter.
Kerensky, we may assume, exchanged opinions with Tseretelli or Cheidze,
who could hardly have failed to put a curb on his righteous indignation.
That evidently explains why the thing went no further. Kerensky wrote
later that, although Ermolenko had testified to a connection of Lenin
with the German staff, he did so “not with sufficient credibility.” The
report of Ermolenko-Denikin thus remained for a month and a half under a
bushel. The Intelligence Service dismissed Ermolenko as superfluous, and
the ensign wandered off to the Far East to drink away the money he had
received from two sources.

The events of the July Days, however, revealing the danger of Bolshevism
in its full stature, called to mind the exposures of Ermolenko. He was
hastily summoned from Blagoveshchensk, but owing to a sheer lack of
imagination he could not, in spite of all cluckings and jerkings of the
reins, add one word to his original testimony. By that time, however,
the Department of Justice and the Intelligence Service were working
under full steam. Inquiries about possible criminal connections of the
Bolsheviks were addressed to politicians, generals, gendarmes,
merchants, innumerable people of any and every profession. The
respectable tzarist secret police conducted themselves in this
investigation with considerably more discretion than the brand-new
representatives of democratic justice. “Such evidence,” wrote a former
chief of the Petrograd secret police, the venerable general Globachev,
“as that Lenin worked in Russia to her injury and on German money, was
not, at least during my period of service, in the possession of the
secret police.” Another secret police officer, Yakubov, chief of the
intelligence department of the Petrograd military district, testified:
“I know nothing of a connection between Lenin and his followers and the
German general staff, but I also know nothing of the resources upon
which Lenin worked.” Thus from the institutions of the tzarist spy
system, which had kept watch of Bolshevism from its very inception,
nothing useful could be squeezed out.

However, when people seek long, especially if they are armed with power,
they find something in the end. A certain Z. Burstein, a merchant by
official calling, opened the eyes of the Provisional Government to a
“German espionage organization in Stockholm, headed by Parvus,” – a
well-known German social democrat of Russian origin. According to the
testimony of Burstein, Lenin was in contact with this organization
through the Polish revolutionists, Ganetsky and Kozlovsky. Kerensky
wrote later: “Some extraordinarily serious data – unfortunately not of a
legal, but merely of a secret police character – were to receive
absolutely unquestionable confirmation with the arrival in Russia of
Ganetsky, who had been arrested on the border, and were to be converted
into authentic juridical material against the Bolshevik staff.” Kerensky
knew in advance into what this material would be converted!

The testimony of the merchant, Burstein, concerned the trade operations
of Ganetsky and Kozlovsky between Petrograd and Stockholm. This wartime
commerce, which evidently had recourse at times to a code
correspondence, had no relation to politics. The Bolshevik party had no
relation to this commerce. Lenin and Trotsky had publicly denounced
Parvus, who combined good commerce with bad politics, and in printed
words had appealed to the Russian revolutionists to break off all
relations with him. But who was there in the whirlpool of events who had
time to look into all this? An espionage organization in Stockholm –
that sounded plain enough. And so the light unsuccessfully ignited by
the hand of ensign Ermolenko, flared up from another direction. To be
sure, here too they ran into a difficulty. The head of the Intelligence
Service of the general staff, Prince Turkestanov, to the query of an
investigator into the especially important affair of Alexandrov, had
answered, “Z. Burstein is a person not deserving the slightest
confidence. Burstein is an unscrupulous type of business man, who will
not stop at any kind of undertaking.” But could Burstein’s bad
reputation stand in the way of an attempt to besmirch the reputation of
Lenin? No, Kerensky did not hesitate to recognize the testimony of
Burstein as “extraordinarily serious.” Henceforth the investigation was
off on the Stockholm scent. The exposures of a spy who had been in the
service of two general staffs, and an unscrupulous business man, “not
deserving the slightest confidence,” lay at the foundation of that
utterly fantastic accusation against a revolutionary party which a
nation of 160 million were about to raise to the supreme power.

But how did it happen that the materials of a preliminary investigation
appeared in print, and moreover just at the moment when the shattered
offensive of Kerensky was becoming a catastrophe, and the July
demonstration in Petrograd was revealing the irresistible growth of the
Bolsheviks? One of the initiators of this business, the attorney
general, Bessarabov, later frankly described in the press how, when it
became clear that the Provisional Government in Petrograd was wholly
without reliable armed forces, it was decided in the district
headquarters to try to create a psychological change in the regiments by
means of some strong medicine. “The substance of the documents was
communicated to representatives of the Preobrazhensky regiment nearest
to headquarters; those present observed what an overwhelming impression
the communication made. From that moment it was clear what a powerful
weapon was in the hands of the government.” After this successful
experimental test, these conspirators from the Department of Justice,
the Intelligence Service and the General Staff hastened to make known
their discoveries to the Minister of Justice. Pereverzev answered that
no official communication could be issued, but that by the members of
the Provisional Government who were present “no obstacle would be put in
the way of a private initiative.” The names of the juridical and staff
officials were rightly judged inapposite to the best interests of the
business: in order to get the sensational slander into circulation a
“political figure” was needed. By the method of private initiative the
conspirators had no difficulty in finding exactly the personage they
needed. A former revolutionist, a member of the second Duma, a shrieking
orator and a passionate lover of intrigue, Alexinsky had once stood on
the extreme left flank of the Bolsheviks. Lenin had been a hopeless
opportunist in his eyes. In the years of reaction Alexinsky had created
a special ultra-left group, which he had continued to lead from abroad
until the war, at the beginning of which he took an ultra-patriotic
position and straightway made a specialty of accusing all and everybody
of being in the service of the Kaiser. Along this line he developed an
extensive espionage business in Paris in company with Russian and French
patriots of the same type. The Paris Association of Foreign Journalists
– that is, the correspondents of Allied and neutral countries, a very
patriotic and by no means austere body – found it necessary in a special
resolution to declare Alexinsky “a dishonest slanderer” and expel him
from its midst. Arriving in Petrograd with this attestation after the
February revolution, Alexinsky made an attempt, in the character of a
former Left, to get into the Executive Committee. In spite of all their
tolerance, the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries by a resolution of
April 11 shut the door in his face, suggesting that he make an attempt
to re-establish his honor. That was easy to propose! Having decided that
he was better fitted to besmirch others than rehabilitate himself,
Alexinsky got into connection with the Intelligence Service, and laid
hold of a national field of operation for his instinct for intrigue. By
the second half of July he had already begun to include Mensheviks, too,
in the widening circle of his slanders. A leader of the latter party,
Dan, abandoning the policy of watchful waiting, printed in the official
soviet _Izvestia_ (July 22) a letter of protest: “It is time to put an
end to the doings of a man officially denounced as a dishonest
slanderer.” Is it not clear that Themis, inspired by Ermolenko and
Burstein, could find no better intermediary between herself and public
opinion than Alexinsky? It was his signature which adorned the documents
of the exposure.

Behind the scenes the minister-socialists protested against the handing
over of these documents to the press, as also did two of the bourgeois
ministers, Nekrasov and Tereshchenko. On the day of their publication,
July 5, Pereverzev, with whom the government had already been willing to
part, found himself obliged to resign. The Mensheviks passed the hint
that this was their victory. Kerensky subsequently asserted that the
minister had been removed for being too hasty with the exposure, thus
hindering the course of the investigation. In any case, Pereverzev, with
his departure, if not with his presence in the government, gave
satisfaction to everybody.

On that same day Zinoviev appeared at a sitting of the bureau of the
Executive Committee, and in the name of the Central Committee of the
Bolsheviks demanded that immediate measures be taken to exonerate Lenin
and to prevent possible consequences of the slander. The bureau could
not refuse to appoint a commission of inquiry. Sukhanov writes: “The
commission itself understood that what needed investigation was not the
question of Lenin’s selling out Russia, but only of the sources of the
slander.” But the commission ran into the jealous competition of the
Institutions of Justice and the Intelligence Service, which had every
reason not to desire outside interference in their trade. To be sure,
the soviet bodies had not up to that time had any difficulty in getting
the better of the governmental bodies when they found it necessary. But
the July Days had produced a serious shift of power to the right, and
moreover the soviet commission was in no hurry to fulfil a task
obviously in conflict with the political interests of those who had
intrusted it. The more serious of the compromise leaders – that is,
properly speaking, only the Mensheviks – were concerned to establish a
formal disconnection with the slander, but nothing more. In all cases
where it was impossible to avoid making some direct answer, they would
in a few words clear themselves of guilt. But they did not extend a
finger to ward off the poisoned sword poised over the head of the
Bolsheviks. A popular image of their policy was once provided by the
Roman pro-consul, Pilate. Yes, and could they behave otherwise without
betraying themselves? It was only the slander against Lenin that in the
July Days turned away a part of the garrison from the Bolsheviks. If the
Compromisers had made a fight against the slander, it is easy to imagine
that the battalion of the Izmailovstsi would have stopped singing the
_Marseillaise_ in honor of the Executive Committee and gone back to
their barracks, if not to the Palace of Kshesinskaia.

In line with the general policy of the Mensheviks, the Minister of the
Interior, Tseretelli, who took the responsibility for the arrest of
Bolsheviks soon to follow, did indeed, under pressure from the Bolshevik
faction, announce at a meeting of the Executive Committee that he
personally did not suspect the Bolshevik leaders of espionage, but that
he did accuse them of conspiracy and armed insurrection. On July 13,
Lieber, in introducing a resolution which in essence outlawed the
Bolshevik party, deemed it necessary to remark: “I myself consider that
the accusations directed against Lenin and Zinoviev have no foundation.”
Such declarations were met by all in gloomy silence: to the Bolsheviks
they seemed dishonorably evasive, to the patriots, superfluous or
unprofitable.

Speaking on the 17th at a joint session of the two Executive Committees,
Trotsky said: “An intolerable atmosphere has been created, in which you
as well as we are choking. They are throwing dirty accusations at Lenin
and Zinoviev. (_Voice: ’That is true.’ Uproar. Trotsky continues._)
There are in this hall, it appears, people who sympathize with these
accusations. There are people here who have only sneaked into the
revolution. (_Uproar. The president’s bell long tries to restore
order._) ... Lenin has fought thirty years for the revolution. I have
fought twenty years against the oppression of the people. And we cannot
but cherish a hatred for German militarism ... A suspicion against us in
that direction could be expressed only by those who do not know what a
revolutionist is. I have been sentenced by a German court to eight
months’ imprisonment for my struggle against German militarism ... This
everybody knows. Let nobody in this hall say that we are hirelings of
Germany, for that is not the voice of convinced revolutionists but the
voice of scoundrels. (_Applause_)” Thus the episode was reported in the
anti-Bolshevik publications of the day. The Bolshevik publications were
already closed. It is necessary to explain, however, that the applause
came from a small left sector. A part of the deputies bellowed with
hatred. The majority were silent. No one, however, even of the direct
agents of Kerensky, ascended the tribune to support the official version
of the accusation, or even indirectly to defend it.

In Moscow, where the struggle between Bolsheviks and Compromisers had in
general assumed a milder character – only to become so much the more
cruel in October – a joint session of the two soviets, the workers’ and
soldiers’, passed a resolution on July 10th to “publish and paste up a
manifesto in which it shall be declared that the accusation of espionage
against the Bolshevik faction is a slander and a plot of the
counter-revolution.” The Petrograd soviet, more directly dependent upon
governmental combinations, took no steps whatever, awaiting the
conclusions of a Commission of Inquiry which had not even met.

On July 5, Lenin, in a conversation with Trotsky, raised the question:
“Aren’t they getting ready to shoot us all?” Only such an intention
could explain the official stamp placed upon that monstrous slander.
Lenin considered the enemy capable of carrying through to the end the
scheme they had thought up, and decided not to fall into their hands. On
the evening of the 6th, Kerensky arrived from the front all stuffed full
of the suggestions of the generals, and demanded decisive measures
against the Bolsheviks. At about two o’clock at night the government
resolved to bring to trial all the leaders of the “armed insurrection,”
and to disband the regiments which had taken part in the mutiny. The
military detachment sent to the apartment of Lenin for purposes of
search and arrest had to content itself with search, for the occupant
had already left home. Lenin still remained in Petrograd, but hid in a
worker’s apartment, demanding that the soviet Inquiry Commission hear
him and Zinoviev in conditions precluding the danger of attack from the
counter-revolution. In a declaration sent to the Commission, Lenin and
Zinoviev wrote: “This morning (Friday, July 7) it was communicated to
Kamenev from the Duma that the commission was to go at 12 o’clock to an
apartment agreed upon. We are writing these lines at 6:30 in the evening
of July 7, and we remark that up to now the Commission has not appeared
or given the slightest sign of its existence ... The responsibility for
the delay of the inquiry does not rest upon us.” The disinclination of
the soviet commission to begin the promised investigation finally
convinced Lenin that the Compromisers were washing their hands of the
case, and leaving it to the mercies of the White Guards. The officers
and junkers, who had by that time broken up the party printing plant,
were now beating up and arresting in the streets everyone who protested
against the charge of espionage against the Bolsheviks. Lenin therefore
finally decided to go into hiding – not from the investigation, but from
possible attempts upon his life.

On the 15th, Lenin and Zinoviev explained in the Kronstadt Bolshevik
paper, which the authorities had not dared to shut down, why they did
not consider it possible to hand themselves over to the authorities:
“From a letter of the former Minister of Justice, Pereverzev, printed on
Sunday in the newspaper _Novoe Vremya_, it has become perfectly clear
that the ‘case’ of the spy activities of Lenin and others was a
perfectly deliberate frame-up by the party of counter-revolution.
Pereverzev quite openly acknowledges that he put in circulation
unverified accusations in order to arouse the rage (his _verbatim_
expression) of the soldiers against our party. This is the confession of
yesterday’s Minister of Justice! ... There is no guarantee of justice in
Russia at this moment. To turn oneself over to the authorities would
mean to put oneself in the hands of the Miliukovs, Alexinskies,
Pereverzevs, in the hands of infuriated counter-revolutionists for whom
the whole accusation against us is a mere episode in a civil war.” In
order to explain at this day the meaning of the phrase “episode in a
civil war,” it is sufficient to remember the fate of Karl Liebknecht and
Rosa Luxemburg. Lenin knew how to see ahead.

While agitators of the hostile camp were telling a thousand stories –
Lenin is on a destroyer, Lenin has fled to Germany in a submarine, etc.
– the majority of the Executive Committee hastily condemned Lenin for
avoiding an investigation. Ignoring the political essence of the
accusation, and the pogrom situation in which, and for the sake of
which, it was launched, the Compromisers came out as champions of pure
justice. This was the least inexpedient position of all those remaining
open to them. A resolution of the Executive Committee on July 13 not
only declared the conduct of Lenin and Zinoviev “absolutely
unpermissible,” but also demanded of the Bolshevik faction “an
immediate, categorical and clear condemnation” of its leaders. The
faction unanimously rejected the demands of the Executive Committee.
However in the Bolshevik ranks – at least in the upper circles – there
were waverings on the subject of Lenin’s avoiding an investigation. And
among even the most extreme Left Compromisers Lenin’s disappearance
caused downright indignation – an indignation not always hypocritical,
either, as we see in the example of Sukhanov. The slanderous character
of the material supplied by the secret police had not been subject to
the slightest doubt in his mind, as we know, from the beginning. “The
nonsensical accusation went up like smoke,” he wrote. “It had no
confirmation, and people simply stopped believing it.” But it remained a
mystery for Sukhanov how Lenin could decide to avoid an inquiry. “That
was something wholly special, unexampled, incomprehensible. Any other
mortal would have demanded a court and an investigation, no matter how
unfavorable the circumstances.” Yes, any other mortal. But no other
mortal could have become an object of such raging hatred to the ruling
classes. Lenin was not any other mortal, and did not for one moment
forget the responsibility which rested on him. He knew how to draw all
the inferences from a situation, and he knew how in the name of those
tasks to which he had consecrated his life, to ignore the oscillations
of “public opinion.” Quixotism was just as foreign to him as posing.

In company with Zinoviev Lenin passed a number of weeks in the environs
of Petrograd in a forest near Sestroretsk. They had to spend the nights
and find shelter from rain in a haystack. Disguised as a fireman Lenin
then crossed the Finland border on a locomotive, and concealed himself
in the apartment of a Helsingfors police chief, a former Petrograd
worker. Afterward he moved nearer the Russian border, to Vyborg. From
the end of September he lived secretly in Petrograd. And on the day of
the insurrection he appeared, after an almost four months’ absence, in
the open arena.

July became a month of shameless, unbridled and triumphant slander. By
August the slander had already begun to exhaust itself. Just a month
after the attack was let loose, Tseretelli, ever true to himself, deemed
it necessary to repeat at a session of the Executive Committee: “On the
day after the arrests I gave an oral answer to the questions of the
Bolsheviks, and I said: ‘The leaders of the Bolsheviks, under indictment
for inciting to insurrection on July 3-5, I do not suspect of connection
with the German staff.’” To say less than that would have been
impossible; to say more would have been inexpedient. The press of the
compromise parties went no farther than these words of Tseretelli, and
since this press was at the same time bitterly denouncing the Bolsheviks
as auxiliaries of German militarism, the voice of the compromisist
papers merged politically with the outcry of all the rest of the press,
which was speaking of the Bolsheviks not as “Auxiliaries” of Ludendorff
but as his hired agents. The highest notes in this chorus were sung by
the Kadets. _Russkie Vedomosti_, the paper of the liberal Moscow
professors, printed a communication to the effect that in a search in
the editorial offices of _Pravda_ a German letter had been found in
which a Baron from Gaparanda “welcomes the activities of the Bolsheviks
and foresees what legitimate rejoicing this will cause in Berlin.” The
German Baron on the Finland border well knew what letters were needed by
the Russian patriots. The press of cultivated society, defending itself
against Bolshevik barbarism, was filled with such communications.

Did the professors and lawyers believe their own words? To admit this,
at least in regard to the leaders in the capital, would be to think far
too little of their political intelligence. Even if not considerations
of principle, or of psychological possibility, mere business
considerations alone ought to have revealed to them the vacuity of these
accusations – and first of all financial considerations. The German
government could obviously have helped the Bolsheviks, not with ideas,
but with money. But money was just what the Bolsheviks did not have. The
center of the party abroad during the war was struggling with cruel
need; a hundred francs was a big sum; the central organ was appearing
once a month, or once in two months, and Lenin was carefully counting
the lines in order not to exceed his budget. The expenses of the
Petrograd organization during the war years amounted to a few thousand
roubles, which went mostly to the printing of illegal leaflets. In two
and a half years only 300,000 copies of these leaflets were distributed
in Petrograd. After the revolution the inflow of members and of means
increased, of course, remarkably. The workers were wonderfully ready to
tax themselves for the Soviet and for the soviet parties.
“Contributions, all kinds of dues, collections and deductions in behalf
of the Soviet,” reported the lawyer Bramson, a Trudovik, at the first
congress of the soviets, “began on the very first day after our
revolution broke out ... You could see the extraordinarily touching
spectacle of an uninterrupted pilgrimage to us in the Tauride Palace
from early morning to late at night bringing these contributions.” As
time went on, the workers were still more ready to make these deductions
in behalf of the Bolsheviks. However, in spite of the swift growth of
the party and of money receipts, _Pravda_ was, in physical proportions,
the smallest of all the party papers. Soon after his arrival in Russia
Lenin wrote to Radek in Stockholm: “Write articles for _Pravda_ about
foreign politics – extremely short and in the spirit of _Pravda_ (there
is very, very little space – we are trying hard to enlarge it).” In
spite of the Spartan régime of economy instituted by Lenin, the party
was always in need. The disbursement of two or three thousand war–time
roubles in behalf of some local organization would mean always a serious
problem for the Central Committee. In order to send papers to the front,
it became necessary again and again to take up special collections among
the workers. And even so, the Bolshevik papers arrived in the trenches
in incomparably fewer number than the papers of the Compromisers and
Liberals. Complaints about this were continual. “We are living only on
the rumor of your papers,” wrote the soldiers. In April a city
conference of the party appealed to the workers of Petrograd to collect
in three days the 75,000 roubles lacking for the purchase of a printing
plant. The sum was more than covered, and the party finally acquired its
own printing press – the same one which the junkers shattered to the
ground in July. The influence of the Bolshevik slogans spread like a
fire in the steppes, but the material instruments of their propaganda
remained exceedingly scant. The personal lives of the Bolsheviks gave
still less occasion for slander. What then remained? Nothing, in the
last analysis, but Lenin’s trip through Germany. But that very fact,
advanced oftenest of all before inexperienced audiences as proof of
Lenin’s friendship with the German government, in reality proved the
opposite. An agent would have travelled through the hostile territory
concealed and without the slightest danger. Only a revolutionist
confident of himself to the last degree would have dared openly to
transgress the laws of patriotism in wartime.

The Ministry of Justice, however, did not hesitate to carry out its
unpleasant task. It had not for nothing inherited employees trained
during the final period of the autocracy, when the murder of liberal
deputies by Black Hundred agents known by name to the whole country
would remain systematically undiscovered, while a Jewish salesman in
Kiev would be accused of using the blood of a Christian boy. Over the
signature of the investigator in the exceptionally important affair of
Alexandrov, and that of the Attorney General, Karinsky, a decree was
published on the 21st of July, indicting on a charge of state treason
Lenin, Zinoviev, Kollontai and a number of other people, among them the
German social democrat Helfand-Parvus. The same articles of the Criminal
Code, 51, 100 and 108, were afterwards invoked in indicting Trotsky and
Lunacharsky, arrested by military detachments on the 23rd of July.
According to the text of the decree, the leaders of the Bolsheviks
“being Russian citizens, did, according to a preliminary agreement
between themselves and other parties, with the aim of aiding other
states engaged in hostile activities within the borders of Russia, enter
into an agreement with the agents of the said governments to co-operate
in the disorganization of the Russian army and rear for the purpose of
weakening the fighting power of the army. For which purpose, with monies
received by them from these states, they did organize a propaganda among
the population and troops, summoning them to an immediate refusal of
military activity against the enemy, and they did also with the same
ends in view, during the period from the 3rd to the 5th of July, 1917,
organize in Petrograd an armed insurrection.” Although every educated
person in those days, at least in the capital, knew in what
circumstances Trotsky had come from New York through Christiania and
Stockholm to Petrograd, the Court of Inquiry charged him also with
having travelled through Germany. The Department of Justice evidently
desired to leave no doubt as to the solidity of the materials which had
been placed at its disposition by the Intelligence Service.

The latter institution has nowhere been a propagator of good morals. But
in Russia the Intelligence Service was the very sewer of the Rasputin
régime. The scum of the military officers, the police, the gendarmerie,
together with discharged agents of the secret police, formed the cadres
of that foul, stupid and all-powerful institution. Colonels, captains
and ensigns who were useless for military deeds took under their
supervision all branches of the social and governmental life,
establishing throughout the country a system of spy feudalism. “The
situation became absolutely catastrophic,” complains a former director
of police, Kurlov, “when the notorious Intelligence Service began to
take part in the affairs of civil administration.” Kurlov himself has no
little dirty business to his credit – among other things an indirect
participation in the murder of the Prime Minister, Stolypin.
Nevertheless the activities of the Intelligence Service made even his
experienced imagination shudder. During the time when “the struggle with
enemy espionage ... was being carried on very weakly,” he writes,
notoriously framed-up cases would frequently come down upon the heads of
completely innocent people with the aim of naked blackmail. Kurlov ran
into one such case: “To my horror,” he says, “[I] heard the pseudonym of
a secret agent known to me in my former service with the police
department as having been expelled for blackmail.” One of the provincial
heads of the Intelligence Service, a certain Ustinov, a notary before
the war, describes the morals of this service in his memoirs in
practically the same terms as those used by Kurlov: “In search of
something to do, the agents themselves would manufacture material.”

It is still more instructive to verify the intellectual level of the
institution by the example of this very accuser. “Russia went to ruin,”
writes Ustinov, speaking of the February revolution, “the victim of a
revolution created by German agents on German money.” The attitude of
the patriotic notary to the Bolsheviks needs no further explanation.
“The reports of the Intelligence Service as to the former activities of
Lenin, as to his connection with the German staff, as to his receipt of
German gold, are convincing enough to hang him immediately.” Kerensky
did not do this, it would seem, only because he was himself a traitor.
“Especially astonishing, and even downright exasperating, was the
leadership of a good-for-nothing lawyer among the Yids, Sashka
Kerensky.” Ustinov testifies that Kerensky “was well-known as a
provocateur who betrayed his comrades.” The French general, Anselm, as
was found out later, abandoned Odessa in March, 1919, not under pressure
from the Bolsheviks, but because he received an immense bribe. From the
Bolsheviks? No. “The Bolsheviks had nothing to do with it,” said
Ustinov. “Here the Free Masons were at work.” Such was that world.

Soon after the February revolution this institution, consisting of
sharpers, falsificators and blackmailers, was put in charge of a
patriotic Social Revolutionary, Mironov, who had arrived from abroad and
whom an assistant minister, Demianov, a “people’s socialist,”
characterized in the following words: “Mironov creates a good impression
externally ... But I shall not be surprised if I learn that this is not
a wholly normal person. It is quite possible to believe he is not: a
normal person would hardly have agreed to stand at the head of an
institution which ought to have been simply disbanded and its walls
washed with sublimate.” As a result of that administrative mix-up caused
by the revolution, the Intelligence Service came under the supervision
of the Minister of Justice, Pereverzev, a man of incredible
light-mindedness and complete indifference to the means he employed. The
same Demianov says in his memoirs that his minister “enjoyed almost no
prestige at all in the Soviet.” Under the protection of Mironov and
Pereverzev, the Intelligence men, frightened at first by the revolution,
soon came to themselves and accommodated their old activities to the new
political situation. In June even the left wing of the governmental
press began to publish information about blackmail and other crimes
committed by the highest ranks of the Intelligence Service, even
including two chiefs of the institution, Shukin and Broy, first
assistants of the miserable Mironov. A week before the July crisis the
Executive Committee, under pressure from the Bolsheviks, had addressed a
demand to the government for an immediate inspection of the Intelligence
Service with the participation of soviet representatives. The
intelligence men thus had their own departmental reasons – or rather
reasons of livelihood – for striking at the Bolsheviks as quickly and as
hard as possible. Prince Lvov had signed a timely law giving the
Intelligence Service the right to hold an arrestee under lock and key
for three months.

The character of the accusation, and of the accusers, inevitably gives
rise to the question, how could people of normal mould believe, or even
pretend to believe, in this notorious lie which was inept from beginning
to end. The success of the Intelligence Service would in truth have been
unthinkable, except for the general atmosphere created by war, defeat,
ruin, revolution, and the embitterment of the social struggle. Since the
autumn of 1914 nothing had gone well with the ruling classes of Russia.
The ground was crumbling under their feet. Everything was falling from
their hands. Misfortunes were coming down on them from all directions.
How could they help seeking a scapegoat? The former Attorney General,
Zavadsky, remembers that “entirely healthy people were inclined in the
alarming years of the war to suspect treachery where it apparently, and
even indubitably, was not to be found. The majority of the cases of this
kind prosecuted while I was attorney general, were fanciful.” These
cases were initiated, not only by spiteful agents, but by ordinary
philistines who had lost their heads. But often, too, the war psychosis
united with the pre-revolutionary political fever to produce even more
freakish fruits. The Liberals, in common with the unsuccessful generals,
sought everywhere and in everybody for the hand of the Germans. The
court camarilla had been considered Germanified. The whole clique of
Rasputin had been believed, or at least declared by the Liberals, to be
under instructions from Potsdam. The tzarina had been widely and openly
accused of espionage. She had been held responsible even in court
circles for the sinking by Germans of the vessel in which General
Kitchener was coming to Russia. The Rights, it goes without saying, were
not slow to pay back the debt. Zavadsky relates how the Assistant
Minister of the Interior, Beletsky, attempted early in 1916 to bring a
charge against the national-liberal industrialist, Guchkov, accusing him
of “activities bordering upon state treason in wartime.” In exposing the
performances of Beletsky, Kurlov, also a former Assistant Minister of
the Interior, in his turn put the question to Miliukov: “For what
honorable work in behalf of the fatherland did he (Miliukov) receive two
hundred thousand roubles of ‘Finland’ money, transferred to him by mail
in the name of the janitor of his house?” The quotation marks around
“Finland” are supposed to show that it was really a question of German
money. But nevertheless Miliukov had a well-earned reputation for
Germanophobia! In governmental circles it was generally considered as
proven that all the opposition parties were operating with German money.
In August 1915, when disturbances were expected in connection with the
dissolution of the Duma, the naval minister, Grigorovich, considered to
be almost a Liberal, said at a session of the government: “The Germans
are conducting a reinforced propaganda and showering the anti-government
organizations with money.” The Octobrists and Kadets, although indignant
at these insinuations, nevertheless never thought of fending them off in
a leftward direction. On the subject of a semi-patriotic speech of the
Menshevik, Cheidze, at the beginning of the war, the president of the
Duma, Rodzianko, wrote: “Subsequent events proved the closeness of
Cheidze to German circles.” You will wait in vain for the slightest
shadow of such proof!

In his _History of the Second Russian Revolution_, Miliukov says: “The
rôle of the ‘dark sources’ in the revolution of February 27 is wholly
unclear, but judging by all that followed it is difficult to deny it.”
Peter Struve, a former Marxist and now a reactionary Slavophile of
German origin, expresses himself more decisively: “When the Russian
revolution, planned and created by Germany, succeeded, Russia had to all
intents and purposes withdrawn from the war.” Like Miliukov, Struve is
here speaking not of the October, but of the February Revolution. On the
subject of the famous _Order No.1_, the Magna Carta of soldiers’
liberties drawn up by the delegates of the Petrograd garrison, Rodzianko
wrote: “I have not the slightest doubt of the German origin of _Order
No.1_.” The chief of one of the divisions, General Barkovsky, told
Rodzianko that “_Order No.1_ was supplied to his troops in enormous
quantities from the German trenches.” When he became war minister,
Guchkov, whom they had tried to indict for state treason under the tzar,
hastened to switch this accusation to the left. The April orders of
Guchkov to the army read: “Persons who hate Russia, and are undoubtedly
in the service of our enemies, have penetrated into the active army with
the persistence characteristic of our enemies, and evidently in
fulfilment of their demands are preaching the necessity of ending the
war as soon as possible.” On the subject of the April manifestation,
which was directed against an imperialist policy, Miliukov writes: “The
task of removing both ministers (Miliukov and Guchkov) was directly
imposed by Germany,” and the workers got 15 roubles a day from the
Bolsheviks for taking part in the demonstration. With this key of German
gold the liberal historian unlocks all those enigmas against which he
bumped his head as a politician.

The patriotic socialists who baited the Bolsheviks as involuntary
allies, if not agents, of the German ruling circles, were themselves
under the same accusation from the right. We have seen what Rodzianko
said about Cheidze. He did not even spare Kerensky himself. “It was he,
undoubtedly, who through secret sympathy for the Bolsheviks, but perhaps
also because of other considerations, impelled the Provisional
Government” to admit the Bolsheviks into Russia. “Other considerations”
can mean nothing but a partiality for German gold. In his curious
memoirs, which have been translated into foreign languages, the General
of Gendarmes, Spiridovich, remarking upon the abundance of Jews in the
ruling circles of the Social Revolutionaries, adds: “Among them Russian
names also glimmered, such as the future Rural Minister, the German spy,
Victor Chernov.” And it was by no means only this gendarme who suspected
the leader of the Social Revolutionary party. After the July pogrom of
the Bolsheviks, the Kadets lost no time in raising a hue and cry against
the Minister of Agriculture, Chernov, a man suspected of connections
with Berlin; and the unhappy patriot had to resign temporarily in order
to exonerate himself. Speaking in the autumn of 1917 on the instructions
given by the patriotic Executive Committee to the Menshevik, Skobelev,
for his participation in an international socialist conference,
Miliukov, in the tribune of the Pre-parliament, demonstrated by means of
a meticulous syntactical analysis of its text, the obvious “German
origin” of the document. The style of the instructions, as indeed of all
the compromisist literature, was as a fact bad. The belated democracy,
without ideas, without will, glancing round affrightedly on all sides,
piled up qualification after qualification in its writings, until they
sounded like a bad translation from a foreign language – just as the
democracy itself was, indeed, the shadow of a foreign past. Ludendorff,
however, is not in the least to blame for that.

The journey of Lenin through Germany offered inexhaustible possibilities
for chauvinist demagoguism. But as though to demonstrate beyond a doubt
the purely instrumental rôle of patriotism in their policies, the
bourgeois press, after having at first met Lenin with a hypocritical
good-will, started their licentious attack upon his “Germanophilism”
only after his social program had become clear. “Land, bread, and peace”
– those slogans he could only have brought from Germany. At that time
there were still no revelations of Ermolenko.

After Trotsky and several other emigrants, returning from America, had
been arrested by the military authorities of King George in the latitude
of Halifax, the British ambassador in Petrograd gave to the press an
official communication in a quite inimitable Anglo-Russian language:
“Those Russian citizens on the steamer _Christianiafiord_ were detained
in Halifax because it was communicated to the British government that
they had connections with a plan subsidized by the German government to
overthrow the Russian Provisional Government ...” Buchanan’s
communication was dated April 14: at that time neither Burstein nor
Ermolenko had appeared upon the horizon. Miliukov, in his capacity of
Minister of Foreign Affairs, found himself obliged, however, to request
the British government through the Russian ambassador, Nabokov, to
liberate Trotsky and permit him to come to Russia. “Knowing of Trotsky’s
activities in America,” writes Nabokov, “the British government was
perplexed: ‘Is this ill-will or blindness?’ The Englishmen shrugged
their shoulders, understood the danger, gave us warning.” Lloyd George
however was compelled to yield. In answer to a question put by Trotsky
to the British Ambassador in the Petrograd press, Buchanan took back in
some embarrassment his first explanation, and this time announced: “My
government detained the group of emigrants in Halifax only for the
purpose of, and until, the establishment of their identity by the
Russian government ... That is the whole story of the detaining of the
Russian emigrants.” Buchanan was not only a gentleman, but also a
diplomat.

At a conference of members of the State Duma early in June, Miliukov,
having been pushed out of the government by the April demonstration,
demanded the arrest of Lenin and Trotsky, unequivocally hinting at their
connections with Germany. On the following day at the congress of the
soviets, Trotsky declared: “Until Miliukov confirms or withdraws this
accusation, he wears the brand of a dishonest slanderer.” Miliukov
answered in the newspaper _Rech_ that he was “in truth dissatisfied that
Messrs. Lenin and Trotsky are at liberty,” but that he had motivated the
demand for their arrest “not on the ground that they are agents of
Germany, but that they have sufficiently violated the criminal code.”
Miliukov was a diplomat without being a gentleman. The necessity of
arresting Lenin and Trotsky had been perfectly clear to him before the
revelations of Ermolenko; the juridical dressings of the arrest were a
mere question of technique. The leader of the Liberals had been playing
with the sharp blade of this accusation long before it was set in motion
in a “juridical” form.

The rôle of the myth of German gold becomes most obvious of all in a
colorful episode described by the general administrator of the
Provisional Government, the Kadet Nabokov (not to be confused with the
Russian ambassador in London mentioned above). In one of the sittings of
the government, Miliukov, speaking on some other question, remarked: “It
is no secret to anybody that German money played its rôle among the
factors promoting the revolution ...” That was quite in the character of
Miliukov, although the formula was obviously softened. “Kerensky,”
according to Nabokov’s report, “went into a rage. He seized his
portfolio and slamming it down on the table, cried out: ‘Since Miliukov
has dared in my presence to slander the sacred cause of the great
Russian Revolution, I do not wish to remain here another minute.’” That
is wholly in the character of Kerensky although his gestures were
perhaps a little exaggerated. A Russian proverb advises us not to spit
in the well from which we may have to drink. When he was offended by the
October Revolution, Kerensky could think of nothing better to use
against it than this myth of German gold. That which in Miliukov’s mouth
had been a “slander against a sacred cause” became for Kerensky in the
mouth of Burstein the sacred cause of slandering the Bolsheviks.

The unbroken chain of suspicions of Germanophilism and espionage,
extending from the tzarina, Rasputin and the court circles, through the
ministry, the staffs, the Duma, the liberal newspapers, to Kerensky and
a number of the Soviet leaders, strikes one most of all by its monotony.
The political enemy seem to have firmly resolved not to overwork their
imaginations: they simply switched the same old accusations about from
one point to another, the movement being predominantly from right to
left. The July slander against the Bolsheviks least of all fell down out
of a clear sky. It was the natural fruit of panic and hate, the last
link in a shameful chain, the transfer of a stereotyped slanderous
formula to its new and final object, permitting a reconciliation of the
accusers and the accused of yesterday. All the insults of the ruling
group, all their fears, all their bitterness, were now directed against
that party which stood at the extreme left and incarnated most
completely the unconquerable force of the revolution. Was it in actual
fact possible for the possessing classes to surrender their place to the
Bolsheviks without having made a last desperate effort to trample them
in the blood and filth? That tangle of slander, well snarled up from
long usage, was inevitably fated to come down on the heads of the
Bolsheviks. The revelations of the retired ensign from the Intelligence
Service were only a materialization of the ravings of possessing classes
who found themselves in a blind alley. For that reason the slander
acquired such frightful force.

The idea of German agentry was not in itself, to be sure, mere raving.
The German espionage in Russia was incomparably better organized than
the Russian in Germany. It is sufficient to recall the fact that the War
Minister, Sukhomlinov, was arrested even under the old régime as the
trusted man of Berlin. It is also indubitable that German agents
inserted themselves not only into the court and Black Hundred circles,
but also among the Lefts. The Austrian and German governments had
flirted from the first days of the war with separatist tendencies,
beginning among the Ukrainian and Caucasian emigrants. It is interesting
that Ermolenko, recruited in April 1917, was sent over to struggle for
the secession of the Ukraine. As early as 1914, both Lenin and Trotsky
in Switzerland had demanded in print a break with those revolutionists
who were getting caught on the hook of Austro-German militarism. Early
in 1917 Trotsky repeated this printed warning to the left German social
democrats, the followers of Liebknecht, with whom agents of the British
embassy were trying to establish connections. But in flirting with
separatists in order to weaken Russia and frighten the tzar, the German
government was far from the thought of overthrowing tzarism. The best
evidence of this is a proclamation scattered in the Russian trenches
after the February revolution, and read on March 11 at a session of the
Petrograd soviet. “At the beginning the English joined hands with your
tzar; now they have turned against him because he would not agree to
their self-interested demands. They have overthrown your tzar, given to
you by God. Why has this happened? Because he understood and divulged
the faults and crafty schemes of the English.” Both the form and
contents of this document give internal guarantee of its genuineness.
Just as you cannot imitate a Prussian lieutenant, so you cannot imitate
his historic philosophy. Hoffmann, a Prussian lieutenant with a
general’s rank, imagined that the Russian revolution was thought up and
its foundations laid in England. In that, however, there is less
absurdity than in the theory of Miliukov and Struve, for Potsdam
continued to the end to hope for a separate peace with Tzarskoe Selo,
while in London they feared more than anything else a separate peace
between them. Only when the impossibility of restoring the tzar became
wholly obvious, did the German staff transfer its hopes to the
disintegrating power of the revolutionary process. Even in the matter of
Lenin’s trip through Germany, the initiative came not from German
circles but from Lenin himself – in its very first form, indeed, from
the Menshevik, Martov. The German staff only consented to it, and that
probably not without hesitation. Ludendorff said to himself: Perhaps
relief will come from that side.

During the July events the Bolsheviks themselves sought for an alien and
criminal hand in certain unexpected excesses that were obviously
provoked with malice aforethought. Trotsky wrote in those days: “What
rôle has been played in this by counter-revolutionary provocation and
German agents? It is difficult at present to pronounce definitely upon
this question. We must await the results of an authentic investigation
... But even now it is possible to say with certainty that the results
of such an investigation will throw a clear light upon the work of Black
Hundred gangs, and upon the underground rôle played by gold, German,
English or 100 per cent Russian, or indeed all three of them. But no
judicial investigation will change the political meaning of the events.
The worker and soldier masses of Petrograd were not, and could not have
been, bought. They are not in the service of Wilhelm, or Buchanan, or
Miliukov. The movement was prepared by the war, by oncoming hunger, by
the reaction lifting its head, by the headlessness of the government, by
the adventurist offensive, by the political distrust and revolutionary
alarm of the workers and soldiers ...” All the material in the archives,
the documents and memoirs, which have become public since the war and
the two revolutions, prove beyond a doubt that the partiality of German
agents for the revolutionary processes in Russia did not for one moment
rise out of the military-police sphere into the sphere of big politics.
Is there, by the way, any need of insisting upon this, after the
revolution in Germany itself? How pitiful and impotent did these
supposedly all-powerful Hohenzollern agents turn out to be in the autumn
of 1918 in the face of the German workers and soldiers! “The calculation
of our enemy in sending Lenin to Russia was absolutely right,” says
Miliukov. Ludendorff himself quite otherwise estimates the results of
the undertaking: “I could not suppose” so he justifies himself, speaking
of the Russian revolution, “that it would become the tomb of our own
might.” This merely means that of the two strategists, Ludendorff who
permitted Lenin to go, and Lenin who accepted his permission, Lenin saw
farther and better.

“The enemy propaganda and Bolshevism” complains Ludendorff in his
memoirs, “were seeking one and the same goal within the boundaries of
the German state. England gave opium to China, our enemies gave us
revolution ...” Ludendorff attributes to the Entente the same thing of
which Miliukov and Kerensky were accusing Germany. Thus cruelly does the
insulted reason of history avenge itself! But Ludendorff did not stop
there. In February 1931, he informed the world that behind the back of
the Bolsheviks stood international and especially Jewish finance
capital, united in the struggle against tzarist Russia and imperialist
Germany. “Trotsky arrived in Petrograd from America through Sweden,
provided with great supplies of the money of international capitalists.
Other moneys were supplied to the Bolsheviks by the Jew, Solmsen, from
Germany.” (Ludendorff’s _Volkswarte_, February 15, 1931). However the
testimonies of Ludendorff and Ermolenko may disagree, they coincide in
one point: a part of the money did actually come from Germany – not from
Ludendorff, it is true, but from his mortal enemy, Solmsen. Only this
testimony was lacking to provide an aesthetic finish to the whole
question.

But not Ludendorff, nor yet Miliukov, nor Kerensky, invented this
device, although they first made a broad use of it. “Solmsen” has many
predecessors in history, both as Jew and as German agent. Count Fersen,
a Swedish ambassador in France during the great revolution, a passionate
partisan of the monarchical power of the king, and more especially of
the queen, more than once sent to his government in Stockholm such
communications as the following: “The Jew, Efraim, an emissary of Herr
Herzberg in Berlin, (the Prussian Minister of Foreign Affairs) is
supplying them (the Jacobins) with money; not long ago he received
another 600,000 livres.” The moderate newspaper, _Les Revolutions de
Paris_ made the supposition that during the republican revolution
“emissaries of the European diplomats, such as for instance the Jew
Efraim, an agent of the Prussian king, made their way into the volatile
and fickle crowd ...” The same Fersen reported: “The Jacobins would have
perished, but for the help of the rabble bribed by them.” If the
Bolsheviks paid daily wages to the participants in that demonstration,
they only followed the example of the Jacobins, and moreover the money
for bribing the “rabble” came in both cases from a source in Berlin.
This similarity in the action of revolutionists in the twentieth and
eighteenth centuries would be striking, were it not outweighed by a more
striking similarity in the slanders peddled by their enemies. But we
need not limit ourselves to the Jacobins. The history of all revolutions
and civil wars invariably testifies that a threatened or an overthrown
ruling class is disposed to find the cause of its misfortunes, not in
itself, but in foreign agents and emissaries. Not only Miliukov in his
character as a learned historian, but even Kerensky in his character as
a superficial reader of history, must be aware of this. However, in
their character as politicians they were victims of their own
counterrevolutionary functions.

Under these theories about the revolutionary rôle of foreign agents, as
under all typical mass-misunderstandings, there lies an indirect
historical foundation. Consciously or unconsciously, every nation at the
critical period of its existence makes especially broad and bold
borrowings from the treasury of other peoples. Not infrequently,
moreover, a leading rôle in the progressive movement is played by people
living on the border or emigrants returning to the homeland. The new
ideas and institutions thus appear to the conservative strata first of
all as alien, as foreign inventions. The village against the city, the
backwoods against the capital, the petty bourgeois against the worker –
they all defend themselves under the guise of a national force resisting
foreign influence. Miliukov portrayed the Bolshevik movement as “German”
for the same reason in the last analysis that the Russian muzhik has for
a hundred years regarded as a German any man dressed up in city clothes.
The difference is that the muzhik was making an honest mistake.

In 1918 – that is, after the October Revolution – a press bureau of the
American government triumphantly published a collection of documents
connecting the Bolsheviks with the Germans. This crude forgery, which
would not stand up under a breath of criticism, was believed in by many
educated and perspicacious people, until it was discovered that the
originals of the documents supposed to have been drawn up in different
countries were all written on the same machine. The forgers did not
stand on ceremony with their customers: they were obviously confident
that the political demand for exposures of the Bolsheviks would outweigh
the voice of criticism. And they made no mistake, for they were well
paid for the documents. However, the American government, separated by
an ocean from the scene of the struggle, was only secondarily interested
in this matter. But why after all is political slander as such so poor
and monotonous? Because the social mind is economical and conservative.
It does not expend more efforts than are necessary for its goal. It
prefers to borrow the old, when not compelled to create the new. But
even when so compelled, it combines with it elements of the old. Each
successive religion has created no new mythology, but has merely
repersonified the superstitions of the past. In the same manner
philosophical systems are created, and doctrines of law and morals.
Separate individuals, even those possessed of genius, develop in the
same inharmonious way as the society which nourishes them. A bold
imagination lives in the same skull with a slavish adherence to trite
images. Audacious flights reconcile themselves with crude prejudices.
Shakespeare nourished his creative genius upon subjects handed down from
the deep ages. Pascal used the theory of probability to demonstrate the
existence of God. Newton discovered the law of gravitation and believed
in the Apocalypse. After Marconi had established a wireless station in
the residence of the pope, the vicar of Christ distributed his mystic
blessing by radio. In ordinary times these contradictions do not rise
above a condition of drowsiness, but in times of catastrophe they
acquire explosive force. When it comes to a threat against their
material interests, the educated classes set in motion all the
prejudices and confusion which humanity is dragging in its wagon-train
behind it. Can we too much blame the lords of old Russia, if they built
the mythology of their fall out of indiscriminate borrowings from those
classes which were overthrown before them? To be sure, the circumstance
that Kerensky resurrects the tale of Ermolenko in his memoirs many years
after the event, is, to say the least, superfluous.

The slander of those years of war and revolution was striking, we
remarked, in its monotony. However, it does contain a variation. From
the piling up of quantity we get a new quality. The struggle of the
other parties among themselves was almost like a family spat in
comparison with their common baiting of the Bolsheviks. In conflict with
one another they were, so to speak, only getting in training for a
further conflict, a decisive one. Even in employing against each other
the sharpened accusation of German connections, they never carried the
thing through to the limit. July presents a different picture. In the
assault upon the Bolsheviks all the ruling forces, the government, the
courts, the Intelligence Service, the staffs, the officialdom, the
municipalities, the parties of the soviet majority, their press, their
orators, constituted one colossal unit. The very disagreements among
them, like the different tone qualities of the instruments in an
orchestra, only strengthened the general effect. An inept invention of
two contemptible creatures was elevated to the height of a factor in
history. The slanders poured down like Niagara. If you take into
consideration the setting – the war and the revolution – and the
character of the accused – revolutionary leaders of millions who were
conducting their party to the sovereign power – you can say without
exaggeration that July 1917 was the month of the most gigantic slander
in world history.



CHAPTER 28 THE COUNTER-REVOLUTION LIFTS ITS HEAD


 

During the first two months, when the power belonged formally to the
government of Guchkov and Miliukov, it was as a fact wholly in the hands
of the Soviet. During the following two months the Soviet grew weaker. A
part of its influence upon the masses went over to the Bolsheviks; a
part of its power the minister-socialists took with them into their
portfolios in the Coalition Government. From the outset of preparations
for the offensive there began an automatic increase of the influence of
the commanding staff, the organs of finance capital and the Kadet party.
Before shedding the blood of the soldiers, the Executive Committee
carried out a substantial transfusion of its own blood into the arteries
of the bourgeoisie. Behind the scenes the threads of all this were held
in the hands of the embassies and governments of the Entente.

At an inter-allied conference in London the western friends “forgot” to
invite the Russian ambassador. Only after he had reminded them of his
existence, did they send him an invitation – it was about ten minutes
before the opening of the session – and moreover there was no place for
him at the table, and he had to crowd in between the Frenchmen. This
mockery of the ambassador of the Provisional Government and the
demonstrative exit of the Kadets from the government – both events
happening on the 2nd of July – had the same purpose: to bring the
Compromisers to their knees. The armed demonstration, bursting out just
after this, had an especially exasperating effect upon the soviet
leaders, because having been struck this double blow, they were at the
time directing all their attention in exactly the other direction. Once
it had become necessary to take up a bloody task in alliance with the
Entente, it would be hard after all to find better intermediaries than
the Kadets. Chaikovsky, one of the oldest revolutionists, who had become
metamorphosed after long years abroad into a moderate British Liberal,
moralized as follows: “Money is necessary for war, and the Allies will
not give money to socialists.” The Compromisers were embarrassed by this
argument, but fully understood the force of it.

The correlation of forces had obviously changed to the disadvantage of
the people, but nobody was able to say how much: The appetites of the
bourgeoisie, at least, had grown considerably more than their
opportunities. In this uncertainty lay the source of the conflict, for
the strength of class forces is tested in action, and all the events of
a revolution reduce themselves to these repeated trials of force.
However great may have been the shift of power from left to right, in
any case it very little affected the Provisional Government which
remained a vacant space. The people who in those critical July Days were
interested in the ministry of Prince Lvov could be counted on the
fingers of one hand. General Krymov, the same one who once had a
conversation with Guchkov about overthrowing Nicholas II – we will soon
meet this general for the last time – sent the prince a telegram
concluding with the urgent demand: “It is time to pass from words to
deeds.” The advice sounded funny, and merely further emphasised the
impotence of the government.

“At the beginning of July,” subsequently wrote the Liberal, Nabokov,
“there was one short moment when the authority of the government seemed
again to lift its head; that was after the putting down of the first
Bolshevik uprising. But the Provisional Government was unable to make
use of this opportunity, and let slip the favorable conditions of the
moment. It was never repeated.” Other representatives of the right camp
have expressed themselves to the same effect. In reality, in the July
Days as in all other critical moments, the constituent parts of the
coalition were pursuing different goals. The Compromisers would have
been perfectly ready to permit a final wiping out of the Bolsheviks, had
it not been obvious that after settling with the Bolsheviks, the
officers, Cossacks, Cavaliers of St. George and shock battalions would
have cleaned up the Compromisers themselves. The Kadets wanted to carry
through, and sweep away not only the Bolsheviks but the soviets also.
However, it was no accident that at all acute moments the Kadets found
themselves outside the government. In the last analysis what pushed them
out was the pressure of the masses, irresistible in spite of the buffer
provided by the Compromisers. Even if they had succeeded in seizing the
power, the Liberals could not have held it. Subsequent events
conclusively proved this. The idea of a lost opportunity in July is a
retrospective illusion. At any rate, the July victory did not strengthen
the government, but on the contrary opened a prolonged period of crisis
which was formally resolved only on the 24th of July, and was in essence
an introduction to the four months’ death agony of the February régime.

The Compromisers were torn between the necessity of reviving their
half-friendship with the bourgeoisie, and the need of softening the
hostility of the masses. Tacking became for them a form of existence.
Their zigzags became a feverish tossing to and fro, but the fundamental
line kept swinging sharply to the right. On the 7th of July, a whole
series of repressive measures was decreed by the government. But at the
same session, and so to speak by stealth, taking advantage of the
absence of the “old man” – that is, the Kadets – the minister-socialists
proposed to the government that it undertake to carry out the program of
the June congress of the soviets. This, however, straightway led to a
further disintegration of the government. The great landlord and former
president of the land union, Prince Lvov, accused the government of
“undermining” with its agrarian policy “the popular sense of right.” The
landlords were worried not only lest they be deprived of their
hereditary possessions, but lest the Compromisers “attempt to place the
Constituent Assembly before the fact of a decision already arrived at.”
All the pillars of the monarchist reaction now became flaming partisans
of pure democracy! The government decided that Kerensky should occupy
the position of Minister-President, retaining also the portfolios of war
and navy. To Tseretelli as the new Minister of the Interior fell the
task of responding in the Executive Committee to questions about the
arrest of the Bolsheviks. A protesting question was raised by Martov,
and Tseretelli unceremoniously answered his old party comrade that he
would rather deal with Lenin than Martov: with the former he knew what
to do, but with the latter his hands were tied ... “I take upon myself
the responsibility for these arrests”: the minister threw this challenge
into the tensely attentive hall.

In dealing blows to the left, the Compromisers would justify themselves
by citing a danger to the right. “Russia is threatened with a military
dictatorship,” declared Dan at the session of July 9th. “We are obliged
to snatch the bayonet from the hand of the military dictator. And this
we can do only by declaring the Provisional Government a Committee of
Public Safety. We must give it unlimited powers, so that it may root out
to the bottom anarchy on the left and counter-revolution on the right.
As though in the hands of a government fighting against workers and
soldiers and peasants there could be any other bayonet but the bayonet
of counter-revolution! By 253 votes with 47 abstaining, the joint
session adopted the following resolutions: “1. The country and the
revolution are in danger. 2. The Provisional Government is a government
of the Salvation of the Revolution. 3. It is endowed with unlimited
powers.” The resolution resounded as loud as an empty barrel. The
Bolsheviks present at the session abstained from the voting, which
testifies to an indubitable disconcertedness among the heads of the
party at that time.

Mass movements, even when shattered, never fail to leave their traces.
The place of the titled nobleman at the head of the government was now
occupied by a radical lawyer. The Ministry of the Interior was occupied
by a former hard-labor convict. The plebeian transformation of the
government was at hand. Kerensky, Tseretelli, Chernov, Skobelev, leaders
of the Executive Committee, now determined the physiognomy of the
government. Was not this a realization of the slogan of the June Days,
“Down with the ten minister-capitalists”? No, this was only an exposure
of its inadequacy. The minister-democrats took the power only in order
to bring back the minister-capitalists. _La Coalition est morte, vive la
coalition!_

The comedy is now put on – the solemnly shameful comedy of the disarming
of the machine-gunners on Palace Square. A series of regiments are
disbanded, the soldiers are sent in small detachments to fill up the
ranks at the front. Forty-year-old men are brought to submission, and
herded into the trenches. They are all agitators against the régime of
Kerenskyism. There are tens of thousands of them, and in the autumn they
will accomplish a great work in the trenches. At the same time the
workers are disarmed, although with less success. Under pressure from
the generals – we shall see in a minute what forms it took – the death
penalty is reintroduced at the front. But on the same day, the 12th of
July, a decree is published limiting the sales of land. That belated
half-measure, adopted under the axe of the muzhik, provokes mockery from
the left and a grinding of teeth on the right. While forbidding all
processions in the streets – a threat to the left – Tseretelli warns of
the prevalence of unlegalized arrests – an attempt to pull up the reins
on the Right. In removing the commander-in-chief of the forces of the
Petrograd district, Kerensky explains to the Left that this is because
he broke up the workers’ organizations, to the Right that it is because
he was not decisive enough.

The Cossacks became the veritable heroes of bourgeois Petrograd. “There
were occasions,” relates the Cossack officer, Grekov, “when upon the
entrance into a public place, a restaurant for example, of someone in a
Cossack uniform, all would stand up and greet the newcomer with
applause.” The theaters, the moving-picture houses, the public gardens,
instituted a series of benefit evenings for the wounded Cossacks and the
families of the slain. The bureau of the Executive Committee found
itself compelled to elect a commission, with Cheidze at the head, to
participate in the organization of a public funeral for the “warriors
fallen while fulfilling their revolutionary duty in the days of July
3-5.” The Compromisers had to drink the cup of humiliation to the dregs.
The ceremonial began with a liturgy in the Isaakievsky Cathedral. The
pall-bearers were Rodzianko, Miliukov, Prince Lvov, Kerensky and they
marched in procession to the burial-place in the Alexandr-Nevsky
Monastery. On the line of march the militia were not to be seen; order
was preserved by the Cossacks. The day of the funeral was the day of
their complete dominion of Petrograd. The workers and soldiers slain by
the Cossacks, own brothers of the February martyrs, were buried
secretly, as were the martyrs of January 9th under tzarism.

The Kronstadt Executive Committee was ordered by the government, under
threat of a blockade of the island, to put Raskolnikov, Roshal and
ensign Remnev at the disposal of the Court of Inquiry. At Helsingfors,
Left Social-Revolutionaries were for the first time arrested along with
Bolsheviks. The retired Prince Lvov complained in the newspapers that
“the soviets are beneath the level of state morals and have not yet
cleansed themselves of Leninists – those agents of the Germans ...” It
became a matter of honor with the Compromisers to demonstrate their
state morals. On July 13th the Executive Committees in joint session
adopted a resolution introduced by Dan: “Any person indicted by the
courts is deprived of membership in the Executive Committees until
sentence is pronounced.” This placed the Bolsheviks in fact beyond the
law. Kerensky shut down the whole Bolshevik press. In the provinces the
land committees were arrested. _Izvestia_ sobbed impotently: “Only a few
days ago we witnessed a debauch of anarchy on the streets of Petrograd.
Today on the same streets there is an unrestrained flow of
counter-revolutionary Black Hundred speeches.”

After the disbandment of the more revolutionary regiments and the
disarming of the workers, the resultant of the composition of forces
moved still farther to the right. A considerable part of the real power
was now clearly in the hands of the military chiefs, the industrial and
banking and Kadet groups. The rest of it remained as before in the hands
of the soviets. The dual power was still there, but now no longer the
legalized, contractual or coalitional dual power of the preceding two
months, but the explosive dual power of a clique – of two cliques, the
bourgeois-military and the compromisist, who feared, but at the same
time needed each other. What remained to be done? To resurrect the
Coalition. “After the insurrection of July 3-5,” says Miliukov quite
justly, “the idea of a Coalition not only did not disappear, but
acquired for the time being more force and importance than it had
possessed before.”

The Provisional Committee of the state Duma unexpectedly came to life at
this time and adopted a drastic resolution against the Government of
Salvation. That was the last straw. All the ministers handed their
portfolios to Kerensky, thereby making him the focus of the national
sovereignty. In the further development of the February revolution, as
also in the personal fate of Kerensky, that moment acquired an important
significance. In the chaos of groupings, resignations and appointments,
something in the nature of an immovable point had been designated around
which everything else revolved. The resignation of the ministers served
only as an introduction to negotiations with the Kadets and
industrialists. The Kadets laid down their conditions: responsibility of
the members of the government “exclusively to their own conscience”;
complete unity with the Allies; restoration of discipline in the army;
no social reforms until the Constituent Assembly. A point not written
down was the demand that the elections to the Constituent Assembly be
postponed. This was called a “non-party and national program.” A similar
program was advanced by the representatives of trade and industry, whom
the Compromisers had tried vainly to set against the Kadets. The
Executive Committee again confirmed its resolution endowing the
Government of Salvation with “unlimited powers.” That meant agreeing to
the government’s independence of the soviets. On the same day Tseretelli
as Minister of the Interior sent out instructions for the taking of
“swift and decisive measures putting an end to all illegal activities in
the matter of land relations.” The Minister of Food Supply, Peshekhonov,
likewise demanded an end of all “violent and criminal manifestations
against the landlords.” The Government of the Salvation of the
Revolution recommended itself above all as a government of the salvation
of the landlord’s property. But not that alone. An industrial magnate,
the engineer Palchinsky, in his three-fold calling as director of the
Ministry of Trade and Industry, plenipotentiary administrator of fuel
and metal, and head of the Commission on Defence, was conducting an
energetic campaign for syndicated capital. The Menshevik economist,
Cherevanin, complained in the economic department of the Soviet that the
noble undertakings of the democracy were going to smash against the
sabotage of Palchinsky. The Minister of Agriculture, Chernov, to whose
shoulders the Kadets had shifted the accusation of German connections,
felt obliged “for purposes of rehabilitation” to resign. On July 18, the
government, in which socialists predominated, issued a decree dissolving
the unsubmissive Finnish Seim[1] with its socialist majority. In a
solemn note to the Allies on the third anniversary of the World War, the
government not only repeated the ritual oath of loyalty, but also
reported the happy putting down of an insurrection caused by agents of
the enemy. A priceless documentary record of bootlicking! At the same
time a fierce law was promulgated against transgressions of discipline
on the railroads. After the government had thus demonstrated its
statesmanly maturity, Kerensky finally made up his mind to answer the
ultimatum of the Kadet party. His answer was to the effect that the
demands presented by it “could not serve as an obstacle to its
participation in the Provisional Government.” This veiled capitulation
was, however, not enough for the Liberals. They had to bring the
Compromisers to their knees. The central committee of the Kadet party
declared that the governmental declaration issued after the break-up of
the coalition on July 8 – a collection of democratic commonplaces – was
unacceptable to them, and broke off the negotiations.

It was a concentrated attack. The Kadets were acting in close union, not
only with the industrialists and Allied diplomats, but also with the
army generals. The head committee of the League of Officers at
headquarters functioned under the de facto leadership of the Kadet
party. Through the high commanding staff the Kadets brought pressure
against the Compromisers on their most sensitive side. On July 8th the
commander-in-chief of the southwestern front, General Kornilov, gave
orders to open fire upon retreating soldiers with machine-guns and
artillery. Supported by the commissar of the front, Savinkov – former
head of a terrorist organization of Social Revolutionaries – Kornilov
had before this demanded the introduction of the death penalty at the
front, threatening otherwise to resign the command. A secret telegram
had immediately appeared in the press. Kornilov was trying to get
publicity for himself. The supreme commander-in-chief, Brussilov, more
cautious and evasive, wrote to Kerensky in pedagogical tone: “The
lessons of the great French Revolution, partially forgotten by us,
nevertheless forcibly call themselves to mind ...” These lessons lay in
the fact that the French revolutionists, after vainly trying to
reorganize the army “upon humane principles” afterward adopted the death
penalty and “their triumphal banners filled half the world.” This was
all that the general had learned from the book of revolution. On July
12, the government restored the death penalty “in war time for certain
major crimes committed by men on military duty.” However, the
commander-in-chief of the northern front, General Klembovsky, wrote
three days later: “Experience has shown that those military units in
which there have been many replacements have become utterly incapable of
fighting. An army cannot be healthy if the source of its replacements is
rotten.” This rotten source of replacements was the Russian people.

On the 16th of July, Kerensky called a conference of the older military
chiefs at headquarters with the participation of Tereshchenko and
Savinkov. Kornilov was absent. The recoil on his front was in full
swing, and came to a stand only several days later when the Germans
themselves called a halt on the old state frontier. The names of the
conferees, Brussilov, Alexeiev, Ruszky, Klembovsky, Denikin, Romanovsky,
sounded like the last echo of an epoch that was disappearing in the
abyss. For four months these high generals had been regarding themselves
as half-dead. They now came to life and, considering the
minister-president an incarnation of the revolution which had so vexed
them, spitefully pinched and slapped him with impunity.

According to headquarters’ figures, the army on the southwestern front
had lost between June 18 and July 6, 56,000 men. An insignificant
sacrifice measured by the scale of the war! But two revolutions, the
February and the October, cost a great deal less. What had the Liberals
and Compromisers got out of the offensive besides death, destruction and
disaster? The social earthquakes of 1917 changed the aspect of one-sixth
of the earth’s surface and opened new possibilities before humanity. The
cruelties and horrors of revolution – which we have no desire either to
soften or deny – do not fall from the sky. They are inseparable from the
whole process of historic development.

Brussilov made a report on the results of the offensive begun a month
before: “Complete failure.” Its cause lay in the fact that “the
officers, from the company commander to the commander-in-chief, have no
power.” How and why they lost it, he did not say. As for future
operations: “We cannot get ready for them before spring.” While
insisting like the rest upon repressive measures, Klembovsky expressed a
doubt whether they could be real. “The death penalty? But is it possible
to put to death whole divisions? Court-martials? But in that case half
of the army would be in Siberia.” The chief of the general staff
reported: “Five regiments of the Petrograd garrison disbanded; the
instigators court-martialled ... In all about 90,000 men will be
transferred from Petrograd.” This news was received with satisfaction.
It did not occur to anybody to ponder the consequences of an evacuation
of the Petrograd garrison.

As to the committees, said Alexeiev, “they must be abolished ...
Military history extending over thousands of years has created its laws.
We tried to violate these laws, and we have had a fiasco.” This man
confused the laws of history with the rules of the drill-master. “People
followed the old banners as sacred things and went to their deaths,”
boasted Ruszky. “But to what have the red banners brought us? To the
surrender of armies in whole corps.” The decrepit general had forgotten
that he himself in August 1915 reported to the Council of Ministers:
“The contemporary demands of military technique are beyond our powers;
in any case we cannot keep up with the Germans.” Klembovsky insisted
with spiteful pleasure that the army had not really been ruined by
Bolsheviks, but by “other persons” who had introduced a good-for-nothing
military code, “persons who do not understand the life and conditions of
existence of an army.” This was a direct slap at Kerensky. Denikin came
down on the ministers more decisively: “You have trampled them in the
mud, our glorious war banners, and you will lift them again if you have
a conscience ...” And Kerensky? Suspected of lacking a conscience, he
humbly thanked the military boor for his “frankly and justly expressed
opinion.” And as for the declaration of rights of the soldier: “If I had
been minister when it was drawn up, the declaration would not have been
issued. Who first put down the Siberian sharp-shooters? Who first shed
blood to bring the disobedient into line? My appointee! My commissar!”
the Minister of Foreign Affairs, Tereshchenko, ingratiated himself with
this consoling observation: “Our offensive even though unsuccessful has
increased the confidence in us of the Allies.” The confidence of the
Allies! Was it not for this that the earth rotated upon its axis?

“At the present time the officers are the sole bulwark of freedom and
the revolution,” declaimed Klembovsky. “The officer is not a bourgeois,”
explained Brussilov, “he is the most real proletarian.” General Ruszky
added: “Generals also are proletarian.” To abolish the committees,
restore power to the old chiefs, drive politics – and that means
revolution – out of the army: such was the program of these proletarians
with a general’s rank. And Kerensky did not object to the program
itself; he was only troubled about the date. “As for the proposed
measures,” he said, “I think that even General Denikin would not insist
upon their immediate introduction ...” Those generals were mere drab
mediocrities, but they could hardly have failed to say to themselves:
“That’s the kind of language to use with these fellows!”

As a result of the conference there was a change in the high command.
The compliant and flexible Brussilov who had replaced the cautious
bureaucrat Alexeiev, the latter having opposed the offensive, was now
removed, and General Kornilov named in his place. The change was
variously motivated: to the Kadets they promised that Kornilov would
establish iron discipline; they assured the Compromisers that Kornilov
was a friend of the committees and commissars; Savinkov himself vouched
for his republican sentiments. In answer to his high appointment the
general sent a new ultimatum to the government: He, Kornilov, would
accept the appointment only on the following conditions: “Responsibility
only to his own conscience and the people; no interference in the
appointment of the high-commanding staff; restoration of the death
penalty at the rear.” The first point created difficulties. Kerensky had
started the business of “answering to his own conscience and the
people,” and this particular business does not tolerate competitors.
Kornilov’s telegram was published in the most widely circulated liberal
papers. The cautious politicians of the reaction puckered their noses.
Kornilov’s ultimatum was merely the ultimatum of the Kadet party
translated into the forthright language of a Cossack general. But
Kornilov’s calculations were right: The exorbitant demands and impudent
tone of his ultimatum delighted all the enemies of the revolution, and
above all the regular officers. Kerensky took fright and wanted to
remove Kornilov forthwith, but found no support in his government. In
the end, upon the advice of his backers, Kornilov agreed to concede in
an oral statement that by responsibility to the people he meant
responsibility to the Provisional Government. For the rest, the
ultimatum was accepted with some slight qualifications. Kornilov became
commander-in-chief. At the same time the military engineer, Filonenko,
was appointed as his commissar, and the former commissar of the
southwestern front, Savinkov, was made general administrator of the War
Ministry. The one was an accidental figure, a parvenu, the other a man
with a big revolutionary past – both of them pure adventurers, ready for
anything. Filonenko at least was ready for anything, and Savinkov was
ready for much. Their close connection with Kornilov, promoters of the
swift career of the general, played its rôle as we shall see in the
further development of events.

The Compromisers were surrendering all along the line. Tseretelli
asserted: “The Coalition is a union of salvation.” In spite of the
formal split, negotiations were in full swing behind the scenes. In
order to hasten the solution, Kerensky, in obvious agreement with the
Kadets, resorted to a purely histrionic measure – a measure, that is to
say, wholly in the spirit of his general policy, but at the same time
useful to his goal. He resigned and left town, abandoning the
Compromisers to their own desperation. Miliukov says on this theme: “By
his demonstrative departure he proved to his enemies, rivals and
adherents that, however they might look upon his personal qualities, he
was indispensable at the present moment simply because of the political
position he occupied between the two warring camps.” He won the game by
giving it away. The Compromisers threw themselves upon “Comrade
Kerensky” with suppressed curses and public prayers. Both sides, the
Kadets and the socialists, easily persuaded the headless ministry to
abolish itself, empowering Kerensky to form the government anew and at
his sole personal discretion.

In order to drive out of their wits the already frightened members of
the Executive Committees, the latest news was handed to them of the
deteriorating situation at the front. The Germans were driving the
Russian troops, the Liberals were driving Kerensky, Kerensky was driving
the Compromisers. The Menshevik and Social Revolutionary factions were
in session all night on July 24. Wearied out with their own
helplessness, the Executive Committees, by a majority of 147 votes
against 46, with 42 abstaining – unprecedented opposition! – finally
ratified the turning over of unconditional and unlimited powers to
Kerensky. At the Kadet Congress, sitting simultaneously, voices were
raised for the overthrow of Kerensky, but Miliukov curbed this
impatience, suggesting that they limit themselves for the present to
bringing pressure to bear. This does not mean that Miliukov had any
illusions about Kerensky, but he saw in him a point of application for
the power of the possessing classes. Once having freed the government
from the soviets, it would be no labor to free it from Kerensky.

In those days the gods of the Coalition remained athirst. The decree
demanding the arrest of Lenin had preceded the formation of the
transitional government of July 7. Now some firm act was needed to
signalize the resurrection of the Coalition. Already on the 13th of July
there had appeared in Maxim Gorky’s paper – the Bolshevik press no
longer existing – an open letter from Trotsky to the Provisional
Government which read: “You can have no logical foundation for excepting
me from the implications of the decree under which Lenin, Zinoviev and
Kamenev are liable to arrest. So far as concerns the political side of
the question, you can have no reason to doubt that I am as implacable an
enemy of the general policy of the Provisional Government as the
above-named comrades.” On the night when the new ministry was created,
Trotsky and Lunacharsky were arrested in Petrograd, and ensign Krylenko,
the future Bolshevik commander-in-chief, on the front.

The new government, having got born into the world after a three-day
crisis, had the appearance of a runt. It consisted of second and
third-rate figures selected on the basis of a choice between evils. The
Vice-President turned out to be the engineer Nekrasov, a left Kadet who
on February 27 had proposed that they put down the revolution by turning
over the power to one of the tzarist generals. A writer without party
and without personality, Prokopovich, a man who had been dwelling on the
borderland between Kadets and Mensheviks, became Minister of Trade and
Industry. A former attorney general, afterward a radical lawyer,
Zarudny, son of a “liberal” minister of Alexander II, was called to the
Ministry of Justice. The president of the Executive Committee of the
peasant soviet, Avksentiev, received the portfolio of the Interior. The
Menshevik, Skobelev, remained Minister of Labor, and the People’s
Socialist, Peshekhonov, became Minister of Provisions. The Liberals
supplied equally secondary figures, men who played a leading rôle
neither before nor after their appointment. Chernov somewhat
unexpectedly returned to his post as Minister of Agriculture. In the
four days between his resignation and this new appointment he had had
time to rehabilitate himself. Miliukov in his _History_ dispassionately
remarks that the nature of the relation between Chernov and the German
authorities “remained unexplained.” “It is possible,” he adds, “that the
testimony of the Russian Intelligence Service and the suspicions of
Kerensky, Tereshchenko and others went a little too far in this matter.”
The reappointment of Chernov to the post of Minister of Agriculture was
nothing more than a tribute paid to the prestige of the ruling party of
the Social Revolutionaries – in which, by the way, Chernov was steadily
losing influence. Finally, Tseretelli had the foresight to remain
outside the ministry. In May he had thought that he would be useful to
the revolution in the staff of the government; now he intended to be
useful to the government in the staff of the Soviet. From this time on
Tseretelli actually fulfilled the duties of a commissar of the
bourgeoisie in the system of the soviets. “If the interests of the
country should be transgressed by the Coalition,” he said at a session
of the Petrograd soviet, “our duty would be to withdraw our comrades
from the government.” It was no longer a question then – as Dan had not
long ago vouchsafed – of crowding out the Liberals after using them up;
it was a question of retiring in good season upon finding out that you
had been used up. Tseretelli was preparing a complete surrender of power
to the bourgeoisie.

In the first Coalition, formed on May 6, the socialists had been in the
minority, but they were in fact masters of the situation. In the
ministry of July 24, the socialists were in a majority, but they were
mere shadows of the Liberals. “With a slight nominal predominance of
socialists,” writes Miliukov, “the actual predominance in the cabinet
unquestionably belonged to the convinced partisans of bourgeois
democracy.” It would be more accurate to say bourgeois property. In the
matter of democracy the thing was much less definite. In the same
spirit, although with an unexpected motivation, Minister Peshekhonov
compared the July with the May Coalition: At that time, he said, the
bourgeoisie needed support from the left; now when counter-revolution
threatens it needs support from the right. “The more forces we attract
from the right, the fewer will remain of those who wish to make an
attack upon the government.” This suggests a superb rule for political
strategy: In order to raise the siege of a fortress, the best method is
to open the gates from the inside. That was the formula of the new
Coalition.

The reaction was on the offensive, the democracy in retreat. Classes and
groups which had retired in fright during the first days of the
revolution began to lift their heads. Interest which yesterday had lain
concealed, today came into the open. Merchants and speculators demanded
the extermination of the Bolsheviks and – freedom of trade. They raised
their voice against all restrictions upon trade whatsoever, even those
which had been introduced under tzarism. The food commissions which had
tried to struggle with speculation were declared to blame for the lack
of the necessities of life. From the commissions, hatred was transferred
to the soviets. The Menshevik economist Grohman has reported that the
campaign of the merchants “became especially strong after the events of
July 3-4.” The soviets were held responsible for the defeat, the high
cost of living and nocturnal burglaries.

Alarmed by monarchist intrigues and fearing some answering explosion
from the left, the government on August 7 sent Nicholas Romanov and his
family to Tobolsk. On the following day the new Bolshevik paper, _Worker
and Soldier_, was suppressed. News was arriving from all sides of the
mass arrests of the soldier committees. The Bolsheviks were able to
assemble their congress at the end of July only semi-legally. Army
congresses were forbidden. Congresses were now held by all who had been
sitting at home: landlords, merchants, industrialists, Cossack chiefs,
the clergy, the Cavaliers of St. George. Their voices sounded alike,
distinguished only in the degree of boldness. The indubitable, although
not always open, conductor of the symphony was the Kadet party.

At a Congress of Trade and Industry which early in August assembled
about three hundred representatives of the most important industrial and
stock-exchange organizations, the opening speech was made by the textile
king, Riabushinsky, and he did not hide his light under a bushel. “The
Provisional Government,” he said, “possesses only the shadow of power
... Actually a gang of political charlatans are in control ... (The
government is concentrating on taxes, imposing them primarily and
cruelly upon the merchant and industrial class ...) Is it expedient to
give to the spendthrifts? Would it not be better in the name of the
salvation of the fatherland to appoint a guardian over the
spendthrifts?” And then a concluding threat: “The bony hand of hunger
and national destitution will seize by the throat the friends of the
people!” That phrase about the bony hand of hunger, generalizing the
policy of lock-outs, entered from that time forth into the political
dictionary of the revolution. It cost the capitalists dear.

There was held in Petrograd a congress of commissars of the provinces.
These agents of the Provisional Government, who were supposed to stand
like a wall around it, virtually united against it, and under the
leadership of their Kadet nucleus took in hand the unhappy Minister of
the Interior, Avksentiev. “You can’t sit down between two chairs: a
government ought to govern and not be a puppet.” The Compromisers
defended themselves and protested half-heartedly, fearing lest
Bolsheviks overhear their quarrel with their ally. Avksentiev walked out
of the congress as though he had got burnt.

The Social Revolutionary and Menshevik press gradually began to adopt
the language of injury and complaint. Unexpected revelations began to
appear on its pages. On August 6, the Social Revolutionary paper _Dyelo
Naroda_, published a letter from a group of left junkers, mailed by them
while on the road to the front. They were “surprised by the rôle being
played by the junkers ... Systematic striking of people in the face,
participation in punitive expeditions characterized by executions
without trial or investigation at a mere order from the battalion
commander. ... Embittered soldiers have begun to snipe isolated junkers
from hiding-places ...” Thus looked the business of restoring health to
the army.

The reaction was on the offensive, the government in retreat. On August
7, the most popular Black Hundred agents, partisans of the Rasputin
circles and of Jewish pogroms, were liberated from prison. The
Bolsheviks remained in the Kresty Prison, where a hunger strike of
arrested soldiers and sailors was impending. The workers’ section of the
Petrograd soviet sent greetings on that day to Trotsky, Lunacharsky,
Kollontai and other prisoners.

The industrialists, the commissars of the provinces, the Cossack
congress in Novocherkassk, the patriotic press, the generals, the
liberals, everybody, thought it would be impossible to hold the
elections for the Constituent Assembly in September – best of all to
postpone them to the end of the war. To this, however, the government
would not agree. A compromise was found. The convocation of the
Constituent Assembly was deferred to the 28th of November. The Kadets
accepted this postponement, although not without grumblings. They were
firmly counting on certain decisive events happening during the three
remaining months, which would shift the whole question of the
Constituent Assembly to a different level. These hopes were being more
and more openly connected with the name of Kornilov.

The réclame surrounding the figure of this new “chief” henceforth
occupied the center of the bourgeois policy. A biography of the “First
People’s Commander-in-chief” was distributed in enormous quantities with
the active co-operation of headquarters. When Savinkov, speaking as
general administrator of the War Ministry, would say to the journalists,
“We assume, etc.” – his “we” did not mean Savinkov and Kerensky, but
Savinkov and Kornilov. The noise surrounding the name of Kornilov put
Kerensky on his guard. Rumors were spreading more and more persistently
about a conspiracy centering in the League of Officers at headquarters.
Personal meetings between the heads of the government and the chiefs of
the army in the first days of August only fanned the fires of their
mutual antipathy. “Does that lightweight elocutionist think he can give
orders to me?” Kornilov doubtless said to himself. “Does that dull and
ignorant Cossack expect to save Russia?” Kerensky could not but think.
And they were both right in their way. Kornilov’s program, which
included the militarisation of the factories and railroads, the
extension of the death penalty to the rear, and the subordination of the
Petrograd military district and therewith the garrison of the capital to
headquarters, became known in those days to the compromisist circles.
Behind this official program another program – unexpressed but no less
actual – could easily be guessed at. The left press sounded the alarm.
The Executive Committee advanced a new candidate for commander-in-chief
in the person of General Cheremissov. There was open talk of the
impending retirement of Kornilov. The reaction became alarmed.

On the 6th of August, the council of the Union of Twelve Cossack Armies
– the Don, the Kuban, the Tver, etc. – passed a resolution, not without
help from Savinkov, to bring it “loudly and forcibly” to the attention
of the government and the people that they would not be responsible for
the behavior of Cossack troops at the front or rear in case of the
removal of the “hero-chief,” General Kornilov. A conference of the
League of Cavaliers of St. George even more forcibly threatened the
government. If Kornilov was removed the League would immediately issue a
war-cry to all the Knights of St. George, summoning them to united
action with the Cossacks.” Not one of the generals protested against
this active insubordination, and the press of the existing order printed
with delight this resolution which contained the threat of civil war.
The head committee of the League of Officers of the Army and Fleet sent
out telegrams in which it placed all its hopes in “our dear leader,
General Kornilov,” and summoned “all honest people” to express their
confidence in him. A conference of “Public Men” of the right camp,
sitting in Moscow during those days, sent Kornilov a telegram in which
it joined its voice with those of the officers, the Georgian Cavaliers
and the Cossacks: “All thinking Russia looks with hope and confidence to
you.” It would be impossible to speak more clearly. The conference was
attended by industrialists and bankers like Riabushinsky and Tretiakov,
generals Alexeiev and Brussilov, representatives of the clergy,
professors, and leaders of the Kadet party with Miliukov at their head.
In the character of a smoke screen, representatives were present from a
semi-fictitious “peasant union,” designed to give the Kadets some
support among the peasant leaders. In the president’s chair loomed the
monumental figure of Rodzianko, offering public thanks to the delegation
of a Cossack regiment for putting down the Bolsheviks. The candidacy of
Kornilov for the rôle of savior of the country was thus openly advanced
by the most authoritative representatives of the possessing and educated
classes of Russia.

After these preparations the high commander-in-chief appeared for a
second time at the War Ministry for negotiations as to his program for
the salvation of the country. “Upon his arrival in Petrograd,” says his
chief of staff, General Lukomsky, describing this visit of Kornilov, “he
went to the Winter Palace escorted by Tekintsi[2] with two machine guns.
These machine guns were taken from the automobile after General Kornilov
entered the Winter Palace, and the Tekintsi stood guard at the palace
gate in order in case of need to come to the aid of the
commander-in-chief.” It was assumed that the commander-in-chief might
require military aid against the Minister-President. The machine guns of
the Tekintsi were machine guns of the bourgeoisie aimed at the
Compromisers who kept getting under their feet. Such was the position of
this government of salvation so independent of the soviets!

Shortly after Kornilov’s visit a member of the Provisional Government,
Kokoshkin, announced to Kerensky that the Kadets would resign “if
Kornilov’s program is not accepted today.” Although without the machine
guns, the Kadets were now talking to the government in the same
ultimative language as Kornilov. And that was a help. The Provisional
Government hastened to examine the report of the supreme commander, and
to recognize in principle the possibility of adopting the measures
proposed by him, “including the restoration of the death penalty at the
rear.”

In this mobilization of the forces of reaction there was naturally
included the All-Russian Council of Churches, which had for its official
aim to complete the emancipation of the orthodox church from
bureaucratic activities, but whose real aim was to protect it from the
revolution. With the overthrow of the monarchy the church had been
deprived of its official head. Its relation to the state, which had been
its defence and protector from time immemorial, was now left hanging in
the air. To be sure, the Holy Synod, in an epistle of March 9, had
hastened to extend its blessing to the accomplished revolution and
summon the people to “place their trust in the Provisional Government.”
However, the future contained a menace. The government had kept silent
on the church question as on all others. The clergy were completely at a
loss. Occasionally from some far-off region – from the city of Verny on
the borders of China – a telegram would come from a local cleric
assuring Prince Lvov that his policy fully corresponded to the Testament
of the Evangelists. Although thus tuning in on the revolution, the
church had not dared to interfere in events. This was plainest of all at
the front, where the influence of the clergy had evaporated along with
the discipline of fear. Denikin acknowledges this: “Whereas the
officers’ corps did for a long time fight for its military authority and
power to command, the voice of the pastors was silent from the first
days of the revolution and their every participation in the life of the
soldiers came to an end.” The congresses of the clergy at headquarters
and in the staffs of the army went by without leaving a trace.

The Council of Churches, although primarily a caste affair of the clergy
itself, and especially of its upper tiers, nevertheless did not remain
confined within the limits of the church bureaucracy. Liberal society
tried with might and main to get hold of it. The Kadet party, having
found no political roots among the people, fancied that a reformed
church might serve as a transmitting mechanism between it and the
masses. In the preparations for the meeting of the Council, an active
rôle was played side by side with princes of the church, and even ahead
of them, by temporal politicians of various tints, such as Prince
Troubetskoy, Count Olsufiev, Rodzianko, Samarin, and by liberal
professors and writers. The Kadet party tried in vain to create around
the Council an atmosphere of church reform, stepping softly the while,
lest some incautious motion might shake down the whole rotting
structure. Not a word was said about the separation of church and state,
either among the clergy or among the temporal reformers. The princes of
the church were naturally inclined to weaken the control of the state
over their inner affairs, but at the same time they desired that in the
future the state should not only guarantee their privileged situation,
their lands and income, but also continue to carry the lion’s share of
their expenses. In their turn the liberal bourgeoisie were willing to
guarantee to the orthodox church a continuance of its dominant position,
but on the condition that it learn to serve the interests of the ruling
class among the masses in the new style.

But just here the chief difficulties began. Denikin himself remarks with
sorrow that the Russian revolution “did not create one single popular
religious movement worth remarking upon. It would be truer to say that
in proportion as new layers of the people were drawn into the
revolution, they almost automatically turned their backs on the church,
even where they had formerly been attached to it. In the country
individual priests may still have had some personal influence, dependent
upon their behavior in regard to the land question; in the cities it
occurred to nobody, either among the workers or the petty bourgeoisie,
to turn to the clergy for the solution of any problem raised by the
revolution. The preparations for the Council of Churches were met with
complete indifference by the people. The interests and passions of the
masses were finding their expression in socialist slogans, not in
theological texts. Belated Russia enacted her history in an abridged
edition: she found herself obliged to step over, not only the epoch of
the reformation, but that of bourgeois parliamentarism as well.

Although planned for in the months of the flood-tide of the revolution,
the Church Council took place during the weeks of its ebb. This still
further thickened its reactionary coloring. The constitution of the
Council, the circle of problems it touched upon, even the ceremony of
its opening – all testified to radical changes in the attitude of the
different classes toward the church. At the divine services in the
Uspensky Cathedral, side by side with Rodzianko and the Kadets, sat
Kerensky and Avksentiev. The burgomaster of Moscow, the Social
Revolutionary Rudner, said in his speech of greeting: “So long as the
Russian people shall live, the Christian faith will burn in its soul.”
Only yesterday those people had considered themselves the direct
descendants of the prophet of the Russian Enlightenment, Chernishevsky.

The Council distributed printed appeals in all directions, prayed for a
strong government, denounced the Bolsheviks, and adjured the workers in
concert with the Minister of Labor, Skobelev: “Laborers, do your work,
sparing no efforts, and subject your own needs to the welfare of the
fatherland.” But the Council gave its more special attention to the land
question. The metropolitans and bishops were no less frightened and
embittered than the landlords by the scope of the peasant movement; fear
for the church and monastery lands had seized hold of their souls more
firmly than the question of the democratization of the parish. With
threats of the wrath of God and excommunication from the church, the
epistles of the Council demanded “an immediate restoration to the
churches, monasteries, parishes, and private proprietors, of the land,
forests and harvests of which they have been robbed.” Here it is
appropriate to recall the voice crying in the wilderness! The Council
dragged along from week to week, and arrived at the high point of its
labors – the re-establishment of patriarchism[3] abolished by Peter two
hundred years before – only after the October revolution.

At the end of July the government decided to call a State Conference of
all classes and social institutions of the country to meet in Moscow
August 13. Membership in the conference was to be determined by the
government itself. In direct contradiction to the results of all
democratic elections which had taken place in the country without a
single exception, the government took care to make sure in advance that
the conference should contain an equal number of representatives from
the possessing classes and the people. Only by means of this artificial
equilibrium could the government of the salvation of the revolution
still hope to save itself. This national congress did not possess any
definite rights. To quote Miliukov: “The conference ... received at the
most a merely advisory voice.” The possessing classes wished to give the
people an example of self-abnegation, in order afterward the more surely
to seize the power as a whole. Officially the goal of the conference was
“a rapprochement between the state power and all the organized forces of
the country.” The press talked about the necessity of solidarity,
reconciliation, encouragement and of raising everybody’s spirits. In
other words, they did not wish to say, and others were incapable of
saying, for just what purpose the conference had been called. Here
again, giving things their true names became the task of the Bolsheviks.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Parliament

2. Caucasian native cavalry

3. Before Peter the Great the heads of the church had called themselves
patriarchs and had their own court, their own administration – were in
effect a second order of tzars. He abolished this title and reduced the
church to a department in his own administration. – _Trans._



CHAPTER 29 KERENSKY AND KORNILOV


(Elements of Bonapartism in the Russian Revolution)

 

A good deal has been written to the effect that subsequent misfortunes,
including the advent of the Bolsheviks, might have been avoided if
instead of Kerensky a man of clear head and strong character had stood
at the helm of the government. It is indubitable that Kerensky possessed
neither of these attributes. But the question is, why did certain well
defined social classes find themselves obliged to lift up just this man,
Kerensky, upon their shoulders?

As though to freshen our historic memory, events in Spain are now again
showing us how a revolution, washing away the customary political
boundary lines, surrounds everybody and everything during its first days
with a rosy mist. At this stage even its enemies try to tint themselves
with its color. This mimicry expresses a semi-instinctive desire of the
conservative classes to accommodate themselves to the changes impending,
so as to suffer from them as little as possible. This solidarity of the
nation, founded upon loose phrases, makes of compromisism an
indispensable political function. Petty bourgeois idealists, overlooking
class distinctions, thinking in stereotyped phrases, not knowing what
they want, and wishing well to everybody, are at this stage the sole
conceivable leaders of the majority. If Kerensky had possessed clear
thoughts and a strong will, he would have been completely unfit for his
historic rôle. This is not a retrospective estimate. The Bolsheviks so
judged the matter in the heat of the events. “An attorney for the
defense in political cases, a Social Revolutionary who became leader of
the Trudoviks, a radical without any socialist schooling whatever,
Kerensky has expressed more completely than anyone else the first epoch
of the revolution, its ‘national’ formlessness, the idealism of its
hopes and expectations”: thus wrote the author of these lines while
locked up in Kerensky’s prison after the July Days. “Kerensky made
speeches about land and freedom, about law and order, about peace among
nations, about the defense of the fatherland, the heroism of Liebknecht,
about how the Russian revolution ought to astonish the world with its
magnanimity – waving the while a little red silk handkerchief. The
everyday man who was just beginning to wake up politically listened to
these speeches with rapture: it seemed to him that he himself was
speaking from the tribune. The army greeted Kerensky as their savior
from Guchkov. The peasants heard about him as a Trudovik, as a muzhik’s
deputy. The Liberals were won over by the extreme moderateness of idea
under his formless radicalism of phrase.”

But the period of universal and indiscriminate embraces does not last
long. The class struggle dies down at the beginning of a revolution only
to come to life afterward in the form of civil war. In the fairy-like
rise of compromisism is contained the seed of its inevitable fall. The
official French journalist, Claude Anet, explained Kerensky’s swift loss
of popularity by a lack of tact which impelled the socialist politician
to actions “little harmonizing” with his rôle. “He frequents the
imperial _loges_, he lives in the Winter Palace or at Tsarskoe Selo, he
sleeps in the bed of Russian emperors. A little too much vanity and
vanity a little too noticeable-that is shocking in a country which is
the simplest in the world.” Tact implies, in the small as well as the
great, an understanding of the situation and of one’s place in it. Of
this understanding Kerensky had not a trace. Lifted up by the trustful
masses, he was completely alien to them, did not understand, and was not
the least interested in, the question of how the revolution looked to
them and what inferences they were drawing from it. The masses expected
bold action from him, but he demanded from the masses that they should
not interfere with his magnanimity and eloquence. Once when Kerensky was
paying a theatrical visit to the arrested family of the tzar, the
soldiers on duty around the palace said to their commandant: “We sleep
on boards, we have bad food, but Nicholashka even after he is arrested
has meat to throw in the pail.” Those were not “magnanimous” words, but
they expressed what the soldiers were feeling.

Breaking free of their age-old chains, the people were transgressing at
every step those boundaries which educated leaders wanted to lay down
for them, Towards the end of April Kerensky voiced a lament upon this
subject: “Can it be that the Russian Free State is a state of slaves in
revolt? ... I regret that I did not die two months ago. I should have
died with the great dream,” etc. etc. With this bad rhetoric he hoped to
exert an influence on the workers, soldiers, sailors, and peasants.
Admiral Kolchak related subsequently before a soviet tribunal how in May
the radical War Minister made the rounds of the Black Sea Fleet in order
to reconcile the sailors with their officers. It seemed to the orator
after each speech that the goal had been attained: “There, you see,
admiral, everything is fixed ...” But nothing at all was fixed. The
disintegration of the fleet was only beginning.

As time went on Kerensky’s affectations, insolence, and braggadocio more
and more keenly offended the masses, During his journey around the front
he once cried out irascibly to his adjutant in the railroad car –
perhaps on purpose to be heard by a general: “Kick all those damned
committees to hell!” Arriving on a visit to the Baltic fleet, Kerensky
ordered the Sailors’ Central Committee to appear before him on the
admiral’s warship. The Centrobalt, being a soviet body, was not under
the war ministry and considered the order offensive. The president of
the committee, the sailor Dybenko, answered: “If Kerensky wants to talk
to the Centrobalt, let him come to us.” Wasn’t that an intolerable act
of impudence! On the vessels where Kerensky did enter into conversation
with the sailors, it went no better – especially on the warship
_Republic_ whose mood was Bolshevik. Here they questioned the minister
on the following points: Why had he voted for war in the State Duma? Why
had he put his signature to the imperialist note of Miliukov on the 21st
of April? Why had he given the tzarist senators a pension of six
thousand roubles a year? Kerensky refused to answer these “crafty”
questions put to him by “foes.” The crew dryly declared the minister’s
explanations “unsatisfactory.” In a silence like the tomb Kerensky
withdrew from the ship. “Slaves in revolt!” muttered the radical lawyer,
grinding his teeth. But the sailors were experiencing an emotion of
pride: “Yes, we were slaves and we have revolted!”

Kerensky’s high-handed treatment of democratic social opinion called out
at every step semi-conflicts with the soviet leaders, who were
travelling the same road but with more of a disposition to look round at
the masses. Already on the 8th of March, the Executive Committee,
frightened by protests from below, had warned Kerensky of the
impossibility of liberating arrested policemen. A few days later the
Compromisers found themselves obliged to protest against the plan of the
Minister of Justice to export the tzar’s family to England. Again in two
or three weeks, the Executive Committee raised the general question of a
“regulation of their relations” with Kerensky, but those relations never
were and never could be regulated. The same difficulties arose about his
party relations, At a Social Revolutionary congress early in June,
Kerensky was voted down in the elections to the party central committee,
receiving 135 votes out of 270. And how the leaders did squirm in their
effort to explain, both to right and left, that “many did not vote for
Comrade Kerensky because he is already overloaded with work.” The fact
is that, while the staff and departmental Social Revolutionaries adored
Kerensky as the source of all good things, the old Social
Revolutionaries bound up with the masses regarded him without confidence
and without respect. But neither the Executive Committee nor the Social
Revolutionary party could get along without Kerensky: He was necessary
to them as the connecting link of the coalition.

In the Soviet bloc the leading rôle belonged to the Mensheviks. They
invented the decisions – that is, the methods by which to avoid doing
anything. But in the state apparatus the Narodniks clearly outbalanced
the Mensheviks – a fact which was most obviously expressed in the
dominating position of Kerensky. Half Kadet and half Social
Revolutionary, Kerensky was not a representative of the soviets in the
government, like Tseretelli or Chernov, but a living tie between the
bourgeoisie and the democracy. Tseretelli and Chernov formed one side of
the Coalition. Kerensky was a personal incarnation of the Coalition
itself. Tseretelli complained of the predominance in Kerensky of
“personal motives,” not understanding that these were inseparable from
his political function. Tseretelli himself as Minister of the Interior
issued a circular to the effect that the commissars of the provinces
ought to rely upon all the “living forces” of their locality – that is,
upon the bourgeoisie and upon the soviets – and carry out the policies
of the Provisional Government without surrendering to “party
influences.” That ideal commissar, rising above all hostile classes and
parties in order to find his whole duty in himself and in a circular –
that is Kerensky on a provincial or a county scale. As a crown to this
system there was needed one independent all-Russian commissar in the
Winter Palace. Without Kerensky compromisism would have been like a
church steeple without a cross.

The history of Kerensky’s rise is full of lessons. He became Minister of
Justice thanks to the February revolution which he feared. The April
demonstration of “slaves in revolt” made him Minister of War and Marine.
The July struggle, caused by “German agents,” put him at the head of the
government. At the beginning of September a movement of the masses will
make this head of the government supreme commander-in-chief as well. The
dialectic of the compromise régime, and its malicious irony, lie in the
fact that the masses had to lift Kerensky to the very highest height
before they could topple him over.

While contemptuously drawing away his skirts from the people who had
given him power, Kerensky the more thirstily grabbed after any sign of
encouragement from educated society. In the very first days of the
revolution the leader of the Moscow Kadets, Doctor Kishkin, said, upon
returning from Petrograd: “if it were not for Kerensky, we should not
have what we have. His name will be written in golden letters on the
tablets of history.” The praise of these Liberals became one of the most
important political criteria for Kerensky, but he could not, and did not
wish to, lay his popularity in a simple way at the feet of the
bourgeoisie. On the contrary, he more and more acquired a taste for
seeing all classes at his own feet. “The thought of setting off and
balancing against each other the government of the bourgeoisie and the
democracy,” testifies Miliukov, “was not foreign to Kerensky from the
very beginning of the revolution.” This course was the natural outcome
of his whole life’s journey, which had run between the functions of a
liberal lawyer and the underground circles. While respectfully assuring
Buchanan that “the Soviet will die a natural death,” Kerensky was
frightening his bourgeois colleagues at every step with the wrath of the
Soviet. And on those frequent occasions when the leaders of the
Executive Committee disagreed with Kerensky, he dismayed them by
mentioning the most horrible of catastrophes, the resignation of the
Liberals.

When Kerensky reiterated that he did not wish to be the Marat of the
Russian revolution, that meant that he would refuse to take severe
measures against the reaction, but not so against “anarchy.” Generally
speaking, by the way, that is the moral of the opponents of violence in
politics: they renounce violence when it comes to introducing changes in
what already exists, but in defense of the existing order they will not
stop at the most ruthless acts.

In the period of preparation for the offensive, Kerensky became the
especially beloved figure of the possessing classes. Tereshchenko kept
telling each and everybody how highly our Allies esteem “the labors of
Kerensky.” The Kadet paper, Rech, while severe with the Compromisers,
continually emphasized its favorable attitude to the War Minister.
Rodzianko himself recognized that “this young man ... is reborn each day
with redoubled strength for creative labor and the welfare of the
fatherland.” With such remarks the Liberals were, of course,
deliberately flattering Kerensky, but also they could not help seeing
that in the essence he was working for them. “Imagine how it would have
been,” remarked Lenin, “if Guchkov had attempted to issue orders for an
offensive, to disband regiments, to arrest soldiers, to forbid
congresses, to shout ‘thou’ at the soldiers, to call the soldiers
‘cowards’ etc. But Kerensky could permit himself this ‘luxury’ – only,
it is true, until he had squandered that incredibly quick-melting
confidence which the people had placed to his credit ...”

The offensive, while elevating Kerensky’s reputation in the ranks of the
bourgeoisie, completely undermined his popularity with the people. The
collapse of the offensive was in essence a collapse of Kerensky in both
camps. But the striking thing is that exactly this two-sided loss of
standing rendered him henceforth “irreplaceable.” As to the rôle of
Kerensky in creating the second Coalition, Miliukov expresses himself
thus: “the only possible man.” Not, alas: “the only man needed.” This
leading liberal politician, be it remarked, never took Kerensky any too
seriously, and broad circles of the bourgeoisie were more and more
inclined to lay the blame on him for all the blows of fate. “The
impatience of patriotically inclined groups” impelled them, according to
Miliukov, to search for a strong man. At one time Admiral Kolchak was
suggested for this rôle. Moreover, this installing of a strong man at
the helm was “thought of in different terms from those of negotiation
and compromise.” That we may easily believe. “Hopes of democracy, of the
will of the people, of the Constituent Assembly,” writes Stankevich of
the Kadet party, “were already thrown overboard. The municipal elections
throughout all Russia had given an overwhelming majority to the
socialists ... and there were beginning to be convulsive reachings out
for a power which should not persuade but only command.” More accurately
speaking, a power which should take the revolution by the throat.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In the biography of Kornilov, and in his personal attributes, it is easy
to distinguish the traits which justified his candidacy for the post of
national savior. General Martynov, who had been Kornilov’s superior in
peace time, and in wartime had shared his captivity in an Austrian
fortress, characterizes Kornilov as follows: “Distinguished by a
sustained love of work and great self-confidence, he was in his
intellectual faculties an ordinary and mediocre man, not possessed of
any broad outlook.” Martynov places to the credit of Kornilov two
traits: personal bravery and disinterestedness. In those circles where
most people were thieving and worrying about their own skin, these
qualities were striking. Of strategic ability – above all the ability to
estimate a situation as a whole, both in its material and moral element
– Kornilov hadn’t a trace. “Moreover he lacked organizing ability,” says
Martynov, “and with his violent temper and lack of equilibrium was
little fitted for planned activity.” Brussilov, who observed the entire
military activity of his subordinate during the World War, spoke of him
with supreme contempt: “The chief of a bold guerrilla band and nothing
more ...” The official legend created around the Kornilov division was
dictated by the demand of patriotic social opinion for some bright spot
on the dark background of events. “The forty-eighth division,” writes
Martynov, “was destroyed thanks to the abominable administration ... of
Kornilov himself, who ... did not know how to organize a retreat, and
worst of all kept continually changing his mind and losing time ... At
the last moment Kornilov abandoned to their fate the division he had led
into a trap, and tried himself to escape capture.” However, after four
days and nights of wandering the unlucky general surrendered to the
Austrians, and he only escaped some time later. “Upon his return to
Russia Kornilov, in conversing with various newspaper correspondents,
touched up the story of his escape with bright colors supplied by his
own imagination.” We need not pause upon the prosaic corrections which
well-informed witnesses have introduced into his legend. It is evident
that from that moment on Kornilov began to acquire a taste for newspaper
_réclame_.

Before the revolution Kornilov had been a monarchist of the Black
Hundred tint. In captivity when reading the papers, he would frequently
remark that “he would gladly hang all those Guchkovs and Miliukovs.” But
political ideas occupied him, as is usual with people of his mould, only
insofar as they directly affected his own person. After the February
revolution Kornilov found it easy to declare himself a republican. “He
was very little acquainted,” according to the report of Martynov, “with
the interlacing interests of the different strata of Russian society,
knew nothing either of party groups or of individual political leaders.”
Mensheviks, Social Revolutionaries, and Bolsheviks constituted for him
one hostile mass which hindered the officers from commanding, the
landlord from enjoying his estate, the merchant from trading, and the
factory owner from producing goods.

Already on the 2nd of March, the committee of the State Duma laid hold
upon General Kornilov, and over the signature of Rodzianko demanded of
headquarters that this “valiant hero known to all Russia” be appointed
commander-in-chief of the troops of the Petrograd district. The tzar,
who had already ceased to be a tzar, wrote on Rodzianko’s telegram:
“Carry out.” Thus the revolutionary capital acquired its first red
general. In a report of the Executive Committee dated March 10, this
phrase is applied to Kornilov: “A general of the old stripe who wants to
put an end to the revolution.” In those early days, however, the general
tried to put his best foot forward, and even carried out without
grumbling the ritual of arresting the tzarina. That was placed to his
credit. In the memoirs of Colonel Kobylinsky, however – the commander of
Tzarskoe Selo appointed by him – it becomes known that Kornilov was here
playing a double game. After his presentation to the tzarina, Kobylinsky
guardedly relates: “Kornilov said to me: ‘Colonel, leave us alone. Go
and stand outside the door.’ I went out. After about five minutes
Kornilov called me. I entered. The Empress extended her hand.” It is
clear that Kornilov had recommended the colonel as a friend. Later on we
shall hear of the embraces exchanged between the tzar and his “jailer”
Kobylinsky. As an administrator Kornilov in his new position proved
unspeakably bad. “His closest associates in Petrograd,” writes
Stankevich, “continually complained of his incapacity to do the work or
to direct it.” Kornilov lingered in the capital, however, only a short
time. In the April days he attempted, not without a hint from Miliukov,
to inaugurate the first blood-letting of the revolution, but ran into
the opposition of the Executive Committee, resigned, was given command
of an army, and afterward of the southwestern front. Without waiting for
the legal introduction of the death penalty, Kornilov here gave orders
to shoot deserters and set up their corpses on the road with an
inscription, threatened the peasants with severe penalties for violating
the proprietary rights of landlords, created shock battalions, and on
every appropriate occasion shook his fist at Petrograd. This immediately
surrounded his name with a halo in the eyes of the officers and the
possessing classes. But many of Kerensky’s commissars, too, would say to
themselves: there is no hope left but in Kornilov. In a few weeks this
gallant general with a mournful experience as commander of a division,
became the supreme commander-in-chief of those disintegrating armies of
millions which the Entente was trying to make wage a war to complete
victory.

It made Kornilov’s head swim. His narrow horizon and political ignorance
rendered him an easy prey for seekers of adventure. While wilfully
defending his personal prerogative, this man “with a lion’s heart and
the brain of a sheep,” as Kornilov was described by General Alexeiev,
and after him by Verkhovsky, submitted very easily to personal
influences, if only they fell in with the voice of his ambition.
Miliukov, who was friendly to Kornilov, remarks in him a “childish trust
in people who knew how to flatter him.” The closest inspirer of the
supreme commander was a certain Zavoiko, who followed the modest calling
of orderly – an obscure figure from among the former landlords, an oil
speculator, an adventurer, who especially impressed Kornilov with his
pen. Zavoiko did indeed have the brisk style of the swindler who will
stop at nothing. This orderly became Kornilov’s press agent, author of
the _People’s Biography_, drawer-up of reports, ultimatums, and all
those documents for which there was needed – in the words of the general
– “a strong artistic style.” To Zavoiko was added another seeker of
adventure, Alladin, a former deputy of the first Duma, who had spent
some years abroad, who never removed an English pipe from his mouth, and
therefore considered himself a specialist upon international affairs.
These two men stood at Kornilov’s right hand, keeping him in touch with
the centers of the counter-revolution. His left flank was covered by
Savinkov and Filonenko, who employed every means to hold up the
general’s exaggerated opinion of himself, and at the same time keep him
from taking any premature step which might make him impossible in the
eyes of the democracy. “To him came the honest and the dishonest, the
sincere and the intriguing, political leaders, and military leaders, and
adventurers,” writes the unctuous General Denikin, “and all with one
voice cried: Save us!” It would be difficult to determine the exact
proportion of the honest and the dishonest. At any rate Kornilov
seriously considered himself called to “save,” and thus became a direct
rival of Kerensky.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The rivals quite sincerely hated each other. “Kerensky,” according to
Martynov, “assumed a high-and-mighty tone in his relations with the
older generals. A humble hard worker like Alexeiev, or the
diplomatically-inclined Brussilov, could permit this treatment. But such
tactics would not go down with the self-complacent and touchy Kornilov,
who ... for his part looked down upon the lawyer, Kerensky.” The weaker
of the two was prepared to yield, and did make serious advances. At
least Kornilov told Denikin towards the end of July that a proposal had
come to him from governmental circles to enter the ministry. “No sir!
Those gentlemen are too bound up with the soviets ... I said to them:
give me the power and then I will make a decisive fight.”

The ground was quaking under Kerensky’s feet like a peat bog. He sought
a way out, as always, in the sphere of verbal improvisations: call
meetings, announce, proclaim! His personal success on the 21st of July,
when he had risen above the hostile camps of the democracy and the
bourgeoisie in the character of the irreplaceable, suggested to Kerensky
the idea of a state conference in Moscow. That which had taken place in
a closed chamber of the Winter Palace would now be brought out in the
open. Let the country see with its own eyes that everything will go to
pieces if Kerensky does not take in his hands the reins and the whip.

According to the official list, the State Conference was to include
“representatives of political, social, democratic, national, commercial,
industrial, and co-operative organizations, leaders of the institutions
of the democracy, the higher representatives of the army, scientific
institutions, universities, and members of the four State Dumas.” About
1500 conferees were indicated, but more than 2500 assembled – the number
having been enlarged wholly in the interests of the right wing. The
Moscow Journal of the Social Revolutionaries wrote reproachfully about
its own government: “As against 150 representatives of labor, there are
120 representatives of trade and industry; against 100 peasant deputies,
100 representatives of the landlords have been invited; against 100
representatives of the Soviet, there will be 300 members of the State
Duma ...” This official paper of Kerensky’s party expressed a doubt as
to whether such a conference would be able to give the government “that
support which it seeks.”

The Compromisers went to the Conference gritting their teeth: We must
make an honest effort, they were saying to each other, to come to an
agreement. But how about the Bolsheviks? We must at whatever cost
prevent them from interfering in this dialogue between the democracy and
the possessing classes. By a special resolution of the Executive
Committee, party factions were deprived of the right to take the floor
without the consent of the præsidium. The Bolsheviks decided to make a
declaration in the name of the party and walk out of the conference. The
præsidium, watchful of their every movement, demanded that they abandon
this criminal plan. Then the Bolsheviks unhesitatingly handed back their
cards of admission. They were preparing another and more significant
answer: Proletarian Moscow was to speak its word.

Almost from the first days of the revolution the partisans of law and
order had on all possible occasions contrasted the peaceful “country”
against tumultuous Petrograd. The convocation of the Constituent
Assembly in Moscow had been one of the slogans of the bourgeoisie. The
National-Liberal “Marxist,” Potressov, had sent curses to Petrograd for
imagining itself to be “a new Paris.” As though the Girondists had not
threatened the old Paris with thunder and lightning – had not proposed
that it reduce its rôle to ¹/83 of what it was! A provincial Menshevik
said in June at the congress of soviets: “Some sort of place like
Novocherkassk far better reflects the conditions of life in Russia than
Petrograd.” In the essence of the matter the Compromisers like the
bourgeoisie were seeking support, not in the actual moods of “the
country,” but in consoling illusions which they themselves created. Now,
when it came time to feel the actual political pulse of Moscow, a cruel
disappointment awaited the initiators of the conference,

Those counter-revolutionary conferences which had followed each other in
Moscow from the first days of August, beginning with a congress of
landlords and ending with the Church Council, had not only mobilized the
possessing circles, but had also brought the workers and soldiers to
their feet. The threats of Riabushinsky, the appeals of Rodzianko, the
fraternization of Kadets with Cossack generals – all this had taken
place before the eyes of the lower ranks in Moscow. All this had been
interpreted by Bolshevik agitators hot on the trail of the news-stories.
But the danger of a counter-revolution had now taken a palpable, even a
personal form. A wave of indignation ran through the shops and
factories. “If the soviets are powerless,” wrote the Moscow Bolshevik
paper, “the workers must unite round their own living organizations.” In
the first rank of these organizations were named the trade-unions, a
majority of them already under Bolshevik leadership. The mood of the
factories was so hostile to the State Conference that the idea of a
general strike, suggested from below, was adopted almost without
opposition at a meeting of representatives of all the Moscow nuclei of
the Bolshevik organization. The trade-unions had taken the initiative.
The Moscow soviet by a majority of 364 against 304 voted against the
strike. But since at the caucus of their factions the Menshevik and
Social Revolutionary workers had voted for the strike, and were now
merely submitting to party discipline, this decision of a soviet elected
long ago, adopted moreover against the will of its actual majority, was
far from stopping the Moscow workers. A meeting of the officers of 41
trade unions passed a resolution to call a one-day strike of protest.
The district soviets, a majority of them, came out on the side of the
party and the trade-unions. The factories here advanced a demand for
re-elections to the Moscow soviet, which was not only lagging behind the
masses, but coming into sharp conflict with them. In the Zamoskvoretsky
district soviet, which met jointly with the factory committees, a demand
for the recall of those deputies who had “gone against the will of the
working-class” received 175 votes against 4, with 19 abstaining!

The night before the strike was, nevertheless, a bad night for the
Moscow Bolsheviks. The country was indeed following in the steps of
Petrograd, but lagging behind, The July demonstration had been
unsuccessful in Moscow: a majority, not only of the garrison, but also
of the workers had feared to go into the streets against the voice of
the Soviet. How would it be this time? Morning brought the answer. The
counter-efforts of the Compromisers did not prevent the strike from
becoming a powerful demonstration of hostility to the Coalition and the
government. Two days before, the newspaper of the Moscow industrialists
had confidently declared: “Let the Petrograd government come soon to
Moscow. Let them listen to the voice of the holy places, the bells and
sacred towers of the Kremlin ...” Today the voice of the sacred places
was drowned – by an ominous stillness.

A member of the Moscow committee of the Bolsheviks, Piatnitsky,
subsequently wrote: “The strike came off magnificently. There were no
lights, no tramcars; the factories and shops were closed and the
railroad yards and stations; even the waiters in the restaurants had
gone on strike.” Miliukov adds a sharp light to this picture: “The
delegates coming to the Conference could not ride on the tramways, nor
lunch in the restaurants.” This permitted them, as the liberal historian
acknowledges, the better to estimate the strength of the Bolsheviks, who
had not been admitted to the Conference. The _Izvestia_ of the Moscow
soviet adequately described the significance of this manifestation of
August 12th. “In spite of the resolutions of the soviets ... the masses
followed the Bolsheviks.” 400,000 workers went on strike in Moscow and
the suburbs upon the summons of a party which for five weeks had been
under continual blows, and whose leaders were still in hiding or in
prison. The new Petrograd organ of the party, _The Proletarian_, managed
before it was shut down to put a question to the Compromisers: “From
Petrograd you went to Moscow – where will you go from there?”

Even the masters of the situation must have put this question to
themselves. In Kiev, Kostroma, Tzaritzyn, similar one-day strikes of
protest occurred, general or partial. The agitation covered the whole
country. Everywhere, in the remotest corners, the Bolsheviks gave
warning that the State Conference bore the “clearly marked imprint of a
counter-revolutionary conspiracy.” By the end of August the meaning of
this formula was disclosed before the eyes of the whole people.

The delegates to the Conference, as well as bourgeois Moscow, expected a
coming-out of the masses with arms, expected clashes, battles, “August
days.” But for the workers to go into the street, would have meant for
them to offer themselves to the blows of the Cavaliers of St. George,
the officer detachments, junkers, individual cavalry units, burning with
the desire to take revenge for the strike. To summon the garrison to the
street would have introduced a split, and tightened the task of the
counterrevolution which stood ready with its hand on the trigger. The
party did not summon them to the street, and the workers themselves,
guided by a correct strategic sense, avoided any open encounter. The
one-day strike perfectly corresponded to the situation. It could not be
hid under a bushel, as was the declaration of the Bolsheviks at the
Conference. When the city was plunged in darkness, all Russia saw the
hand of the Bolsheviks at the switch-board. No, Petrograd was not
isolated. “In Moscow, upon whose patriarchal humbleness so many had set
their hopes, the workers’ districts suddenly showed their teeth.” Thus
Sukhanov describes the significance of that day. In the absence of the
Bolsheviks, but under the sign of the unfleshed teeth of the proletarian
revolution, the Coalition conferees had to take their seats.

Moscow wits were saying that Kerensky had come there “to be crowned.”
But the next day Kornilov arrived from headquarters with the same
purpose, and was met by innumerable delegates – among them those from
the Church Council. The Tekintsi leapt from the approaching train in
their bright red long coats, with their naked curved swords, and drew up
in two files on the platform. Ecstatic ladies sprinkled the hero with
flowers as he reviewed this bodyguard and the deputations. The Kadet,
Rodichev, concluded his speech of greeting with the cry: “Save Russia,
and a grateful people will reward you!” Patriotic sobbings were heard.
Morozova, a millionaire merchant’s wife, went down on her knees.
Officers carried Kornilov out to the people on their shoulders. While
the commander-in-chief was reviewing the Cavaliers of St. George, the
cadets, the officers’ schools, and the Cossack squadron drawn up on the
square before the station, Kerensky, in his character as rival and
Minister of War, was reviewing a parade of the troops of the Moscow
garrison. From the station Kornilov took his way – in the steps of the
tzar – to the Ivarsky shrine, where a service was held in the presence
of his escort of Mussulmen Tekintsi in their gigantic fur hats. “This
circumstance,” writes the Cossack officer Grekov, “disposed believing
Moscow still more favorably to Kornilov.” The counter-revolution was
meanwhile trying to capture the street. Kornilov’s biography, together
with his portrait, was generously scattered from automobiles, The walls
were covered with posters summoning the people to the aid of the hero.
Like a sovereign, Kornilov received in his private car statesmen,
industrialists, financiers. Representatives of the banks made reports to
him about the financial condition of the country. The Octobrist
Shidlovsky significantly writes: “The only one of all the members of the
Duma to visit Kornilov in his train was Miliukov, who had a conversation
with him, the matter of which is unknown to me.” We shall hear later
from Miliukov as much about this conversation as he himself thinks it
necessary to relate.

During this time the preparations for a military insurrection were in
full swing. Several days before the conference Kornilov had given
orders, under pretext of going to the help of Riga, to prepare four
cavalry divisions for a movement on Petrograd. The Orenburg Cossack
regiment had been sent by headquarters to Moscow “to preserve order,”
but at Kerensky’s command it had been held up on the way. In his
subsequent testimony before an Inquiry Commission on the Kornilov
affair, Kerensky said: “We were informed that during the Moscow
conference a dictatorship would be declared.” Thus in those triumphant
days of national unity, the War Minister and the commander-in-chief were
engaged in strategic counter-maneuvers. So far as possible, however,
decorum was observed. The relations between the two camps oscillated
between officially friendly assurances and civil war.

In Petrograd, notwithstanding the self-restraint of the masses – the
July experience having left its lesson – rumors kept coming down from
above, from the staffs and editorial offices, furiously insisting upon
an impending insurrection of the Bolsheviks. The Petrograd organizations
of the party warned the masses in an open manifesto against possible
provocatory appeals upon the part of the enemy. The Moscow soviet
meanwhile took its own measures. A secret revolutionary committee was
formed, consisting of six people, two from each of the soviet parties,
including the Bolsheviks. A secret order was issued forbidding the
formation of cordons of Cavaliers of St. George, officers, and junkers,
along the line of march of Kornilov. The Bolsheviks, who had been
forbidden entry into the barracks since the July Days, were now freely
admitted: without them it was impossible to win over the soldiers. While
in the open arena the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries were
negotiating with the bourgeoisie for the creation of a strong power
against the masses led by the Bolsheviks, behind the scenes these same
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries in co-operation with the
Bolsheviks, whom they would not admit to the conference, were preparing
the masses for a struggle against the conspiracy of the bourgeoisie.
Although yesterday they had opposed the protest strike, today they were
summoning the workers and soldiers to prepare for a struggle. The
contemptuous indignation of the masses did not prevent them from
responding to the summons with a fighting eagerness which frightened the
Compromisers more than it pleased them. This arrant duplicity, almost
amounting to an open treachery in two directions, would have been
incomprehensible if the Compromisers had still been consciously carrying
out their policy; as a matter of fact they were merely suffering its
consequences.

Big events were clearly in the air, But apparently nobody had settled
upon the days of the Conference for an overturn. At any rate no
confirmation of the rumors to which Kerensky subsequently referred has
been found either in documents, or in the compromisist literature, or in
the memoirs of the Right Wing. It was still merely a matter of getting
ready. According to Miliukov – and his testimony coincides with the
further development of events – Kornilov himself had already before the
Conference chosen the date for his action: August 27. This date of
course was known to but few. The half-informed, however, as always in
such circumstances, kept advancing the day of the great event, and
rumors forerunning it poured in upon the authorities from all sides. It
seemed from moment to moment as though the blow would fall.

Indeed, the very mood of excitement among the bourgeois and officer
circles in Moscow might have led, if not to an attempted overturn, at
least to counter-revolutionary manifestations designed as a test of
power. Still more probable would have been an attempt to create out of
the members of the Conference some sort of center for the salvation of
the fatherland in competition with the soviets. The right press had
spoken openly of this. But things did not even go that far: the masses
prevented it, Even if perhaps some had cherished the thought of
hastening the decisive hour, the strike compelled them to pause and say
to themselves: We cannot catch the revolution unawares; the workers and
soldiers are on their guard; we must postpone action. Even that
universal popular procession to the Ivarsky shrine which had been
planned by the priests and Liberals in agreement with Kornilov, was
called off.

As soon as it became clear that there was no immediate danger, the
Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks hastened to pretend that nothing
special had happened. They even refused to continue admitting Bolsheviks
into the barracks, although the barracks insistently continued to demand
Bolshevik orators. “The Moor has done his duty,” Tseretelli and Dan and
Khinchuk, president of the Moscow soviet, must have said to each other
with a foxy smile. But the Bolsheviks had not the slightest intention of
falling into the position of the Moor. They were still only intending to
carry their work through to the end.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Every class society has need of unity in the governmental will. The dual
power is in its essence a régime of social crisis signifying an utter
dividedness of the nation. It contains within itself potential or actual
civil war. Nobody any longer wanted the dual power. On the contrary, all
were searching for a strong, single-minded, “iron” government. The July
government of Kerensky had been endowed with unlimited powers. The
design had been by common consent to establish above the democracy and
the bourgeoisie, who were paralyzing each other, a “real” sovereign
power. This idea of a master of destiny rising above all classes, is
nothing but Bonapartism. If you stick two forks into a cork
symmetrically, it will, under very great oscillations from side to side,
keep its balance even on a pin point: that is the mechanical model of
the Bonapartist superarbiter. The degree of solidity of such a power,
setting aside international conditions, is determined by the stability
of equilibrium of the two antagonistic classes within the country. In
the middle of May at a session of the Petersburg soviet, Trotsky had
defined Kerensky as “the mathematical center of Russian Bonapartism.”
The immateriality of this description shows that it was not a question
of personality but of function. At the beginning of July, as you will
remember, all the ministers, acting upon instructions from their
parties, had resigned in order to permit Kerensky to form a government.
On the 21st of July this experiment was repeated in a more demonstrative
form. The two hostile camps invoked Kerensky, each seeing in him a part
of itself, and both swearing fealty to him. Trotsky wrote while in
prison: “Led by politicians who are afraid of their own shadow, the
Soviet did not dare take the power. The Kadet party, representing all
the propertied cliques, could not yet seize the power. It remained to
find a great conciliator, a mediator, a court of arbitration.”

In a manifesto to the people issued by Kerensky in his own name, he
declared: “I, as head of the government ... consider that I have no
right to hesitate if the changes (in the structure of the government)
increase my responsibility in the matters of supreme administration.”
That is the unadulterated phraseology of Bonapartism. But nevertheless,
although supported from both right and left, it never got beyond
phraseology. What is the reason for this?

In order that the Little Corsican might lift himself above a young
bourgeois nation, it was necessary that the revolution should already
have accomplished its fundamental task – the transfer of land to the
peasants – and that a victorious army should have been created on the
new social foundation. In the 18th century a revolution had no farther
to go: it could only from that point recoil and go backward. In this
recoil, however, its fundamental conquests were in danger. They must be
defended at any cost. The deepening but still very immature antagonism
between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat kept the nation, shaken as
it was to its foundations, in a state of extreme tension. A national
“judge” was in those conditions indispensable. Napoleon guaranteed to
the big bourgeois the possibility to get rich, to the peasants their
pieces of land, to the sons of peasants and the hoboes a chance for
looting in the wars. The judge held a sword in his hand and himself also
fulfilled the duties of bailiff. The Bonapartism of the first Bonaparte
was solidly founded.

The revolution of 1848 did not give the peasants the land, and could not
do so. That was not a great revolution, replacing one social régime with
another, but a political re-shuffle within the framework of the same
social régime. Napoleon III did not have under him a victorious army.
The two chief elements of classical Bonapartism were thus lacking. But
there were other favorable conditions, and no less real. The
proletariat, which had been maturing for half a century, showed its
threatening force in June, but was incapable of seizing the power. The
bourgeoisie feared the proletariat and its own bloody victory over them.
The peasant proprietors feared the June insurrection, and wanted the
state to protect them from those who wished to divide the land. And
finally a powerful industrial boom, extending with slight moments of
lull over two decades, had opened before the bourgeoisie unheard of
sources of wealth. These conditions proved sufficient for an epigone
Bonapartism.

In the policies of Bismarck, who also stood “above classes,” there were,
as has been often pointed out, indubitable Bonapartist elements,
although disguised by legitimism. The stability of the Bismarck régime
was guaranteed by the fact that, having arisen after an impotent
revolution, it offered a solution, or a half-solution, of such a mighty
national problem as the unification of Germany. It brought victory in
three wars, indemnities, and a mighty up-growth of capitalism. That was
enough to last several decades.

The misfortune of the Russian candidates for Bonaparte lay not at all in
their dissimilarity to the first Napoleon, or even to Bismarck. History
knows how to make use of substitutes, But they were confronted by a
great revolution which had not yet solved its problems or exhausted its
force The bourgeoisie was trying to compel the peasant, still without
land, to fight for the estates of the landlords. The war had given
nothing but defeats. There was not the shadow of an industrial boom; on
the contrary the breakdown of industry was producing ever new
devastations. If the proletariat had retreated, it was only to close up
its ranks. The peasantry were only drawing back for their last assault
upon the lords. The oppressed nationalities were assuming the offensive
against a Russifying despotism. In search of peace, the army was coming
closer and closer to the workers and their party. The lower ranks were
uniting, the upper weakening. There was no equilibrium. The revolution
was still full-blooded. No wonder Bonapartism proved anaemic.

Marx and Engels compared the rôle of a Bonapartist régime in the
struggle between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat, with the rôle of
the old absolute monarchy in the struggle between the feudal lords and
the bourgeoisie. Traits of similarity are indubitable, but they stop
just where the social content of the power begins to appear. The rôle of
court of arbitration between the elements of the old and the new society
was possible at a certain period owing to the fact that the two
exploiting régimes both needed defense against the exploited. But
between feudal lords and peasant serfs no “impartial” mediation was
possible. While reconciling the interests of the landlords to those of a
youthful capitalism, the tzarist autocracy functioned in relation to the
peasants, not as a mediator, but as an authorized representative of the
exploiting classes.

Similarly Bonapartism was not a court of arbitration between the
proletariat and the bourgeoisie. It was in reality the most concentrated
dominion of the bourgeoisie over the proletariat. Having climbed up with
his boots on the neck of the people, whatever Bonaparte happened to come
along could not fail to adopt a policy of protection of property, rent
and profits. The peculiarities of a régime do not go beyond its means of
defense. The watchman does not now stand at the gate, but sits on the
roof of the house, yet his function is the same. The independence of
Bonapartism is to an enormous degree external, decorative, a matter of
show. Its appropriate symbol was the mantle of the emperor.

While skilfully exploiting the fear of the bourgeoisie before the
workers, Bismarck remained in all his political and social reforms the
unchanging plenipotentiary of the possessing classes, whom he never
betrayed. Nevertheless, the growing pressure of the proletariat
indubitably permitted him to rise above the Junkerdom, and the
capitalists in the quality of a weighty bureaucratic arbiter: that was
his essential function.

The soviet régime permits a very considerable independence of the
government in relation to proletariat and peasantry, and consequently a
“mediation” between them insofar as their interests, although giving
rise to debates and conflicts, remain fundamentally reconcilable. But it
would not be easy to find an “impartial” court of arbitration between
the soviet state and a bourgeois state, at least so far as concerns the
fundamental interests of each. On the international arena the Soviet
Union is prevented from adhering to the League of Nations by those same
social causes which within the national borders make impossible anything
but a pretended “impartiality” of any government In the struggle between
bourgeoisie and proletariat.

While lacking the force of Bonapartism, Kerenskyism had all its vices.
It lifted itself above the nation only to demoralize the nation with its
own impotence. Whereas in words the leaders of the bourgeoisie and the
democracy promised to “obey” Kerensky, in reality Kerensky, the
omnipotent arbiter, obeyed Miliukov – and more especially Buchanan.
Kerensky waged the imperialist war, protected the landlord’s property
from attack, and postponed social reforms to happier days. If his
government was weak, this was for the same reason that the bourgeoisie
in general could not get its people into power. However, with all the
insignificance of the “government of salvation” its conservatively
capitalistic character grew manifestly with the growth of its
“independence.”

Their understanding that the régime of Kerensky was the inevitable form
of bourgeois rulership for the given period, did not prevent the
bourgeois politicians from being extremely dissatisfied with Kerensky,
nor from preparing to get rid of him as quickly as possible. There was
no disagreement among the possessing classes that the national arbiter
put forward by the petty bourgeois democracy must be opposed by a figure
from their own ranks. But why Kornilov, exactly? Because the candidate
for Bonaparte must correspond to the character of the Russian
bourgeoisie. He must be backward, isolated from the people, ungifted,
and on the decline. In an army which had seen almost nothing but
humiliating defeats, it was not easy to find a popular general. Kornilov
was arrived at by a process of elimination of other candidates still
less suitable.

Thus the Compromisers and Liberals could neither seriously unite in a
coalition, nor agree upon a single candidate for savior. They were
prevented from doing so by the uncompleted tasks of the revolution. The
Liberals did not trust the democrats, the democrats did not trust the
Liberals. Kerensky, it is true, opened his arms wide to the bourgeoisie,
but Kornilov made it clearly understood that at the first opportunity he
would twist the neck of the democracy. The clash between Kornilov and
Kerensky, inevitably resulting from the preceding development, was a
translation of the contradictions of the dual power into the explosive
language of personal ambition.

Just as in the midst of the Petrograd proletariat and garrison there was
formed, toward the beginning of July, an impatient wing dissatisfied
with the too cautious policy of the Bolsheviks, so among the possessing
classes there accumulated, towards the beginning of August, an
impatience of the watchful-waiting policy of the Kadet leaders. This
mood expressed itself, for example, at the Kadet congress, where demands
were voiced for the overthrow of Kerensky. A still keener political
impatience was to be seen outside the framework of the Kadet party – in
the military staffs where they lived in continual dread of the soldiers,
in the banks where they were drowning in the waters of inflation, in the
manors of the landlords where the roofs were burning over the heads of
the nobility. “Long live Kornilov!” became a slogan of hope, of despair,
and of thirst for revenge.

While agreeing throughout to the program of Kornilov, Kerensky
quarrelled about the date: “We cannot do everything at once.” While
recognizing the necessity of getting rid of Kerensky, Miliukov answered
his impatient followers: “It is still, I suggest, a little too soon.”
Just as out of the eagerness of the Petrograd masses arose the
semi-insurrection of July, so out of the impatience of the property
owners arose the Kornilov insurrection of August. And just as the
Bolsheviks found themselves obliged to take the side of an armed
insurrection, in order if possible to guarantee its success, and in any
case to prevent its extermination, so the Kadets found themselves
obliged, for like purposes, to take part in the Kornilov insurrection.
Within these limits, there is an astonishing symmetry in the two
situations. But inside this symmetrical framework there is a complete
contrast of goals, methods and results. It will develop fully in the
course of the coming events.



CHAPTER 30 THE STATE CONFERENCE IN MOSCOW


 

If a symbol is a concentrated image, then a revolution is the
master-builder of symbols, for it presents all phenomena and all
relations in concentrated form. The trouble is that the symbolism of a
revolution is too grandiose; it fits in badly with the creative work of
individuals. For this reason artistic reproductions of the greatest mass
dramas of humanity are so poor.

The Moscow State Conference ended in the failure assured in advance. It
created nothing and decided nothing. However, it has left to the
historian an invaluable impression of the revolution – although a
negative impression, one in which light appears as shadow, weakness
parades as strength, greed as disinterestedness, treachery as the
highest valor. The mightiest party of the revolution, which in only ten
weeks was to arrive at the power, was left outside the walls of the
Conference as a magnitude not worth noticing. At the same time the
“party of evolutionary socialism,” unknown to anybody, was taken
seriously. Kerensky stepped forth as the incarnation of force and will.
The Coalition, wholly exhausted in the past, was spoken of as a means of
future salvation. Kornilov, hated by the soldier millions, was greeted
as the beloved leader of the army and the people. Monarchists and Black
Hundred men registered their love for the Constituent Assembly. All
those who were about to retire from the political arena behaved as
though they had agreed for one last time to play their best rôles on the
stage of a theater. They were all eager to shout with all their might:
Here is what we wanted to be! Here is what we would have been, if they
had not prevented us! What prevented them was the workers, the soldiers,
the peasants, the oppressed nationalities. Tens of millions of “slaves
in revolt” prevented them from demonstrating their loyalty to the
revolution. In Moscow where they had gone for shelter a strike followed
on their heels. Harried by “dark elements,” by “ignorance,” by
“demagoguism,” these two and a half thousand people, having crowded into
a theater, tacitly agreed together not to violate the histrionic
illusion. Not a word was spoken about the strike. They tried never to
mention the Bolsheviks by name. Plekhanov recalled “the unhappy memory
of Lenin” just in passing, and as though he were talking of an enemy
completely routed. The impression thus bore the character of a negative
to the last detail: in this kingdom of half-buried shades, giving
themselves out for “the living forces of the nation,” the authentic
people’s leader could not possibly figure otherwise than as a political
cadaver.

“The brilliant auditorium,” writes Sukhanov, “was quite sharply divided
into two halves: to the right sat the bourgeoisie, to the left the
democracy. In the orchestra and loges to the right many uniforms of
generals were to be seen, and to the left ensigns and soldiers. Opposite
the stage in the former imperial loge were seated the higher diplomatic
representatives of the Allied and friendly powers ... Our group, the
extreme Left, occupied a small corner of the orchestra.” The extreme
Left, in the absence of the Bolsheviks, were the followers of Martov.

Towards four o’clock Kerensky appeared on the stage accompanied by two
young officers, a soldier and a sailor, symbolizing the power of the
revolutionary government. They stood stock still as though rooted in the
ground behind the back of the Minister-President. In order not to
irritate the Right Wing with the word republic – so it was agreed in
advance – Kerensky greeted “the representatives of the Russian land” in
the name of the government of the “Russian state.” “The general tone of
the speech,” writes our liberal historian, “instead of being one of
dignity and confidence, was, as a result of the influence of recent days
... one of badly concealed fright, which the orator seemed to be trying
to suppress within himself by adopting the high notes of a threat.”
Without directly naming the Bolsheviks, Kerensky began with a fist-shake
in their direction. Any new attempts against the government “will be put
down with blood and iron.” Both wings of the conference joined in a
stormy applause. Then a supplementary threat in the direction of
Kornilov, who had not yet arrived: “Whatever ultimatums no matter who
may present to me, I will know how to subdue him to the will of the
supreme power, and to me, its supreme head.” Although this evoked
ecstatical applause, the applause came only from the left half of the
Conference. Kerensky kept coming back again and again to himself as the
“supreme head”: he had need of that thought. “To you here who have come
from the front, to you say I, your War Minister and supreme leader,
there is no will and no power in the army higher than the will and power
of the Provisional Government.” The democrats were in rapture at these
blank cartridges. They believed that in this way they could avoid the
resort to lead.

“All the best forces of the people and the army,” affirms the head of
the government, “associated the triumph of the Russian revolution with
the triumph of our arms on the front, but our hopes have been trampled
in the mud and our faith spat upon.” Such is his lyrical summing up of
the June offensive. He himself, Kerensky, intends in any case to wage
the war to complete victory. Speaking of the danger of a peace at the
expense of Russia’s interests – that course having been suggested in the
peace proposals of the Pope on August 4 – Kerensky pays a tribute of
praise to the noble loyalty of our Allies. To which he adds: “And I, in
the name of the mighty Russian people, say only one thing: We have
expected nothing else and we can expect nothing else.” An ovation
addressed to the loges of the Allied diplomats brings all to their feet
except a few internationalists and those solitary Bolsheviks who have
come as delegates from the trade unions. From the officers’ loge
somebody shouts: “Martov, get up!” Martov, to his honor be it said, had
the force not to offer homage to the disinterestedness of the Entente.

To the oppressed nationalities of Russia striving to rebuild their
destiny, Kerensky offers a Sunday school lesson interwoven with threats.
“When languishing and dying in the chains of the tzarist autocracy” –
thus he boasts of chains that others have worn – “we poured out our
blood in the name of the welfare of all the peoples.” Out of a feeling
of gratitude, he suggests to the oppressed nationalities, they ought now
to endure a régime which deprives them of rights.

Where lies the way out? “Do you not feel it in you, this mighty flame?
... Do you not feel within you the strength and the will to discipline,
self-sacrifice and labor? ... Do you not offer here a spectacle of the
united strength of the nation?” These words were pronounced on the day
of the Moscow strike, and during the hours of the mysterious movements
of Kornilov’s cavalry. “We will destroy our souls, but we will save the
state.” That was all the government of the revolution had to offer the
people.

“Many provincials,” writes Miliukov, “saw Kerensky in this hall for the
first time, and they went out half disappointed and half indignant.
Before them had stood a young man with a tortured pale face, and a pose
like an actor speaking his lines. This man seemed to be trying to
frighten somebody and create upon all an impression of power and force
of will in the old style. In reality he evoked only a feeling of pity.”

The speeches of the other members of the government exposed not so much
a personal bankruptcy, as the bankruptcy of the compromise system. The
grand idea which the Minister of the Interior, Avksentiev, submitted to
the judgement of the country, was the institution of “travelling
commissars.” The Minister of Industry advised the capitalists to content
themselves with a modest profit. The Minister of Finance promised to
lower the direct tax upon the possessing classes by increasing indirect
taxation. The Right Wing was incautious enough to greet these words with
a stormy applause, in which Tseretelli afterward, with some
embarrassment, pointed out a lack of eagerness for self-sacrifice. The
Minister of Agriculture, Chernov, had been told to keep still entirely,
in order not to irritate the Allies on the right with the specter of
land expropriation. In the interests of national unity it had been
decided to pretend that the agrarian question did not exist. The
Compromisers had no objection. The authentic voice of the muzhik never
once sounded from the tribune. Nevertheless in those very weeks of
August the agrarian movement was billowing throughout the whole country,
getting ready to break loose in autumn in the form of an unconquerable
peasant war.

After a day’s intermission – a day passed in reconnoitering and
mobilizing of forces on both sides – the session of the 14th opened in
an atmosphere of extreme tension. When Kornilov appeared in his _loge_,
the right half of the Conference gave him a stormy ovation, the left
remained seated almost as a body. Cries of “get up!” from the officers’
loges were followed with coarse abuse. When the government appeared, the
left section gave Kerensky a prolonged ovation, in which, as Miliukov
testifies, “the right just as demonstratively refused to participate,
remaining in their seats.” In those hostile clashing waves of applause
were heard the close approaching battles of the civil war. Meanwhile
upon the stage representatives of both halves of the divided hall
continued to sit with the title of government; and the president, who
had secretly taken military measures against the commander-in-chief, did
not for a moment forget to incarnate in his figure “the unity of the
Russian people.” In pursuance of this rôle, Kerensky announced: “I
propose to all that in the person of the supreme commander-in-chief who
is present here, we should all greet our army, courageously dying for
freedom and the fatherland.” On the subject of that army he had said at
the first session: “Our hopes have been trampled in the mud, and our
faith spat upon.” But never mind! A saving phrase had been found. The
hall rose and stormily applauded Kornilov and Kerensky. The unity of the
nation was once more preserved!

The ruling classes, whom historic necessity had seized by the throat,
resorted to the method of historic masquerade. It evidently seemed to
them that if they could once more stand before the people in all their
transformations, this would make them more significant and stronger. In
the character of experts on the national conscience, they brought out on
the stage all the representatives of all the four state Dumas. Their
mutual disagreements, once so sharp, had disappeared. All the parties of
the bourgeoisie now united without difficulty upon the “extra-party and
extra-class program” of those public men who a few days back had sent a
telegram of greeting to Kornilov. In the name of the first Duma – of the
year 1906! – the Kadet Nabokov renounced “the very intimation of the
possibility of a separate peace.” This did not prevent the liberal
politician from subsequently relating in his memoirs how he, and with
him many of the leading Kadets, saw in a separate peace the only way to
salvation. In the same way representatives of the other tzarist Dumas
demanded of the revolution first of all a tribute of blood.

“General! You have the floor!” The session has now arrived at its
critical moment. What will the high commander-in-chief have to say,
after Kerensky has insistently but vainly urged him to limit himself to
a mere outline of the military situation? Miliukov writes as an
eye-witness: “The short, stumpy but strong figure of a man with Kalmuck
features, appeared up the stage, darting sharp piercing glances from his
small black eyes in which there was a vicious glint. The hall rocked
with applause. All leapt to their feet with the exception of ... the
soldiers.” Shouts of indignation mingled with abuse were addressed from
the right to the delegates who did not stand: “You roughnecks, get up!”
From the delegates not standing the answer comes back: “Serfs!” The
uproar turns into a storm. Kerensky demands that they all quietly listen
to the “first soldier of the Provisional Government.” In the sharp,
fragmentary, imperious tone appropriate to a general who intends to save
the country, Kornilov read a manuscript written for him by the
adventurer Zavoiko at the dictation of the adventurer Filonenko. But the
program proffered in the manuscript was considerably more moderate than
the design to which it formed an introduction. Kornilov did not hesitate
to paint the condition of the army and the situation at the front in the
blackest colors, and with an obvious intent to cause fright. The central
point in his speech was a military prognosis: “The enemy is already
knocking at the gates of Riga, and if the instability of our army does
not make it possible to restrain him on the shores of the Gulf of Riga,
then the road to Petrograd is open.” Here Kornilov hauls off and deals a
blow to the government: “By a whole series of legislative measures
introduced after the revolution by people strange to the spirit and
understanding of an army, the army has been converted into a crazy mob
trembling only for its own life.” The inference is obvious: There is no
hope for Riga, and the commander-in-chief openly and challengingly says
so before the whole world, as though inviting the Germans to seize the
defenseless city. And Petrograd? Kornilov’s thought was this: If I am
empowered to carry out my program, Petrograd may still be saved, but
hurry up! The Moscow Bolshevik paper wrote: “What is this, a warning or
a threat? The Tarnopol defeat made Kornilov commander-in-chief, the
surrender of Riga might make him dictator.” That suggestion accorded far
more accurately with the designs of the conspirators than could have
been guessed by the most suspicious Bolshevik.

The Church Council, having participated in the gorgeous welcome of
Kornilov, now sent to the support of the commander-in-chief one of its
most reactionary members, the Archbishop Platon. “You have just seen the
deadly picture of our army,” says this representative of the living
forces, “and I have come here in order from this platform to say to
Russia: Do not be troubled, dear one. Have no fear, my own one ... If a
miracle is necessary for the salvation of Russia, then in answer to the
prayers of his church, God will accomplish this miracle ...” For the
protection of the church lands, however, the orthodox prelates preferred
some good Cossack troops. The point of the speech was not there, though.
The Archbishop complained that in the speeches of the members of the
government, he “had not once heard even by a slip of the tongue the word
God.” Just as Kornilov had accused the revolutionary government of
demoralizing the army, so Platon accused “those who now stand at the
head of our God-loving people” of criminal unbelief. These churchmen who
had been squirming in the dust at the feet of Rasputin were now bold
enough publicly to confess the revolutionary government.

A declaration of the 12th Cossack Army was read by General Kaledin,
whose name was persistently mentioned during this period among the
strongest of those in the military party. “Kaledin,” to quote one of his
eulogists, “not desiring and not knowing how to please the mob, broke
with General Brussilov on this ground, and as not adaptable to the
spirit of the times was retired from the command.” Returning to the Don
at the beginning of May, the Cossack general had soon been elected
_ataman_ of the Don army, and so to him as chief of the oldest and
strongest of the Cossack armies was allotted the task of presenting the
program of the privileged Cossack upper circles. Rejecting the
accusation of counter-revolutionism, his declaration ungraciously
reminded the minister-socialists how at the moment of danger they had
come to the Cossacks for help against the Bolsheviks. The gloomy general
unexpectedly won the hearts of the democrats by pronouncing in a
thunderous voice the word which Kerensky had not dared to speak out
loud: Republic. The majority of the hall, and with special zeal the
minister Chernov, applauded this Cossack general, who was quite
seriously demanding of the republic that which the autocracy was no
longer able to give. Napoleon predicted that Europe would become either
Cossack or republican. Kaledin agreed to see Russia republican on
condition that she should not cease to be Cossack. Having read the
words: “There should be no place for defeatists in the government,” the
ungrateful general roughly and impudently turned in the direction of the
unlucky Chernov. The report of the liberal press remarks: “All eyes were
fixed upon Chernov, whose head was bowed low over the table.” Being
unretained by any political position, Kaledin developed to the full the
military program of the reaction: abolish the committees, restore power
to the commanders, equalize the front and the rear, reconsider the
rights of the soldiers – that is, reduce them to nothing. (_Applause
from the Right was here mingled with protests and even whistling from
the Left._) The Constituent Assembly “in the interest of tranquil and
deliberative labors” should be convoked in Moscow. This speech, prepared
in advance of the Conference, was read by Kaledin the next day after a
general strike which made his phrase about “tranquil” labors in Moscow
sound like a joke. The speech of the Cossack republican finally raised
the temperature of the hall to the boiling point, and prompted Kerensky
to show his authority: “It is unbecoming for anybody in the present
assembly to address demands to the government.” But in that case why had
he summoned the conference? Purishkevich, a popular member of the Black
Hundreds, shouted from his seat: “We are in the position of supers to
the government!” Two months before, this organizer of pogroms had not
dared show his face.

The official declaration of the democracy, an endless document which
tried to answer all questions and answered none, was read by the
president of the Executive Committee, Cheidze, who received a warm
greeting from the Left. Their cries of “Long live the leader of the
Russian revolution!” must have embarrassed this modest Caucasian, who
was the last man in the world to imagine himself a leader. In a tone of
self-justification the democracy announced that it “had not striven
after the power, and had not desired a monopoly for itself.” It was
prepared to support any power capable of preserving the interests of the
country and the revolution. But you must not abolish the soviets: they
alone have saved the country from anarchy. You must not destroy the
soldiers’ committees: only they can guarantee the continuation of the
war. The privileged classes must in some things act in the interests of
the whole people. However, the interests of the landlords must be
protected from forcible seizures. The solution of nationality questions
must be postponed to the Constituent Assembly. It is necessary, on the
other hand, to carry out the more urgent reforms. Of an active policy of
peace, the declaration said not a word. In general the document seemed
to have been especially designed to provoke the indignation of the
masses without giving satisfaction to the bourgeoisie.

In an evasive and colorless speech, the representative of the peasants’
Executive Committee reminded his auditors of the slogan “Land and
Freedom,” under which “our best fighters have died.” An account in a
Moscow paper records an episode omitted from the official stenographic
report: “The whole hall rises and gives a stormy ovation to the
prisoners of Schlusselburg who are seated in a _loge_.” Astonishing
grimace of the revolution! “The whole hall” does honor to those few of
the former political hard-labor convicts whom the monarchy of Alexeiev,
Kornilov, Kaledin, Archbishop Platon, Rodzianko, Guchkov, and in essence
also Miliukov, had not succeeded in strangling to death in its prisons.
These hangmen, or colleagues of hangmen, wanted to decorate themselves
with the martyr’s aureole of their own victims!

Fifteen years before that, the leaders of the right half of this hall
were celebrating the two hundredth anniversary of the capture of
Schlusselburg fortress by Peter the First. _Iskra_, the journal of the
revolutionary wing of the social democracy, wrote during those days:
“What indignation awakens in the breast at the thought of this patriotic
celebration on that accursed island which has been the place of
execution of Minakov, Myshkin, Rogachev, Stromberg, Ulianov, Generalov,
Ossipanov, Chevyrev; Andryushkin; within sight of those stone cages in
which Klimenko strangled himself with a rope, Grachevsky soaked himself
with kerosene and set fire to his body, Sophia Ginsburg stabbed herself
with a pair of scissors; under the walls within which Shchedrin,
Yuvachev, Konashevich, Pokhitonov, Ignatius Ivanov, Aronchik and
Tikhonovich sank into the black night of madness, and scores of others
died of exhaustion, scurvy and tuberculosis. Abandon yourself, then, to
your patriotic bacchanal for today you are still the lords in
Schlusselburg!” The motto of _Iskra_ was a sentence from the letter of a
Dekabrist hard-labor convict to Pushkin: “The spark will kindle a
flame.” The flame had been kindled. It had reduced to ashes the monarchy
and its Schlusselburg hard-labor prison, and now today in the hall of
this State Conference yesterday’s jail-keepers were offering an ovation
to the victims torn from their clutches by the revolution. But most
paradoxical of all was the fact that the jailers and their prisoners had
actually united together in a feeling of common hatred for the
Bolsheviks – for Lenin, the former chief-editor of _Iskra_, for Trotsky,
the author of the above-quoted lines, for the rebelling workers and the
unsubmissive soldiers who now filled the prisons of the republic.

The National-Liberal, Guchkov, president of the third Duma, who in his
day had refused to admit the left deputies into the Committees of
Defense, and for this was named by the Compromisers first War Minister
of the revolution, made the most interesting speech – a speech, however,
in which irony struggled vainly with despair: “But why then ...” he
said, alluding to the words of Kerensky, “why have the representatives
of the government come to us with ‘mortal alarm’ and ‘in mortal terror’
with a sort of morbid, I would even say, hysterical, cry of despair? And
why does this alarm, this terror and this cry, why do they find in our
souls a kindred piercing pain as of the anguish of those about to die?”
In the name of those who had lorded, commanded, and pardoned, and
punished, the great Moscow merchant publicly confesses to a feeling as
of “the anguish of those about to die.” “This government,” he said, “is
the shadow of a power.” Guchkov was right. But he himself, too, the
former partner of Stolypin, was but a shadow of himself.

On the very day of the opening of the conference, there appeared in
Gorky’s paper an account of how Rodzianko had got rich by supplying
worthless wood for rifle-stocks. This untimely revelation – due to
Karakhan, the future soviet diplomat, then still unknown to anybody –
did not prevent the Lord Chamberlain from speaking at the conference
with dignity in defense of the patriotic program of the manufacturers of
military supplies. All misfortunes, he said, flowed from the fact that
the Provisional Government did not go hand in hand with the state Duma,
“the sole, legal and absolutely all-national popular representative
assembly in Russia.” That seemed a little too much. There was laughter
on the left. There were shouts: “The third of June!” There had been a
time when that date, the third of June, 1907, the day of the trampling
underfoot of the constitution they had granted, burned like the brand of
a galley-slave on the brow of the monarchy and the party supporting it.
Now it was only a pale memory. But Rodzianko himself, too, with his
thundering bass, ponderous and portentous, seemed as he stood on the
tribune rather a living monument of the past than a political figure.

As against attacks from within, the government brought forward some
encouragements received a long time ago from without. Kerensky read a
telegram of greeting from the American president, Wilson, promising
“every material and moral support to the government of Russia for
success in the common cause uniting both peoples and in which they are
pursuing no selfish aims.” The renewed applause addressed to the
diplomatic loge could not drown the alarm caused in the right half of
the assembly by this telegram from Washington. Praise for their
disinterestedness had too often meant to the Russian imperialists the
prescription of a starvation diet.

In the name of the compromisist democracy, Tseretelli, its acknowledged
leader, defended the soviets and the army committees, as one defends for
honor’s sake a lost cause. “We cannot yet remove these scaffoldings,
when the temple of free revolutionary Russia is not yet completely
built.” After the revolution “the popular masses had trusted nobody in
the essence of the matter, but themselves”; only the efforts of the
compromisist soviets had made it possible for the possessing classes to
stay on top at all, even though at first deprived of their comforts.
Tseretelli placed it to the special credit of the soviets that they “had
handed over all state functions to the Coalition Government.” Did this
sacrifice, he asked, have to be “wrested from the democracy by force?”
The orator was like the commander of a fortress who boasts publicly that
he has surrendered the position entrusted to him without a struggle ...
And in the July days – “Who then came forward in defense of the country
against anarchy?” A voice resounded on the right: “The Cossacks and
junkers.” Those short words cut like the blow of a whip through the flow
of democratic commonplaces. The bourgeois wing of the conference
perfectly understood the rescuing services done them by the
Compromisers; but gratitude is not a political feeling. The bourgeoisie
had promptly drawn their conclusion from the services rendered them by
the democracy. It was this: The chapter of the Social Revolutionaries
and Mensheviks is at an end, the Cossack and junker chapter is next in
order.

Tseretelli approached the problem of power with special caution. During
the recent months elections had been held to the city dumas, in part
also to the zemstvos, on a basis of universal franchise – and what had
happened? The representatives of these democratic, self-governing bodies
had turned up at the State Conference in the left group, side by side
with the soviets, under the leadership of those same parties, the Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks. If the Kadets intend to insist upon
their demand: to abolish all dependence of the government upon the
democracy, then what will be the use of the Constituent Assembly?
Tseretelli only just suggested the contours of this argument, for
carried to its conclusion it would have condemned the policy of
coalition with the Kadets as standing in contradiction even with formal
democracy. They are accusing the revolution of overdoing its speeches
about peace, he said, but do not the possessing classes understand that
the slogan of peace is now the sole means by which the war can be
continued? The bourgeoisie understood this all right. They merely wished
to take this means of continuing the war, along with the power, into
their own hands. Tseretelli concluded with a hymn of praise to the
Coalition. In that divided assembly which saw no way out of its
problems, his compromisist commonplaces awakened for the last time a ray
of hope. But Tseretelli, too, was already in essence a phantom of
himself.

The democracy was answered in the name of the right half of the hall by
Miliukov, the hopelessly sober representative of those classes for whom
history had made a sober policy impossible. In his “History” the leader
of liberalism has expressly set forth his own speech at the State
Conference. “Miliukov made ... a brief factual survey of the mistakes of
the ‘revolutionary democracy’ and summarized them: ... Capitulation on
the question of ‘democratization of the army,’ involving the retirement
of Guchkov; capitulation on the question of a ‘Zimmerwaldist’ foreign
policy, involving the retirement of the Minister of Foreign Affairs
(Miliukov); capitulation before the utopian demands of the working
class, involving the retirement of Konovalov (Minister of Commerce and
Industry); capitulation before the extreme demands of the national
minorities, involving the retirement of the rest of the Kadets. The
fifth capitulation – before the tendency of the masses to direct action
in the agrarian problem ... had caused the retirement of the first
president of the Provisional Government, Prince Lvov.” That was no bad
history of the case. When it came to suggesting a cure, however,
Miliukov’s wisdom did not go beyond police measures: We must strangle
the Bolsheviks. “Confronted by obvious facts,” he reproached the
Compromisers, “these more moderate groups have been compelled to admit
that there are criminals and traitors among the Bolsheviks. But they
have not yet acknowledged that the very fundamental idea uniting these
partisans of anarchosyndicalist militant action is criminal
(_applause_).”

The extremely submissive Chernov still seemed to be the link uniting the
Coalition with the revolution. Almost all the orators of the Right Wing,
Kaledin, the Kadet Maklakov, the Kadet Astrov, aimed a blow at Chernov,
who had been ordered in advance to keep still, and whom no one undertook
to defend. Miliukov for his part called to mind the fact that the
Minister of Agriculture “had himself been at Zimmerwald and Kienthal,
and had there introduced the most extreme resolutions.” That was a blow
straight to the jaw. Before becoming a minister – the minister of an
imperialist war – Chernov had actually placed his signature under
certain documents of the Zimmerwald Left – that is, of the faction of
Lenin.

Miliukov did not conceal from the Conference the fact that from the very
beginning he had been opposed to the Coalition, considering that it
would be “not stronger but weaker than the government which issued from
the revolution” – that is, the government of Guchkov and Miliukov. And
now he “greatly fears that the present staff of executives ... cannot
guarantee the safety of persons and property.” But however that may be,
he, Miliukov, promises to support the government, “voluntarily and
without any argument.” The treachery of this magnanimous promise will
become adequately clear in two weeks. At the moment his speech did not
evoke any enthusiasm nor occasion any stormy protest. The orator was
both greeted and dismissed with a rather dry applause.

The second speech of Tseretelli reduced itself to promises,
asseverations, clamor: Don’t you understand that it is all for you –
soviets, committees, democratic programs, slogans of pacifism – all this
is a protection for you? “Who is more capable of setting in motion the
troops of the Russian revolutionary state, the war-minister Guchkov, or
the war-minister Kerensky?” Tseretelli was here repeating the words of
Lenin almost verbatim, although the leader of compromise regarded as a
service what the leader of revolution had branded as treachery. The
orator even apologized for his excessive mildness in relation to the
Bolsheviks: “I tell you that the revolution was inexperienced in the
struggle with anarchy on the left (_stormy applause from the right_).”
But after it had “received its first lessons” the revolution corrected
its mistake: “An exceptional law has already been passed.” During those
very hours Moscow was in the secret control of a committee of six – two
Mensheviks, two Social Revolutionaries, two Bolsheviks – defending it
against a seizure of power by those to whom the Compromisers were giving
this promise to shatter the Bolsheviks.

The high point of the last day was the speech of General Alexeiev, in
whose authority the mediocrity of the old military chancelleries stood
incarnate. To the wild enthusiasm of the Right, this former
chief-of-staff of Nicholas II and organizer of defeats for the Russian
army, talked about those destructive characters “in whose pockets is to
be heard the melodious clink of German marks.” For the restoration of
the army, discipline is necessary; for discipline, the authority of the
commanders is necessary; and for this again, discipline is necessary.
“Call discipline ‘iron,’ call it ‘conscious,’ call it ‘genuine’ ... at
bottom these three kinds of discipline are one and the same.” For
Alexeiev all history was comprised in the domestic service regulations.
“Is it so difficult, gentlemen, to sacrifice some imaginary advantage –
the existence of these organizations (_laughter on the left_) for a
certain period of time? (_uproar and shouts on the left_).” The general
urged them to give the disarmed revolution into his keeping, not forever
– oh, God save us, no – but only “for a certain period of time!” Upon
the conclusion of the war he promised to return the goods undamaged. But
Alexeiev concluded with an aphorism that was not bad: “We need measures
and not half-measures.” These words were a blow at the declaration of
Cheidze, the Provisional Government, the Coalition, the whole February
régime. Measures and not half-measures! To that the Bolsheviks heartily
subscribed.

General Alexeiev’s speech was immediately offset by the delegates of the
Petrograd and Moscow left officers, who spoke in support of “our supreme
chief, the Minister of War.” After him Lieutenant Kuchin, an old
Menshevik, spokesman of the “representatives of the front at the State
Conference” spoke in the name of the soldier millions, who, however,
would scarcely have recognized themselves in the mirror of compromisism.
“We have all read the interview of General Lukomsky, printed in all the
papers, where he says that if the Allies do not help us, Riga will be
surrendered ...” Why did the high commanding staff which has heretofore
always concealed its failures and defeats, consider it necessary to lay
on these black colors? Cries of “For shame!” from the left were aimed at
Kornilov, who had expressed the same thought at the conference the day
before. Kuchin here touched the possessing classes on their sorest
point. The upper circles of the bourgeoisie, the commanding staff, the
whole right half of the hall, were saturated with defeatist tendencies
in all three spheres, economic, political and military. The motto of
these respectable and cool-blooded patriots had become: the worse it
gets the better! But the compromisist orator hastened to abandon a theme
which would have mined the ground under his own feet. “Whether we shall
save the army or not, we do not know,” said Kuchin. “But if we fail, the
commanding staff will not save it either ...” “It will!” cried a voice
from the officers’ seats. Kuchin: “No, it won’t!” A burst of applause
from the left. Thus the commanders and the committees, upon whose
pretended solidarity the whole program of the restoration of the army
was based, shouted their hostility across the hall – and thus likewise
the two halves of the Conference, which was supposed to constitute the
foundation of “an honest coalition.” These clashes were merely a weak,
smothered, parliamentarized echo of those contradictions which were
convulsing the country. Obeying their Bonapartist stage directions, the
orators from left and right followed each other alternately, balancing
each other off as well as possible. If the hierarchs of the orthodox
Church Council supported Kornilov, then the evangelical Christian
parsons sided with the Provisional Government. The delegates of the
zemstvos and the city dumas made speeches in pairs – one from the
majority adhering to the declaration of Cheidze, the other from the
minority supporting the declaration of the State Duma.

The representatives of the oppressed nationalities one after another
assured the government of their patriotism, but beseeched it to deceive
them no longer: In the localities we have the same officials, the same
laws, the same oppression. “You must not delay – no people is able to
live upon mere promises.” Revolutionary Russia must show that she is
“mother and not stepmother of all her peoples.” These timid reproaches
and humble adjurations found hardly a sympathetic response even from the
left side of the hall. The spirit of an imperialist war is least of all
compatible with an honest policy upon the question of nationalities.

“Up to the present time the nationalities from beyond the Caucasus have
not made a single separative move,” announced the Menshevik, Chenkeli,
in the name of the Georgians, “and they will not make one in the
future.” This promise, which was roundly applauded, was soon to prove
false: from the moment of the October revolution Chenkeli became one of
the leaders of separatism. There was no contradiction here, however: the
patriotism of democrats does not extend beyond the framework of the
bourgeois régime.

Meanwhile certain more tragic specters of the past are taking their
place upon the stage; the war cripples are going to lift their voices.
They too are not unanimous. The handless, the legless, the blind, have
also their aristocracy and their plebs. In the name of the “immense and
mighty League of the Cavaliers of St. George, in the name of its 128
departments in all parts of Russia,” a crippled officer, outraged in his
patriotic feelings, supports Kornilov (_applause from the right_). The
All-Russian League of Crippled Warriors adheres through the voice of its
delegate to the declaration of Cheidze (_applause from the left_).

The Executive Committee of the recently organized union of railroad
workers – destined under the abbreviated name of Vikzhel to play an
important rôle – joins its voice to the declaration of the Compromisers.
The president of the Vikzhel, a moderate democrat and an extreme
patriot, paints a vivid picture of counter-revolutionary intrigue among
the railroad lines: malicious attacks upon the workers, mass discharges,
arbitrary violations of the eight-hour day, arrests and indictments.
Underground forces, he says, directed from hidden but influential
centers, are clearly trying to provoke the hungry railroad workers to a
fight. The enemy remains undiscovered. “The Intelligence Service is
dreaming, and the prosecuting attorney’s inspectors are fast asleep.”
And this most moderate of the moderates concludes his speech with a
threat: “If the Hydra of counter-revolution lifts its head, we will go
out and we will choke him with our own hands.”

Here one of the railroad magnates immediately takes the floor with
counter accusations: “The clear spring of the revolution has been
poisoned.” Why? “Because the idealistic aims of the revolution have been
replaced by material aims (applause from the right).” In a similar
spirit the Kadet landlord, Rodichev, denounces the workers for having
appropriated from France “the shameful slogan: get rich!” The Bolsheviks
will soon give extraordinary success to the formula of Rodichev,
although not quite of the kind which the orator hoped for. Professor
Ozerov, a man of pure science and a delegate from the agricultural
banks, exclaims: “The soldier in the trenches ought to be thinking of
war, not of dividing the land.” This is not surprising: a confiscation
of privately owned land would mean a confiscation of bank capital. On
the first of January, 1915, the debts of the private land owners
amounted to more than 3¼ billion roubles.

On the right spokesmen took the floor from the high staffs, from the
industrial league, from chambers of commerce and banks, from the society
of horse breeders, and other organizations comprising hundreds of
eminent people. On the left spokesmen appeared for the soviets, the army
committees, the trade unions, the democratic municipalities, and the
cooperatives behind which in the distant background stood nameless
millions and tens of millions. In normal times the advantage would have
been with the short arm of the lever. “It is impossible to deny,”
preached Tseretelli, “especially at such a moment, the great relative
weight and significance of those who are strong through the possession
of property.” But the whole point was that this weight was becoming more
and more impossible to weigh. Just as weight is not an inner attribute
of individual objects, but an inter-relation between them, so social
weight is not a natural property of people, but only that class
attribute which other classes are compelled to recognize in them. The
revolution, however, had come right up to the point where it was
refusing to recognize this most fundamental “attribute” of the ruling
classes. It was for this reason that the position of the eminent
minority on the short arm of the lever was becoming so uncomfortable.
The Compromisers were trying with might and main to preserve the
equilibrium, but they also were already without power: the masses were
too irresistibly pressing down on the long arm. How cautious were the
great agrarians, bankers, industrialists about coming out in the defense
of their interests! Did they indeed defend them at all? Almost not at
all. They spoke for the rights of idealism, the interests of culture,
the prerogatives of a future Constituent Assembly. The leader of the
heavy industries, Von Ditmar, even concluded his speech with a hymn in
honor of “liberty, equality, fraternity.” Where were the metallic
baritones of profits, the hoarse bass of land rents – where were they
hiding? Only the over-sweet tenor melodies of disinterestedness filled
the hall. But listen for a moment: how much spleen and vinegar under all
this syrup! How unexpectedly these lyric roulades break into a spiteful
falsetto! The president of the All-Russian Chamber of Agriculture,
Kapatsinsky, standing with all his heart for the coming agrarian reform,
does not forget to thank “our pure Tseretelli” for his circular in
defense of law against anarchy. But the land committees? They will
straightway turn over the power to the muzhik! To this “dark,
semi-illiterate man, crazy with joy that they have at last given him the
land, it is proposed to turn over the inauguration of justice in the
country!” If in their struggle with this dark muzhik, the landlords
happen to be defending property, it is not for their own sakes – Oh no!
– but only in order afterwards to lay it upon the altar of freedom.

The social symbolism would now seem to have been completed. But here
Kerensky is blessed with a happy inspiration. He proposes that they give
the floor to one more group – “a group out of Russian history – namely
Breshko-Breshkovskaia, Kropotkin and Plekhanov.” Russian Narodnikism,
Russian anarchism, and Russian social democratism take the floor in the
person of the older generation – anarchism and Marxism in the person of
their most eminent founders.

Kropotkin asked only to join his voice “to those voices which are
summoning the whole Russian people to break once for all with
Zimmerwaldism.” The apostle of non-government promptly gave his
adherence to the right wing of the Conference. A defeat threatens us, he
cried, not only with the loss of vast territories and the payment of
indemnities: “You must know, comrades, that there is something worse
than all this – that is the psychology of a defeated nation.” This
ancient internationalist prefers to see the psychology of a defeated
nation on the other side of the border. While recalling how a conquered
France had humbled herself before the Russian tzars, he did not foresee
how a conquering France would humble herself before American bankers. He
exclaimed: “Are we going to live through the same thing? Not by any
means!” He was applauded by the entire hall. And then what rainbow
prospects, he said, are opened by the war: “All are beginning to
understand that we must build a new life on new socialist principles ...
Lloyd George is making speeches imbued with the socialist spirit ... In
England, in France and in Italy, there is forming a new comprehension of
life, imbued with socialism – unfortunately state socialism.” If Lloyd
George and Poincaré have not yet “unfortunately” renounced the state
principle, at least Kropotkin has come over to it frankly enough. “I
think,” he said, “that we will not be depriving the Constituent Assembly
of any of its rights – I fully recognize that to it belongs the
sovereign decision upon such questions – if we, the Council of the
Russian land, loudly express our desire that Russia should be declared a
republic.” Kropotkin insisted upon a confederative republic: “We need a
federation such as they have in the United States.” That is what
Bakunin’s federation of free communes had come down to! “Let us promise
each other at last,” adjured Kropotkin in conclusion, “that we will no
longer be divided into the left and right halves of this theater. We all
have one fatherland, and for her we ought all to stand together, or to
lie down together if need be, both Lefts and Rights.” Landlords,
industrialists, generals, Cavaliers of St. George, all those who did not
recognize Zimmerwald, extended to the apostle of anarchism a well-earned
ovation.

The principles of liberalism can have a real existence only in
conjunction with a police system. Anarchism is an attempt to cleanse
liberalism of the police. But just as pure oxygen is impossible to
breathe, so liberalism without the police-principle means the death of
society. Being a shadow-caricature of liberalism, anarchism as a whole
has shared its fate. Having killed liberalism, the development of class
contradictions has also killed anarchism. Like every sect which founds
its teaching not upon the actual development of human society, but upon
the reduction to absurdity of one of its features, anarchism explodes
like a soap bubble at that moment when the social contradictions arrive
at the point of war or revolution. Anarchism as represented by Kropotkin
was about the most spectral of all the specters at the State Conference.

In Spain, the classic country of Bakuninism, the anarchosyndicalist and
so-called “specific,” or pure anarchists, in abstaining from politics,
are really repeating the policy of the Russian Mensheviks. These
bombastic deniers of the state respectfully bow down to force the moment
it changes its skin. Having warned the proletariat against the
temptations of power, they self-sacrificingly support the power of the
“left” bourgeoisie. Cursing the gangrene of parliamentarism, they
secretly hand their followers the election ballot of the vulgar
republican. No matter how the Spanish revolution develops, it will at
least put an end to anarchism once for all.

Plekhanov, who was greeted by the whole conference with stormy applause
– the lefts were honoring their old leader, the rights their new ally –
represented that early Russian Marxism whose outlook had in the course
of the decades become fixed within the boundaries of political freedom.
For the Bolsheviks the revolution had only begun, for Plekhanov it was
already finished. Advising the industrialists to “seek a rapprochement
with the working class,” Plekhanov suggested to the democrats: “It is
absolutely necessary for you to come to an agreement with the
representatives of the commercial and industrial class.” As a horrible
example Plekhanov introduced the “unhappy memory of Lenin,” who had
fallen to such a level that he was summoning the proletariat to “an
immediate seizure of political power.” It was just for this warning
against a struggle for power that the Conference had need of Plekhanov,
who had abandoned the last item of the armor of a revolutionist upon the
threshold of the revolution.

On the evening of the day that the delegates from “Russian history”
spoke, Kerensky gave the floor to a representative of the Chamber of
Agriculture and the Union of Horse Breeders, also a Kropotkin, another
member of the old princely family which had, if you believe their
genealogical tree, a better right than the Romanovs to the Russian
throne. “I’m not a Socialist,” said this feudal aristocrat, “though I
have a respect for genuine socialism. But when I see seizures, robberies
and violence I am obliged to say ... the government ought to compel
people who are attaching themselves to socialism to withdraw from the
task of reconstructing the country.” This second Kropotkin, obviously
aiming his shot at Chernov, had no objection to such socialists as Lloyd
George or Poincaré. Along with his family-opposite, the anarchist, this
monarchist Kropotkin condemned Zimmerwald, the class struggle and the
land seizures – alas, he had been in the habit of calling them “anarchy”
– and also demanded union and victory. Unfortunately the records do not
state whether the two Kropotkins applauded each other.

In this conference, corroded with hatred, they talked so much about
unity that unity simply had to materialize at least for one second in
the inevitable symbolic handshake. The Menshevik paper tells of this
incident in rapturous words: “During the speech of Bublikov an incident
occurred which made a deep impression upon all the members of the
Conference ... ‘Yesterday,’ said Bublikov, ‘a noble leader of the
revolution, Tseretelli, extended his hand to the business world, and I
want him to know that that hand is not left hanging in the air ...’”
When Bublikov stopped speaking Tseretelli came up and shook hands with
him. Stormy ovations.

How many ovations! A little too many. A week before the scene just
described, this same Bublikov, a big railroad magnate, attending a
congress of industrialists, had bellowed against the soviet leaders:
“Away with the dishonest, the ignorant, all those who have driven us
toward destruction!” and his words were still echoing in the atmosphere
of Moscow. The old Marxist, Riazanov, who attended the conference as a
trade union delegate, very appropriately recalled the kiss of the
prelate of Lyon, Lamourette – “That kiss which was exchanged by two
parts of the National Assembly – not the workers and the bourgeoisie,
but two parts of the bourgeoisie – and you know that the struggle never
burst out more furiously than just after that kiss.” Miliukov
acknowledges with unaccustomed frankness that this union was, upon the
side of the industrialists, “not sincere, but practically necessary for
a class which would have too much to lose. The celebrated handshake of
Bublikov was just such a reconciliation, with mental reservations.”

Did the majority of the members of the conference believe in the force
of handshakes and political kisses? Did they believe in themselves?
Their feelings were contradictory, like their plans. To be sure, in
certain individual speeches, especially from the provinces, there was
still to be heard the crackle of the first raptures, hopes, illusions.
But in a conference where the left half was disappointed and
demoralized, and the right enraged, these echoes of the March days
sounded like the correspondence of a betrothed couple made public in
their divorce trial. Having already departed into the kingdom of shades,
these politicians were saving with spectral measures a spectral régime.
A deathly cold breath of hopelessness hung over this assembly of “living
forces,” this final parade of the doomed.

Towards the very end of the conference an incident occurred revealing
the deep split even in that group which was considered the model of
unity and loyalty to the state, the Cossacks. Nagaiev, a young Cossack
officer in the soviet delegation, declared that the working Cossacks
were not with Kaledin. The Cossacks at the front, he said, do not trust
the Cossack leaders. That was true, and touched the conference upon its
sorest point. The newspaper accounts here report the stormiest of all
the scenes at the conference. The Left ecstatically applauded Nagaiev
and shouts were heard: “Hurrah for the revolutionary Cossacks!”
Indignant protests from the Right: “You will answer for this!” A voice
from the officers’ benches: “German marks!” In spite of the
inevitability of these words as the last argument of patriotism, they
produced an effect like an exploding bomb. The hall was filled with a
perfectly hellish noise. The soviet delegates jumped from their seats,
threatening the officers’ benches with their fists. There were cries of
“Provocateurs!” The president’s bell clanged continually. “Another
moment and it seemed as though a fight would begin.”

After all that had taken place Kerensky declared in his concluding
speech: “I believe and I even know ... that we have achieved a better
understanding of each other, that we have achieved a greater respect for
each other.” Never before had the duplicity of the February régime risen
to such disgusting and futile heights of falsity. Himself unable to
sustain this tone, the orator suddenly burst out in the midst of his
concluding phrases into a wail of threat and despair. As Miliukov
describes it: “With a broken voice which fell from a hysterical shriek
to a tragic whisper, Kerensky threatened an imaginary enemy, intently
searching for him throughout the hall with inflamed eyes ...” Miliukov
really knew better than anybody else that this enemy was not imaginary.
“Today citizens of the Russian land, I will no longer dream ... May my
heart become a stone ...” Thus Kerensky raged: “Let all those flowers
and dreams of humanity dry up. (_A woman’s voice from the gallery: ‘You
cannot do that. Your heart will not permit you.’_) I throw far away the
key of my heart, beloved people. I will think only of the state.”

The hall was stupefied, and this time both halves of it. The social
symbol of the State Conference wound up with an insufferable monologue
from a melodrama. That woman’s voice raised in defense of the flowers of
the heart sounded like a cry for help, like an SOS from the peaceful,
sunny, bloodless February revolution. The curtain came down at last upon
the State Conference.



CHAPTER 31 KERENSKY’S PLOT


 

The Moscow Conference damaged the position of the government by
revealing, as Miliukov correctly states, “that the country was divided
into two camps between which there could be no essential reconciliation
or agreement.” The Conference raised the spirits of the bourgeoisie and
sharpened their impatience. On the other hand it gave a new impulse to
the movement of the masses. The Moscow strike opened a period of
accelerated regrouping to leftward of the workers and soldiers.
Henceforth the Bolsheviks grew unconquerably. Among the masses, only the
Left Social Revolutionaries, and to some extent the Left Mensheviks,
held their own. The Petrograd organization of the Mensheviks signalized
its political shift leftward by excluding Tseretelli from the list of
candidates for the city duma. On the 16th of August, a Petrograd
conference of the Social Revolutionaries demanded, by 22 votes against
1, the dissolution of the League of Officers at headquarters, and other
decisive measures against the counter-revolution. On August 18, the
Petrograd Soviet, over the objection of its president, Cheidze, placed
upon the order of the day the question of abolishing the death penalty.
Before the voting, Tseretelli put this challenging question: “If as a
consequence of your resolution, the death penalty is not abolished, then
will you bring the crowd into the street and demand the overthrow of the
government?” “Yes,” shouted the Bolsheviks in answer. “Yes, we will call
out the crowd, and we will try our best to overthrow the government.”
“You have lifted your heads high these days,” said Tseretelli. The
Bolsheviks had lifted their heads together with the masses. The
Compromisers had lowered their heads as the heads of the masses were
lifted. The demand for an abolition of the death penalty was adopted by
all votes – about 900 – against 4. Those four were Tseretelli, Cheidze,
Dan, Lieber! Four days later, at a joint session of Mensheviks and
groups surrounding them, where upon fundamental questions a resolution
of Tseretelli was adopted in opposition to that of Martov, the demand
for an immediate abolition of the death penalty was passed without
debate. Tseretelli, no longer able to resist the pressure, remained
silent.

This thickening political atmosphere was pierced by events at the front.
On the 19th of August, the Germans broke through the Russian line near
Ikskul. On the 21st, they occupied Riga. This fulfilment of Kornilov’s
prediction became, as though by previous agreement, the signal for a
political attack of the bourgeoisie. The press multiplied tenfold its
campaign against “workers who will not work” and “soldiers who will not
fight.” The revolution had to answer for everything: it had surrendered
Riga; it was getting ready to surrender Petrograd. The slandering of the
army – just as furious as two and a half months ago – had now not a
shadow of justification. In June the soldiers had actually refused to
take the offensive: they had not wanted to stir up the front, to break
the passivity of the Germans, to renew the fight. But before Riga the
initiative was taken by the enemy, and the soldiers behaved quite
differently. It was, moreover, the most thoroughly propagandised part of
the 12th army which proved least subject to panic.

The commander of the army, General Parsky, boasted, and not without
foundation, that the retreat was accomplished “in model formation,” and
could not even be compared to the retreats from Galicia and East
Prussia. Commissar Voitinsky reported: “Our troops have carried out the
tasks allotted to them in the region of the breach honorably and
irreproachably, but they are not in a condition long to sustain the
attack of the enemy, and are retreating slowly, a step at a time,
suffering enormous losses. I consider it necessary to mention the
extraordinary valor of the Lettish sharpshooters, the remnant of whom,
in spite of complete exhaustion, has been sent again into the battle.”
Still more enthusiastic was the report of the president of the army
committee, the Menshevik Kuchin: “The spirit of the soldiers was
astonishing. According to the testimony of members of the committee and
officers, their staunchness was something never before seen.” Another
representative of the same army reported a few days later at a session
of the bureau of the Executive Committee: “In the center of the point of
attack was a Lettish brigade consisting almost exclusively of Bolsheviks
... Receiving orders to advance, the brigade went forward with red
banners and bands playing and fought with extraordinary courage.”
Stankevich wrote later to the same effect, although more restrainedly:
“Even in the army headquarters which contained people notoriously ready
to lay the blame upon the soldiers, they could not tell me one single
concrete instance of non-fulfilment, not only of fighting orders, but of
any orders whatever.” The landing force of marines engaged in the
Moonsund operation, as appears in the official documents, also showed
noticeable fortitude. A part was played in determining the mood of the
soldiers, especially the Lettish sharpshooters and Baltic sailors, by
the fact that it was a question this time of the direct defense of two
centers of the revolution, Riga and Petrograd. The more advanced troops
had already got hold of the Bolshevik idea that “to stick your bayonets
in the ground does not settle the question of the war,” that the
struggle for peace was inseparable from the struggle for power, for a
new revolution.

Even if certain individual commissars, frightened by the attack of the
generals, exaggerated the staunchness of the army, the fact remains that
the soldiers and sailors obeyed orders and died. They could not do more.
But nevertheless in the essence of the matter there was no defense.
Incredible as it may seem, the twelfth army was caught wholly
unprepared. Everything was lacking: men, arms, military supplies, gas
masks. The communications were unspeakably bad. Attacks were delayed
because Japanese cartridges had been supplied for Russian rifles. Yet
this was no incidental sector of the front. The significance of the loss
of Riga had been no secret to the high command. How then explain the
extraordinarily miserable condition of the defense forces and supplies
of the twelfth army? “The Bolsheviks,” writes Stankevich, “had already
begun to spread rumors that the city was surrendered to the Germans on
purpose, because the officers wanted to get rid of that nest and nursery
of Bolshevism. These rumors could not but win belief in the army, which
knew that essentially there had been no defense or resistance.” The fact
is that as early as December 1916, Generals Ruzsky and Brussilov had
complained that Riga was “the misfortune of the Northern front,” that it
was “a nest of propaganda,” which could only be dealt with by the method
of executions. To send the Riga workers and soldiers to the training
school of a German military occupation, must have been the secret dream
of many generals of the northern front. Nobody imagined of course that
the commander-in-chief had given an order for the surrender of Riga. But
all the commanders had read the speech of Kornilov and the interview of
his chief-of-staff, Lukomsky. This made an order entirely unnecessary.
The commander-in-chief of the northern front, General Klembovsky,
belonged to the inside clique of conspirators, and was consequently
awaiting the surrender of Riga as a signal for the beginning of the
movement to save the country. Moreover, even in normal conditions these
Russian generals had a preference for surrender and retreat. On this
occasion, when they were relieved of responsibility in advance by
headquarters, and their political interests impelled them along the road
of defeatism, they did not even make the attempt at a defense. Whether
this or that general added some damaging action to the passive sabotage
of the defense, is a secondary question and in its essence hard to
solve. It would be naïve to imagine, however, that the generals
restrained themselves from lending what help they could to destiny in
those cases where their traitorous activities would remain unpunished.

The American journalist, John Reed, who knew how to see and hear, and
who has left an immortal book of chronicler’s notes of the days of the
October Revolution, testifies without hesitation that a considerable
part of the possessing classes of Russia preferred a German victory to
the triumph of the revolution, and did not hesitate to say so openly.
“One evening I spent at the house of a Moscow merchant,” says Reed,
among other examples. “During tea we asked eleven people at the table
whether they preferred ‘Wilhelm or the Bolsheviks.’ The vote was ten to
one for Wilhelm.” The same American writer conversed with officers on
the northern front, who “frankly preferred a military defeat to working
with the soldiers’ committees.”

To sustain the political accusation made by the Bolsheviks – and not
only by them – it is wholly sufficient that the surrender of Riga
entered into the plans of the conspirators and occupied a definite place
in the calendar of their conspiracy. This was quite clearly evident
between the lines of the Moscow speech of Kornilov. Subsequent events
illumined that aspect of the matter completely. But we have also a piece
of direct testimony, to which, in the given instance, the personality of
the witness imparts an irreproachable authority. Miliukov in his
_History_ says: “In Moscow, Kornilov indicated in his speech that moment
beyond which he did not wish to postpone decisive steps for the
‘salvation of the country from ruin and the army from collapse.’ That
moment was the fall of Riga predicted by him. This event in his opinion
would evoke ... a flood of patriotic excitement ... As Kornilov told me
personally at a meeting in Moscow on the 13th of August, he did not wish
to let pass this opportunity. And the moment of open conflict with the
government of Kerensky was completely determined in his mind even to the
point of settling in advance upon the date, August 27.” Could one
possibly speak more clearly? In order to carry out the march on
Petrograd, Kornilov had need of the surrender of Riga several days
before the date settled upon. To strengthen the Riga position, to take
serious measures of defense, would have meant to destroy the plan of
another campaign immeasurably more important for Kornilov. If Paris is
worth a mass, then Riga is a small price to pay for power.

During the week which passed between the surrender of Riga and the
insurrection of Kornilov, headquarters became the central reservoir of
slander against the army. The communications from the Russian staff
printed in the Russian press found immediate echo in the press of the
Entente. The Russian patriotic papers in their turn enthusiastically
reprinted the taunts and abuse addressed to the Russian army by The
Times, Le Temps and Le Matin. The soldiers’ front quivered with
resentment, indignation and disgust. The commissars and committees, even
the compromisist and patriotic ones, felt injured to the quick. Protests
poured in from all sides. Especially sharp was the letter of the
executive committee of the Rumanian front, the Odessa military district,
and the Black Sea fleet – the so-called Rumcherod – which demanded that
the Executive Committee “establish before all Russia the valor and
devoted bravery of the soldiers who are dying by the thousands every day
in cruel battles for the defense of revolutionary Russia ...” Under the
influence of these protests from below, the compromisist leaders
abandoned their passivity. “It seems as if there exists no filth which
the bourgeois papers will not fling at the revolutionary army,” wrote
_Izvestia_ of its allies in a political bloc. But nothing had any
effect. This slandering of the army was a necessary part of the
conspiracy which had its center in headquarters.

Immediately after the abandonment of Riga, Kornilov gave order by
telegram to shoot a few soldiers on the road before the eyes of others
as an example. Commissar Voitinsky and General Parsky reported that in
their opinion the conduct of the soldiers did not at all justify such
measures. Kornilov, beside himself, declared at a meeting of committee
representatives at headquarters that he would court-martial Voitinsky
and Parsky for giving untrue reports of the situation in the army –
which meant, as Stankevich explains, “for not laying the blame on the
soldiers.” To complete the picture, it is necessary to add that on the
same day Kornilov ordered the army staffs to supply a list of Bolshevik
officers to the head committee of the League of Officers – that is, to
the counter-revolutionary organization headed by the Kadet Novosiltsev
which was the chief center of the plot. Such was this supreme
commander-in-chief, “the first soldier of the revolution!”

Having made up its mind to lift a tiny corner of the curtain, _Izvestia_
wrote: “Some mysterious clique extraordinarily close to the high
commanding circles is doing a monstrous work of provocation ...” Under
the phrase “mysterious clique” they were alluding to Kornilov and his
staff. The heat lightnings of the advancing civil war began to cast a
new illumination not only upon today’s, but upon yesterday’s doings.
Under the head of self-defense, the Compromisers began to uncover
suspicious activities of the commanding staff during the June offensive.
There appeared in the press more and more details of the malicious
slandering by the staffs of divisions and regiments. “Russia has the
right to demand,” wrote _Izvestia_, “that the whole truth be laid bare
to her about our July retreat.” Those words were eagerly read by
soldiers, sailors, workers – especially by those who, under the pretense
that they had been guilty of the catastrophe at the front, were still
keeping the prisons full. Two days later _Izvestia_ felt compelled to
declare more openly that: “Headquarters with its communiqués is playing
a definite political game against the Provisional Government and the
revolutionary democracy.” The government is portrayed in these lines as
an innocent victim of the designs of headquarters, but it would seem as
though the government had every opportunity to pull up on the generals.
If it did not do so, that was because it did not want to.

In the above-mentioned protest against treacherous baitings of the
soldiers, Rumcherod spoke with especial indignation of the fact that
“the communiqués from headquarters ... while emphasizing the gallantry
of the officers seem deliberately to belittle the devotion of the
soldiers to the defense of the revolution.” The protest of Rumcherod
appeared in the press of August 22, and the next day a special order of
Kerensky was published devoted to the laudation of the officers, who
“from the first days of the revolution have had to endure a diminution
of their rights,” and undeserved insults on the part of soldier masses
“concealing their cowardice under idealistic slogans.” At a time when
his closest assistants, Stankevich, Voitinsky and others, were
protesting against the taunting of soldiers, Kerensky demonstratively
associated himself with this business, crowning it with a provocatory
order from the War Minister and Head of the Government. Kerensky
subsequently acknowledged that as early as the end of July he had in his
hands “accurate information” as to an officers’ plot grouped around
headquarters. ’The head committee of the League of Officers,” to quote
Kerensky, “appointed active conspirators from its midst, and its members
were agents of the conspiracy in various localities. They gave to the
legal actions of the League the necessary tone.” That is perfectly
correct. We need only add that “the necessary tone” was a tone of
slander against the army, the committees, and the revolution – that is,
the very tone of Kerensky’s order of August 23.

How shall we explain this riddle? That Kerensky had no consistent and
thought-out policy is absolutely indubitable. But he must needs have
been altogether out of his senses, in order with knowledge of an
officer’s plot to put his head under the knife of the plotters and at
the same time to help them disguise themselves. The explanation of the
conduct of Kerensky, incomprehensible at first glance, is in reality
very simple: he was himself at that time a party to the plot against the
baffled régime of the February revolution.

When the time came for revelations, Kerensky himself testified that from
the Cossack circles, from officers, and from bourgeois politicians,
proposals of a personal dictatorship had come to him more than once.
“But they fell upon unfertile soil ...” The position of Kerensky was at
any rate, then, such that the leaders of counter-revolution were able
without risk to exchange opinions with him about a coup d’etat. “The
first conversations on the subject of a dictatorship, taking the form of
a slight feeling out of the ground,” began – according to Denikin – at
the beginning of June, that is, during the preparations for the
offensive. Kerensky not infrequently participated in these
conversations, and in such cases it was assumed as a matter of course,
especially by Kerensky himself, that he would occupy the center of the
dictatorship. Sukhanov rightly says of Kerensky: “He was a Kornilovist –
only on the condition that he himself should stand at the head of the
Kornilovists.” During the collapse of the offensive, Kerensky promised
Kornilov and the other generals far more than he could fulfil. “During
his journeys on the front,” relates General Lukomsky, “Kerensky would
often pump up his courage and discuss with his companions the question
of creating a firm power, of forming a directory, or of turning over the
power to a dictator.” In conformity with his character, Kerensky would
introduce into these conversations an element of formlessness, a
slovenly, dilettante element. The generals, on the other hand, would
incline towards military precision.

These casual participations of Kerensky in the conversations of the
generals gave a certain legalization to the idea of a military
dictatorship, a thing which, out of cautiousness before the not yet
strangled revolution, they most often called by the name of “directory.”
What rôle historic recollections about the government of France after
the Thermidor played here, it would be difficult to say. But aside from
questions of mere verbal disguise, the directory presented in the first
place this indubitable advantage, that it permitted a subordination of
personal ambitions. In a directory, places ought to be found not only
for Kerensky and Kornilov, but also for Savinkov, even for Filonenko –
in general, for people of “iron will.” as the candidates themselves
expressed it. Each of them cherished in his own mind the thought of
passing over afterward from the collective to the single dictatorship.

For a conspiratorial bargain with headquarters Kerensky therefore did
not have to make any abrupt change: it was sufficient to develop and
continue what he had already begun. He assumed, moreover, that he could
give to the conspiracy of the generals a suitable direction, bringing it
down not only on the heads of the Bolsheviks, but also, within certain
limits, upon his allies and tiresome guardians, the Compromisers.
Kerensky manoeuvred in such a way that, without exposing the
conspirators completely, he could adequately frighten them and involve
them in his own design. In this he went to the very limit beyond which
the head of a government would become an illegal conspirator. “Kerensky
needed an energetic pressure upon him from the right, from the
capitalist cliques, the Allied embassies, and especially from
headquarters,” wrote Trotsky early in September, “in order to enable him
to get his own hands absolutely free. Kerensky wanted to use the revolt
of the generals in order to reinforce his own dictatorship.”

The State Conference was the critical moment. Carrying home from Moscow,
along with the illusion of unlimited opportunities, a humiliating sense
of his personal failure, Kerensky finally decided to cast away all
hesitations and show himself to them in his full stature. But whom did
he mean by “them”? Everybody – but above all the Bolsheviks, who had
placed the mine of a general strike under his gorgeous national tableau.
In doing this he would also settle matters once for all with the Rights,
with all those Guchkovs and Miliukovs who would not take him seriously,
who made fun of his gestures and considered his power the shadow of a
power. And finally he would give a good reprimand to “them,” the
compromisist tutors, the hateful Tseretelli who kept correcting and
instructing him, Kerensky, the chosen of the nation, even at the State
Conference. Kerensky firmly and finally decided to show the whole world
that he was by no means a “hysteric,” a “juggler,” a “ballerina,” as the
Guard and Cossack officers were more and more openly calling him, but a
man of iron who had closed tight the doors of his heart and thrown the
key in the ocean in spite of the prayers of the beautiful unknown in the
loge at the theater.

Stankevich remarked in Kerensky in those days, “a desire to speak some
new word answering the universal alarm and consternation of the country.
Kerensky ... decided to introduce disciplinary punishments into the
army; probably he was also ready to propose other decisive measures to
the government.” Stankevich knew only that part of his chief’s
intentions which the latter deemed it timely to communicate to him. In
reality the designs of Kerensky at that time already went considerably
further. He had decided at one blow to cut the ground under the feet of
Kornilov by carrying out the latter’s program, and thus binding the
bourgeoisie to himself. Guchkov had been unable to move the troops to an
offensive; he, Kerensky, had done it. Kornilov would not be able to
carry out the program of Kornilov; he, Kerensky, could. The Moscow
strike had reminded him, it is true, that there would be obstacles on
this road, but the July Days had shown that it was possible to overcome
them. Now again it was only necessary to carry the job through to the
end, not permitting the friends on the left to get hold of your
coat-tails, First of all it was necessary to change completely the
Petrograd garrison: the revolutionary regiments must be replaced by
“healthy” detachments, who would not be always glancing round at the
soviets. There would be no chance to talk of this plan with the
Executive Committee. And why indeed should that be necessary? The
government had been recognized as independent and crowned under that
banner in Moscow. To be sure, the Compromisers understood independence
only in a formal sense, as a means of pacifying the Liberals. But he,
Kerensky, would convert the formal into the material. Not for nothing
had he declared in Moscow that he was neither with the Rights nor the
Lefts, and that therein lay his strength. Now he would prove this in
action!

After the conference Kerensky’s line and the line of the Executive
Committee had continued to diverge: the Compromisers were afraid of the
masses, Kerensky of the possessing classes. The popular masses were
demanding the abolition of the death penalty at the front; Kornilov, the
Kadets, the embassies of the Entente, were demanding its introduction at
the rear.

On August 19, Kornilov telegraphed the Minister-President: “I
insistently assert the necessity of subordinating to me the Petrograd
district.” Headquarters was openly stretching its hand toward the
capital. On August 24, the Executive Committee summoned the courage to
demand vocally that the government put an end to “counter-revolutionary
methods,” and undertake “without delay and with all energy” the
realization of the democratic transformation. This was a new language.
Kerensky was compelled to choose between accommodating himself to a
democratic platform, which with all its meagerness might lead to a split
with the Liberals and generals, and the program of Kornilov which would
inexorably lead to a conflict with the soviets. Kerensky decided to
extend his hand to Kornilov, to the Kadets, to the Entente. He wanted to
avoid an open conflict on the right at any cost.

It is true that on August 21, the grand dukes Mikhail Alexandrovich and
Pavel Alexandrovich were put under house arrest, and a few other persons
at the same time placed under observation. But there was nothing serious
in all that, and Kerensky was compelled to liberate the arrestees
immediately. “It seems,” he said in subsequent testimony on the Kornilov
affair, “that we had been consciously led off on a false scent.” To this
it is only necessary to add – “with our own co-operation.” It was
perfectly clear that for serious conspirators – that is, for the whole
right wing of the Moscow Conference – it was not at all a question of
restoring monarchy, but of establishing the dictatorship of the
bourgeoisie over the people. It was in this sense that Kornilov and all
his colleagues rejected, not without indignation, the charge of
“counter-revolutionary" – that is, monarchist – designs. To be sure,
there were former officials, _aides-de-camp_, ladies-in-waiting, Black
Hundred courtiers, witch-doctors, monks, ballerinas, whispering here and
there in the back yards. That was a thing of no consequence whatever.
The victory of the bourgeoisie could come only in the form of a military
dictatorship. The question of monarchy could rise only at some future
stage, and then too on the basis of a bourgeois counter-revolution, not
of Rasputin’s ladies-in-waiting.

For the given period the real thing was the struggle of the bourgeoisie
against the people under the banner of Kornilov. Seeking an alliance
with this camp, Kerensky was all the more willing to screen himself from
the suspicions of the Left with a fictitious arrest of grand dukes. The
trick was so obvious that the Moscow Bolshevik paper wrote at the time:
“To arrest a pair of brainless puppets from the Romanov family and leave
at liberty ... the military clique of the army commanders with Kornilov
at the head – that is to deceive the people ...” The Bolsheviks were
hated for this, too, that they saw everything, and talked out loud about
it. Kerensky’s inspiration and guide in those critical days had come to
be Savinkov – a mighty seeker of adventures, a revolutionist of the
sporting type, one who had acquired a scorn for the masses in the school
of the individual terror, a man of talent and will – qualities which had
not, however, prevented him from becoming for a number of years an
instrument in the hands of the famous provocateur, Azef – a sceptic and
a cynic, who believed, not without foundation, that he had a right to
look down upon Kerensky, and while holding his right hand to his vizor
respectfully to lead him by the nose with his left. Savinkov imposed
himself upon Kerensky as a man of action, and upon Kornilov as a genuine
revolutionist with a historic name. Miliukov has a curious story of the
first meeting between the commissar and the general, as told by
Savinkov. “General,” said Savinkov, “I know that if conditions arise in
which you ought to shoot me, you will shoot me.” After a prolonged pause
he added: “But if conditions arise in which I have to shoot you, I will
do that too.” Savinkov was fond of literature, knew Corneille and Hugo,
and was inclined to the lofty genre. Kornilov intended to get rid of the
revolution without regard to the formulæ of pseudo-classicism and
romanticism, but the general, too, was not a stranger to the charm of a
“strong artistic style.” The words of the former terrorist must have
tickled pleasantly the heroic principle buried in the breast of the
former member of the Black Hundreds.

In one of the later newspaper articles, obviously inspired and perhaps
also written by Savinkov, his own plans were quite lucidly explained:
“While still a commissar ...” says the article, “Savinkov came to the
conclusion that the Provisional Government was incapable of getting the
country out of its difficult situation, Here other forces must be
brought into play. However, all the work in that direction could be done
only under the banner of the Provisional Government, and in particular
of Kerensky. It would have to be a revolutionary dictatorship
established by an iron hand. That iron hand Savinkov saw in General
Kornilov.” Kerensky as a “revolutionary” screen, Kornilov as an iron
hand. As to the rôle of the third party, the article has nothing to say,
but there is no doubt that Savinkov, in reconciling the
commander-in-chief with the prime minister, had some thought of crowding
them both out. At one time this unspoken thought came so close to the
surface that Kerensky, just on the eve of the Conference and against the
protest of Kornilov, compelled Savinkov to resign. However, like
everything else that happened in that sphere, the resignation was not
conclusive. “On the 17th of August it was announced,” testified
Filonenko, “that Savinkov and I would keep our posts, and that the
Minister-President had accepted in principle the program expounded in
the report presented by General Kornilov, Savinkov and me.” Savinkov, to
whom Kerensky on August 17, “gave orders to draft a law for measures to
be adopted in the rear,” created to this end a commission under the
presidency of General Apushkin. Although seriously fearing Savinkov,
Kerensky definitely decided to use him for his own great plan, and not
only kept his place for him in the war ministry but gave him one in the
ministry of the navy to boot. That meant, according to Miliukov, that
for the government “the time had come to take some definite measures
even at the risk of bringing the Bolsheviks into the street.” Savinkov
on this subject “frankly stated that with two regiments it would be easy
to put down a Bolshevik revolt and break up the Bolshevik
organizations.”

Both Kerensky and Savinkov perfectly understood, especially after the
Moscow Conference, that the compromisist soviets would in no case accept
the program of Kornilov. The Petrograd soviet, having only yesterday
demanded the abolition of the death penalty at the front, would rise
with redoubled strength against the extension of the death penalty to
the rear. The danger, therefore, was that the movement against the coup
d’etat planned by Kerensky might be led, not by the Bolsheviks, but by
the soviets. However, we must not stop for that of course: it is a
question of saving the country!

“On the 22nd of August,” writes Kerensky, “Savinkov went to headquarters
at my direction in order, among other things (!) to demand of General
Kornilov that he place a cavalry corps at the disposal of the
government.” Savinkov himself, when it came his turn to justify himself
before public opinion, described his mission in the following terms; “To
get from General Kornilov a cavalry corps for the actual inauguration of
martial law in Petrograd and for the defense of the Provisional
Government against any attempt whatever, in particular (!) an attempt of
the Bolsheviks who ... according to information received from a foreign
intelligence service, were again preparing an attack in connection with
a German siege and an insurrection in Finland.” The fantastic
information of the Intelligence Service was used simply to cover the
fact that the government itself, in the words of Miliukov, was assuming
the “risk of bringing the Bolsheviks into the street.” That is, it was
ready to provoke an insurrection. And since the publication of the
decree establishing a military dictatorship was designated for the last
days of August, Savinkov accommodated to that date the anticipated
insurrection.

On the 25th of August, the Bolshevik organ _Proletarian_ was suppressed
without any external motive. _The Worker_, which came out in its place,
declared that its predecessor had been “closed the day after it had
summoned the workers and soldiers, in connection with the breach on the
Riga front, to self-restraint and tranquillity. Whose hand is taking
such care that the workers shall not know that the party is warning them
against provocation?” That question was directly to the point. The fate
of the Bolshevik press was in the hands of Savinkov. The suppression of
the paper gave him two advantages: it irritated the masses and it
prevented the party from protecting them against a provocation which
came this time from governmental high places.

According to the minutes of headquarters – perhaps a little polished up,
but in general fully corresponding to the situation and the persons
involved – Savinkov informed Kornilov: “Your demands, Lavr Georgievich,
will be satisfied in a few days. But the government fears that in
connection with this, serious complications may arise in Petrograd ...
The publication of your demands will be a signal for a coming-out of the
Bolsheviks. It is not known what attitude the soviets will take to the
new law. The latter may also oppose the government. Hence I request you
to give an order that the third cavalry corps be sent to Petrograd
toward the end of August and placed at the disposition of the
Provisional Government. In case the members of the soviets as well as
the Bolsheviks come out, we shall have to take action against them.”
Kerensky’s emissary added that the action would have to be very decisive
and ruthless – to which Kornilov answered that he “understands no other
kind of action.” Afterward, when it became necessary to justify himself,
Savinkov added, “... if at the moment of the insurrection of the
Bolsheviks, the soviets should be Bolshevik”. But that is too crude a
trick. The decree announcing the _coup d’état_ of Kerensky was to come
out in three or four days. It was thus not a question of some future
soviets, but of those in existence at the end of August. In order that
there should be no misunderstanding, and the Bolsheviks should not come
out “before the proper moment” the following sequence of actions was
agreed upon: First concentrate a cavalry corps in Petrograd, then
declare the capital under martial law, and only after that publish the
new laws which were to provoke a Bolshevik insurrection. In the minutes
of headquarters this plan is written down in black and white. “In order
that the Provisional Government shall know exactly when to declare the
Petrograd military district under martial law and when to publish the
new law, it is necessary that General Kornilov shall keep him (Savinkov)
accurately informed by telegraph of the time when the corps will
approach Petrograd.”

The conspiring generals understood, says Stankevich, “that Savinkov and
Kerensky ... wanted to carry out some sort of _coup d’état_ with the
help of the staff. Only this was needed. They hastily agreed about all
demands and conditions. Stankevich, who was loyal to Kerensky, makes the
reservation that at headquarters, they mistakenly associated Kerensky
with Savinkov. But how could these two be dissociated, once Savinkov had
arrived with precisely formulated instructions from Kerensky? Kerensky
himself writes: “On the 25th of August, Savinkov returns from
headquarters and reports to me that the troops to be at the disposition
of the Provisional Government will be sent according to instructions.”
The evening of the 26th was designated for the adoption by the
government of the law on measures for the rear, which was to be the
prologue for decisive action by the cavalry corps. Everything was ready
– it remained only to press the button.

The events, the documents, the testimony of the participants, and
finally the confession of Kerensky himself, unanimously bear witness
that the Minister-President, without the knowledge of a part of his own
government, behind the back of the soviets which had given him the
power, in secrecy from the party of which he considered himself a
member, had entered into agreement with the highest generals of the army
for a radical change in the state régime with the help of armed forces.
In the language of the criminal law this kind of activity has a
perfectly definite name – at least in those cases where the undertaking
does not come off victorious. The contradiction between the “democratic”
character of Kerensky’s policy and his plan of saving the government
with the help of the sword, can seem insoluble only to a superficial
view. In reality the cavalry plan flowed inevitably from the
compromisist policy. In explaining the law of this process it is
possible to abstract to a considerable extent, not only from the
personality of Kerensky, but even from the peculiarities of the national
milieu. It is a question of the objective logic of compromisism in the
conditions of revolution.

Friedrich Ebert, the people’s plenipotentiary of Germany, a compromisist
and a democrat, not only acted under the guidance of the Hohenzollern
generals behind the back of his own party, but also at the beginning of
December 1918 became a direct participant in a military plot having as
its goal the arrest of the highest soviet body, and the declaration of
Ebert himself as President of the Republic. It is no accident that
Kerensky subsequently declared Ebert the ideal statesman.

When all their schemes – those of Kerensky, Savinkov, Kornilov – had
gone to smash, Kerensky, to whom fell the none too easy work of
obliterating the tracks, testified as follows: “After the Moscow
Conference it was clear to me that the next attempt against the
government would be from the right and not the left.” It is not to be
doubted that Kerensky feared headquarters, and feared that sympathy with
which the bourgeoisie surrounded the military conspirators; but the
point is that Kerensky thought it necessary to struggle against
headquarters, not with a cavalry corps, but by carrying out in his own
name the program of Kornilov. The double-faced accomplice of the Prime
Minister was not merely fulfilling an ordinary mission – for that a
telegram in code from the Winter Palace to Moghiliev would have been
enough. No, he went as an intermediary to reconcile Kornilov with
Kerensky, to bring their plans, that is, into agreement, and thus
guarantee that the _coup d’état_ should proceed so far as possible
legally. It was as though Kerensky said through Savinkov: “Go ahead, but
within the limits of my scheme. You will thus avoid risk and get almost
everything you want.” Savinkov on his own part added the hint: “Do not
go prematurely beyond the limits of Kerensky’s plan.” Such was that
peculiar equation with three unknown quantities. Only in this way is it
possible to understand Kerensky’s appealing to headquarters through
Savinkov for a cavalry corps. The conspirators were addressed by a
highly placed conspirator, preserving his legality, and himself aspiring
to stand at the head of the conspiracy.

Among the directions given to Savinkov, only one seemed a measure
actually directed against the conspirators on the right: it concerned
the head committee of the League of Officers, whose dissolution had been
demanded by a Petrograd conference of Kerensky’s party. But here a
remarkable thing is the very formulation of the order: “... in so far as
possible to dissolve the League of Officers.” Still more remarkable is
the fact that Savinkov not only did not find any such possibility at
all, but did not seek it. The question was simply buried as untimely.
The very order had been given merely to have something on paper for
justification before the Lefts. The words “so far as possible” meant
that the order was not to be carried out. As though to emphasize the
decorative character of this order, it was placed first on the list.

Attempting at least to weaken a little the deadly meaning of the fact
that, in expectation of a blow from the right, he had removed the
revolutionary regiments from the capital, and simultaneously appealed to
Kornilov for “reliable” troops, Kerensky later referred to the three
sacramental conditions with which he had surrounded the summoning of the
cavalry corps. Thus his agreement to subordinate to Kornilov the
Petrograd military district Kerensky had conditioned upon the separation
of the capital and its immediate suburbs from the district, so that the
government would not be wholly in the hands of headquarters. For as
Kerensky expressed himself among his own friends: “We here would be
eaten up.” This condition merely shows that in his dream of
subordinating the generals to his own designs, Kerensky had no weapon in
his hands but impotent chicanery. Kerensky’s desire not to be eaten
alive can be credited without demonstration. The two other conditions
amounted to nothing more: Kornilov was not to include in the
expeditionary corps the so-called “Savage Division” consisting of
Caucasian mountaineers, and was not to put General Krymov in command of
the corps. So far as concerned defending the interests of the democracy,
that really meant swallowing the camel and choking on the gnat. But so
far as concerned disguising a blow at the revolution, Kerensky’s
conditions were incomparably more purposeful. To send against the
Petrograd workers Caucasian mountaineers who did not speak Russian would
have been too imprudent; even the tzar in his day never made up his mind
to that! The inconvenience of appointing General Krymov, about whom the
Executive Committee possessed some rather definite information, Savinkov
convincingly explained at headquarters on the ground of their common
interest: “It would be undesirable,” he said, “in case of disturbances
in Petrograd that these disturbances should be put down by General
Krymov. Public opinion might perhaps connect with his name motives by
which he is not guided ...” Finally, the very fact that the head of the
government, in summoning a military detachment to the capital,
anticipated events with that strange request: not to send the Savage
Division and not to appoint Krymov, convicts Kerensky as clearly as he
could be convicted of possessing advance knowledge, not only of the
general scheme of the conspiracy, but also of the constituent units of
the punitive expedition, and the candidates for its more important
executive positions.

Moreover, no matter how things had stood in these secondary points, it
was perfectly obvious that a cavalry corps of Kornilov could not be of
any use in defending “the democracy.” On the contrary, Kerensky could
not possibly doubt that of all the units in the army this corps would be
the most reliable weapon against the revolution. To be sure it might
have been well to have a detachment in Petrograd personally loyal to
Kerensky, who was elevating himself above the Rights and Lefts. However,
as the whole further course of events demonstrates, no such troops
existed in nature. For the struggle against the revolution there was
nobody but Kornilov men, and to them Kerensky had recourse.

These military preparations only supplemented the political ones. The
general course of the Provisional Government during the not quite two
weeks separating the Moscow Conference from the insurrection of
Kornilov, would have been enough in itself essentially to prove that
Kerensky was getting ready, not for a struggle against the Right, but
for a united front with the Right against the people. Ignoring the
protests of the Executive Committee against this counter-revolutionary
policy, the government on August 26 took a bold step to meet the
landlords with its unexpected decree doubling the price of grain. The
hatefulness of this measure – which was introduced, moreover, upon the
spoken demand of Rodzianko – put the government almost in the position
of consciously provoking the hungry masses. Kerensky was clearly trying
to win over the extreme right flank of the Moscow Conference with an
immense bribe. “I am yours!” he hastened to cry to the landlords on the
eve of a cavalry assault upon what was left of the February revolution.

Kerensky’s testimony before the commission of inquiry named by himself,
was disgraceful. Although appearing in the character of a witness, the
head of the government really felt himself to be the chief of the
accused, and moreover, one caught red-handed. The experienced judiciary
officials, who excellently well understood the mechanics of the events,
pretended to take seriously the explanations of the head of the
government, but all other mortals – among them the members of Kerensky’s
own party – quite frankly asked themselves how one and the same cavalry
corps might be useful both for accomplishing a coup d’etat and for
preventing it. It was just a little too reckless on the part of the
“Social Revolutionary” to bring into the capital a force which had been
composed for the purpose of strangling it. The Trojans, to be sure, did
once bring a hostile detachment into the walls of their city, but they
were at least ignorant of what was inside the belly of the wooden horse.
And even so an ancient historian disputes the story of the poet: in the
opinion of Pausanius, you can believe Homer only if you consider the
Trojans to have been “stupid men not possessed of a glimmer of reason.”
What would the old man have said of the testimony of Kerensky?



CHAPTER 32 KORNILOV’S INSURRECTION


 

As early as the beginning of August, Kornilov had ordered the transfer
of the Savage Division and the Third Cavalry Corps from the southwestern
front to the sector of the railroad triangle,
Nevel-Novosokolniki-Velikie Luki, the most advantageous base for an
attack on Petrograd – this under the guise of reserves for the defense
of Riga. At the same time the commander-in-chief had concentrated one
Cossack division in the region between Vyborg and Byeloostrov. This fist
thrust into the very face of the capital – from Byeloostrov to Petrograd
is only thirty kilometers! – was given out as a preparation of reserves
for possible operations in Finland. Thus even before the Moscow
Conference four cavalry divisions had been moved into position for the
attack on Petrograd, and these were the divisions considered most useful
against Bolsheviks. Of the Caucasian division it was customary in
Kornilov’s circle to remark: “Those mountaineers don’t care whom they
slaughter.” The strategic plan was simple. The three divisions coming
from the south were to be transported by railroad to Tzarskoe Selo,
Gatchina, and Krasnoe Selo, in order from those points “_upon receiving_
information of disorders beginning in Petrograd, _and not later than_
the morning of September 1” to advance on foot for the occupation of the
southern part of the capital on the left bank of the Neva. The division
quartered in Finland was at the same time to occupy the northern part of
the capital.

Through the mediation of the League of Officers Kornilov had got in
touch with Petrograd patriotic societies who had at their disposal,
according to their own words, 2,000 men excellently armed but requiring
experienced officers to lead them. Kornilov promised to supply
commanders from the front under the pretext of leave-of-absence. In
order to keep watch of the mood of the Petrograd workers and soldiers
and the activity of revolutionists, a secret intelligence service was
formed, at the head of which stood a colonel of the Savage Division,
Heiman. The affair was conducted within the framework of military
regulations. The conspiracy made use of the headquarters’ apparatus.

The Moscow Conference merely fortified Kornilov in his plans. Miliukov,
to be sure, according to his own story, recommended a delay on the
ground that Kerensky still enjoyed a certain popularity in the
provinces. But this kind of advice could have no influence upon the
impatient general. The question after all was not about Kerensky, but
about the soviets. Moreover, Miliukov was not a man of action, but a
civilian, and still worse a professor. Bankers, industrialists, Cossack
generals were urging him on. The metropolitans had given him their
blessing. Orderly Zavoiko offered to guarantee his success. Telegrams of
greeting were coming from all sides. The Allied embassies took an active
part in the mobilization of the counter-revolutionary forces. Sir
Buchanan held in his hands many of the threads of the plot. The military
attachés of the Allies at headquarters assured him of their most cordial
sympathies. “The British attache in particular” testifies Denikin, “did
this in a touching form.” Behind the embassies stood their governments.
In a telegram of August 23, a commissar of the Provisional Government
abroad, Svatikov, reported from Paris that in a farewell reception the
Foreign Minister Ribot had “inquired with extraordinary eagerness who
among those around Kerensky was a man of force and energy.” And
President Poincaré had “asked many questions ... about Kornilov,” All
this was known at headquarters. Kornilov saw no reason to postpone and
wait. On or about the 20th, two cavalry divisions were advanced further
in the direction of Petrograd. On the day Riga fell, four officers from
each regiment of the army were summoned to headquarters, about 4000 in
all, “for the study of English bomb-throwing.” To the most reliable of
these officers it was immediately explained that the matter in view was
to put down “Bolshevik Petrograd” once for all. On the same day an order
was given from headquarters to supply two of the cavalry divisions with
several boxes of hand grenades: they would be the most useful in street
fighting. “It was agreed,” writes the chief-of-staff, Lukomsky, “that
everything should be ready by the 26th of August.”

As the troops of Kornilov approached Petrograd an inside organization
“was to come out in Petrograd, occupy Smolny Institute and try to arrest
the Bolshevik chiefs.” To be sure in Smolny Institute the Bolshevik
chiefs appeared only at meetings, whereas continually present there was
the Executive Committee which had appointed the ministers, and continued
to number Kerensky among its vice-presidents. But in a great cause it is
not possible or necessary to observe the fine points of things. Kornilov
at least did not bother about them. “It is time,” he said to Lukomsky,
“to hang the German agents and spies, Lenin first of all, and disperse
the Soviet of Workers’ and Peasants’ Deputies – yes, and disperse it so
it will never get together again.”

Kornilov firmly intended to give the command of the operations to
Krymov, who in his own circles enjoyed the reputation of a bold and
resolute general. “Krymov was at that time happy and full of the joy of
life,” says Denikin, “and looked with confidence into the future.” At
headquarters they looked with confidence upon Krymov. “I am convinced,”
said Kornilov, “that he will not hesitate, if need arises, to hang the
whole membership of the Soviet of Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies.” The
choice of this general, so happy and full of the joy of life, was
consequently most appropriate.

At the height of these labors, which drew attention from the German
front, Savinkov arrived at headquarters in order to dot the i’s of an
old agreement, and introduce some secondary changes into it. Savinkov
named the same date for the blow against the common enemy as that which
Kornilov had long ago designated for his action against Kerensky: the
semi-anniversary of the revolution. In spite of the fact that the
conspiracy had split into two halves, both sides were trying to operate
with the common elements of the plan – Kornilov for the purpose of
camouflage, Kerensky in order to support his own illusions. The proposal
of Savinkov played perfectly into the hands of headquarters: the
government had presented its head, and Savinkov was ready to slip the
noose. The generals at headquarters rubbed their hands:

“He’s biting!” they exclaimed like happy fishermen. Kornilov was quite
ready to make the proposed concessions, which cost him nothing. What
difference will the non-subordination of the Petrograd garrison to
headquarters make, once the Kornilov troops have entered the capital?
Having agreed to the other two conditions, Kornilov immediately violated
them: the Savage Division was placed in the vanguard and Krymov at the
head of the whole operation. Kornilov did not consider it necessary to
choke on the gnats.

The Bolsheviks debated the fundamental problems of their policy openly:
a mass party cannot do otherwise. The government and headquarters could
not but know that the Bolsheviks were restraining the masses, and not
summoning them to action. But as the wish is father to the thought, so
political needs become the basis for a prognosis. All the ruling classes
were talking about an impending insurrection because they were in
desperate need of one. The date of the insurrection would approach or
recede a few days from time to time. In the War Ministry – that is, in
the office of Savinkov – according to the press, the impending
insurrection was regarded “very seriously.” _Rech_ stated that the
Bolshevik faction of the Petrograd soviet was assuming the
responsibility for the attack. Miliukov was to such an extent involved
in this matter of the pretended insurrection of the Bolsheviks in his
character of politician, that he has considered it a matter of honor to
support the tale in his character of historian. “In subsequently
published documents of the Intelligence Service,” he writes, “new
assignments of German money for Trotsky’s enterprise relate to exactly
this period.” The learned historian, together with the Russian
Intelligence Service, forgets that Trotsky – whom the German staff for
the convenience of the Russian patriots was kind enough to mention by
name – was “exactly at this period,” from the 23rd of July to the 4th of
September, locked up in prison. The fact that the earth’s axis is merely
an imaginary line does not of course prevent the earth from rotating on
its axis. In like manner the Kornilov operations rotated round an
imaginary insurrection of the Bolsheviks as round its own axis. That was
amply sufficient for the period of preparation. But for the _denouément_
something a little more substantial was needed.

One of the leading military conspirators, the officer Vinberg, revealing
in his interesting notes what was going on behind the scenes in this
business, wholly confirms the assertion of the Bolsheviks that a vast
work of military provocation was in progress. Even Miliukov is obliged,
under the whip of facts and documents, to admit that “the suspicions of
the extreme left circles were correct: agitation in the factories was
undoubtedly one of the tasks which the officers’ organizations were
supposed to fulfil.” But even this did not help: “The Bolsheviks,”
complains the same historian, decided “not to be put upon,” and the
masses did not intend to go out without the Bolsheviks. However, even
this obstacle had been taken into consideration in the plan, and
paralyzed as it were in advance. The “republican center,” as the leading
body of the conspirators in Petrograd was called, decided simply to
replace the Bolsheviks. The business of imitating a revolutionary
insurrection was assigned to the Cossack colonel, Dutov. In January
1918, Dutov, to a question from his political friends: “What was to have
happened on the 28th of August, 1917?” answered as follows (the
quotation is verbatim): “Between the 28th of August and the 2nd of
September I was to take action in the form of a Bolshevik insurrection.”
Everything had been foreseen. This plan had not been labored over by the
officers of the general staff for nothing.

Kerensky, on his side, after the return of Savinkov from Moghiliev, was
inclined to think that all misunderstandings had been removed, and that
headquarters was entirely drawn into his plan. “There were times,”
writes Stankevich, “when all those active not only believed they were
all acting in the same direction, but that they had a like conception of
the very methods of action.” Those happy moments did not last long. An
accident occurred, which like all historic accidents opened the
sluice-gates of necessity. To Kerensky came the Octobrist, Lvov, a
member of the first Provisional Government – that same Lvov who as the
expansive Procuror of the Holy Synod had reported that this institution
was filled with “idiots and scoundrels.” Fate had allotted to Lvov the
task of discovering that under the appearance of a single plan there
were in reality two plans, one of which was directed in a hostile manner
against the other.

In his character as an unemployed but word-loving politician, Lvov had
taken part in endless conversations about the transformation of the
government and the salvation of the country – now at headquarters, now
in the Winter Palace. This time he appeared with a proposal that he be
permitted to mediate in the transformation of the cabinet along national
lines, incidentally frightening Kerensky in a friendly manner with the
thunders and lightnings of a discontented headquarters. The disturbed
Minister-President decided to make use of Lvov in order to test the
loyalty of the staff – and at the same time, apparently, that of his
accomplice, Savinkov. Kerensky expressed his sympathy for the plan of a
dictatorship – in which he was not hypocritical – and encouraged Lvov to
undertake further mediations – in which there was military trickery.

When Lvov again arrived at headquarters, weighed down now with the
credentials of Kerensky, the generals looked upon his mission as a proof
that the government was ripe for capitulation. Only yesterday Kerensky
through Savinkov had promised to carry out the program of Kornilov if
defended by a corps of Cossacks; today Kerensky was already proposing to
the staff a co-operative transformation of the government. “It is time
to put a knee in his stomach,” the generals justly decided. Kornilov
accordingly explained to Lvov that since the forthcoming insurrection of
the Bolsheviks has as its aim “the overthrow of the Provisional
Government, peace with Germany, and the surrender to her by the
Bolsheviks of the Baltic fleet,” there remains no other way out but “the
immediate transfer of power by the Provisional Government into the hands
of the supreme commander-in-chief.” To this Kornilov added: “... no
matter who he may be” – but he had no idea of surrendering his place to
anybody. His position had been fortified in advance by the oath of the
Cavaliers of St. George, the League of Officers and the Council of the
Cossack army. In order to make sure of the “safety” of Kerensky and
Savinkov from the hands of the Bolsheviks, Kornilov urgently requested
them to come to headquarters and place themselves under his personal
protection. The orderly, Zavoiko, gave Lvov an unequivocal hint as to
just what this protection would consist of.

Returning to Moscow, Lvov fervently urged Kerensky, as a “friend,” to
agree to the proposal of Kornilov “in order to save the lives of the
members of the Provisional Government, and above all his own life.”
Kerensky could not but understand at last that his political playing
with the idea of dictatorship was taking a serious turn, and might end
most unfortunately for him. Having decided to act, he first of all
summoned Kornilov to the wire in order to verify the facts: Had Lvov
correctly conveyed his message? Kerensky put his questions, not only in
his own name, but in the name of Lvov, although the latter was not
present during the conversation. “Such an action,” remarks Martynov,
“appropriate for a detective, was of course improper for the head of a
government.” Kerensky spoke of his arrival at headquarters the next day
as a thing already decided upon. This whole dialogue on the direct wire
seems incredible. The democratic head of the government and the
“republican” general converse about yielding the power the one to the
other, as though they were discussing a berth in a sleeping car!

Miliukov is entirely right when he sees in the demand of Kornilov that
the power be transferred to him, merely “a continuation of all those
conversations openly begun long ago about a dictatorship, a
re-organization of the government, etc.” But Miliukov goes too far when
he tries upon this basis to present the thing as though there had been
in essence no conspiracy at headquarters. It is indubitable that
Kornilov could not have presented his demand through Lvov, if he had not
formerly been in a conspiracy with Kerensky. But this does not alter the
fact that with one conspiracy – the common one – Kornilov was covering
up another – his own private one. At the same time that Kerensky and
Savinkov were intending to clean up the Bolsheviks, and in part the
soviets, Kornilov was intending also to clean up the Provisional
Government. It was just this that Kerensky did not want.

For several hours on the evening of the 26th headquarters was actually
in a position to believe that the government was going to capitulate
without a struggle. But that does not mean that there was no conspiracy;
it merely means that the conspiracy seemed about to succeed. A
victorious conspiracy always finds ways of legalizing itself “I saw
General Kornilov after this conversation,” says Troubetskoy, a diplomat
who represented the Ministry of Foreign Affairs at headquarters. “A sigh
of relief lifted his breast, and to my question, ‘This means that the
government is coming to meet you all along the line?’ he answered:
‘Yes.’” Kornilov was mistaken. It was at that very moment that the
government, in the person of Kerensky, had stopped coming to meet him.

Then headquarters has its own plans? Then it is not a question of
dictatorship in general, but of a Kornilov dictatorship? To him, to
Kerensky, they are offering as if in mockery the post of Minister of
Justice? Kornilov had actually been so imprudent as to make this
suggestion through Lvov. Confusing himself with the revolution, Kerensky
shouted out to the Minister of Finance, Nekrasov: “I won’t hand over the
revolution to them!” And the disinterested friend, Lvov, was immediately
arrested and spent a sleepless night in the Winter Palace with two
sentries at his feet, listening through the wall with a grinding of his
teeth to “the triumphant Kerensky in the next room, the room of
Alexander III, happy at the successful progress of his affairs and
endlessly singing a _roulade_ from an opera.” During those hours
Kerensky experienced an extraordinary afflux of energy.

Petrograd in those days was living in a two-fold state of alarm. The
political tension, purposely exaggerated by the press, contained the
material of an explosion. The fall of Riga had brought the front nearer.
The question of evacuating the capital, raised by the events of the war
long before the fall of the monarchy, now came up with new force.
Well-to-do people were leaving town. The flight of the bourgeoisie was
caused far more by fear of a new insurrection than by the advance of the
enemy. On August 26th the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks repeated
its warning: “A provocational agitation is being carried on by unknown
persons supposedly in the name of our party.” The leading organs of the
Petrograd soviet, the trade unions, and the shop and factory committees,
announced on the same day that not one workers’ organization, and not
one political party, was calling for any kind of demonstration.
Nevertheless rumors of an overthrow of the government to occur on the
following day did not cease for one minute. “In government circles,”
stated the press, “they are talking of a unanimously adopted decision
that all attempted manifestations shall be put down.” And measures had
been taken to call out the manifestation before putting it down.

In the morning papers of the 27th there was not only no news of the
insurrectionary intentions of headquarters, but, on the contrary, an
interview with Savinkov declared that “General Kornilov enjoys the
absolute confidence of the Provisional Government.” On the whole the
semi-anniversary began in unusual tranquillity. The workers and soldiers
avoided anything which might look like a demonstration; the bourgeoisie,
fearing disorders, stayed at home; the streets stood empty; the tomb of
the February martyrs on Mars Field seemed abandoned.

On the morning of that long-expected day which was to bring the
salvation of the country, the supreme commander-in-chief received a
telegraphic command from the Minister-President: to turn over his duties
to the chief-of-staff, and come immediately to Petrograd. This was a
totally unexpected turn of affairs. The general understood – to quote
his own words – that “here a double game was being played.” He might
have said with more truth that his own double game had been discovered.
Kornilov decided not to surrender. Savinkov’s urgings over the direct
wire made no difference. “Finding myself compelled to act openly” – with
this manifesto the commander-in-chief appealed to the people – “I,
General Kornilov, declare that the Provisional Government, under
pressure from the Bolshevik majority of the soviets, is acting in full
accord with the plans of the German general staff, and simultaneously
with the impending descent of hostile forces upon the Riga coastline is
murdering the army and unsettling the country from within.” Not wishing
to surrender the power to the enemy, he, Kornilov “prefers to die upon
the field of honor and battle.” Of the author of this manifesto Miliukov
subsequently wrote, with a tinge of admiration: “resolute, scornful of
juridical refinements, and accustomed to go directly toward the goal
which he has once decided is right.” A commander-in-chief who withdraws
troops from the enemy front in order to overthrow his own government
certainly cannot be accused of a partiality for “juridical refinements.”

Kerensky removed Kornilov upon his sole personal authority. The
Provisional Government had by that time ceased to exist. On the evening
of the 26th the ministers had resigned – an act which, by a happy
conjuncture of events, corresponded to the desires of all sides. Several
days before the break between headquarters and the government, General
Lukomsky had already suggested to Lvov through Alladin, that “it would
not be a bad idea to warn the Kadets that they should withdraw from the
government before the 27th of August, so as to place the government in a
difficult situation and themselves avoid any unpleasantness.” The Kadets
did not fail to take cognizance of this suggestion. On the other side,
Kerensky himself announced to the government that he considered it
possible to struggle with the revolt of Kornilov “only on condition that
the whole power be conferred upon him personally.” The rest of the
ministers, it seemed, were only waiting for some such happy occasion to
take their turn at resigning. Thus the Coalition received one more test.
“The ministers from the Kadet Party,” writes Miliukov, “announced that
they would resign for the given moment, without prejudicing the question
of their future participation in the Provisional Government.” True to
their traditions, the Kadets wanted to stay on the sidelines until the
struggle was over, so that their decision might be guided by its
outcome. They had no doubt that the Compromisers would keep their seats
inviolable for them. Having thus relieved themselves of responsibility,
the Kadets, along with all the other retired ministers, took part
thereafter in a series of conferences of the government, conferences of
a “private character.” The two camps who were preparing for a civil war
grouped themselves, in a “private” manner, around the head of the
government, who was endowed with all possible authorizations but no real
power.

Upon a telegram from Kerensky received at headquarters reading, “Hold up
all echelons moving towards Petrograd and its districts, and return them
to their last stopping-point,” Kornilov wrote: “Do not carry out this
order. Move the troops towards Petrograd.” The military insurrection was
thus firmly set in motion. This must be understood literally: three
cavalry divisions, in railroad echelons, were advancing on the capital.

Kerensky’s order to the soldiers of Petrograd read: “General Kornilov,
having announced his patriotism and loyalty to the people ... has
withdrawn regiments from the front ... and sent them against Petrograd.”
Kerensky wisely omitted to remark that the regiments were withdrawn from
the front, not only with his knowledge, but at his direct command, in
order to clean up that same garrison before whom he was now disclosing
the treachery of Kornilov. The rebellious commander of course was not
slow with his answer. “The traitors are not among us,” his telegram
reads, “but there in Petrograd, where for German money, with the
criminal connivance of the government, they have been selling Russia.”
Thus the slander set in motion against the Bolsheviks found ever new
roads.

That exalted nocturnal mood in which the President of the Council of
Retired Ministers was singing arias from the opera, very quickly passed.
The struggle with Kornilov, whatever turn it took, threatened dire
consequences. “On the first night of the revolt of headquarters,” writes
Kerensky, “in the soldier and worker circles of Petrograd a persistent
rumor went round associating Savinkov with the movement of General
Kornilov.” The rumor named Kerensky in the next breath after Savinkov,
and the rumor was not wrong. Extremely dangerous revelations were to be
feared in the future.

“Late at night on the 26th of August,” relates Kerensky, “the general
administrator of the War Ministry entered my office in a great state of
excitement. ‘Mr. Minister,’ Savinkov addressed me, standing at
attention, ‘I ask you to arrest me immediately as an accomplice of
General Kornilov. If, however, you trust me, I ask you to give me the
opportunity to demonstrate to the people in action that I have nothing
in common with the revoltees ...’ In answer to this announcement,”
continued Kerensky, “I immediately appointed Savinkov temporary
governor-general of Petersburg, endowing him with ample authority for
the defense of Petersburg from the troops of General Kornilov.” Not
content with that, at the request of Savinkov, Kerensky appointed
Filonenko his assistant. The business of revolting and the business of
putting down the revolt were thus concentrated within the narrow circle
of the “directory.”

This so hasty naming of Savinkov governor-general was dictated to
Kerensky by his struggle for political self-preservation. If Kerensky
had betrayed Savinkov to the soviets, Savinkov would have immediately
betrayed Kerensky. On the other hand, having received from Kerensky –
not without blackmail – the possibility of legalizing himself by an
overt participation in the actions against Kornilov, Savinkov was bound
to do his best to exonerate Kerensky. The “governor-general” was needed
not so much for the struggle against counter-revolution, as for covering
up the tracks of the conspiracy. The friendly labors of the accomplices
in this direction began immediately.

“At four o’clock on the morning of August 28th,” testifies Savinkov, “I
returned to the Winter Palace, summoned by Kerensky, and there found
General Alexeiev and Tereshchenko. We all four agreed that the ultimatum
of Lvov had been nothing more than a misunderstanding.” The rôle of
mediator in this early-morning conference belonged to the new
governor-general. Miliukov was directing it all from behind the scenes.
During the course of the day he will come out openly upon the stage.
Alexeiev, although he had called Kornilov a sheep’s brain, belonged to
the same camp with him. The conspirators and their seconds made a last
attempt to declare the whole business a “misunderstanding” – that is, to
join hands in deceiving public opinion, in order to save what they could
of the common plan. The Savage Division, General Krymov, the Cossack
echelons, the refusal of Kornilov to retire, the march on the capital –
all these things were the mere details of a “misunderstanding”!
Frightened by the ominous tangle of circumstances, Kerensky was no
longer shouting: “I will not hand over the revolution to them!”
Immediately after the conference with Alexeiev he went to the
journalists’ room in the Winter Palace and demanded that they withdraw
from the papers his manifesto declaring Kornilov a traitor. When in
answer the journalists had made it clear that this was a physical
impossibility, Kerensky exclaimed: “That’s too bad.” This miserable
episode, described in the newspapers of the following day, illumines
with marvelous clarity the figure of the now hopelessly entangled
super-arbiter of the nation. Kerensky had so perfectly embodied in
himself both the democracy and the bourgeoisie, that he had now turned
out to be at the same time the supreme incarnation of governmental power
and a criminal conspirator against it.

By the morning of the 28th, the split between the government and the
commander-in-chief had become an accomplished fact before the eyes of
the whole country. The stock exchange immediately took a hand in the
matter. Whereas it had reacted to the Moscow speech of Kornilov
threatening the surrender of Riga with a fall in the value of Russian
stocks, it reacted to the news of an open insurrection of the general
with a rise of all values. With this annihilating appraisal of the
February régime, the stock exchange gave unerring expression to the
moods and hopes of the possessing classes who had no doubt of Kornilov’s
victory.

The chief-of-staff, Lukomsky, whom Kerensky the day before had ordered
to take upon himself the temporary command, answered: “I do not consider
it possible to take the command from General Kornilov, for that will be
followed by an explosion in the army which will ruin Russia.” With the
exception of the commander-in-chief in the Caucasus, who after some
delay declared his loyalty to the Provisional Government, the rest of
the commanders in various tones of voice supported the demands of
Kornilov. Inspired by the Kadets, the head committee of the League of
Officers sent out a telegram to all the staffs of the army and fleet:
“The Provisional Government, which has already more than once
demonstrated to us its political incapacity, has now dishonored its name
with acts of provocation and can no longer remain at the head of Russia
...” That same Lukomsky was the respected president of the League of
Officers. At headquarters they said to General Krasnov, appointed to
command the Third Cavalry Corps: “Nobody will defend Kerensky. This is
only a promenade. Everything is ready.”

A fair idea of the optimistic calculations of the leaders and backers of
the plot is conveyed by the code telegram of the aforementioned Prince
Troubetskoy to the Ministry of Foreign Affairs: “Soberly estimating the
situation,” he writes, “it must be acknowledged that the whole
commanding staff, an overwhelming majority of the officers, and the best
of the rank-and-file elements of the army, are for Kornilov. On his side
at the rear stand all the Cossacks, a majority of the military schools,
and also the best fighting units. To these physical forces it is
necessary to add the moral sympathy of all the non-socialist layers of
the population, and in the lower orders ... an indifference which will
submit to the least blow of the whip. There is no doubt that an enormous
number of the March socialists will come quickly over to the side of
Kornilov in case of his victory. Troubetskoy here expressed not only the
hopes of headquarters, but also the attitude of the Allied missions. In
the Kornilov detachments advancing to the conquest of Petrograd, there
were English armored cars with English operatives – and these we may
assume constituted the most reliable units. The head of the English
military mission in Russia, General Knox, reproached the American
Colonel Robbins, for not supporting Kornilov: “I am not interested in
the government of Kerensky,” said the British General, “it is too weak.
What is wanted is a strong dictatorship. What is wanted is the Cossacks.
This people needs the whip! A dictatorship – that is just what it
needs.” All these voices from different quarters arrived at the Winter
Palace, and had an alarming effect upon its inhabitants. The success of
Kornilov seemed inevitable. Minister Nekrassov informed his friends that
the game was completely up, and it remained only to die an honorable
death. “Several eminent members of the Soviet,” affirms Miliukov,
“foreseeing their fate in case of Kornilov’s victory, had already made
haste to supply themselves with foreign passports.”

From hour to hour came the messages, one more threatening than the
other, of the approach of Kornilov’s troops. The bourgeois press seized
them hungrily, expanded them, piled them up, creating an atmosphere of
panic. At 12:30 noon on August 28th: “The troops sent by General
Kornilov have concentrated themselves in the vicinity of Luga.” At 2:30
in the afternoon; “Nine new trains containing the troops of Kornilov
have passed through the station Oredezh. In the forward train is a
railroad engineering battalion.” At 3:00 p.m.: “The Luga garrison has
surrendered to the troops of General Kornilov and turned over all its
weapons. The station and all the government buildings of Luga are
occupied by the troops of Kornilov.” At 6:00 in the evening: “Two
echelons of Kornilov’s army have broken through from Narva and are
within half a verst of Gatchina. Two more echelons are on the road to
Gatchina.” At two o’clock in the morning of the 29th: “A battle has
begun at the Antropshino Station (33 kilometers from Petrograd) between
government troops and the troops of Kornilov. Killed and wounded on both
sides.” By nightfall comes the news that Kaledin has threatened to cut
off Petrograd and Moscow from the grain-growing south of Russia.
“Headquarters,” “commanders-in-chief at the front,” “British mission,”
“officers,” “echelons,” “railroad battalions,” “cossacks,” “Kaledin” –
all these words sounded in the Malachite Hall of the Winter Palace like
the trumpets of the Last Judgement.

Kerensky himself acknowledges this in a somewhat softened form: “August
28th was the day of the greatest wavering,” he writes, “the greatest
doubt as to the strength of the enemy, Kornilov, the greatest
nervousness among the democracy.” It is not difficult to imagine what
lies behind those words. The head of the government was torn by
speculations, not only as to which of the two camps was stronger, but as
to which was personally the less dangerous to him. “We are neither with
you on the right, nor with you on the left” – those words had seemed
effective on the stage of the Moscow theater. Translated into the
language of a civil war on the point of explosion, they meant that the
Kerensky group might appear superfluous both to right and left. “We were
all as though numb with despair,” writes Stankevich, “seeing this drama
unfold to the destruction of everything. The degree of our numbness may
be judged by the fact that even after the split between headquarters and
the government was before the eyes of the whole people, attempts were
made to find some sort of reconciliation ...”

“A thought of mediation ... was in these circumstances spontaneously
born,” says Miliukov, who himself preferred to function in the capacity
of mediator. On the evening of the 28th he appeared at the Winter Palace
“to advise Kerensky to renounce the strictly formal viewpoint of the
violation of law.” The liberal leader, who understood that it is
necessary to distinguish the kernel of a nut from the shell, was at that
moment a most suitable person for the task of loyal intermediary. On the
13th of August, Miliukov had learned directly from Kornilov that he had
set the 27th as the date for the revolt. On the following day, the 14th,
Miliukov had demanded in his speech at the Conference that “the
immediate adoption of the measures designated by the supreme
commander-in-chief should not serve as a pretext for suspicions, verbal
threats, or even removals from office.” Up to the 27th Kornilov was to
remain above suspicion! At the same time Miliukov promised Kerensky his
support – “voluntarily and without any argument.” That would have been a
good time to remember the hangman’s noose which also, as they say,
“supports without argument.” Kerensky upon his side acknowledges that
Miliukov, appearing with his proposal of mediation, “chose a very
comfortable moment to demonstrate to me that the real power was on the
side of Kornilov.” The conversation ended so successfully that in
conclusion Miliukov called the attention of his political friends to
General Alexeiev as a successor to Kerensky against whom Kornilov would
offer no objection. Alexeiev magnanimously gave his consent.

And after Miliukov came a greater than he. Late in the evening the
British Ambassador Buchanan handed to the Minister of Foreign Affairs a
declaration in which the representatives of the Allied Powers
unanimously offered their good services “in the interests of humanity
and the desire to avoid irrevocable misfortune.” This official mediation
between the government and the general in revolt was nothing less than
support and insurance to the revolt. In reply, Tereshchenko expressed,
in the name of the Provisional Government, “extreme astonishment” at the
revolt of Kornilov, a greater part of whose program had been adopted by
the government. In a state of loneliness and prostration, Kerensky could
think of nothing better to do than to call one more of those everlasting
conferences with his retired ministers. In the midst of this wholly
disinterested business of killing time, some especially alarming news
arrived as to the approach of the enemy’s echelons. Nekrasov voiced an
apprehension that “in a few hours Kornilov’s troops will probably be in
Petrograd.” The former ministers began to guess “how in those
circumstances the governmental power would have to be formed.” The
thought of a directory again swam to the surface. The idea of including
General Alexeiev in the staff of the “directory” found sympathy both
right and left. The Kadet Kokoshkin thought that Alexeiev ought to be
placed at the head of the government. According to some accounts, the
proposal to tender the power to some other was made by Kerensky himself,
with a direct reference to his conversation with Miliukov. Nobody
objected. The candidacy of Alexeiev reconciled them all. Miliukov’s plan
seemed very, very near to realization. But just here – as is proper at
the moment of highest tension – resounds a dramatic knock on the door.
In the next room a deputation is waiting from the “Committee of Struggle
against the Counter-Revolution.” It was a most timely arrival. One of
the most dangerous nests of counter-revolution was this pitiful,
cowardly and treacherous conference of Kornilovists, intermediaries, and
capitulators in the hall of the Winter Palace.

This new soviet body – The Committee of Struggle against
Counter-Revolution – had been created at a joint session of both
Executive Committees, the worker-soldiers’ and the peasants’. It was
created on the evening of the 27th, and consisted of specially delegated
representatives of the three soviet parties from both executive
committees, from the trade union center, and from the Petrograd soviet.
This creation _ad hoc_ of a fighting committee was in essence a
recognition of the fact that the governing soviet bodies were themselves
conscious of their decrepit condition, and their need of a transfusion
of fresh blood for the purposes of revolutionary action.

Finding themselves compelled to seek the support of the masses against
the rebellious general, the Compromisers hastened to push their left
shoulder forward. They immediately forgot all their speeches about how
all questions of principle should be postponed to the Constituent
Assembly. The Mensheviks announced that they would press the government
for an immediate declaration of a democratic republic, a dissolution of
the State Duma, and the introduction of agrarian reform. It was for this
reason that the word “republic” first appeared in the announcement of
the government about the treason of the commander-in-chief.

On the question of power, the Executive Committees considered it
necessary for the time being to leave the government in its former shape
– replacing the retired Kadets with democratic elements – and for a
final solution of the problem to summon in the near future a congress of
all those organizations which had united in Moscow on the platform of
Cheidze. After midnight negotiations it became known, however, that
Kerensky resolutely rejected the idea of a democratic control of the
government. Feeling that the ground was slipping under him both to left
and right, he was holding out with all his might for the idea of a
“directory,” in which there was still room for his not yet dead dreams
of a strong power. After renewed fruitless and wearisome debates in
Smolny, it was decided to appeal again to the irreplaceable and one and
only Kerensky, with the request that he agree to the preliminary project
of the Executive Committees. At seven-thirty in the morning Tseretelli
returned with the information that Kerensky would make no concession,
that he demanded “unconditional” support, but that he agreed to employ
“all the powers of the state” in the struggle against the
counter-revolution. Wearied out with their night’s vigil, the Executive
Committees surrendered at last to that idea of a “directory” which was
as empty as a knot-hole.

Kerensky’s solemn promise to throw “all the powers of the state” into
the struggle with Kornilov did not, as we already know, prevent him from
carrying on those negotiations with Miliukov, Alexeiev, and the retired
ministers, about a peaceful surrender to headquarters – negotiations
which were interrupted by a midnight knock on the door. Several days
later the Menshevik, Bogdanov, one of the members of the Committee of
Defense, made a report to the Petrograd soviet in cautious but
unequivocal words about the treachery of Kerensky. “When the Provisional
Government was wavering, and it was not clear how the Kornilov adventure
would end, intermediaries appeared, such as Miliukov and General
Alexeiev ...” But the committee of defense interfered and “with all
energy” demanded an open struggle. “Under our influence,” continued
Bogdanov, “the government stopped all negotiations and refused to
entertain any proposition from Kornilov ...”

After the head of the government, yesterday’s conspirator against the
left camp, had become today its political captive, the Kadet ministers
who had resigned on the 26th only in a preliminary and hesitating
fashion, announced that they would conclusively withdraw from the
government, since they did not wish to share the responsibility for
Kerensky’s action in putting down so patriotic, so loyal, and so
nation-saving a rebellion. The retired ministers, the counsellors, the
friends – one after another they all left the Winter Palace. It was,
according to Kerensky himself, “a mass abandonment of a place known to
be condemned to destruction.” There was one night, August 28-9, when
Kerensky was actually walking about almost in “complete solitude” in the
Winter Palace. The opera _bravuras_ were no longer running in his head.
“A responsibility lay upon me in those anguishingly long days and nights
that was really super-human.” This was in the main a responsibility for
the fate of Kerensky himself: everything else had already been
accomplished over his head and without any attention being paid to him.



CHAPTER 33 THE BOURGEOISIE MEASURES STRENGTH WITH THE DEMOCRACY


 

On the 28th of August, while fright was shaking the Winter Palace like a
fever, the commander of the Savage Division, Prince Bagration, informed
Kornilov by telegraph that “the natives would fulfil their duty to the
fatherland and at the command of their supreme hero ... would shed the
last drop of their blood.” Only a few hours later the division came to a
halt; and on the 31st of August a special deputation, with the same
Bagration at the head, assured Kerensky that the division would submit
absolutely to the Provisional Government. All this happened not only
without a battle, but without the firing of a single shot. To say
nothing of its last, the division did not shed even its first drop of
blood. The soldiers of Kornilov never even made the attempt to employ
weapons to force their way to Petrograd. The officers did not dare give
them the command. The government troops were nowhere obliged to resort
to force in stopping the onslaught of the Kornilov army. The conspiracy
disintegrated, crumbled, evaporated in the air.

In order to understand this, it is only necessary to look closely at the
powers which had come in conflict. First of all we must notice – and
this will not be an unexpected discovery – that the staff of the
conspiracy was the same old tzarist staff, composed of clerical people
without brains, incapable of thinking out in advance two or three moves
in the vast game they had undertaken. Notwithstanding the fact that
Kornilov had set the day of the insurrection several weeks in advance,
nothing whatever had been foreseen or properly reckoned upon. The purely
military preparation of the uprising was carried out in an inept,
slovenly and light-headed manner. Complicated changes in the
organization and commanding staff were undertaken on the eve of the
action – just on the run. The Savage Division, which was to deal the
first blow at the revolution, consisted all told of 1,350 fighters, and
they were short 600 rifles, 1,000 lances and 500 sabers. Five days
before the beginning of active fighting, Kornilov gave an order for the
transformation of the division into a corps. This measure, which any
schoolbook would condemn, was obviously considered necessary in order to
attract the officers with higher pay. “A telegram stating that the
lacking weapons would be supplied at Pskov,” writes Martynov, “was
received by Bagration only on August 31st after the complete collapse of
the whole enterprise.” The sending of instructors from the front to
Petrograd was also taken up at headquarters only at the very last
moment. The officers accepting the commission were liberally supplied
with money and private cars, but the patriotic heroes were in no great
hurry, it seems, to save the fatherland. Two days later railroad
communications between headquarters and the capital were cut off, and
the majority of the heroes had not yet arrived at the place of their
proposed deeds.

The capital, however, had its own organization of Kornilovists numbering
about 2,000. The conspirators here were divided into groups according to
the special tasks allotted to them; seizure of armored automobiles;
arrest and murder of the more eminent members of the Soviet; arrest of
the Provisional Government; capture of the more important public
institutions. Vinberg, the president of the League of Military Duty,
known to us above, says: “By the time Krymov’s troops arrived, the
principal forces of the revolution were supposed to have already been
broken, annihilated, or rendered harmless, so that Krymov’s task would
be merely to restore order in the town.” At Moghiliev, to be sure, they
considered this program exaggerated, and relied upon Krymov for most of
the work, but headquarters did also expect very serious help from the
detachments of the Republican Center. As it turned out, however, the
Petrograd conspirators never showed themselves for an instant, never
lifted a voice, never moved a finger; it was quite as though they did
not exist in the world. Vinberg explains this mystery rather simply. It
seems that the superintendent of the Intelligence Service, Colonel
Heiman, spent the decisive hours in a roadhouse somewhere outside of
town, while Colonel Sidorin, whose duty it was, under the immediate
command of Kornilov, to co-ordinate the activities of all the patriotic
societies of the capital, and Colonel Ducemetiere, the head of the
military department, “had disappeared without a trace and could not be
found anywhere.” The Cossack colonel Dutov, who was supposed to take
action “in the guise of” Bolsheviks, subsequently complained: “I ran ...
and called people to come into the streets, but nobody followed me.” The
sums of money set aside for organization were, according to Vinberg,
appropriated by the principal participants and squandered on dinner
parties. Colonel Sidorin, according to Denikin’s assertion, “fled to
Finland, taking with him the last remnants of the treasury of the
organization, something around a hundred or a hundred and fifty thousand
roubles.” Lvov, whom we last saw under arrest in the Winter Palace,
subsequently told about one of the secret contributors who was to
deliver to some officers a considerable sum of money, but upon arriving
at the designated place found the conspirators in such a state of
inebriation that he could not deliver the goods. Vinberg himself thinks
that if it had not been for these truly vexatious “accidents,” the plan
might have been crowned with complete success. But the question remains:
Why was a patriotic enterprise entered into and surrounded, for the most
part, by drunkards, spendthrifts and traitors? Is it not because every
historic task mobilizes the cadres that are adequate to it?

As regards personnel the conspiracy was in a bad case, beginning from
the very top. “General Kornilov,” according to the right Kadet, Izgoyev,
“was the most popular general ... among the peaceful population, but not
among the soldiers, at least not among those in the rear whom I had an
opportunity to observe.” By peaceful population, Izgoyev means the
people of the Nevsky Prospect. To the popular masses, both front and
rear, Kornilov was alien, hostile, hateful.

The general appointed to command the Third Cavalry Corps, Krasnov, a
monarchist who soon after tried to become a vassal of Wilhelm II,
expressed his surprise that “Kornilov conceived such a great
undertaking, but himself remained at Moghiliev in a palace surrounded by
Turkomen and shock troops, as though he did not believe in his own
success.” To a question from the French journalist, Claude Anet, why
Kornilov himself did not go to Petrograd at the decisive moment, the
chief of the conspiracy answered: “I was sick. I had a serious attack of
malaria, and was not in possession of my usual energy.”

There were too many of these unfortunate accidents: it is always so when
a thing is condemned to failure in advance. The moods of the
conspirators oscillated between drunken toploftiness, when the ocean
only came up to their knees, and complete prostration before the first
real obstacle. The difficulty was not Kornilov’s malaria, but a far
deeper, more fatal, and incurable disease paralyzing the will of the
possessing classes.

The Kadets have seriously denied any counter-revolutionary intentions
upon the part of Kornilov, understanding by that the restoration of the
Romanov monarchy. As though that were the matter in question! The
“republicanism” of Kornilov did not in the least prevent the monarchist
Lukomsky from going hand in hand with him, nor did it prevent the
president of the Union of Russian People, the Black Hundreds,
Rimsky-Korsakov, from telegraphing Kornilov on the day of the uprising:
“I heartily pray God to help you save Russia. I put myself absolutely at
your disposal.” The Black Hundred partisans of tzarism would not stop
for a cheap little thing like a republican flag. They understood that
Kornilov’s program was to be found in himself, in his past, in the
Cossack stripes on his trousers, in his connections and sources of
financial support, and above all in his unlimited readiness to cut the
throat of the revolution.

Designating himself in his manifestos as “the son of a peasant” Kornilov
based the plan of his uprising wholly upon the Cossacks and the
mountaineers. There was not a single infantry detachment among the
troops deployed against Petrograd. The general had no access to the
muzhik and did not even try to discover any. There was at headquarters,
to be sure, an agrarian reformer, some sort of “professor,” who was
ready to promise every soldier a fantastic number of dessiatins of land,
but the manifesto prepared upon this theme was not even issued. The
generals were restrained from agrarian demagoguism by a well-justified
dread of frightening and repelling the landlords.

A Moghiliev peasant, Tadeush, who closely observed the environs of the
staff in those days, testifies that among the soldiers and in the
villages nobody believed in the manifestos of the general. “He wants the
power,” they said, “and not a word about the land and not a word about
ending the war.” Upon life-and-death questions, the masses had somehow
or other learned to find their way during the six months of revolution.
Kornilov was offering the people war and a defense of the privileges of
generals and the property of landlords. He could give them nothing more,
and they expected nothing else from him. In his inability to rely upon
the peasant infantry – evident in advance to the conspirators themselves
– to say nothing of relying upon the workers, is expressed the socially
outcast position of Kornilov’s clique.

The picture of political forces traced by the headquarters’ diplomat,
Prince Trubetskoy, was correct in many things, but mistaken in one. Of
that indifference of the people which made them ready “to submit to the
least blow of the whip,” there was not a trace. On the contrary, the
masses were as if only awaiting a blow of the whip in order to show what
sources of energy and self-sacrifice were to be found in their depths.
This mistake in estimating the mood of the masses brought all their
other calculations to the dust.

The conspiracy was conducted by those circles who were not accustomed to
know how to do anything without the lower ranks, without labor forces,
without cannon-fodder, without orderlies, servants, clerks, chauffeurs,
messengers, cooks, laundresses, switchmen, telegraphers, stablemen, cab
drivers. But all these little human bolts and links, unnoticeable,
innumerable, necessary, were for the Soviet and against Kornilov. The
revolution was omnipresent. It penetrated everywhere, coiling itself
around the conspiracy. It had everywhere its eye, its ear, its hand.

The ideal of military education is that the soldier should act when
unseen by the officer exactly as before his eyes. But the Russian
soldiers and sailors of 1917, without carrying out official orders even
before the eyes of the commanders, would eagerly catch on the fly the
commands of the revolution, or still oftener fulfil them on their own
initiative before they arrived. The innumerable servants of the
revolution, its agents, its intelligence men, its fighters, had no need
either of spurs or of supervision.

Formally the liquidation of the conspiracy was in the hands of the
government, and the Executive Committee co-operated. In reality the
struggle was carried on within totally different channels. While
Kerensky, bending under the weight of a “more than human
responsibility,” was measuring the floors of the Winter Palace in
solitude, the Committee of Defense, also called the Military
Revolutionary Committee, was taking action on a vast scale. Early in the
morning instructions were sent by telegram to the railroad workers, and
postal and telegraph clerks, and soldiers. “All movements of troops” –
so Dan reported on the same day – “are to be carried out at the
direction of the Provisional Government when countersigned by the
committee of People’s Defense.” Qualifications aside, this meant: The
Committee of Defense deploys the troops under the firm name of
Provisional Government. At the same time steps were taken for the
destruction of Kornilovist nests in Petrograd itself. Searches and
arrests were carried out in the military schools and officers’
organizations. The hand of the Committee was felt everywhere. There was
little or no interest in the governor-general.

The lower soviet organizations in their turn did not await any summons
from above. The principal effort was concentrated in the workers’
districts. During the hours of greatest vacillation in the government,
and of wearisome negotiations between the Executive Committee and
Kerensky, the district soviets were drawing more closely together and
passing resolutions: to declare the inter-district conferences
continuous; to place their representatives in the staff organized by the
Executive Committee; to form a workers’ militia; to establish the
control of the district soviets over the government commissars; to
organize flying brigades for the detention of counter-revolutionary
agitators. In the total, these resolutions meant an appropriation not
only of very considerable governmental functions, but also of the
functions of the Petrograd Soviet. The logic of the situation compelled
the soviet institutions to draw in their skirts and make room for the
lower ranks. The entrance of the Petrograd districts into the arena of
the struggle instantly changed both its scope and its direction. Again
the inexhaustible vitality of the soviet form of organization was
revealed. Although paralyzed above by the leadership of the
Compromisers, the soviets were reborn again from below at the critical
moment under pressure from the masses.

To the Bolshevik leaders of the districts, Kornilov’s uprising had not
been in the least unexpected. They had foreseen and forewarned, and they
were the first to appear at their posts. At the joint session of the
Executive Committees, on August 27, Sokolnikov announced that the
Bolshevik party had taken all measures available to it in order to
inform the people of the danger and prepare for defense; the Bolsheviks
announced their readiness to co-ordinate their military work with the
organs of the Executive Committee. At a night session of the Military
Organization of the Bolsheviks, participated in by delegates of numerous
military detachments, it was decided to demand the arrest of all
conspirators, to arm the workers, to supply them with soldier
instructors, to guarantee the defense of the capital from below, and at
the same time to prepare for the creation of a revolutionary government
of workers and soldiers. The Military Organization held meetings
throughout the garrison; the soldiers were urged to remain under arms in
order to come out at the first alarm.

“Notwithstanding the fact that they were in a minority,” writes
Sukhanov, “it was quite clear that in the Military Revolutionary
Committee the leadership belonged to the Bolsheviks.” He explains this
as follows: “If the committee wanted to act seriously, it was compelled
to act in a revolutionary manner,” and for revolutionary action “only
the Bolsheviks had genuine resources,” for the masses were with them.
Intensity in the struggle has everywhere and always brought forth the
more active and bolder elements. This automatic selection inevitably
elevated the Bolsheviks, strengthened their influence, concentrated the
initiative in their hands, giving them de facto leadership even in those
organizations where they were in a minority. The nearer you came to the
district, to the factory, to the barrack, the more complete and
indubitable was the leadership of the Bolsheviks. All the nuclei of the
party were on their toes. The big factories organized a system of guard
duty by Bolsheviks. In the district committees of the party
representatives of small plants were put on duty. A tie was formed from
below, from the shop, leading through the districts, to the Central
Committee of the party.

Under direct pressure from the Bolsheviks and the organizations led by
them, the Committee of Defense recognized the desirability of arming
individual groups of workers for the defense of the workers’ quarters,
the shops and factories. It was only this sanction that the masses
lacked. In the districts, according to the workers’ press, there
immediately appeared “whole queues of people eager to join the ranks of
the Red Guard.” Drilling began in marksmanship and the handling of
weapons. Experienced soldiers were brought in as teachers. By the 29th,
Guards had been formed in almost all the districts. The Red Guard
announced its readiness to put in the field a force of 40,000 rifles.
The unarmed workers formed companies for trench-digging, sheet-metal
fortification, barbed-wire fencing. The new governor-general Palchinsky
who replaced Savinkov – Kerensky could not keep his accomplice longer
than three days – was compelled to recognize in a special announcement
that when the need arose for the work of sappers in the defense of the
capital “thousands of workers ... by their irreplaceable, personal labor
achieved in the course of a few hours a colossal task which without
their help would have required several days.” This did not prevent
Palchinsky, following the example of Savinkov, from suppressing the
Bolshevik paper, the sole paper which the workers considered their own.

The giant Putilov factory became the center of resistance in the
Peterhoff district. Here fighting companies were hastily formed; the
work of the factory continued day and night; there was a sorting out of
new cannon for the formation of proletarian artillery divisions. The
worker, Minichev, says: “In those days we worked sixteen hours a day ...
We got together about 100 canon.

The newly formed Vikzhel received a prompt baptism of war. The railroad
workers had a special reason to dread the victory of Kornilov, who had
incorporated in his program the inauguration of martial law on the
railroads. And here, too, the lower ranks far outdistanced their
leaders. The railroad workers tore up and barricaded the tracks in order
to hold back Kornilov’s army. War experiences came in handy. Measures
were also taken to isolate the center of the conspiracy, Moghiliev,
preventing movements both towards and away from headquarters. The postal
and telegraph clerks began to hold up and send to the Committee
telegrams and orders from headquarters, or copies of them. The generals
had been accustomed during the years of war to think of transport and
communications as technical questions. They found out now that these
were political questions.

The trade unions, least of all inclined toward political neutrality, did
not await any special invitation before occupying military positions.
The railroad workers’ union armed its members, and sent them along the
lines for inspection, and for tearing up railroads, guarding bridges,
etc. The workers in their enthusiasm and resolution pushed ahead of the
more bureaucratic and moderate Vikzhel. The metal workers’ union put its
innumerable office workers at the disposal of the Committee of Defense,
and also a large sum of money for expenses. The chauffeurs’ union put in
charge of the committee its technical and transportation facilities. The
printers’ union arranged in a few hours for the issue of Monday’s
papers, so as to keep the population in touch with events, and at the
same time availed themselves of the most effective of all possible means
of controlling the press. The rebel general had stamped his foot, and
legions rose up from the ground – but they were the legions of the
enemy.

All around Petrograd, in the neighboring garrisons, in the great
railroad stations, in the fleet, work was going on night and day. They
were inspecting their own ranks, arming the workers, sending out
detachments as patrols along the tracks, establishing communications
with neighboring points, and with Smolny. The task of the Committee of
Defense was not so much to keep watch over and summon the workers, as
merely to register and direct them. Its plans were always anticipated.
The defense against the rebellion of the generals turned into a popular
round-up of the conspirators.

In Helsingfors a general congress of all the soviet organizations
created a revolutionary committee which sent its commissars to the
offices of the governor-general, the commandant, the Intelligence
Service, and other important institutions.

Thenceforth no order was valid without its signature. The telegraphs and
telephones were taken under control. The official representatives of a
Cossack regiment quartered in Helsingfors, chiefly officers, tried to
declare themselves neutral: they were secret Kornilovists. On the second
day, a rank-and-file cossack appeared before the Committee with the
announcement that the whole regiment was against Kornilov. Cossack
representatives were for the first time introduced into the soviet. In
this case as in others a sharp conflict of classes was pushing the
officers to the right and the rank-and-file to the left.

The Kronstadt soviet, which had completely recovered from the July
wounds, sent a telegraphic declaration: “The Kronstadt garrison is ready
as one man at the first word from the Executive Committee to come to the
defense of the revolution.” The Kronstadters did not know in those days
to what extent the defense of the revolution meant the defense of
themselves against annihilation: at that time they could still only
guess this.

Soon after the July Days it had been decided by the Provisional
Government to vacate the Kronstadt fortress as a nest of Bolshevism.
This measure, adopted in agreement with Kornilov, was officially
explained as due to “strategic motives.” Sensing some dirty work, the
sailors had resisted. “The legend of treachery at headquarters” – wrote
Kerensky after he himself had accused Kornilov of treachery – “was so
deeply rooted in Kronstadt that every attempt to remove the artillery
evoked actual ferocity from the crowd there.” The task of devising a way
to liquidate Kronstadt was laid by the government upon Kornilov.
Kornilov devised a way: immediately after the conquest of the city
Krymov was to despatch a brigade with artillery to Oranienbaum and,
under threat of bombardment from the shores, demand that the Kronstadt
garrison disarm the fortress and transfer themselves to the mainland,
where the sailors were to undergo mass executions. But while Krymov was
entering upon his task of saving the government, the government found
itself obliged to ask the Kronstadters to save it from Krymov.

The Executive Committee sent telephonegrams to Kronstadt and Vyborg
asking for the despatch of considerable detachments of troops to
Petrograd. On the morning of the 29th, the troops began to arrive. These
were chiefly Bolshevik units. In order that the summons of the Executive
Committee should become operative, it had to be confirmed by the central
committee of the Bolsheviks. A little earlier, at midday of the 28th,
upon an order from Kerensky which sounded very much like a humble
request, sailors from the cruiser _Aurora_ had undertaken the defense of
the Winter Palace. A part of the same crew were still imprisoned in
Kresty for participation in the July demonstration. During their hours
off duty the sailors came to the prison for a visit with the imprisoned
Kronstadters, and with Trotsky, Raskolnikov and others. “Isn’t it time
to arrest the government?” asked the visitors. “No, not yet,” was the
answer. “Use Kerensky as a gun-rest to shoot Kornilov. Afterward we will
settle with Kerensky.” In June and July these sailors had not been
inclined to pay much attention to revolutionary strategy, but they had
learned much in a short two months. They raised this question of the
arrest of the government rather to test themselves and clear their own
consciences. They themselves were beginning to grasp the inexorable
consecutiveness of events. In the first half of July, beaten, condemned,
slandered; at the end of August, the trusted defenders of the Winter
Palace against Kornilovists; at the end of October, they will be
shooting at the Winter Palace with the guns of the _Aurora_.

But although the sailors were willing to postpone for a certain time a
general settlement with the February régime, they did not want to endure
for one unnecessary day the Kornilovist officers hanging over their
heads. The commanding staff which had been imposed upon them by the
government since the July Days was almost solidly on the side of the
conspirators. The Kronstadt soviet immediately removed the government
commander of the fortress and installed their own. The Compromisers had
now ceased to shout about the secession of the Kronstadt republic.
However the thing did not everywhere stop at mere removals from office:
it came to bloody encounters in several places.

“It began in Vyborg,” says Sukhanov, “with the beating to death of
generals and officers by a sailor-soldier crowd infuriated and
panic-stricken.” No, these crowds were not infuriated, and it would not
be possible to speak in this instance of panic. On the morning of the
29th, Centroflot sent a telegram to the commandant at Vyborg, General
Oranovsky, for communication to the garrison, informing them of the
mutiny at headquarters. The commandant held up the telegram for a whole
day, and to questions about what was happening, answered that he had
received no information. In the course of a search instituted by the
sailors the telegram was found. Thus caught in the act, the general
declared himself a partisan of Kornilov. The sailors shot the commandant
and along with him two other officers who had declared themselves of the
same party. From the officers of the Baltic fleet the sailors required a
signed declaration of loyalty to the revolution, and when four officers
of the ship-of-the-line _Petropavlovsk_ refused to sign, declaring
themselves Kornilovists, they were by resolution of the crew immediately
shot.

A mortal danger was hanging over the soldiers and sailors; a bloody
purgation not only of Petrograd and Kronstadt, but of all the garrisons
of the country, was impending. From the conduct of their suddenly
emboldened officers – from their tones, their side glances – the
soldiers and sailors could plainly foresee their own fate in case of a
victory of headquarters. In those localities where the atmosphere was
especially hot, they hastened to cut off the road of the enemy,
forestalling the purgation intended by the officers with their own
sailors’ and soldiers’ purgation. Civil war, as is well known, has its
laws, and they have never been considered identical with the laws of
humane conduct.

Cheidze immediately sent a telegram to Vyborg and Helsingfors condemning
lynch law as “a mortal blow against the revolution.” Kerensky on his
part telegraphed to Helsingfors: “I demand an immediate end of
disgusting acts of violence.” If you seek the political responsibility
for these individual cases of lynch law – not forgetting that revolution
as a whole is a taking of the law into one’s own hands – in the given
case the responsibility rests wholly on the government and the
Compromisers, who at a moment of danger would run for help to the
revolutionary masses, in order afterward to turn them over again to the
counterrevolutionary officers.

As during the State Conference in Moscow, when he was expecting an
uprising from moment to moment, so now after the break with
headquarters, Kerensky turned to the Bolsheviks with a request “to
influence the soldiers to come to the defense of the revolution.” In
summoning the Bolshevik sailors to the defense of the Winter Palace,
however, Kerensky did not set free their comrades, the July prisoners.
Sukhanov writes on this theme: “The situation with Alexeiev whispering
to Kerensky and Trotsky in prison was absolutely intolerable.” It is not
hard to imagine the excitement which prevailed in the crowded prisons.
“We were boiling with indignation,” relates midshipman Raskolnikov,
“against the Provisional Government which in such days of alarm ...
continued to let revolutionists like Trotsky rot in Kresty ... ‘What
cowards, what cowards they are,’ said Trotsky as some of us were
circling around together on our walk. ‘They ought immediately to declare
Kornilov an outlaw, so that any soldier devoted to the revolution might
feel that he had a right to put an end to him.’”

The entrance of Kornilov’s troops into Petrograd would have meant first
of all the extermination of the arrested Bolsheviks. In his order to
General Bagration, who was to enter the capital with the vanguard,
Krymov did not forget this special command: “Place a guard in prisons
and houses of detention, in no case let out the people now under
restraint.” This was a concerted program, inspired by Miliukov ever
since the April days: “In no case let them out.” There was not a single
meeting in Petrograd in those days which did not pass resolutions
demanding the release of the July prisoners. Delegation after delegation
came to the Executive Committee, which in turn sent its leaders for
negotiations to the Winter Palace. In vain! The stubbornness of Kerensky
on this question is the more remarkable since during the first day and a
half or two days he considered the position of the government hopeless,
and was therefore condemning himself to the rôle of the old-time
jailkeeper – holding the Bolsheviks so that the generals could hang
them.

It is no wonder that the masses led by the Bolsheviks in fighting
against Kornilov did not place a moment of trust in Kerensky. For them
it was not a case of defending the government, but of defending the
revolution. So much the more resolute and devoted was their struggle.
The resistance to the rebels grew out of the very road beds, out of the
stones, out of the air. The railroad workers of the Luga station, where
Krymov arrived, stubbornly refused to move the troop trains, alluding to
a lack of locomotives. The Cossack echelons also found themselves
immediately surrounded by armed soldiers from the Luga garrison, 20,000
strong. There was no military encounter, but there was something far
more dangerous: contact, social exchange, inter-penetration. The Luga
soviet had had time to print the government announcement retiring
Kornilov, and this document was now widely distributed among the
echelons. The officers tried to persuade the Cossacks not to believe the
agitators, but this very necessity of persuasion was a bad sign.

On receiving Kornilov’s order to advance, Krymov demanded under threat
of bayonets that the locomotives be ready in half an hour. The threat
seemed effective: the locomotives, although with some delays, were
supplied; but even so, it was impossible to move, since the road out was
damaged and so crowded with cars that it would take a good twenty-four
hours to clear it. To get free of demoralizing propaganda, Krymov on the
evening of the 28th, removed his troops several _versts_ from Luga. But
the agitators immediately turned up in the villages. These were
soldiers, workers, railroad men – there was no refuge from them. They
went everywhere. The Cossacks began even to hold meetings. Thus stormed
with propaganda and cursing his impotence, Krymov waited in vain for
Bagration. The railroad workers were holding up the echelon of the
Savage Division, which also in the coming hours was to undergo a most
alarming moral attack.

No matter how spineless and even cowardly the compromisist democracy was
in itself, those mass forces upon which it again partly relied in its
struggle against Kornilov, opened before it inexhaustible resources for
action. The Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks did not see it as
their task to conquer the forces of Kornilov in open struggle, but to
bring the forces over to their own side. That was right. Against
“compromisism” along that line, it goes without saying, the Bolsheviks
had no objection. On the contrary that was their own fundamental method.
The Bolsheviks only demanded that behind the agitators and
parliamentarians armed workers and soldiers should stand ready. For this
moral mode of action upon the Kornilov regiments, an unlimited choice of
ways and means was suddenly discovered. Thus a Mussulman delegation was
sent to meet the Savage Division on the staff of which were included
native potentates who had immediately made themselves known, beginning
with the grandson of the famous Shamil who heroically defended the
Caucasus against tzarism. The mountaineers would not permit their
officers to arrest the delegation: that was a violation of the ancient
customs of hospitality. Negotiations were opened and soon became the
beginning of the end. The Kornilov commanders, in order to explain the
whole campaign, had kept referring to a rebellion of German agents
supposed to have begun in Petrograd. The delegates, arriving directly
from the capital, not only disproved the fact of a rebellion, but also
demonstrated with documents in their hands that Krymov was a rebel and
was leading his troops against the government. What could the officers
of Kornilov reply to that?

On the staff car of the Savage Division the soldiers stuck up a red flag
with the inscription: “Land and freedom.” The staff commander ordered
them to take down the flags – “merely to avoid confusing it with a
railroad signal,” as the lieutenant-colonel politely explained. The
staff soldiers were not satisfied with this cowardly explanation, and
arrested the lieutenant-colonel. Were they not mistaken at headquarters
when they said that the Caucasian mountaineers did not care whom they
slaughtered?

The next morning a colonel arrived at Krymov’s headquarters from
Kornilov with an order to concentrate his corps, advance swiftly on
Petrograd, and “unexpectedly” occupy it. At headquarters they were
obviously still trying to shut their eyes to the facts. Krymov replied
that the different units of the corps were scattered on various
railroads and in some places were detraining; that he had at his
disposition only eight Cossack squadrons; that the railroads were
damaged, overloaded, barricaded, and that it was possible to move
farther only on foot; and that finally there could be no talk of an
unexpected occupation of Petrograd, now that the workers and soldiers
had been placed under arms in the capital and its environs. The affair
was still further complicated by the fact that the possibility was
hopelessly past of carrying out the operation “unexpectedly” even to the
troops of Krymov himself. Sensing something unpropitious, they had
demanded explanations. It had become necessary to inform them of the
conflict between Kornilov and Kerensky – that is, to place soldiers’
meetings officially on the order of the day.

An order issued by Krymov at just that moment read: “This evening I
received from the headquarters of the commander-in-chief and from
Petrograd information that rebellions have begun in Petrograd ...” This
deceit was designed to justify an already quite open campaign against
the government. An order of Kornilov himself on the 29th of August, had
read: “The intelligence service from Holland reports: (a) In a few days
a simultaneous attack upon the whole front is to begin, with the aim of
routing and putting to flight our disintegrating army; (b) An
insurrection is under preparation in Finland; (c) Explosions are to be
expected of bridges on the Dnieper and the Volga; (d) An insurrection of
Bolsheviks is being organized in Petrograd.” This was that same
“information” to which Savinkov had already referred on the 23rd.
Holland is mentioned here merely to distract attention. According to all
evidence the document was fabricated in the French war mission or with
its participation.

Kerensky on the same day telegraphed Krymov: “There is complete
tranquillity in Petrograd. No demonstrations are expected. Your corps is
not needed.” The demonstrations were to have been evoked by the military
edicts of Kerensky himself. Since it had been necessary to postpone this
governmental act of provocation, Kerensky was entirely justified in
concluding that “no demonstrations are expected.”

Seeing no way out, Krymov made an awkward attempt to advance upon
Petrograd with his eight Cossack squadrons. This was little but a
gesture to clear his own conscience, and nothing of course came of it.
Meeting a force on patrol duty a few _versts_ from Luga, Krymov turned
back without even trying to give battle. On the theme of this single and
completely fictitious “operation,” Krasnov, the commander of the Third
Cavalry Corps, wrote later: “We should have struck Petrograd with a
force of eighty-six cavalry and Cossack squadrons, and we struck with
one brigade and eight weak squadrons, half of them without officers.
Instead of striking with our fist, we struck with our little finger. It
pained the finger, and those we struck at were insensible of the blow.”
In the essence of the matter there was no blow even from a finger.
Nobody felt any pain at all.

The railroad workers in those days did their duty. In a mysterious way
echelons would find themselves moving on the wrong roads, regiments
would arrive in the wrong division, artillery would be sent up a blind
alley, staffs would get out of communication with their units. All the
big stations had their own soviets, their railroad workers’ and their
military committees. The telegraphers kept them informed of all events,
all movements, all changes. The telegraphers also held up the orders of
Kornilov. Information unfavorable to the Kornilovists was immediately
multiplied, distributed, pasted up, passed from mouth to mouth. The
machinists, the switchmen, the oilers, became agitators. It was in this
atmosphere that the Kornilov echelons advanced – or what was worse,
stood still. The commanding staff, soon sensing the hopelessness of the
situation, obviously did not hasten to move forward, and with their
passivity promoted the work of the counter-conspirators of the transport
system. Parts of the army of Krymov were in this way scattered about in
the stations, sidings, and branch lines, of eight different railroads.
If you follow on the map the fate of the Kornilov echelons, you get the
impression that the conspirators were playing at blind man’s buff on the
railroad lines.

“Almost everywhere,” says General Krasnov, writing his observations made
on the night of August 30, “we saw one and the same picture. On the
tracks or in the cars, or in the saddles of their black or bay horses,
who would turn from time to time to gaze at them, dragoons would be
sitting or standing, and in the midst of them some lively personality in
a soldier’s long coat.” The name of this “lively personality” soon
became legion. From the direction of Petrograd innumerable delegations
continued to arrive from regiments sent out to oppose the Kornilovists.
Before fighting they wanted to talk things over. The revolutionary
troops were confidently hopeful that the thing could be settled without
fighting. This hope was confirmed: the Cossacks readily came to meet
them. The communication squad of the corps would seize locomotives, and
send the delegates along all railroad lines. The situation would be
explained to every echelon. Meetings were continuous and at them all the
cry was being raised: “They have deceived us!”

“Not only the chiefs of divisions,” says Krasnov, “but even the
commanders of regiments did not know exactly where their squadrons and
companies were. The absence of food and forage naturally irritated
everybody still more. The men ... seeing all this meaningless confusion
which had been created around them, began to arrest their chiefs and
officers.” A delegation from the Soviet which had organized its own
headquarters reported: “Fraternization is going on rapidly ... We are
fully confident that the conflict may be considered liquidated.
Delegations are coming from all sides ...” Committees took the place of
the officers in directing the units. A soviet of deputies of the corps
was very soon created, and from its staff a delegation of forty men was
appointed to go to the Provisional Government. The Cossacks began to
announce out loud that they were only waiting an order from Petrograd to
arrest Krymov and the other officers.

Stankevich paints a picture of what he found on the road when he set out
on the 30th with Voitinsky in the direction of Pskov. In Petrograd, he
says, they had thought Tzarskoe was occupied by Kornilovists; there was
nobody there at all. “In Gatchina, nobody ... On the road to Luga,
nobody. In Luga, peace and quiet ... We arrived at the village where the
staff of the corps was supposed to be located ... empty ... We learned
that early in the morning the Cossacks had left their positions and gone
away in the direction opposite to Petrograd.” The insurrection had
rolled back, crumbled to pieces, been sucked up by the earth.

But in the Winter Palace they were still dreading the enemy. Kerensky
made an attempt to enter into conversation with the commanding staff of
the rebels. That course seemed to him more hopeful than the “anarchist”
initiative of the lower ranks. He sent delegates to Krymov, and “in the
name of the salvation of Russia,” invited him to come to Petrograd,
guaranteeing him safety on his word of honor. Pressed upon all sides,
and having completely lost his head, the general hastened, of course, to
accept the invitation. On his heels came a deputation from the Cossacks.

The fronts did not support headquarters. Only the Southwestern made a
somewhat serious attempt. Denikin’s staff had adopted preparatory
measures in good season. The unreliable guards at the staff were
replaced by Cossacks. The printing presses were seized on the night of
the 27th. The staff tried to play the rôle of self-confident master of
the situation, and even forbade the committee of the front to use the
telegraph. But the illusion did not last more than a few hours.
Delegates from various units began to come to the committee with offers
of support. Armored cars appeared, machine guns, field artillery. The
committee immediately asserted its control of the activity of the staff,
leaving it the initiative only in operations against the enemy. By three
o'clock on the 28th the power on the Southwestern front was wholly in
the hands of the committee. “Never again,” wept Denikin, “did the future
of the country seem so dark, our impotence so grievous and humiliating.”

On the other fronts the thing passed off less dramatically: the
commander-in-chief had only to look around in order to sense a torrent
of friendly feeling going out to the commissars of the Provisional
Government. By the morning of the 29th, telegrams had arrived at the
Winter Palace with expressions of loyalty from General Sherbachev on the
Rumanian front, Valuyev on the Western, and Przevalsky on the Caucasian.
On the Northern front, where the commander-in-chief was an open
Kornilovist, Klembovsky, Stankevich named a certain Savitsky as his
deputy. “Savitsky, little known to anybody until then, and appointed by
telegram at the moment of the conflict,” writes Stankevich himself,
“could appeal with confidence to any bunch of soldiers – infantry,
Cossacks, orderlies and even junkers – with any order whatever, even if
it were a question of arresting the commander-in-chief, and the order
would be promptly carried out.” KIembovsky was replaced, without further
difficulties, by General Bonch-Bruevich, who through the mediation of
his brother, a well-known Bolshevik, became afterward one of the first
to enter the service of the Bolshevik government.

Things went a little better with the southern pillar of the military
party, the ataman of the Don Cossacks, Kaledin. They were saying in
Petrograd that Kaledin was mobilizing the Cossack army and that echelons
from the front were marching to join him on the Don. Meanwhile the
ataman, according to one of his biographers, “was riding from village to
village, far from the railroad ... peacefully conversing with
villagers.” Kaledin actually did conduct himself more cautiously than
was imagined in revolutionary circles. He chose the moment of open
revolt, the date of which had been made known to him in advance, for
making a “peaceful” round of the villages, in order that during the
critical days he might be beyond control by telegraph or otherwise, and
at the same time might be feeling out the mood of the Cossacks. On the
27th he telegraphed his deputy, Bogayevsky: “It is necessary to support
Kornilov with all means and forces.” However, his conversations with the
villagers were demonstrating at just that moment that properly speaking
there were no means or forces: those Cossack wheat-growers would not
think of rising in defense of Kornilov. When the collapse of the
uprising became evident, the so-called “troop ring”[1] of the Don
decided to refrain from expressing its opinion “until the real
correlation of forces has become clear.” Thanks to these manoeuvers, the
chiefs of the Don Cossacks succeeded in making a timely jump to the
sidelines.

In Petrograd, in Moscow, on the Don, at the front, along the course
followed by the echelons, here, there and everywhere, Kornilov had had
his sympathizers, partisans, friends. Their number seemed enormous to
judge by telegrams, speeches of greeting, newspaper articles. But
strange to say, now when the hour had come to reveal themselves, they
had disappeared. In many cases the cause did not lie in personal
cowardice. There were plenty of brave men among the Kornilov officers.
But their bravery could find no point of application. From the moment
the masses got into motion the solitary individual had no access to
events. Not only the weighty industrialists, bankers, professors,
engineers, but also students and even fighting officers, found
themselves pushed away, thrown aside, elbowed out. They watched the
events developing before them as though from a balcony. Along with
General Denikin they had nothing left to do but curse their humiliating
and appalling impotence.

On the 30th of August, the Executive Committee sent to all soviets the
joyous news that “there is complete demoralization in the troops of
Kornilov.” They forgot for the moment that Kornilov had chosen for his
undertaking the most patriotic units, those with the best fighting
morale, those most protected from the influence of the Bolsheviks. The
process of demoralization consisted in the fact that the soldiers had
decisively ceased to trust their officers, discovering them to be
enemies. The struggle for the revolution against Kornilov meant a
deepening of the demoralization of the army. That is exactly the thing
of which they were accusing the Bolsheviks.

The generals had finally got an opportunity to verify the force of
resistance possessed by that revolution which had seemed to them so
crumbly and helpless, so accidentally victorious over the old régime.
Ever since the February days, on every possible occasion, the gallant
formula of soldier-braggadoccio had been repeated: “Give me one strong
detachment and I will show them.” The experience of General Khabalov and
General Ivanov at the end of February had taught nothing to these
warriors of loud mouth. The same song was frequently sung too by
civilian strategists. The Octobrist Shidlovsky asserted that if in
February there had appeared in the capital “a military detachment, not
especially large but united by discipline and fighting spirit, the
February revolution would have been put down in a few days.” The
notorious railway magnate, Bublikov, wrote: “One disciplined division
from the front would have been enough to crush the insurrection to the
bottom.” Several officers who participated in the events assured Denikin
that “one firm battalion under a commander who knew what he wanted,
could have changed the whole situation from top to bottom.” During the
days of Guchkov’s war ministry, General Krymov came to him from the
front and offered to “clean up Petrograd with one division – of course
not without bloodshed.” The thing was not put through merely because
“Guchkov did not consent.” And finally Savinkov, preparing in the
interests of a future directory his own particular “August 27th,”
asserted that two regiments would be amply sufficient to make dust and
ashes of the Bolsheviks. Now fate had offered to all these gentlemen, in
the person of the “happy” general “full of the joy of life,” an ample
opportunity to verify the truth of their heroic calculations. Without
having struck a single blow, with bowed head, shamed and humiliated,
Krymov arrived at the Winter Palace. Kerensky did not let pass the
opportunity to play out a melodramatic scene with him – a scene in which
his chief effects were guaranteed their success in advance. Returning
from the prime-minister to the war office, Krymov ended his life with a
revolver shot. Thus turned out his attempt to put down the revolution
“not without bloodshed.”

In the Winter Palace they breathed more freely, having concluded that a
matter so pregnant with difficulties was ending favorably. And they
decided to return as soon as possible to the order of the day – that is
to a continuation of the business which had been interrupted. Kerensky
appointed himself commander-in-chief. From the standpoint of preserving
his political ties with the old generals, he could hardly have found a
more suitable figure. As chief of the headquarters staff he selected
Alexeiev, who two days ago had barely missed landing in the position of
Prime Minister. After hesitating and conferring with his friends, the
general, not without a contemptuous grimace, accepted the appointment –
with the aim, as he explained to his own people, of liquidating the
conflict in a peaceful manner. The former chief-of-staff of the supreme
commander-in-chief, Nicholas Romanov, thus arrived at the same position
under Kerensky. That was something to wonder at! “Only Alexeiev, thanks
to his closeness to headquarters and his enormous influence in high
military circles” – so Kerensky subsequently tried to explain his
wonderful appointment – “could successfully carry out the task of
peacefully transferring the command from the hands of Kornilov to new
hands.” Exactly the opposite was true. The appointment of Alexeiev –
that is, one of their own men – could only inspire the conspirators to
further resistance, had there remained the slightest possibility of it.
In reality Alexeiev was brought forward by Kerensky after the failure of
the insurrection for the same reason that Savinkov had been summoned at
the beginning of it: it was necessary at any cost to keep open a bridge
to the right. The new commander-in-chief considered a restoration of
friendship with the generals now especially needful. After the
disturbance it will be necessary to inaugurate a firm order, and
accordingly a doubly strong power is needed.

At headquarters nothing was now left of that optimism which had reigned
two days before. The conspirators were looking for a way to retreat. A
telegram sent to Kerensky stated that Kornilov in view of the “strategic
situation” was disposed to surrender the command peacefully, provided he
was assured that “a strong government will be formed.” This large
ultimatum the capitulator followed up with a small one: lie. Kornilov
considered it “upon the whole impermissible to arrest the generals and
other persons most indispensable to the army.” The delighted Kerensky
immediately took a step to meet his enemy, announcing by radio that the
orders of General Kornilov in the sphere of military operations were
obligatory upon all. Kornilov himself wrote to Krymov on the same day:
“An episode has occurred – the only one of its kind in the history of
the world: a commander-in-chief accused of treason and betrayal of the
fatherland, and arraigned for this crime before the courts, has received
an order to continue commanding the armies ...” This new manifestation
of the good-for-nothingness of Kerensky immediately raised the hopes of
the conspirators, who still dreaded to sell themselves too cheap. In
spite of the telegram sent a few hours earlier about the
impermissibility of inner conflict “at this terrible moment,” Kornilov,
half-way restored to his rights, sent two men to Kaledin with a request
“to bring pressure to bear” and at the same time suggested to Krymov:
“If circumstances permit, act independently in the spirit of my
instructions to you.” The spirit of those instructions was: Overthrow
the government and hang the members of the Soviet.

General Alexeiev, the new chief-of-staff, departed for the seizure of
headquarters. At the Winter Palace they still took this operation
seriously. In reality Kornilov had had at his immediate disposition: a
battalion of St. George, the “Kornilovist” infantry regiment, and a
Tekinsky cavalry regiment. The St. George battalion had gone over to the
government at the very beginning, the Kornilovist and Tekinsky regiments
were still counted loyal, but part of them had split off. Headquarters
had no artillery at all. In these circumstances there could be no talk
of resistance. Alexeiev began his mission by paying ceremonial visits to
Kornilov and Lukomsky – visits during which we can only imagine both
sides unanimously squandering the soldierly vocabulary on the subject of
Kerensky, the new commander-in-chief. It was clear to Kornilov, as also
to Alexeiev, that the salvation of the country must in any case be
postponed for a certain period of time.

But while at headquarters peace without victors or vanquished was being
so happily concluded, the atmosphere in Petrograd was getting
extraordinarily hot, and in the Winter Palace they were impatiently
awaiting some reassuring news from Moghiliev which might be offered to
the people. They kept nudging Alexeiev with inquiries. Colonel
Baranovsky, one of Kerensky’s trusted men, complained over the direct
wire: “The soviets are raging, the atmosphere can be discharged only by
a demonstration of power, and the arrest of Kornilov and others.” This
did not at all correspond to the intentions of Alexeiev. “I remark with
deep regret,” answers the general, “that my fear lest at present we have
fallen completely into the tenacious paws of the Soviet has become an
indubitable fact.” By the familiar pronoun we is implied the group of
Kerensky, in which Alexeiev, in order to soften the sting, conditionally
includes himself. Colonel Baranovsky replies in the same tone: “God
grant that we shall get out of the tenacious paws of the Soviet into
which we have fallen.” Hardly had the masses saved Kerensky from the
paws of Kornilov, when the leader of the democracy hastened to get into
agreement with Alexeiev against the masses: “We shall get out of the
tenacious paws of the Soviet.” Alexeiev was nevertheless compelled to
submit to necessity, and carry out the ritual of arresting the principal
conspirators. Kornilov offered no objection to sitting quietly under
house arrest four days after he had announced to the people: “I prefer
death to my removal from the post of commander-in-chief.” The
Extraordinary Commission of Inquiry, when it arrived at Moghiliev, also
arrested the Vice-Minister of Communications, several officers of the
general staff, the unarrived diplomat Alladin, and also the whole
personnel of the head committee of the League of Officers.

During the first hours after the victory the Compromisers gesticulated
ferociously. Even Avksentiev gave out flashes of lightning. For three
whole days the rebels had left the front without any command! “Death to
the traitors!” cried the members of the Executive Committee. Avksentiev
welcomed these voices: Yes, the death penalty was introduced at the
demand of Kornilov and his followers – “so much the more decisively will
it be applied to them.” Stormy and prolonged applause.

The Moscow Church Council which had two weeks ago bowed its head before
Kornilov as the restorer of the death penalty, now beseeched the
government by telegraph “in the name of God and the Christ-like love of
the neighbor to preserve the life of the erring general.” Other levers
also were brought into operation. But the government had no idea at all
of making a bloody settlement. When a delegation from the Savage
Division came to Kerensky in the Winter Palace, and one of the soldiers
in answer to some general phrases of the new commander, said that “the
traitor commanders ought to be ruthlessly punished,” Kerensky
interrupted him with the words: “Your business now is to obey your
commander and we ourselves will do all that is necessary.” Apparently
this man thought that the masses ought to appear on the scene when he
stamped with his left foot, and disappear again when he stamped with his
right.

“We ourselves will do all that is necessary.” But all that they did
seemed to the masses unnecessary, if not indeed suspicious and
disastrous. The masses were not wrong. The upper circles were most of
all occupied with restoring that very situation out of which the
Kornilov campaign had arisen. “After the first few questions put by the
members of the Inquiry Commission,” relates Lukomsky, “it became clear
that they were all in the highest degree friendly toward us.” They were
in essence accomplices and accessories. The military prosecutor
Shablovsky gave the accused a consultation on the question how to evade
justice. The organizations of the front sent protests. “The generals and
their accomplices are not being held as criminals before the state and
the people ... The rebels have complete freedom of communication with
the outside world.” Lukomsky confirms this: “The staff of the
commander-in-chief kept us informed about all matters of interest to
us.” The indignant soldiers more than once felt an impulse to try the
generals in their own courts, and the arrestees were saved from summary
execution only by a counterrevolutionary Polish division sent to Bykhov
where they were detained.

On the 12th of September, General Alexeiev wrote to Miliukov from
headquarters a letter which reflected the legitimate indignation of the
conspirators at the conduct of the big bourgeoisie, which had first
pushed them on, but after the defeat left them to their fate. “You are
to a certain degree aware” – wrote the general, not without poison in
his pen – “that certain circles of our society not only knew about it
all, not only sympathized intellectually, but even to the extent that
they were able helped Kornilov ...” In the name of the League of
Officers Alexeiev demanded of Vyshnegradsky, Putilov and other big
capitalists, who had turned their backs to the vanquished, that they
should collect 300,000 roubles for the benefit of “the hungry families
of those with whom they had been united by common ideas and preparations
...” The letter ended in an open threat: “If the honest press does not
immediately begin an energetic explanation of the situation ... General
Kornilov will be compelled to make a broad exposure before the court of
all the preparatory activities, all conversations with persons and
circles, the parts they played, etc.” As to the practical results of
this tearful ultimatum, Denikin reports: “Only towards the end of
October did they bring to Kornilov from Moscow about 40,000 roubles.”
Miliukov during this period was in a general way absent from the
political arena. According to the official Kadet version he had “gone to
the Crimea for a rest.” After all these violent agitations the liberal
leader was, to be sure, in need of rest.

The comedy of the Inquiry Commission dragged along until the Bolshevik
insurrection, after which Kornilov and his accomplices were not only set
free, but supplied by Kerensky’s headquarters with all necessary
documents. These escaped generals laid the foundation of the civil war.
In the name of the sacred aims which had united Kornilov with the
liberal Miliukov and the Black Hundredist, Rimsky-Korsakov, hundreds of
thousands of people were buried, the south and east of Russia were
pillaged and laid waste, the industry of the country was almost
completely destroyed, and the Red Terror imposed upon the revolution.
Kornilov, after successfully emerging from Kerensky’s courts of justice,
soon fell on the civil war front from a Bolshevik shell. Kaledin’s fate
was not very different. The “troop ring” of the Don demanded, not only a
revocation of the order for Kaledin’s arrest, but also his restoration
to the position of _ataman_. And here too Kerensky did not miss the
opportunity to go back on himself. Skobelev was sent to Novocherkassk to
apologize to the troop ring. The democratic minister was subjected to
refined mockeries conducted by Kaledin himself. The triumph of the
Cossack general was not, however, long-lasting. Pressed from all sides
by the Bolshevik revolution breaking out on the Don, Kaledin in a few
months ended his own life. The banner of Kornilov then passed into the
hands of General Denikin and Admiral Kolchak, with whose names the
principal period of the civil war is associated. But all that has to do
with 1918 and the years that followed.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. The Cossacks’ name for their elective assembly.



CHAPTER 34 THE MASSES UNDER ATTACK


 

The immediate causes of the events of a revolution are changes in the
state-of-mind of the conflicting classes. The material relations of
society merely define the channel within which these processes take
place. Changes in the collective consciousness have naturally a
semi-concealed character. Only when they have attained a certain degree
of intensity do the new moods and ideas break to the surface in the form
of mass activities which establish a new, although again very unstable,
social equilibrium. The development of a revolution lays bare at each
new stage the problem of power, but only to disguise it again
immediately afterward – until the hour of a new exposure. A
counter-revolution has the same dynamic, except that the picture is
reeled off in the opposite direction.

What goes on in the governmental and soviet upper circles is by no means
without effect upon the course of events. But it is impossible to
understand the real significance of a political party or find your way
among the maneuvers of the leaders, without searching out the deep
molecular processes in the mind of the mass. In July the workers and
soldiers were defeated, but in October with an unconquerable onslaught
they seized the power. What happened in their heads during those four
months? How did they live through the blows rained upon them from above?
With what ideas and feelings did they meet the open attempt at a seizure
of power by the bourgeoisie? Here the reader will find it necessary to
go back to the July defeat. It is often necessary to step back a few
paces in order to make a good leap. And before us is the October leap.

In the official soviet histories the opinion has become established, and
been converted into a kind of rubber-stamp, that the July attack upon
the party – the combination of repression and slander – went by almost
without leaving a trace upon the workers’ organizations. That is utterly
untrue. The decline in the ranks of the party and the ebbing away of
workers and soldiers did not, to be sure, last very long – not longer
than a few weeks. The revival began so quickly – and what is more
important, so boisterously – that it more than half wiped out the memory
of the days of persecution and decline. Victories always throw a new
light upon the defeats which led up to them. But in proportion as the
minutes of local party organizations begin to be published, the picture
emerges more and more sharply of a July decline of the revolution – a
thing which was felt in those days the more painfully in proportion as
the preceding upward swing had been uninterrupted.

Every defeat, resulting as it does from a definite correlation of
forces, changes that correlation in its turn to the disadvantage of the
vanquished, for the victor gains in self-confidence and the vanquished
loses faith in himself. Moreover this or that estimate of one’s own
forces constitutes an extremely important element in the objective
correlation of forces. A direct defeat was experienced by the workers
and soldiers of Petrograd, who in their urge forward had come up against
the confusedness and contradictions in their own aims, on the one hand,
and on the other, the backwardness of the provinces and the front. It
was in the capital, therefore, that the consequences of the defeat
revealed themselves first and most sharply. The assertion is also
untrue, however – although as frequently to be found in the official
literature – that for the provinces the July defeat passed almost
unnoticed. This is both theoretically improbable, and refuted by the
testimony of facts and documents. Whenever great questions arose, the
whole country involuntarily and always looked toward Petrograd. The
defeat of the workers and soldiers of the capital was therefore bound to
produce an enormous impression, and especially upon the more advanced
layers of the provinces. Fright, disappointment, apathy, flowed down
differently in different parts of the country, but they were to be
observed everywhere.

The lowered pressure of the revolution expressed itself first of all in
an extraordinary weakening of the resistance of the masses to the enemy.
While the troops brought into Petrograd were carrying out official
punitive activities in the way of disarming soldiers and workers,
semi-volunteer gangs under their protection were attacking with impunity
the workers’ organizations. After the raid on the editorial rooms of
_Pravda_ and the printing plant of the Bolsheviks, the headquarters of
the metal workers’ union was raided. The next blow fell upon the
district soviets. Even the Compromisers were not spared. On the 10th,
one of the institutions of the party led by the Minister of the
Interior, Tseretelli, was attacked. It required no small amount of
self-abnegation on the part of Dan to write on the subject of the
arriving soldiers: “Instead of the ruin of the revolution, we are now
witnessing its new triumph.” This triumph went so far that – in the
words of the Menshevik, Prushitsky – passers-by on the streets, if they
happened to look like workers or be suspected of Bolshevism, were in
danger at any moment of cruel beatings. Could there be a more
unmistakable symptom of a sharp change in the whole situation?

A member of the Petrograd committee of the Bolsheviks, Latsis –
subsequently a well-known member of the “Cheka” – wrote in his diary:
“July 9. All our printing plants in the city are destroyed. Nobody dares
print our papers and leaflets. We are compelled to set up an underground
press. The Vyborg district has become an asylum for all. Here have come
both the Petrograd committee and the persecuted members of the Central
Committee. In the watchman’s room of the Renaud factory there is a
conference of the committee with Lenin. The question is raised of a
general strike. A division occurs in the committee. I stand for calling
the strike. Lenin, after explaining the situation, moves that we abandon
it ... July 12. The counter-revolution is victorious. The soviets are
without power. The junkers, running wild, have begun to raid the
Mensheviks too. In some sections of the party there is a loss of
confidence. The influx of members has stopped ... But there is not as
yet a flight from our ranks.” After the July Days “there was a strong
Social Revolutionary influence in the Petersburg factories,” writes the
worker, Sisko. The isolation of the Bolsheviks automatically increased
the weight and self-confidence of the Compromisers. On July 16, a
delegate from Vassillievsky Ostrov reported at a Bolshevik city
conference that the mood in his district was “in general” hearty, with
the exception of a few factories. “In the Baltic factories the Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks are crowding us out.” Here the thing went
very far: the factory committee decreed that the Bolsheviks attend the
funeral of the slain Cossacks, and this they did ... The official loss
of membership of the party was, to be sure, insignificant. In the whole
district, out of four thousand members not more than a hundred openly
withdrew. But a far greater number in those first days quietly stood
apart. “The July Days,” a worker, Minichev, subsequently remembered,
“showed us that in our ranks too there were people who, fearing for
their own skin, ‘chewed up’ their party cards, and denied all connection
with the party.” “But there were not many of them he adds reassuringly.
“The July events,” writes Shliapnikov, “and the whole accompanying
campaign of violence and slander against our organization interrupted
that growth of our influence which by the beginning of July had reached
enormous proportions ... The very party became semi-illegal, and had to
wage a defensive struggle, relying in the main upon the trade unions and
the shop and factory committees.”

The charge that the Bolsheviks were in the service of Germany could not
but create an impression even upon the Petrograd workers – at least upon
a considerable number of them. Those who had been wavering, drew off.
Those who were about to join, wavered. Even of those who had already
joined, a considerable number withdrew. Together with the Bolsheviks a
large part had been played in the July demonstrations by workers
belonging to the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks. After the blow
they were the first to jump back under the banners of their own parties.
It now seemed to them that in violating party discipline they had really
made a mistake. Broad layers of non-party workers, travelling companions
of the party, also stepped away from it under the influence of that
officially proclaimed and juridically embellished slander.

In this changed political atmosphere the repressive blows produced a
redoubled effect. Olga Ravich, one of the old and active workers of the
party, a member of the Petrograd committee, subsequently stated in a
report: “The July Days brought such a break-up of the organization that
for the first three weeks afterward there could be no talk of any kind
of activities.” Ravich here has in view, for the most part, public
activities of the party. For a long time it was impossible to arrange
for the issue of the party paper; there were no printing plants which
would agree to serve the Bolsheviks. The resistance here did not always
come from the owners, either. In one printing plant the workers
threatened to stop work if Bolshevik papers were printed, and the
proprietor tore up a contract already concluded. For a certain period of
time Petrograd was supplied by the Kronstadt paper.

The extreme Left Wing upon the open arena during those weeks was the
group called “Menshevik-Internationalists.” The workers eagerly listened
to the speeches of Martov, whose fighting instinct woke up in this
period of retreat when it was not necessary to lay out new roads for the
revolution, but only to fight for what remained of its conquests.
Martov’s courage was the courage of pessimism. He said at a session of
the Executive Committee: “It seems as though they had put a full stop to
the revolution. If it has got so that ... there is no place in the
Russian revolution for the voice of the peasantry and the workers, then
let us make our exit honorably. Let us accept this challenge not with
silent renunciation, but with honest fighting.” This proposal to make
their exit with honest fighting, Martov made to those party comrades of
his, such as Dan and Tseretelli, who regarded the victory of the
generals and Cossacks over the workers and soldiers as a victory of the
revolution over anarchy. On a background of unrestrained
Bolshevik-baiting and continuous belly-crawling by the Compromisers
before Cossack trouser-stripes, the conduct of Martov raised him high
during those weeks in the eyes of the workers.

The July crisis struck an especially damaging blow at the Petrograd
garrison. The soldiers were far behind the workers politically. The
soldiers’ section of the Soviet remained a bulwark of compromisism after
the workers had gone over to the Bolsheviks. This is not in the least
contradicted by the fact that the soldiers showed a remarkable readiness
to get out their guns. In demonstrations they would play a far more
aggressive rôle than the workers, but under blows they would retreat
much farther. The wave of hostility against Bolshevism swept up very
high in the Petrograd garrison. “After the defeat,” says the former
soldier, Mitrevich, “I did not show up in my regiment, as I might have
been killed there before the squall passed.” It was exactly in those
more revolutionary regiments which had marched in the front rank in the
July Days, and therefore received the most furious blows, that the
influence of the party fell lowest. It fell so low that even three
months later it was impossible to revive the organization. It was as
though these units had been morally disintegrated by too strong a shock.
The Military Organization was compelled to draw in very decidedly.
“After the July defeat,” writes a former soldier, Minichev, “not only in
the upper circles of our party, but also in some of the district
committees, the comrades were none too friendly toward the Military
Organization.” In Kronstadt the party lost about 250 members. The mood
of the garrison of this Bolshevik fortress declined vastly. The reaction
also spread to Helsingfors. Avksentiev, Bunakov, and the lawyer,
Sokolov, went up there to bring the Bolshevik ships to repentance. They
achieved certain results. By arresting the leading Bolsheviks, by
playing up the official slander, by threats, they succeeded in getting a
declaration of loyalty even from the Bolshevik battleship,
_Petropavlovsk_. Their demand for the surrender of the “instigators” was
rejected, however, by all the ships.

It was not greatly different in Moscow. “The attacks of the bourgeois
press,” remembers Piatnitsky, “produced a panic even in certain members
of the Moscow committee.” The organization weakened numerically after
the July Days. “I will never forget,” writes the Moscow worker,
Ratekhin, “one mortally hard moment. A plenary session was assembling
(of the Zamoskvoretsky district soviet) ... I saw there were none too
many of our comrade Bolsheviks ... Steklov, one of the energetic
comrades, came right up close to me and, barely enunciating the words,
asked: ‘Is it true they brought Lenin and Zinoviev in a sealed train? Is
it true they are working on German money ...?’ My heart sank with pain
when I heard those questions. Another comrade came up – Konstantinov:
‘Where is Lenin? He has beat it, they say ... What will happen now?’ And
so it went.” This living picture introduces us correctly to the
experience of the advanced workers of that time. “The appearance of the
documents published by Alexinsky,” writes the Moscow artillerist,
Davidovsky, “produced a terrible confusion in the brigade. Even our
battery, the most Bolshevik, wavered under the blow of this cowardly lie
... It seemed as though we had lost all faith.”

“After the July Days,” writes V. Yakovleva, at that time a member of the
Central Committee and a leader of the work in the extensive Moscow
region, “all the reports from the localities described with one voice
not only a sharp decline in the mood of the masses, but even a definite
hostility to our party. In a good number of cases our speakers were
beaten up. The membership fell off rapidly, and several organizations,
especially in the southern provinces, even ceased to exist entirely.” By
the middle of August no noticeable change for the better had taken
place. Work was going on among the masses to sustain the influence of
the party, but no growth of the organization was observable. In Riazan
and Tambov provinces, no new bonds were established, no new Bolshevik
nuclei arose. In general, these were the domains of the Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks.

Evreinov, who directed the work in proletarian Kineshma, remembers what
a difficult situation arose after the July events, when at a grand
conference of all social organizations the question was put of expelling
the Bolsheviks from the soviets. The efflux from the party in some cases
reached such a scale that only after a new registration of members could
the organization begin to live a proper life. In Tula, thanks to a
preliminary serious selection of workers, the organization did not
experience a loss of members, but its solidarity with the masses
weakened. In Nizhni-Novgorod, after the punitive campaign under the
leadership of Colonel Verkhovsky and the Menshevik Khinchuk, a sharp
decline set in: at the elections to the city duma the party carried only
four deputies. In Kaluga the Bolshevik faction took under consideration
the possibility of its being expelled from the soviets. At certain
points in the Moscow region the Bolsheviks were obliged to withdraw not
only from the soviets, but also from the trade unions.

In Saratov, where the Bolsheviks had kept up very peaceful relations
with the Compromisers, and even at the end of June were intending to
nominate common candidates with them for the city duma, the soldiers
were to such a point incited against the Bolsheviks after the July storm
that they would break into campaign meetings, tear the Bolshevik
bulletins from people’s hands, and beat up their agitators. “It became
difficult,” writes Lebedev, “to speak at election meetings. They would
often yell at us: ‘German spies! Provocateurs!’” Among the Saratov
Bolsheviks the faint-hearted were numerous: “Many announced their
resignation, others went into hiding.”

In Kiev, which had long been famous as a Black Hundred center, the
baiting of Bolsheviks took on an especially unbridled character, soon
even including Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries. The decline of the
revolutionary movement was here felt especially. At the elections to the
local duma the Bolsheviks received only 6 per cent of the votes. At a
city conference the speakers complained that apathy and inactivity were
to be felt everywhere. The party paper was compelled to abandon daily
for weekly publication.

The disbandment and transfer of the more revolutionary regiments must in
itself not only have lowered the political level of the garrisons, but
also grievously affected the local workers, who had felt firmer when
friendly troops were standing behind their backs. Thus the removal from
Tver of the 57th regiment abruptly changed the political situation both
among the soldiers and the workers. Even among the trade unions the
influence of the Bolsheviks became negligible. This was still more
evident in Tiflis, where the Mensheviks, working hand in hand with the
staff, replaced the Bolshevik units with wholly colorless regiments.

At certain points, owing to the constitution of the garrison, the level
of the local workers, and other causes accidentally intervening, the
political reaction took a paradoxical form. In Yaroslavl, for example,
the Bolsheviks were almost completely crowded out of the workers’ soviet
in July, but kept their predominant influence in the soviet of soldiers’
deputies. In certain individual localities, moreover, the July events
did seem to pass without effect, not stopping the growth of the party.
So far as we can judge, this occurred in those cases where an arrival
upon the revolutionary arena of new backward strata coincided with the
general retreat. Thus in certain textile districts a considerable influx
of women workers into the organization was to be observed in July. But
these cases do not alter the general fact of the decline.

The indubitable and even exaggerated acuteness of this reaction to a
partial defeat, was in some sense a payment made by the workers, and yet
more the soldiers, for their too smooth, too rapid, too uninterrupted
flow to the Bolsheviks during the preceding months. This sharp turn in
the mood of the masses produced an automatic, and moreover an unerring,
selection within the cadres of the party. Those who did not tremble in
those days could be relied on absolutely in what was to come. They
constituted a nucleus in the shops, in the factories, in the districts.
On the eve of October in making appointments and allotting tasks, the
organizers would glance round many a time calling to mind who bore
himself how in the July Days.

On the front, where all relations are more naked, the July reaction was
especially fierce. The staff made use of the events chiefly in order to
create special units of “Duty to the Free Fatherland.” Each regiment
would organize its own shock companies. “I often saw these shock
companies,” Denikin relates, “and they were always tense and gloomy. The
attitude of the rest of the regiment to them was aloof or even hostile.”
The soldiers rightly saw in these “Divisions of Duty” the nuclei of a
Praetorian guard. “The reaction went fast,” relates the Social
Revolutionary, Degtyarev, who subsequently joined the Bolsheviks. He is
speaking of the backward Rumanian front: “Many soldiers were arrested as
deserters. The officers lifted their chins and began to ignore the army
committees. In some places the officers tried to restore the salute.”
The commissars carried out a purgation of the army. “Almost every
division,” writes Stankevich, “had its Bolshevik with his name better
known in the army than that of the chief of the division ... We
gradually removed one celebrity after another.” The unsubmissive units
were disarmed simultaneously throughout the entire front. In this
operation the commanders and commissars relied upon the Cossacks and
upon those special companies so hateful to the soldiers.

On the day Riga fell, a conference of the commissars of the Northern
front with representatives of the army organizations, declared necessary
a more systematic application of severe measures of repression. Some
soldiers were shot for fraternizing with the Germans. Many of the
commissars, pumping up their nerve with hazy recollections of the French
revolution, tried to show the iron fist. They did not understand that
the Jacobin commissars were relying upon the lower ranks; they were not
sparing the aristocrats and the bourgeoisie; only the authority of a
plebeian ruthlessness nerved them to the introduction of severe
discipline in the army. These commissars of Kerensky had no popular
support under them, no moral halo about their heads. In the eyes of the
soldiers they were agents of the bourgeoisie, cattle-drivers of the
Entente, and nothing more. They could frighten the army for a time –
this indeed to a certain extent they actually did – but they were
powerless to resurrect it.

It was reported in the bureau of the Executive Committee in Petrograd at
the beginning of August that a favorable change had occurred in the mood
of the army, that drilling activities were getting under way. But on the
other hand, an increasing tyranny was observable, increasing acts of
despotism and oppression. The question of the officers was becoming
especially critical. “They were completely isolated, and formed a closed
organization of their own.” Other testimony bears out the fact that
externally a greater order was being established at the front – the
soldiers had ceased to rebel about petty and accidental things – but
their dissatisfaction with the situation as a whole was only the more
intense. In the cautious and diplomatic speech of the Menshevik, Kuchin,
at the State Conference, an alarmed warning could be heard underneath
the note of reassurance. “There is an indubitable tranquillity,” he
said, “but there is also something else. There is a feeling of something
like disappointment, and of this feeling also we are extremely afraid
...” The temporary victory over the Bolsheviks had been first of all a
victory over the new hopes of the soldiers, over their faith in a better
future. The masses had become more cautious, they had acquired a certain
amount of discipline. But the gulf between the rulers and the soldiers
had deepened. What and whom will it swallow up tomorrow?

The July reaction established a kind of decisive water-shed between the
February and October revolutions. The workers, the garrisons at the
rear, the front – in part even, as will appear later, the peasantry –
recoiled and jumped back as though from a blow in the solar plexus. The
blow was in reality psychological rather than physical, but it was no
less real for that. During the first four months all the mass processes
had moved in one direction – to the left. Bolshevism had grown,
strengthened, and become bold. But now the movement had run into a stone
wall. In reality it had only become clear that further progress along
the road of the February revolution was impossible. Many thought that
the revolution in general had exhausted itself. The February revolution
had indeed exhausted itself to the bottom. This inner crisis in the mass
consciousness, combining with the slanders and measures of repression,
caused confusion and retreat – in some cases panic. The enemy grew
bolder. In the masses themselves all the backward and dubious elements
rose to the surface, those impatient of disturbances and deprivations.
These receding waves in the flood of the revolution developed an
overwhelming force. It seemed as though they were obeying the
fundamental laws of social hydrodynamics. You cannot conquer such a wave
head on – it is necessary to give way to it, not let it swamp you. Hold
out until the wave of reaction has exhausted itself, preparing in the
meantime points of support for a new advance.

Observing certain individual regiments which on July 3rd had marched
under Bolshevik banners and a week later were calling down awful
punishments upon the agents of the Kaiser, educated sceptics might have
exulted, it would seem, in a complete victory: Such are your masses,
such is their stability and comprehension! But that is a cheap
scepticism. If the masses really did change their feelings and thoughts
under the influence of accidental circumstances, then that mighty
obedience to natural law which characterizes the development of great
revolutions would be inexplicable. The deeper the popular millions are
caught up by a revolution, and the more regular therefore is its
development, the more confidently can you predict the sequence of its
further stages. Only in doing this you must remember that the political
development of the masses proceeds not in a direct line, but in a
complicated curve. And is not this, after all, the essential movement of
every material process? Objective conditions were powerfully impelling
the workers, soldiers and peasants toward the banners of the Bolsheviks,
but the masses were entering upon this path in a state of struggle with
their own past, with their yesterday’s beliefs, and partly also with
their beliefs of today. At a difficult turn, at a moment of failure and
disappointment, the old prejudices not yet burnt out would flare up, and
the enemy would naturally seize upon these as upon an anchor of
salvation. Everything about the Bolsheviks which was unclear, unusual,
puzzling – the novelty of their thoughts, their audacity, their contempt
for all old and new authorities – all this now suddenly acquired one
simple explanation, convincing in its very absurdity: They are German
spies! In advancing this accusation against the Bolsheviks, the enemy
were really staking their game upon the enslaved past of the people,
upon the relics among them of darkness, barbarism, superstition. And it
was no fatuous game to play. That gigantic patriotic lie remained
throughout July and August a political factor of primary importance,
playing its accompaniment to all the questions of the day. The ripples
of slander spread out over the whole country, carried by the Kadet
press, swallowing up the provinces, the frontiers, penetrating even into
the remotest backwoods. At the end of July the Ivanovo-Voznesensk
organization of the Bolsheviks was still demanding a more energetic
campaign against slander. The question of the relative weight of slander
in a political struggle in civilized society still awaits its
sociologist.

And yet the reaction among the workers and soldiers, although nervous
and impetuous, was neither deep nor lasting. The more advanced factories
in Petrograd began to recover in the very next days after the raids.
They protested against arrests and slanders, they came knocking on the
doors of the Executive Committee; they restored their lines of
communication. At the Sestroretsk arms factory, which had been stormed
and disarmed, the workers soon had the helm again in their hands: a
general meeting on July 20 resolved that the workers must be paid for
the days of the demonstration, and that the pay should be used entirely
in supplying literature to the front. The open agitational work of the
Bolsheviks in Petrograd began again, according to the testimony of Olga
Ravich, between the 20th and 30th of July. At meetings comprising no
more than 200 or 300 people, three men began to appear in different
parts of the city: Slutsky, later killed by the Whites in the Crimea,
Volodarsky, killed by the Social Revolutionaries in Petrograd, and
Yefdokimov, a Petrograd metal worker, one of the ablest orators of the
revolution. In August the educational work of the party acquired a
broader scope. According to the notes of Raskolnikov, Trotsky, when
arrested on the 23rd of July, gave those in prison the following picture
of the situation in the city: “The Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries
are continuing their insane baiting of the Bolsheviks. The arrests of
our comrades continue, but there is no gloom in party circles. On the
contrary, everybody is looking to the future with hope, calculating that
the repressions will only strengthen the popularity of the party ... In
the workers’ districts no loss of spirit is to be observed.” And it is
true that a meeting of the workers of 27 plants in the Peterhoff
district passed soon after that a resolution of protest against the
irresponsible government and its counter-revolutionary policy. The
proletarian districts were fast coming to life.

During those very days when up on top, in the Winter Palace or the
Tauride, they were creating new Coalitions, tearing them up, and then
pasting them together again – in those same days, and even hours, of the
21st and 22nd of July, a gigantic event was taking place in Petrograd,
an event hardly noticed in the official sphere, but which signified the
formation of another, more solid coalition – a coalition of the
Petrograd workers with the soldiers of the active army. Delegates from
the front had begun to arrive in the capital with protests from their
regiments against the strangling of the revolution at the front. For
some days these delegates had been knocking in vain at the doors of the
Executive Committee. The Committee did not admit them. It turned them
away and recoiled from them. Meanwhile new delegates had been arriving,
and following the same course. All these repulsed soldiers would run
into each other in the corridors and reception rooms, would complain,
abuse the Committee, and then seek some common way out. In this they
would be helped by the Bolsheviks. The delegates would decide to
exchange thoughts with the workers of the capital, with the soldiers and
sailors. And these would meet them with open arms, give them shelter and
feed them. At a conference which nobody summoned from above but which
grew up spontaneously from below, representatives were present from 29
regiments at the front, from 90 Petrograd factories, from the Kronstadt
sailors, and from the surrounding garrisons. At the focus of the
conference stood the trench delegates – among them a number of young
officers. The Petersburg workers listened to the men from the front
eagerly, trying not to let fall a word of their own. The latter told how
the offensive and its consequences had devoured the revolution. Those
gray soldiers – not in any sense agitators – painted in unstudied words
the workaday life of the front. The details were disturbing – they
demonstrated so nakedly how everything was crawling back to the old,
hateful, pre-revolutionary régime. The contrast between the hopes of
yesterday and today’s reality struck home to every man there and brought
them all to one mood. Although Social Revolutionaries obviously
predominated among the men from the front, a drastic Bolshevik
resolution was passed almost unanimously: only three men abstained from
the voting. That resolution will not remain a dead letter. The
dispersing delegates will tell the truth about how the compromise
leaders repulsed them, and how the workers received them. And the
trenches will believe their delegates. These men would not deceive them.

In the Petrograd garrison itself the beginning of a break was evident
toward the end of the month – especially evident after those meetings
participated in by delegates from the front. Of course the more heavily
stricken regiments could not so soon recover from their apathy. But on
the other hand in those units which had preserved longest the patriotic
attitude, submitting to discipline throughout the first months of the
revolution, the influence of the party was noticeably growing. The
Military Organization, which had suffered especially from the
persecution, began to get on its feet. As always after a defeat, they
looked unfavorably in party circles on the leaders of the military work,
laying up against them both actual and imaginary mistakes and
deviations. The Central Committee drew the Military Organization closer
under its wing, established a more direct control over it through
Sverdlov and Dzerzhinsky, and the work got under way again, more slowly
than before but more reliably.

By the end of July the position of the Bolsheviks in the Petrograd
factories was already restored. The workers were united under the same
banners, but they were now different workers, more mature – that is,
more cautious but at the same time more resolute. “We have a colossal,
an unlimited influence in the factories,” reported Volodarsky to a
congress of the Bolsheviks on July 27. “The party work is carried out
chiefly by the workers themselves ... The organization has grown from
below, and we have every reason to believe therefore that it will not
disintegrate.” The Union of Youth had at that time 50,000 members, and
was coming continually more and more under the influence of the
Bolsheviks. On August 7 the workers’ section of the Soviet adopted a
resolution demanding the abolition of the death penalty. In sign of
protest against the State Conference, the Putilov workers set aside a
day’s wages for the workers’ press. At a conference of factory and shop
committees, a resolution was passed unanimously declaring the Moscow
Conference “an attempt to organize the counter-revolutionary forces.”

Kronstadt was healing its wounds. On July 20, a meeting in Yakorny
Square demanded the transfer of power to the soviets, the sending of the
Cossacks to the front together with the gendarmes and police, the
abolition of the death penalty, the admission of Kronstadt delegates to
Tsarskoe Selo to make sure that Nicholas II was adequately guarded, the
disbandment of the battalions of death, the confiscation of the
bourgeois newspapers, etc. At about the same time the new admiral,
Tyrkov, on taking command of the fortress had ordered the red flags
lowered on military vessels and the Andreievsky flag raised; the
officers and a part of the soldiers had put on chevrons. The
Kronstadters protested against this. A government commission to
investigate the events of July 3-5 was compelled to return from
Kronstadt without results: it was met with hisses, protests and even
threats.

A shift was occurring throughout the whole fleet. “At the end of July
and the beginning of August,” writes one of the Finland leaders,
Zalezhsky, “it was clearly felt that the outside reaction had not only
not broken the revolutionary strength of Helsingfors, but on the
contrary there was to be observed here a sharp shift to the left and a
broad growth of sympathy for the Bolsheviks.” The sailors had been to a
considerable degree the instigators of the July movement, acting over
the head of, and to an extent against the will of the party, which they
suspected of moderation and almost of compromisism. The experience of
the armed demonstration had shown them that the question of power is not
so easily solved. Semi-anarchistic moods had now given place to a
confidence in the party. Upon this theme the report of a Helsingfors
delegate at the end of July is very interesting: “On the small vessels
the influence of the Social Revolutionaries prevails, but on the big
battleships, cruisers and destroyers, all the sailors are either
Bolsheviks or Bolshevik sympathizers. This was (even before) the
attitude of the sailors on the Petropavlovsk and the Republic, but since
July 3-5 there have come over to us the Gangut, the Sebastopol, the
Rurik, the Andrei Pervozvanny, the Diana, the Gromoboi, and the India.
Thus we have in our hands a colossal fighting force ... The events of
July 3-5 taught the sailors many things, showing them that a mere state
of mind is not sufficient for the attainment of a goal.”

Although lagging behind Petrograd, Moscow was travelling the same road.
“The fumes began gradually to clear up,” relates the artillerist
Davidovsy. “The soldier masses began to come to themselves, and we again
took the offensive all along the line. That lie which stopped for a time
the leftward movement of the masses afterward only reinforced their rush
to us.” Under blows the friendship between factory and barrack had grown
closer. A Moscow worker, Strelkov, tells about the close relation
gradually established between the Michaelson factory and a neighboring
regiment. The workers’ and soldiers’ committees often decided at joint
sessions the practical life-questions of both factory and regiment. The
workers arranged cultural and educational evenings for the soldiers,
bought them the Bolshevik papers, and gave them help in all kinds of
ways. “If somebody was disciplined,” says Strelkov, “they would come
immediately to us to complain. During the street meetings, if a
Michaelson man was insulted anywhere, it was enough for one soldier to
hear of it, and they would come running in whole groups to protect him.
And there were many insults in those days; they baited us with talk of
German gold, treason and the whole vile compromisist lie.”

The Moscow conference of factory and shop committees at the end of July
opened on a moderate note, but swung strongly to the left during the
week of its labors, and towards the end adopted a resolution quite
obviously tinged with Bolshevism. In those same days a Moscow delegate,
Podbelsky, reported to a party conference: “Six district soviets out of
ten are in our hands ... Under the present organized slanderous attacks
only the worker mass which firmly supports Bolshevism is saving us.” At
the beginning of August, in elections at the Moscow factories Bolsheviks
were already getting elected in place of Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries. The growth of the party’s influence became boisterously
evident in the general strike on the eve of the Conference. The official
Moscow _Izvestia_ wrote: “It is time to understand at last that the
Bolsheviks are not an irresponsible group, but one of the divisions of
the organized revolutionary democracy, and that broad masses stand
behind them, not always disciplined perhaps, but nevertheless devotedly
loyal to the revolution.”

The July weakening of the position of the proletariat gave courage to
the industrialists. A conference of thirteen of the most important
business organizations, including the banks, formed a Committee for the
Defense of Industry, which took upon itself the leadership of the
lockouts and of the whole political offensive against the revolution.
The workers put up a resistance. A wave of big strikes and other
conflicts swept over the whole country. While the more experienced ranks
of the proletariat moved cautiously, the new and fresh layers went the
more resolutely into the fight. The metal workers were waiting and
getting ready, but the textile workers and the workers of the rubber,
leather and paper industries were rushing into the arena. The most
backward and submissive strata of the laboring population were beginning
to rise. Kiev was disturbed by a riotous strike of the night-watchmen
and janitors. Making the rounds of the houses, the strikers put out
lights, removed keys from elevators, opened street doors, etc., etc.
Every conflict, no matter upon what theme it arose, showed a tendency to
spread to the whole given branch of industry and become a struggle about
principles. With the support of labor throughout the whole country, the
leather-workers of Moscow started in August a long and stubborn fight
for the right of the factory committees to employ and discharge men. In
many instances, especially in the provinces, the strikes were very
dramatic, going even to the point of arrests by the strikers of the
managers and executives. The government preached self-restraint to the
workers, formed a coalition with the capitalists, sent the Cossacks to
the Don basin, and doubled the prices of bread and of military supplies.
While raising the indignation of the workers to white heat, this policy
did not satisfy the capitalists. “The commissars of labor in the
localities,” complains Auerbach, one of the captains of heavy industry,
“had not yet seen the light which had come to Skobelev ... In the
ministry itself ... they did not trust their own provincial agents ...
They would summon representatives of the workers to Petrograd and in the
Marble Palace scold them and try to persuade and reconcile them with the
industrialists and engineers.” But all this came to nothing: “The
laboring masses were by this time steadily falling under the influence
of the more resolute leaders and those unashamed in their demagoguism.”

Economic defeatism became the chief weapon of the industrialists against
the dual power in the factories. At a conference of factory and shop
committees during the first half of August, the sabotage policy of the
industrialists aiming at a disorganization and stoppage of production
was exposed in detail. Aside from financial machinations, there was a
general resort to the concealment of raw materials, the closing of tool
and repair shops, etc. An illuminating testimony as to the sabotage of
the capitalists is given by John Reed, who had access as an American
correspondent to the most heterogeneous circles, having credentials from
the diplomatic agents of the Entente, and who listened to frank
confessions from the Russian bourgeois politicians. “The secretary of
the Petrograd branch of the Kadet Party,” writes Reed, “told me that the
breakdown of the country’s economic life was part of a campaign to
discredit the revolution. An Allied diplomat, whose name I promised not
to mention, confirmed this from his own knowledge. I know of certain
coal mines near Kharkov which were fired and flooded by the owners, of
textile factories at Moscow whose engineers put the machinery out of
order when they left, of railroad officials caught by the workers in the
act of crippling the locomotives.” Such was the cruel economic reality.
It corresponded not to the compromisist illusions, not to the politics
of the Coalition, but to the preparation of the Kornilov uprising.

At the front the sacred union got along about as badly as at the rear.
Arrests of individual Bolsheviks, complains Stankevich, did not settle
the question. “Criminality was in the air; its contours were not sharply
defined because the whole mass was infected with it.” If the soldiers
had become more restrained, it was only because they had learned to a
certain extent to discipline their hatred; when the dams broke their
feelings were only the more clearly revealed. One of the companies of
the Dubensky regiment, when ordered to disband for refusing to recognize
a newly appointed company commander, induced several other companies and
finally the whole regiment to mutiny, and when the regiment commander
made an attempt to restore order by force of arms, they killed him with
the butts of their rifles. That happened on July 31. If it did not go so
far as that in other regiments, the commanding staffs nevertheless felt
inwardly that it might do so at any moment.

In the middle of August, General Sherbachev reported to headquarters:
“The mood of the infantry, with the exception of the battalions of
death, is very unstable. Sometimes in the course of a few days the
attitude of certain infantry units will swing sharply to its diametric
opposite.” Many of the commissars were beginning to understand that the
July methods would solve nothing. On August 22, the commissar Yamandt
reported: “The practice of military revolutionary court-martial on the
western front is causing a dreadful disaccord between the commanding
staff and the mass of the population, discrediting the very idea of
these courts ...” The Kornilov program of salvation had already, before
the revolt of headquarters, been sufficiently tried out, and had led
into the same blind alley.

What the possessing classes feared most of all was the specter of a
disintegration of the Cossacks. Here the last bulwark threatened to give
way. In February the Cossack regiments in Petrograd had surrendered the
monarchy without resistance. In their own country, to be sure, in
Novocherkassk, the Cossack authorities had tried to conceal the telegram
about the revolution, and had carried out with the usual solemnity the
March 1st mass in memory of Alexander II. But in the long run the
Cossacks were willing to get along without the tzar, and had even
managed to dig up republican traditions in their own past. But farther
than this they would not go. From the beginning the Cossacks refused to
send their deputies to the Petrograd soviet in order not to put
themselves on a level with the workers and soldiers; and they formed a
soviet of the Cossack armies which brought together all the twelve
Cossackdoms in the person of their rear commanders. The bourgeoisie
tried, and not without success, to base upon the Cossacks their plans
against the workers and peasants.

The political rôle of these Cossacks was determined by their special
situation in the state. The Cossacks had from long ago been a unique
privileged caste of a lower order. The Cossacks paid no taxes and
enjoyed a considerably larger land allotment than the peasant. In the
three neighboring territories, Don, Kuban and Tver, the Cossack
population of 3 million owned 23 million dessiatins of land, while the
4.3 million peasants in the same territories owned only 6 million
dessiatins. The Cossacks owned on the average, that is, five times as
much per capita as the peasants. Among the Cossacks themselves the land
was divided, to be sure, very unequally. They had here their landlords
and Kulaks, even more powerful than in the North; they had also their
poor. Every Cossack was obliged to present himself at the demand of the
state on his own horse and with his own equipment. The rich Cossacks
more than covered this expense with their freedom from taxes; but the
lower ranks were bowed down under the burden of this liability to
service. These fundamental data sufficiently explain the
self-contradictory position of the Cossackdom as a whole. In its lower
strata it came in close contact with the peasantry; in its upper, with
the landlords. At the same time the upper and lower strata were united
by a consciousness of their special situation, their position as a
chosen people, and were accustomed to look down not only upon the worker
but also upon the peasant. This was what made the middle Cossack so
useful for putting down revolts.

During the years of the war, when the younger generations were at the
front, the old men, carrying conservative traditions and closely bound
up with their officers, became the bosses. Under the pretext of a
resurrection of Cossack democracy, the Cossack landlords during the
first months of the revolution summoned the so-called “troop rings”
which elected atamans – presidents of a kind – and under them “troop
governments.” The official commissars and soviets of the non-Cossack
population had no power in the Cossack territories, for the Cossacks
were stronger, richer and better armed. The Social Revolutionaries tried
to form common soviets of peasant and Cossack deputies, but the Cossacks
would not consent, since they feared, rightly enough, that an agrarian
revolution would take away a part of their land. It was no empty phrase
that Chernov let fall as Minister of Agriculture: “It will be necessary
for the Cossacks to make a little room on their lands.” Still more
important was the fact that the local peasants and infantry soldiers
were themselves oftener and oftener addressing such remarks as this to
the Cossacks: “We will get at your land, you have bossed things long
enough.” That was the aspect of affairs at the rear, in the Cossack
villages – partly also in the Petrograd garrison, the political focus.
And that explains the conduct of the Cossack regiments in the July
demonstration.

On the front the situation was essentially different. In the summer of
1917 there were 162 regiments in the active Cossack army, and 171
separate squadrons. Torn away from their village connections, the
Cossacks at the front shared the experiences of the war with the whole
army, and they passed through, although somewhat belatedly, the same
evolution as the infantry – lost faith in the victory, became embittered
at the insane confusion, grumbled against the command, got to longing
for peace and for home. As many as 45 regiments and 65 squadrons were
gradually drawn away for police duty at the front and in the rear! The
Cossacks had again been turned into gendarmes. The soldiers, workers and
peasants grumbled against them, reminding them of their hangman’s work
in 1905. Many of the Cossacks, who had begun to enjoy a pride in their
conduct in February, began to feel a gnawing at the heart. The Cossack
began to curse his whip, and would often refuse to include a whip in his
equipment. There were not many deserters, though, among the Don and
Kuban Cossacks; they were afraid of their old men in the village. In
general the Cossack units remained considerably longer in control of the
officers than the infantry.

From the Don and the Kuban news came to the front that the Cossack
chiefs, along with the old men, had set up their own government without
asking the Cossacks at the front. This awakened sleeping social
antagonisms: “We will show them when we get home,” the men at the front
would say. The Cossack general, Krasnov, one of the leaders of the
counter-revolution on the Don, has vividly described how the strong
Cossack units at the front were gradually torn asunder: “Meetings began
to be held and they would pass the wildest resolutions ... The Cossacks
stopped cleaning and feeding their horses regularly. There was no
thought of any kind of serious occupation. The Cossacks decorated
themselves with crimson bands, decked themselves out with red ribbon,
and would not hear of any kind of respect for their officers.” Before
finally arriving at this condition, however, the Cossack had long
hesitated, scratching his head and wondering which way to turn. At a
critical moment, therefore, it was not easy to guess how this or that
Cossack unit would behave.

On August 8 the troop ring on the Don formed a bloc with the Kadets for
the elections to the Constituent Assembly. News of this immediately
reached the army. “Among the Cossacks,” writes the Cossack officer
Yanov, “this bloc was greeted very adversely. The Kadet Party had no
roots in the army.” As a matter-of-fact the army hated the Kadets,
identifying them with everything that was strangling the popular masses.
“The old folks have sold you out to the Kadets,” the soldiers would
tease them. “We will show them!” the Cossacks would reply. On the
Southwestern front the Cossack units passed a special resolution
declaring the Kadets “the sworn enemies and enslavers of the working
people,” and demanded the expulsion from their troop ring of all those
who dared to enter an agreement with the Kadets.

Kornilov, himself a Cossack, counted strongly on the help of the
Cossacks, especially those of the Don, and filled out with Cossack units
the division designated for his _coup d’état_. But the Cossacks never
stirred in behalf of this “son of a peasant.” The villagers were ready
to defend their land in their own territory ferociously enough, but they
had no desire to get mixed up in somebody else’s quarrel. The Third
Cavalry Corps also failed to justify the hopes placed in it. Although
unfriendly to fraternization with the Germans, on the Petrograd front
the Cossacks willingly came to meet the soldiers and sailors. It was
this fraternization which broke up Kornilov’s plan without bloodshed. In
this way the last prop of the Old Russia, the Cossacks, weakened and
crumbled away.

During this same time and far beyond the border of Russia, on French
territory, an experiment in the “resurrection” of the Russian armies was
carried out on a laboratory scale – beyond the reach of the Bolsheviks
and therefore the more convincing. During the summer and autumn
despatches appeared in the Russian press, but remained almost unnoticed
in the whirlwind of events, telling of armed revolts among the Russian
troops in France. As early as January 1917 – that is, before the
revolution – the soldiers of the two Russian brigades in France, to
quote the officer Lissovsky, “were firmly convinced that they had all
been sold to the French in exchange for ammunition.” The soldiers were
not so badly mistaken, either. For their Allied masters they had not the
“slightest sympathy,” and in their own officers not the slightest
confidence. The news of the revolution found these exported brigades
politically prepared, so to speak, yet nevertheless, it took them
unawares. An explanation of the revolution was not to be expected from
the officers – the officers were the more at a loss, the higher they
were – but democratic patriots from among the emigrants appeared in the
camps. “It was observed more than once,” writes Lissovsky, “that certain
of the diplomats and officers of the guard regiments ... would
obligingly draw up chairs for the former emigrants.” Elective
institutions were formed among the regiments, and at the head of the
committee would soon arrive a Lettish soldier. Here, too, then, they had
their “foreign elements.” The first regiment, formed in Moscow and
consisting almost wholly of workers, clerks and salesmen – proletarian
and semi-proletarian elements in general – had first stepped on French
soil a year before, and during the winter had fought well on the fields
of Champagne. But “the disease of demoralization struck this same
regiment first.” The second regiment, which had in its ranks a large
percentage of peasants, remained longer tranquil. The second brigade,
which consisted almost exclusively of Siberian peasants, seemed wholly
reliable. Very soon after the February revolution the first brigade
broke discipline. It did not want to fight either for Alsace or for
Lorraine; it did not want to die for beautiful France. It wanted to try
living in the New Russia. The brigade was withdrawn to the rear, and
quartered in the center of France, in Camp La Courtine. “Amid quiet
bourgeois villages,” relates Lissovsky, “about ten thousand mutinous
Russian soldiers, armed, having no officers, and absolutely refusing to
submit to anybody, lived in this vast camp an entirely unique and
special kind of life.” Here Kornilov had an extraordinary opportunity to
apply his methods for restoring the army, with the co-operation of his
warm sympathizers, Poincaré and Ribot. The commander-in-chief
telegraphed a command that the soldiers be brought “into submission,”
and sent to Salonika. But the rebels would not surrender. On the 1st of
September heavy artillery was brought up, and placards posted within the
camp quoting the threatening telegram of Kornilov. But just here a new
complication thrust itself into the course of events. News appeared in
the French papers that Kornilov himself had been declared a traitor and
a counter-revolutionist. The mutinous soldiers firmly decided that there
was no reason why they should die in Salonika – especially at the
command of a traitor-general. These workers and peasants who had been
sold for ammunition decided to stand up for themselves. They refused to
hold conversations with anybody whatever from the outside. From then on
not one single soldier ever left the camp.

The second Russian brigade was brought into action against the first.
The artillery occupied positions on the nearby mountain slopes, the
infantry, employing all the rules of engineering science, dug trenches
and approaches to La Courtine. The surroundings were strongly occupied
by Alpine sharpshooters, to make sure that no single Frenchman should
enter the theater of war of the two Russian brigades. Thus the military
authorities of France set the stage on their territory for a Russian
civil war, prudently surrounding it with a hedge of bayonets. This was
merely a rehearsal. Later on the French ruling classes organized a civil
war on the territory of Russia herself, surrounding it with the barbed
ring of the blockade.

“A regular methodical bombardment of the camp began.” Several hundred
soldiers came out of the camp, agreeing to surrender. They were
received, and the artillery fire immediately began again. This lasted
for four days and four nights. The La Courtine men surrendered in
detachments. On the 6th of September, there remained about two hundred
men who had decided not to give themselves up alive. At their head stood
a Ukrainian, Globa, a Baptist, a fanatic: in Russia they would have
called him a Bolshevik. Under cover of artillery, machine gun and rifle
fire, combining in one general roar, the place was actually stormed. In
the end the rebels were subdued. The number of victims is unknown. Law
and order was in any case re-established. But in just a few weeks the
second brigade which had bombarded the first was seized with the same
disease.

The Russian soldiers had carried this dreadful infection with them
across the sea in their canvas knapsacks, in the linings of their coats,
in the secret places of their hearts. This dramatic episode at La
Courtine is significant; it was a kind of consciously arranged ideal
experiment, almost as though under a bell-glass, for testing out those
inner processes in the Russian army, the foundation for which had been
laid by the whole past history of the country.



CHAPTER 35 THE RISING TIDE


 

The strong weapon of slander proved a two-edged one. If the Bolsheviks
are German spies, why does the news come chiefly from sources most
hateful to the people? Why is it the Kadet press, which has always
attributed to the workers and soldiers the lowest possible motives, that
is loudest and clearest of all in accusing the Bolsheviks? Why does that
reactionary overseer or engineer who has been crouching in a corner
since the insurrection, now suddenly jump out and begin to curse the
Bolsheviks? Why have the most reactionary officers begun to swagger in
their regiments? And why in accusing “Lenin & Co.” do they shake their
fists in the very faces of the soldiers, as though they were the
traitors?

Every factory had its Bolsheviks. “Do I look like a German spy, boys,
eh?” a fitter would ask, or a cabinet-maker, whose whole life history
was known to the workers. At times even the Compromisers, in their
struggle against the assault of the counterrevolution, would go farther
than they planned and unintentionally smooth the path for the
Bolsheviks. The soldier Pireiko tells how at a soldiers’ meeting an army
physician Markovich, a follower of Plekhanov, refuted the accusation of
espionage against Lenin, in order the more effectively to attack his
political views as inconsistent and ruinous. In vain! “If Lenin is
intelligent and not a spy, not a traitor, and wants to make peace, then
we are for him,” said the soldiers after the meeting.

After the temporary halt in its growth Bolshevism again began
confidently spreading its wings. “The compensation is coming fast,”
wrote Trotsky in the middle of August. “Driven, persecuted, slandered,
our party has never grown so swiftly as in recent days. And this process
will not be long in running from the capital into the provinces, from
the cities into the villages and the army ... All the toiling masses of
the country will have learned, when new trials come, to unite their fate
with the fate of our party.”

As before, Petrograd took the lead. It seemed as though an almighty
broom was busy in the factories, sweeping the influence of the
Compromisers out of every last nook and cranny. “The last fortresses of
defensism are falling ...” said the Bolshevik paper. “Was it so long ago
that the defensist gentlemen were the sole bosses in the giant
Obukhovsky factory? ... Now they don’t dare show their faces in that
factory.” About 550,000 votes were cast in the elections for the
Petrograd city duma on August 20, considerably less than in the July
elections for the district dumas. After losing upwards of 375,000, the
Social Revolutionaries still got over 200,000 votes, or 37 per cent of
the whole number. The Kadets got a fifth of the whole number. “A pitiful
23,000 votes,” writes Sukhanov, “were cast for our Menshevik ballot.”
Unexpectedly to everybody, the Bolsheviks got almost 200,000 votes or
about one third of the whole number.

At a regional conference of trade unions which took place in the Urals
in the middle of August, uniting 150,000 workers, resolutions of a
Bolshevik character were carried upon all questions. In Kiev at a
conference of the factory and shop committees on the 20th of August, the
Bolshevik resolution was carried by a majority of 161 votes against 35,
with 13 abstaining. At the democratic elections for the city duma of
Ivonovo-Voznesensk which coincided exactly with the Kornilov revolt, the
Bolsheviks got 58 seats out of 102, the Social Revolutionaries 24, the
Mensheviks 4. In Kronstadt a Bolshevik, Brekman, was elected president
of the soviet, and a Bolshevik, Pokrovsky, burgomaster. It was far from
being so obvious everywhere, and in some places there was a decline. But
during August Bolshevism was growing almost throughout the whole breadth
of the land.

The revolt of Kornilov gave a powerful impetus to the radicalization of
the masses. Slutsky has recalled upon this theme a word of Marx: a
revolution needs from time to time the whip of the counter-revolution.
The danger had awakened not only energy, but penetration. The collective
thought was working at a higher tension. There was no lack of data from
which to draw conclusions. A Coalition had been declared necessary for
the defense of the revolution, and meanwhile the ally in the Coalition
had turned up on the side of the counter-revolution. The Moscow
Conference had been declared a review of the national unity. Only the
Central Committee of the Bolsheviks had given warning: “The Conference
... will inevitably turn into the instrument of a counter-revolutionary
conspiracy.” Events had verified this. And now Kerensky was declaring:
“The Moscow Conference ... this was a prologue to the 27th of August ...
Here was carried out an estimate of forces ... Here the future dictator,
Kornilov, was first introduced to Russia ...” As though Kerensky had not
been the initiator, organizer and president of this conference, and as
though it were not he who had introduced Kornilov as “the first soldier”
of the revolution. As though it had not been the Provisional Government
which armed Kornilov with the death penalty against the soldier, and as
though the warnings of the Bolsheviks had not been denounced as
demagoguism.

The Petrograd garrison remembered, moreover, that two days before the
uprising of Kornilov, the Bolsheviks had voiced the suspicion at a
meeting of the soldiers’ section that the progressive regiments were
being removed from the capital with counterrevolutionary aims. To this
the representatives of the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries had
replied with a threatening demand: Do not venture upon a discussion of
the military orders of General Kornilov. A resolution had been
introduced and carried in that spirit. “The Bolsheviks, it seems, were
not talking through their hats!” That is what the non-party worker and
soldier must be saying to himself now.

If the conspiring generals were guilty, according to the belated
accusation of the Compromisers themselves, not only of surrendering Riga
but also of the July breach, then why bait the Bolsheviks and execute
the soldiers? If military provocateurs attempted to bring the workers
and soldiers into the streets on the 27th of August, did they not play
their rôle also in the bloody encounters of July 4? Moreover, what is
the position of Kerensky in all this history? Against whom did he summon
the Third Cavalry Corps? Why did he name Savinkov Governor-general, and
Filonenko his assistant? And who is this Filonenko, this candidate for
the directory? An unexpected answer came from the armored-car division:
Filonenko, who had served with them as a lieutenant, had inflicted the
worst kinds of taunts and humiliations upon the soldiers. Where did this
shady performer, Zavoiko, come from? What, in general, does this
selection of swindlers for the highest positions signify?

The facts were simple, remembered by many, accessible to all,
irrefutable and deadly. The echelons of the Savage Division, the torn-up
rails, the mutual accusations between the Winter Palace and
headquarters, the testimonies of Savinkov and Kerensky – all spoke for
themselves. What an irrefutable indictment of the Compromisers and their
régime! The meaning of the baiting of Bolsheviks had become utterly
clear: it had been an indispensable element in the preparation for a
_coup d’état_. The workers and soldiers, as they began to see all this,
were seized with a sharp feeling of shame. Lenin is in hiding, then,
merely because they have vilely slandered him. The others are in jail,
then, to please the Kadets, the generals, the bankers, the diplomats of
the Entente. The Bolsheviks, then, are not office-seekers, and they are
hated up above exactly because they do not want to join that stock
company which they call a Coalition! This was the understanding arrived
at by the hard workers, by the simple people, by the oppressed. And out
of these moods, together with a feeling of guilt before the Bolsheviks,
grew an unconquerable loyalty to the party and confidence in its
leaders.

The old soldiers, the standing elements of the army, the artillery men,
the staff of non-commissioned officers, resisted up to the very last
days, with all their power. They did not want to set a cross against all
their fighting labors, their sacrifices, their deeds of heroism: can it
be that all that was squandered for nothing? But when the last prop was
knocked out from under them, they turned sharply – left about face! – to
the Bolsheviks. Now they had utterly come over to the revolution, their
non commissioned officer chevrons, their soldier wills tempered in
battle, their bulging jaw muscles, and all. They had got fooled on the
war, but this time they would carry the thing through to the end.

In the reports of local authorities, both military and civil, Bolshevism
had become in these days a synonym for every kind of mass activity,
every decisive demand, every resistance against exploitation, every
forward motion – in a word, it had become another name for revolution.
Does that mean that all these things are Bolshevism? the strikers would
ask themselves – and the protesting sailors, and the dissatisfied
soldiers’ wives, and the muzhiks in revolt. The masses were, so to
speak, compelled from above to identify their intimate thoughts and
demands with the slogans of Bolshevism. Thus the revolution turned to
its own uses a weapon directed against it. In history not only does the
reasonable become nonsensical, but also, when the course of evolution
requires it, the nonsensical becomes reasonable.

The change in the political atmosphere revealed itself very clearly in
the joint session of the Executive Committees of August 30, when
delegates from Kronstadt demanded that they receive seats in that high
body. Could it be possible that, where these unbridled Kronstadters had
been subjected only to condemnations and excommunications, their
representatives were now to take seats? But how refuse them? Only
yesterday the Kronstadt sailors and soldiers had come to the defense of
Petrograd. Sailors from the Aurora were even now guarding the Winter
Palace. After whispering among themselves, the leaders offered the
Kronstadters four seats with a voice but not a vote. The concession was
accepted dryly, without expressions of gratitude.

“After the attempt of Kornilov,” relates Chinenov, a soldier of the
Moscow garrison, “all the troops acquired a Bolshevik color ... All were
struck by the way in which the statement (of the Bolsheviks) came true
... that General Kornilov would soon be at the gates of Petrograd.”
Mitrevich, a soldier of the armored-car division, recalls the heroic
legends which passed from mouth to mouth after the victory over the
rebellious generals: “They were nothing but stories of bravery and of
great deeds, and of how – well, if there is such bravery, we can fight
the whole world. Here the Bolsheviks came into their own.”

Antonov-Ovseenko, liberated from prison on the day of the Kornilov
campaign, went immediately to Helsingfors. “An immense change had
occurred in the masses,” he says. At the regional congress of the
Finland soviets the Right Social Revolutionaries were in a tiny
minority; the Bolsheviks, in coalition with the Left Social
Revolutionaries, had taken the lead. As president of the regional
committee of the soviet they elected Smilga, who in spite of his extreme
youth was a member of the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks – a man
with a strong urge leftward, and who had already in the April Days
revealed an inclination to shake down the Provisional Government. As
president of the Helsingfors soviet, which rested upon the garrison and
the Russian workers, they elected Scheineman, a Bolshevik, the future
director of the Soviet State Bank – a man of cautious and bureaucratic
mould, but who at that time was marching abreast with the other leaders.
The Provisional Government had forbidden the Finlanders to convoke the
Seim, dissolved by it. The regional committee suggested that the Seim
assemble, and volunteered to defend it. The committee refused to fulfil
the orders of the Provisional Government withdrawing various military
units from Finland. Essentially the Bolsheviks had here already
established a dictatorship of the soviets in Finland.

At the beginning of September a Bolshevik paper wrote: “From a whole
series of Russian cities, the news comes that the organizations of our
party have grown immensely in the recent period, but still more
significant is the growth of our influence in the broadest democratic
masses of the workers and soldiers.” “Even in those plants where at
first they had refused to listen to us,” writes the Bolshevik, Averin,
from Ekaterinoslav, “the workers were on our side in the Kornilov days.”
“When the rumor came that Kaledin was mobilizing the Cossacks against
Tzaritzyn and Saratov,” writes Antonov, one of the leaders of the
Saratov Bolsheviks, “when this rumor was confirmed and reinforced by the
insurrection of General Kornilov, the masses got over their former
prejudices in a few days.”

The Bolshevik paper in Kiev stated on the 19th of September: “In the
election for the soviets twelve comrades were elected from the arsenal –
all Bolsheviks. All the Menshevik candidates were defeated. The same
thing is happening in a whole series of other plants.” Similar
despatches are to be found from now on every day in the pages of the
workers’ press. The hostile press tried in vain to minimize or hush up
the growth of Bolshevism. The masses, leaping forward, seemed to be
trying to make up for the time lost in their former waverings,
hesitations, and temporary retreats. There was a universal, obstinate
and unrestrainable flood tide.

A member of the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks, Barbara Yakovleva,
from whom we learned in July and August about the extreme weakening of
the Bolsheviks in the whole Moscow region, now testifies to an abrupt
change. “During the second half of September,” she reports to the
conference, “the workers of the regional bureau made the rounds of the
region ... Their impressions were absolutely identical: everywhere, in
all the provinces, the process was under way of general Bolshevization
of the masses, and everyone observed likewise that the villages were
demanding Bolsheviks In those localities where after the July Days the
organizations of the party had disintegrated they were now reborn and
were growing rapidly. In the districts into which Bolsheviks had not
been admitted, party nuclei were now spontaneously arising. Even in the
backward provinces of Tambovsk and Riazan – in those bulwarks of the
Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, which formerly in making their
rounds the Bolsheviks had passed by through sheer hopelessness – a
veritable revolution was now occurring: the influence of the Bolsheviks
was growing by leaps and bounds, and the compromisist organizations were
dissolving.

The reports of the delegates to the Bolshevik conference of the Moscow
region, a month after the Kornilov uprising and a month before the
insurrection of the Bolsheviks, are filled with confidence and
enthusiasm. In Nizhni-Novgorod, after a two months’ decline, the party
is again living a full life. Social Revolutionary workers are coming
over to the Bolsheviks by the hundreds. In Tver a broad party work has
developed only since the Kornilov days. The Compromisers are going to
pieces; nobody listens to them; they are being chased out. In Vladimir
province the Bolsheviks have grown so strong that at a provincial
congress of the soviets only five Mensheviks are to be found and only
three Social Revolutionaries. In Ivanovo-Voznesensk, the Russian
Manchester, the whole work in the soviets, the duma, and the zemstvo has
been turned over to the Bolsheviks as the semi-sovereign masters.

The organizations of the party are growing, but its force of attraction
is growing incomparably faster. The lack of correspondence between the
technical resources of the Bolsheviks and their relative political
weight finds its expression in the small number of members of the party
compared to the colossal growth of its influence. Events are sweeping
the masses so powerfully and swiftly into their whirlpool, that the
workers and soldiers have no time to organize themselves in a party.
They have no time even to understand the necessity of any special party
organization. They drink up the Bolshevik slogans just as naturally as
they breathe the air. That the party is a complicated laboratory in
which these slogans have been worked out on the basis of collective
experience, is still not clear to their minds. There are over twenty
million people represented in the soviets. The party, which had on the
very eve of the October revolution only 240,000 members, was more and
more confidently leading these millions, through the medium of the trade
unions, the factory and shop committees, and the soviets.

Throughout this vast country, shaken to its depths and with an
inexhaustible variety of local conditions and political levels of
development, some sort of elections were going on every day – to the
dumas, the zemstvos, the soviets, the factory and shop committees, the
trade unions, the army or land committees. And throughout all these
elections there appears like a red thread one unchanging fact: the
growth of the Bolsheviks. The elections to the district dumas of Moscow
astonished the country especially with the sharp change they indicated
in the mood of the masses. The “great” party of the Social
Revolutionaries retained at the end of September only 54,000 of the
375,000 votes it had counted in June. The Mensheviks had fallen from
76,000 to 16,000. The Kadets kept 101,000, having lost only 8,000. The
Bolsheviks, on the other hand, had risen from 75,000 to 198,000. Whereas
in June the Social Revolutionaries had 58 per cent of the votes, in
September the Bolsheviks had approximately 52 per cent. The garrison
voted 90 per cent for the Bolsheviks; in some detachments over 95 per
cent. In the shops of the heavy artillery, the Bolsheviks got 2,286 out
of 2,347 votes. A considerable lowering of the number of voters was due
to the fact that many small town people, who in the vapor of their first
illusions had joined the Compromisers, fell back soon after into
political non-existence. The Mensheviks were melting away completely;
the Social Revolutionaries received half as many votes as the Kadets;
the Kadets received half as many as the Bolsheviks. Those September
votes for the Bolsheviks were won in a bitter struggle with all the
other parties. They were strong votes. They were to be relied on. The
wiping out of intermediate groups, the significant stability of the
bourgeois camp, the gigantic growth of the most hated and persecuted
proletarian party – these were unmistakable symptoms of a revolutionary
crisis. “Yes, the Bolsheviks worked zealously and unceasingly,” writes
Sukhanov, who himself belonged to the shattered party of the Mensheviks.
“They were among the masses, in the factories, every day and all the
time ... They became the party of the masses because they were always
there, guiding both in great things and small the whole life of the
factories and barracks. The masses lived and breathed together with the
Bolsheviks. They were wholly in the hands of the party of Lenin and
Trotsky.”

On the front the political picture was more variegated. There were
regiments and divisions which had never yet heard or seen a Bolshevik.
Many of them were sincerely astounded when they were themselves accused
of Bolshevism. On the other hand, divisions were to be found which took
their own anarchistic moods, mingled with a dash of Black Hundredism,
for pure Bolshevism. The mood of the front was levelling out in one
direction, but in that colossal political flood which took the trenches
for its channels there occurred many whirlpools and backwashes, and
there was no little turbidity.

In September the Bolsheviks broke through the cordon and got access to
the front, from which they had been cut off in dead earnest for the last
two months. Even now the official veto was not removed. The compromisist
committees did everything to keep the Bolsheviks out of their units; but
all efforts were vain. The soldiers had heard so much about their own
“Bolshevism” that they were all, without exception, dying to see and
hear a live Bolshevik. The formal obstacles, delays, and complications
thought up by the committee men were wiped away by the insistence of the
soldiers as soon as the news came that a Bolshevik had arrived. The old
revolutionist, Efgenia Bosh, who did a great work in the Ukraine, has
left brilliant memoirs of her bold excursions into the primitive soldier
jungle. The frightened warnings of her friends, both sincere and
insincere, were everywhere refuted. In those divisions which had been
described as bitterly hostile to the Bolsheviks, the orator, approaching
her theme very cautiously, would soon find out that the listeners were
with her. “There was no coughing, or hawking, or nose-blowing – those
first indications of boredom in a soldier audience; the silence and
order were complete.” The meetings would end in stormy ovations in honor
of that bold agitator. In general, the whole journey of Efgenia Bosh
along the front was a kind of triumphal procession. Less heroic, less
effective, but essentially the same, was the experience of agitators of
less distinguished caliber.

New ideas, or ideas convincing in a new way, new slogans, new
generalizations, were bursting into the stagnant life of the trenches.
The millions of soldier brains were grinding over the events, casting
the balance of their political experience. “Dear comrade-workers and
soldiers,” writes a soldier at the front to the editor of the party
paper, “do not give free rein to that bad letter K which has sold the
whole world into bloody slaughter. That includes the first murderer,
Kolka (Nicholas II), Kerensky, Kornilov, Kaledin, the Kadets, all of
them on one letter K. The Kossacks are also dangerous for us ... Sidor
Nikolaiev.” Do not look for superstition here: this is merely a method
of political mnemonics.

The insurrection, starting at headquarters, could not but shock every
fiber of the soldiers’ being. That external discipline, the effort to
restore which had cost so many victims, was again going to pieces on all
sides. The military commissar of the western front, Zhdanov, reported:
“The general mood is nervous, suspicious of officers, waiting; refusal
to obey orders is explained on the ground that they are Kornilov orders,
and should not be obeyed.” Stankevich, who replaced Filonenko in the
position of head commissar, writes to the same effect: “The soldier
masses ... felt themselves surrounded on all sides by treason ... Anyone
who tried to dissuade them from this seemed also a traitor.”

For the ranking officers the collapse of Kornilov’s adventure meant the
collapse of their last hope. Even before that, the self-confidence of
the commanding staff had been none too brilliant. We observed during the
last days of August the military conspirators in Petrograd, drunk,
boastful and weak-willed. The officers now felt utterly despised and
rejected. “That hatred, that baiting,” writes one of them, “that
complete inactivity, and eternal expecting of arrest and shameful death,
drove the officers into the roadhouses, the private dining rooms, the
hotels ... In this drunken vapor the officers were drowned.” In contrast
to this, the soldiers and sailors were more sober than ever before. They
were caught up by a new hope.

“The Bolsheviks,” according to Stankevich, “lifted up their heads, and
felt themselves to be complete masters in the army. The lower committees
began to turn into Bolshevik nuclei. Every election in the army showed
an amazing Bolshevik growth. And moreover it is impossible to ignore the
fact that the best and most tightly disciplined army, not only on the
Northern front but perhaps on the whole Russian front, the Fifth Army,
was the first to elect a Bolshevik army committee.”

The fleet was still more clearly, concisely and colorfully going
Bolshevik. On September 8, the Baltic sailors raised the battle-flags on
all ships as an expression of their readiness to fight for the transfer
of power to the proletariat and peasantry. The fleet demanded an
immediate armistice on all fronts, the transfer of land to the peasant
committees, and the establishment of workers’ control of production.
Three days later the central committee of the Black Sea Fleet, less
advanced and more moderate, supported the Baltic sailors, adopting the
slogan of Power to the Soviets. The same slogan was adopted in the
middle of September by 23 Siberian and Lettish infantry regiments of the
Twelfth Army. Other divisions followed steadily. The demand for Power to
the Soviets never again disappeared from the order of the day in the
army or the fleet.

“The sailors’ meetings,” says Stankevich, “nine-tenths of them,
consisted of Bolsheviks only.” The new head commissar happened to be
defending the Provisional Government before the sailors at Reval. He
felt the futility of the attempt from the very first words. At the mere
word “government” the audience drew together with hostility: “A wave of
indignation, hatred and distrust instantly seized the whole crowd. It
was clear, strong, passionate, irresistible, and poured out in one
unanimous shout: _‘Down with it!’_” We cannot withhold a word of praise
from this story-teller who does not forget to see beauty in the attack
of a crowd mortally hostile to him.

The question of peace, driven underground for these two months, now
emerges with tenfold strength. At a meeting of the Petersburg Soviet,
the officer Dubassov, arriving from the front, declares: “Whatever you
may say here, the soldiers will not fight any more.” Voices reply: “Even
the Bolsheviks don’t say that!” But the officer, not a Bolshevik, comes
back: “I tell you what I know, and what the soldiers directed me to tell
you.” Another man from the front, a gloomy soldier in a long coat soaked
with the filth and stink of the trenches, declared to the Petrograd
Soviet in those same September days that the soldiers needed peace, any
kind of peace, even “some sort of an indecent peace.” Those harsh
soldier words gave the soviet a fright. That is how far things had gone
then! The soldiers at the front were not little children. They
excellently understood that with the present war map, the peace could
only be an oppressor’s peace. And for this understanding of his, the
trench delegate purposely chose the crudest words possible, expressing
the whole force of his disgust for a Hohenzollern peace. But with this
very nakedness of his mind the soldier compelled his hearers to
understand that there was no other road, that the war had unwound the
spirit of the army, that an immediate peace was necessary no matter what
it cost. The bourgeois press seized the words of the trench orator with
malicious joy, attributing them to the Bolsheviks. That phrase about an
indecent peace was henceforward continually to the fore as an extreme
expression of the savagery and depravity of the people!

------------------------------------------------------------------------

As a general rule the Compromisers were not at all inclined, like the
political dilettant Stankevich, to admire the beauties of that rising
tide which threatened to wash them off the revolutionary arena. They
learned from day to day with amazement and horror that they no longer
possessed any power of resistance. As a matter of fact, under the
confidence of the masses in the Compromisers there had lain concealed
from the first hours of the revolution a misunderstanding – historically
inevitable but not long-lasting. Only a few months had been required to
clear it up. The Compromisers had been compelled to talk with the
workers and soldiers in a wholly different language from that which they
employed in the Executive Committee, and still more in the Winter
Palace. The responsible leaders of the Social Revolutionaries and
Mensheviks, were more and more afraid as weeks passed, to come out into
the open square. Agitators of the second and third rank would go out,
and they would accommodate themselves to the social radicalism of the
people with the help of equivocal phrases. Or else they would become
sincerely infected with the mood of the factories, mines and barracks,
would begin to speak their language, and soon break away from their own
parties.

The sailor Khovrin tells in his memoirs how the seamen who considered
themselves Social Revolutionaries would in reality defend the Bolshevik
platform. This was to be observed everywhere. The people knew what they
wanted, but they did not know how to call it by name. That
“misunderstanding” which belonged to the inner essence of the February
revolution had a universal popular mass character – especially in the
villages, where it lasted longer than in the cities. Only experience
could introduce order into this chaos. Events, little and great, were
tirelessly shaking up the mass parties, bringing their membership into
correspondence with their policy and not their signboards.

An excellent example of this _qui pro quo_ between the Compromisers and
the masses, is to be seen in an oath taken at the beginning of July by
2,000 Donetz miners, kneeling with uncovered heads in the presence of a
crowd of 5,000 people and with its participation. “We swear by our
children, by God, by the heaven and earth, and by all things that we
hold sacred in the world, that we will never relinquish the freedom
bought with blood on the 28th of February, 1917; believing in the Social
Revolutionaries and the Mensheviks, we swear we will never listen to the
Leninists, for they, the Bolshevik-Leninists, are leading Russia to ruin
with their agitation, whereas the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks
united in a single union, say: The land to the people, land without
indemnities; the capitalist structure must fall after the war and in
place of capitalism there must be a socialist structure ... We give our
oath to march forward under the lead of these parties, not stopping even
at death.” This oath of the miners directed against the Bolsheviks in
reality led straight to the Bolshevik revolution. The February shell and
the October kernel appear in this naïve and fervent picture so clearly
as in a way to exhaust the whole problem of the Permanent Revolution.

By September the Donetz miners, without betraying either themselves or
their oath, had already turned their backs on the Compromisers. The most
backward ranks of the Ural miners had done the same thing. A member of
the Executive Committee, the Social Revolutionary Ozhegov, a
representative of the Urals, paid a visit early in August to his
Izhevsky factory. “I was dreadfully shocked,” he writes in his sorrowful
report, “by the sharp changes which had taken place in my absence. That
organization of the Social Revolutionary Party which, both for its
numbers (8,000 members), and its activities, was known throughout the
whole Ural region ... had been disintegrated and reduced to 500 people,
thanks to irresponsible agitators.”

The report of Ozhegov did not bring any unexpected news to the Executive
Committee: the same picture was to be seen in Petrograd. If after the
July raids the Social Revolutionaries temporarily leapt to the front in
the factories, and even in some places increased their influence, their
subsequent decline was only the more headlong. “To be sure, Kerensky’s
government conquered at the time,” wrote the Social Revolutionary V.
Zenzinov later, “the Bolshevik demonstrators were scattered, and the
chiefs of the Bolsheviks arrested, but that was a Pyrrhic victory.” That
is quite true: like King Pyrrhus the Compromisers won a victory at the
price of their army. “Whereas earlier, before July 3-5,” writes the
Petrograd worker, Skorinko, “the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries
had been able in some places to appear before the workers without the
risk of being whistled down, at present they had no such guarantee.” In
general they had no guarantees left.

The Social Revolutionary Party had not only lost its influence, but had
also changed its social constituency. The revolutionary workers had
already either gone over to the Bolsheviks or, in taking flight, were
going through an inner crisis. On the other hand, the sons of
shopkeepers, kulaks and petty officials who had been hiding in the
factories during the war, had had time to find out that the perfect
place for them was the Social Revolutionary party. In September,
however, even they were afraid to call themselves Social Revolutionaries
any longer – at least in Petrograd. The workers, the soldiers, and in
some provinces already even the peasants, had abandoned that party.
There remained in it only the conservative, bureaucratic and philistine
strata.

When the masses, awakened by the revolution, gave their confidence to
the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, both these parties were
tireless in praising the lofty intelligence of the people. When those
same masses, having passed through the school of events, began to turn
sharply toward the Bolsheviks, the Compromisers laid the blame for their
own collapse upon the ignorance of the people. But the masses would not
agree that they had become more ignorant. On the contrary it seemed to
them that they now understood what they had not understood before.

The Social Revolutionary party, as it withered and weakened, also began
to split along a social seam, in this process throwing its members over
into hostile camps. In the fields and villages there remained those
Social Revolutionaries who, side by side with the Bolsheviks and usually
under their leadership, had defended themselves against the blows dealt
out by Social Revolutionaries in the government. The sharpening struggle
between the two wings brought to life an intermediate group. Under the
leadership of Chernov, this group tried to preserve a unity between the
persecutors and the persecuted, became tangled up, arrived in hopeless
and often ludicrous contradictions, and still further compromised the
party. In order to make it possible for them to appear at mass meetings,
the Social Revolutionary orators were compelled insistently to recommend
themselves as “Lefts,” as internationalists, having nothing in common
with the clique of “March Social Revolutionaries.” After the July Days
the Left Social Revolutionaries came out in open opposition – still not
breaking formally with the party, but belatedly catching up the
arguments and slogans of the Bolsheviks. On the 21st of September,
Trotsky, not without a hidden pedagogical intention, declared at a
session of the Petrograd Soviet that it was becoming “easier and easier
for the Bolsheviks to come to an understanding with the Left Social
Revolutionaries.” In the end these people split off in the form of an
independent party, to inscribe in the book of revolution one of its most
fantastic pages. This was the last flare-up of self-sufficient
intellectual radicalism, and a few months after October there remained
nothing of it but a small heap of ashes.

There was a deep differentiation also among the Mensheviks. Their
Petrograd organization came into sharp conflict with their central
committee. Their central nucleus, led by Tseretelli, having no peasant
reserve such as the Social Revolutionaries possessed, melted even more
rapidly than they did. Intermediate social democratic groups, who
adhered to neither of the two principal camps, were still trying to
unite the Bolsheviks with the Mensheviks: they were still nourishing the
illusions of March, when even Stalin had thought desirable a union with
Tseretelli, and had believed that “we will live down petty disagreements
within the party.” In the latter part of August there occurred a fusion
of the Mensheviks with these advocates of union. At their joint session
the right wing had a decided preponderance, and the resolution of
Tseretelli favoring war and a coalition with the bourgeoisie got 117
votes against 79. Tseretelli’s victory in the party hastened the defeat
of the party in the working class. The Petrograd organization of
worker-Mensheviks, extremely few in number, followed Martov, pushing him
along, irritated by his indecisiveness and getting ready to go over to
the Bolsheviks. In the middle of September the organization of the
Vassilie Island district joined the Bolshevik party almost as a unit.
That hastened the agitation in other districts and in the provinces. The
leaders of the different trends of Menshevism furiously accused each
other in joint sessions of destroying the party. Gorky’s paper,
belonging to the left flank of the Mensheviks, stated at the end of
September that the Petrograd organization of the party, which had a
little while ago numbered about 10,000 members, “had practically ceased
to exist ... The last all-city conference was unable to meet for lack of
a quorum.”

Plekhanov was attacking the Mensheviks from the right. “Tseretelli and
his friends,” he said, “without themselves knowing or desiring it, have
been preparing the road for Lenin.” The political condition of
Tseretelli himself in the days of the September tide, is clearly
depicted in the memoirs of the Kadet, Nabokov: “The most characteristic
quality of his mood at that time was fright at the rising tide of
Bolshevism. I remember how he spoke to me in a heart to heart
conversation about the possibility of a seizure of power by the
Bolsheviks. ‘Of course,’ he said, ‘they will not hold out more than two
or three weeks, but only think what destruction that will mean. This we
must avoid at any cost.’ In his voice was a note of genuine,
panic-stricken alarm.” Tseretelli was experiencing before October those
same moods which had been familiar to Nabokov in the February days.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The soviets were the arena in which the Bolsheviks functioned side by
side with the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, although in
continual conflict with them. The change in the relative power of the
soviet parties did not, to be sure, immediately, but only with
unavoidable laggings and artificial postponements, find its expression
in the make-up of the soviets and their social functioning.

Many of the provincial soviets had already, before the July Days, become
organs of power. It was so in Ivanovo-Voznesensk, Lugansk, Tzaritzyn,
Kherson, Tomsk, Vladivostok – if not formally, at least in fact, and if
not continually at least sporadically. The Krasnoyarsk Soviet quite
independently introduced a system of cards for the purchase of objects
of personal consumption. The compromisist soviet in Saratov was
compelled to interfere in economic conflicts, to arrest manufacturers,
confiscate the tramway belonging to Belgians, introduce workers’
control, and organize production in the abandoned factories. In the
Urals, where ever since 1905 the Bolsheviks had enjoyed a predominant
political influence, the soviets frequently instituted courts of justice
for the trial of citizens, created their own militia in several
factories, paying for its equipment out of the factory cash-box,
organized a workers’ inspection which assembled raw materials and fuel
for the factories, superintended the sale of manufactured goods and
established a wage scale. In certain districts of the Urals the soviets
took the land from the landlords and put it under social cultivation. At
the Simsk metal works, the soviets organized a regional factory
administration which took charge of the whole administration, the
cash-box, the bookkeeping, and the sales department. By this act the
nationalization of the Simsk metal district was roughly accomplished.
“As early as July,” writes V. Eltsin, from whom we borrow these data,
“not only was everything in the Ural factories in the hands of the
Bolsheviks, but the Bolsheviks were already giving object lessons in the
solution of political, economic and agrarian problems.” These lessons
were primitive – they were not reduced to a system, not illumined by a
theory – but in many respects they anticipated the future roads to be
travelled.

The July Days hit the soviets far harder than the party or the trade
unions, for the struggle then was primarily for the life and death of
the soviets. The party and the trade unions would retain their
significance both in a “peaceful” period and during the difficult times
of reaction. Their tasks and methods would change, but not their basic
functions. The soviets, however, could survive only on the basis of a
revolutionary situation, and would disappear along with it. Uniting the
majority of the working class, they brought it face to face with a
problem which rises above the needs of all private persons, groups and
guilds, above the wage problem, the problem of reforms and improvements
in general – the problem, that is, of a conquest of power. But the
slogan “All Power to the Soviets” seemed shattered along with the July
demonstration of the workers and soldiers. That defeat which weakened
the Bolsheviks in the soviets, weakened the soviets in the state
incomparably more. “The government of salvation” meant the resurrection
of an independent bureaucracy. The renunciation of power by the soviets
meant their humiliation before the commissars, their enfeeblement, their
fading away.

The decline in the significance of the Executive Committee found a vivid
external expression: the government suggested to the Compromisers that
they evacuate the Tauride Palace on the ground that it required repairs
in preparation for the Constituent Assembly. During the first half of
July the building of Smolny, where formerly the daughters of the
nobility had been educated, was set apart for the soviets. The bourgeois
press now wrote about the giving over to the soviets of the house of the
“white doves,” in the same tone in which they had formerly talked of the
seizure of the Palace of Kshesinskaia by the Bolsheviks. Various
revolutionary organizations, among them the trade unions which were
occupying requisitioned buildings, were subjected to attack at the same
time on the ground of the housing problem. It was no other but a
question of crowding the workers’ revolution out of the too extensive
quarters seized by it within bourgeois society. The Kadet press knew no
limit to its indignation – somewhat belated to be sure – over the
vandalism of the people, their trampling upon the rights of private and
state property. But toward the end of July an unexpected fact was laid
bare through the medium of the typographical workers. The parties
grouped around the notorious Committee of the State Duma had long ago,
it appeared, appropriated to their needs the opulent state printing
plant, its despatching facilities and its franking privileges. The
agitational brochures of the Kadet party were not only being printed
free, but freely distributed by the ton, and moreover with preferential
rights, throughout the whole country. The Executive Committee, placed
under the necessity of examining this charge, was obliged to confirm it.
The Kadet party, to be sure, only found a new theme for indignation:
Could you, indeed, for a moment place in the same category the seizure
of government buildings for destructive purposes, and the use of the
properties of the state for the defense of its greatest treasures? In a
word, if we gentlemen have somewhat light-fingeredly robbed the state,
it is only in its own interest. But this argument did not seem
convincing to all. The building trades stubbornly believed that they had
more right to a building for their union than the Kadets had to the
government printing office. This disagreement was not accidental: it was
leading straight to the second revolution. The Kadets were compelled, in
any case, to bite their tongues a little.

One of the instructors sent out during the second half of August by the
Executive Committee, having made the rounds of the soviets in the south
of Russia, where the Bolsheviks were considerably weaker than in the
north, made this report of his disturbing observations: “The political
moods are noticeably changing ... In the upper circles of the masses a
revolutionary mood is growing, as a result of the shift in the policy of
the Provisional Government ... In the masses a weariness and
indifference to the revolution is to be felt. There is a noticeable
coolness toward the soviets ... The functions of the soviets are
decreasing little by little.” That the masses were getting tired of the
vacillations of their democratic intermediaries is beyond a doubt, but
it was not to the revolution, but to the Social Revolutionaries and
Mensheviks, that they were growing cold. This situation was especially
unbearable in those localities where the power was, in spite of all
programs, actually concentrated in the hands of the compromisist
soviets. Utterly entangled in the capitulation of the Executive
Committee before the bureaucracy, the leaders no longer dared make any
use of their power, and merely compromised the soviets in the eyes of
the masses. A considerable part of the ordinary everyday work, moreover,
had passed over from the soviets to the democratic municipalities – a
still greater part to the trade unions and factory and shop committees.
Less and less clear became the answer to the question: Will the soviets
survive? And what will their future be?

During the first months of their existence, the soviets, far
outstripping all other organizations, had taken upon themselves the task
of creating trade unions, factory committees, clubs, and played a
leading part in their work. But once they got on their own feet, these
workers’ organizations came more and more under the leadership of the
Bolsheviks. “The factory and shop committees,” wrote Trotsky in August,
“are not created out of temporary meetings. The masses elect to these
committees those who at home in the everyday life of the factory have
demonstrated their firmness, their business-like character, and their
devotion to the interests of the workers. And these same factory
committees ... in their overwhelming majority consist of Bolsheviks.”
There could no longer be any talk of a guardianship over the factory
committees and trade unions exercised by the compromisist soviets. On
the contrary, there was a bitter struggle between them. In those
problems which touched the masses to the quick, the soviets were proving
less and less capable of standing up against the trade unions and
factory committees. Thus, for instance, the Moscow unions carried out a
general strike in opposition to the decision of the soviets. In a less
clear form similar conflicts were taking place everywhere, and it was
not the soviets which usually came off victorious.

Driven up a blind alley by their own policy, the Compromisers found
themselves obliged to “think up” incidental occupations for the soviets,
to switch them over into the cultural field – in the essence of the
matter, to entertain them. In vain. The soviets were created to conduct
a struggle for power; for other tasks, other more appropriate
organizations existed. “The entire work of our soviet, running in the
Menshevik and Social Revolutionary channel,” writes the Saratov
Bolshevik, Antonov, “lost all meaning ... At a meeting of the Executive
Committee we would yawn from boredom till it became indecent. The Social
Revolutionary-Menshevik talking-mill was empty and trivial.”

The sickly soviets were becoming less and less able to serve as a
support to their Petrograd center. The correspondence between Smolny and
the localities was going into a decline: there was nothing to write
about, nothing to propose; no prospects remained, and no tasks. This
isolation from the masses took the very palpable form of a financial
crisis. The compromisist soviets in the provinces were themselves
without means, and therefore could not offer support to their staff in
Smolny; and the left soviets demonstratively refused financial support
to an Executive Committee which had dishonored itself by participating
in the work of the counterrevolution.

This process of fading out of the soviets was crossed, however, by
processes of another and partly opposite character. Far-off frontiers,
backward counties, and inaccessible corners were waking up and creating
their own soviets, and these would manifest a revolutionary freshness
until they fell under the demoralizing influence of the center, or under
the repressions of the government. The total number of soviets was
growing rapidly. At the end of August, the secretariat of the Executive
Committee counted as many as 600 soviets, behind which stood 23 million
electors. The official soviet system had been raised up over a human
ocean which was billowing powerfully and driving its waves leftward.

The political revival of the soviets, which coincided with their
Bolshevization, began from the bottom. In Petrograd the first voice to
be lifted was that of the district locals. On July 21, a delegation from
an inter-district conference of the soviets presented to the Executive
Committee a list of demands: dissolve the State Duma, confirm the
inviolability of the army organizations by a decree of the government,
restore the left press, stop the disarming of workers, put an end to
mass arrests, bridle the right press, bring to an end the disbandment of
regiments and the death penalty at the front. A lowering of the
political demands here, in comparison with the July demonstration, is
quite obvious; but this was only a first step toward convalescence. In
cutting down the slogans, the districts were trying to broaden their
base. The leaders of the Executive Committee diplomatically welcomed the
“sensitiveness” of the district soviets, but confined their response to
the assertion that all misfortunes had resulted from the July
insurrection. The two sides parted politely but coolly.

Upon this program of the district soviets a significant campaign was
opened. _Izvestia_ printed from day to day resolutions of soviets, trade
unions, factories, battleships, army units, demanding the dissolution of
the State Duma, an end of repressions against the Bolsheviks and
indulgences to the counter-revolution. Upon this general background,
certain more radical voices were heard. On the 22nd of July the soviet
of Moscow Province, considerably in advance of the soviet of Moscow
itself, passed a resolution in favor of the transfer of power to the
soviets. On July 26 the Ivanovo-Voznesensk soviet “branded with
contempt” the method of struggle employed against the party of the
Bolsheviks, and sent a greeting to Lenin, “the glorious leader of the
revolutionary proletariat.” Elections held at the end of July and during
the first half of August at many points in the country brought about as
a general rule a strengthening of the Bolshevik factions in the soviets.
In Kronstadt, raided and made notorious throughout Russia, the new
soviet contained 100 Bolsheviks, 75 Left Social Revolutionaries, 12
Menshevik-Internationalists, 7 anarchists, and over 90 non-party men of
whom not one dared openly acknowledge his sympathy for the Compromisers.
At a regional congress of the soviets of the Urals, opening on August
18, there were 86 Bolsheviks, 40 Social Revolutionaries, 23 Mensheviks.
Tzaritzyn became an object of special hatred to the bourgeois press, for
here not only had the soviet become Bolshevik, but the leader of the
local Bolsheviks, Minin, was elected burgomaster. Kerensky sent a
punitive expedition against Tzaritzyn, a city which was a red rag to the
Don Cossack ataman Kaledin – without any serious pretext and with the
sole aim of destroying a revolutionary nest. In Petrograd, Moscow, and
all the industrial districts, more and more hands were being raised
every day for the Bolshevik proposals.

The events at the end of August subjected the soviets to a test. Under
the shadow of danger an inner regrouping took place very swiftly; it
took place everywhere, and with comparatively little debate. In the
provinces as in Petrograd, the Bolsheviks – step-children of the
official soviet system – were advanced to the front rank. But also in
the staff of the Compromise party, the “March” socialists, the
politicians of ministerial and official waiting-rooms, were temporarily
crowded back by more militant elements tempered in the underground
movement. For this new grouping of forces a new organizational form was
needed. The leadership of the revolutionary defense was nowhere
concentrated in the hands of the executive committees. They were of
little use in the form in which Kornilov’s insurrection found them for
fighting action. Everywhere there were formed special committees of
defense, revolutionary committees, staffs. They relied upon the soviets,
made reports to them, but represented a new selection of elements, a new
method of action corresponding to the revolutionary nature of the task.

The Moscow soviet created – as in the days of the State Conference – a
fighting group of six, which alone should have the right to deploy armed
forces and make arrests. The regional congress of Kiev, which met at the
end of August, advised its local soviets not to hesitate to replace
unreliable representatives of the power, both military and civil, and
take measures for the immediate arrest of counter-revolutionists and the
arming of the workers. In Vyatka the soviet committee assumed
extraordinary rights, including the disposition of the armed forces. In
Tzaritzyn the whole power went over to the soviet staff. In
Nizhni-Novgorod the revolutionary committee established its sentries at
the post and telegraph offices. The Krasnoyarsk soviet concentrated both
the civil and military power in its hands.

With various qualifications – at times substantial – this same picture
was reproduced almost everywhere. And it was by no means a mere
imitation of Petrograd. The mass constitution of the soviets gave the
character of a general law to their inner evolution, making them all
react in like manner to any great event. While the two parts of the
coalition were divided by a civil war front, the soviets had actually
gathered around themselves all the living forces of the nation. Running
into this wall the offensive of the generals had crumbled into dust. A
more instructive lesson could not possibly be demanded. “In spite of all
efforts of the authorities to crowd out the soviets and deprive them of
power,” says the declaration of the Bolsheviks on this theme, “the
soviets manifested during the putting down of the Kornilov revolt the
irrepressible ... might and initiative of the popular mass ... After
this new experience, which nothing will ever drive out of the
consciousness of the workers, soldiers and peasants, the cry raised at
the very beginning of the revolution by our party – ‘All Power to the
Soviets!’ – has become the voice of the whole revolutionary country.”

The city dumas, which had made an effort to compete with the soviets,
died down in the days of danger and vanished. The Petrograd duma humbly
sent its delegation to the Soviet “for an explanation of the general
situation and the establishment of contact.” It would seem as though the
soviets, elected by a part of the city’s population, should have had
less power and influence than the dumas, elected by the whole
population. But the dialectic of the revolutionary process has
demonstrated that in certain historic conditions the part is
incomparably greater than the whole. As in the government, so in the
duma, the Compromisers formed a bloc with the Kadets against the
Bolsheviks, and that bloc paralyzed the duma as it had the government.
The soviet, on the other hand, proved the natural form of defensive
cooperation between the Compromisers and the Bolsheviks against the
attack of the bourgeoisie.

After the Kornilov days a new chapter opened for the soviets. Although
the Compromisers still retained a considerable number of bad spots,
especially in the garrison, the Petrograd soviet showed such a sharp
careen in the direction of the Bolsheviks as to astonish both camps-both
Right and Left. On the night of September 1, while still under the
presidency of Cheidze, the Soviet voted for a government of workers and
peasants. The rank-and-file members of the compromisist factions almost
solidly supported the resolution of the Bolsheviks. The rival proposal
of Tseretelli got only about 15 votes. The compromisist praesidium could
not believe their eyes. The Right demanded a roll call, and this dragged
on until three o’clock in the morning. To avoid openly voting against
their parties, many of the delegates went home. But even so, and in
spite of all methods of pressure, the resolution of the Bolsheviks
received in the final vote 279 votes against 115. That was a big fact.
That was the beginning of the end. The praesidium, stunned, announced
that they would resign.

On September 2nd at a joint session of the Russian soviet institutions
of Finland, a resolution was adopted by 700 votes against 13, with 36
abstaining, favoring a government of soviets. On the 5th, the Moscow
soviet followed in the steps of the Petrograd. By 355 votes against 254,
it not only expressed its want of confidence in the Provisional
Government, declaring it a weapon of counter-revolution, but also
condemned the coalition policy of the Executive Committee. The
praesidium, headed by Khinchuk, announced they would resign. A congress
of the soviets of central Siberia, meeting at Krasnoyarsk on September
5, followed the Bolshevik leadership throughout. On the 8th, the
Bolshevik resolution was adopted in the Kiev soviet of workers’ deputies
by a majority of 130 against 66 – although there were only 95 deputies
in the official Bolshevik faction. At the Finland congress of the
soviets which met on the 10th, 150,000 sailors, soldiers and Russian
workers were represented by 69 Bolsheviks, 48 Left Social
Revolutionaries, and a few non-party men. The soviet of peasants’
deputies of Petrograd Province elected the Bolshevik, Sergeiev, as
delegate to the Democratic Conference. Here again it was revealed that
in those cases where the party is able through the mediation of workers
or soldiers to get into immediate contact with the villages, the
peasantry eagerly flock to its banner.

The dominance of the Bolshevik party in the Petrograd Soviet was
dramatically certified at the historic session of September 9. All the
factions had diligently rounded up their members: “It is a question of
the fate of the soviets.” About 1,000 workers’ and soldiers’ deputies
assembled. Had the vote of September 1st been a mere episode caused by
the accidental constitution of the session, or did it mean a complete
change in the policy of the Soviet? Thus the question was posed. Fearing
lest they could not assemble a majority against the praesidium, of which
all the compromise leaders were members – Cheidze, Tseretelli, Chernov,
Gotz, Dan, Skobelev – the Bolshevik faction made a motion that the
praesidium be elected on a proportional basis. This proposal, which
would obscure to a certain degree the sharpness of the conflict about
principles, and was on this account roundly condemned by Lenin, had this
tactical advantage, that it made sure of the support of the wavering
elements. But Tseretelli rejected the compromise. The praesidium wants
to know, he said, whether the Soviet has actually changed its direction:
“We cannot carry out the tactics of the Bolsheviks.” The resolution
introduced by the Right declared that the vote of September 1st did not
correspond to the political line of the Soviet, and that the Soviet had
confidence, as before, in its praesidium. There was nothing left for the
Bolsheviks to do but accept the challenge, and that they did with great
willingness. Trotsky, appearing for the first time after his liberation
from prison and warmly welcomed by a considerable part of the assembly –
both sides were inwardly measuring the applause: is it a majority or
not? – demanded an explanation before the vote: Is Kerensky, as before,
a member of the praesidium? The praesidium, after hesitating a moment,
answered in the affirmative – thus, although already weighed down with
sins, tying another millstone around its neck. “We had firmly believed,”
said Trotsky, “... that Kerensky would not be allowed to sit in the
praesidium. We were mistaken. The ghost of Kerensky now sits between Dan
and Cheidze ... When they propose to you to sanction the political line
of the praesidium, do not forget that you will be sanctioning the
policies of Kerensky.” The meeting proceeded in the utmost imaginable
tension. Order was preserved by the desire of each and every person
there not to permit an explosion. They all wanted to count as soon as
possible the numbers of their friends and enemies. All understood that
they were deciding the question of power – of the war – of the fate of
the revolution. It was decided to vote by the method of withdrawing from
the room. Those should go out who accepted the resignation of the
praesidium: it is easier for a minority to go out than a majority. In
every corner of the hall an impassioned although whispered agitation now
began. The old praesidium or the new? The Coalition or the Soviet Power?
A large crowd of people seemed to be drifting towards the door – too
large, in the opinion of the praesidium. The Bolshevik leaders, on their
part, estimated that they would lack about 100 votes of the majority.
“And that will be doing excellently well,” they comforted themselves in
advance. But the workers and soldiers kept on drifting and drifting
toward the door. There was a hushed rumble of voices – brief explosions
of loud argument. From one side a voice shouted out: “Kornilovists!”
From the other: “July heroes!” The procedure lasted about an hour. The
arms of an unseen scale were oscillating. The praesidium, hardly able to
contain its excitement, remained throughout the whole hour upon the
platform. At last the result was counted and weighed: For the praesidium
and the Coalition, 414 votes; against, 519; abstaining, 67! The new
majority applauded like a storm, ecstatically, furiously. It had a right
to. The victory had been well paid for. A good part of the road lay
behind.

Still bewildered by the blow, with long faces, the overthrown leaders
withdraw from the platform. Tseretelli cannot refrain from one last
dreadful prophecy. “We withdraw from this tribune,” he cries, turning
halfway round as he moves, “in the consciousness that for half a year we
have held worthily and held high the banner of the revolution. This
banner has now passed into your hands. We can only express the wish that
you may be able to hold it in the same way for half as long!” Tseretelli
was cruelly mistaken about his dates as about everything.

The Petrograd Soviet, the parent of all the other soviets, henceforth
stood under the leadership of the Bolsheviks, who had been only
yesterday “an insignificant little bunch of demagogues.” Trotsky, from
the tribune, reminded the praesidium that the charge against the
Bolsheviks of being in the service of the German staff had not been
withdrawn. “Let the Miliukovs and Guchkovs tell the story of their lives
day by day. They dare not do it. But we are ready any day to give an
account of our activities. We have nothing to hide from the Russian
people ...” The Petrograd soviet in a special resolution “branded with
contempt the authors, distributors and promoters of the slander.”

The Bolsheviks now entered upon their inheritance. It proved at once
colossal and extraordinarily slender. The Executive Committee had in
good season taken away from the Petrograd Soviet the two newspapers
established by it, all the administrative offices, all funds and all
technical equipment, including the typewriters and inkwells. The
innumerable automobiles which had been at the disposal of the Soviet
since the February days had every last one of them been transferred into
the keeping of the compromisist Olympus. The new leaders had nothing –
no treasury, no newspapers, no secretarial apparatus, no means of
locomotion, no pen and no pencil. Nothing but the blank walls and – the
burning confidence of the workers and soldiers. That, however, proved
sufficient.

After this fundamental break in the policy of the Soviet, the ranks of
the Compromisers began to melt even more rapidly. On the 11th of
September, when Dan defended the Coalition before the Petrograd Soviet
and Trotsky spoke for a soviet government, the Coalition was rejected by
all votes against 10, with 7 abstaining! On the same day the Moscow
soviet by a unanimous vote condemned the repressions against the
Bolsheviks. The Compromisers soon found themselves pushed away into a
narrow sector on the right, such as that which the Bolsheviks had
occupied on the left at the beginning of the revolution. But with what a
difference! The Bolsheviks had always been stronger among the masses
than in the soviets. The Compromisers, on the contrary, still had a
larger place in the soviets than among the masses. The Bolsheviks in
their period of weakness had a future. The Compromisers had nothing left
but a past – and one of which they had no reason to be proud.

Together with its change of course the Petrograd Soviet changed its
external aspect. The compromise leaders completely disappeared from the
horizon, digging themselves in in the Executive Committee. In the Soviet
they were displaced by stars of the second and third magnitude. With the
disappearance of Tseretelli, Chernov, Avksteniev, Skobelev, the friends
and admirers of these democratic ministers also ceased to appear – the
radical-minded officers and ladies, the semi-socialistic writers, the
people of culture and celebrity. The Soviet became more homogeneous –
grayer, darker, more serious.



CHAPTER 36 THE BOLSHEVIKS AND THE SOVIETS


 

Upon a close examination, the means and implements of the Bolshevik
agitation seem not only completely out of proportion to the political
influence of Bolshevism, but simply amazing in their insignificance. Up
to the July days the party had 41 publications counting weeklies and
monthlies, with a total circulation, counting everything, of 320,000.
After the July raids the circulation dwindled by half. At the end of
August the central organ of the Party was printing 50,000 copies. In the
days when the party was winning over the Petrograd and Moscow soviets,
the cash in the treasury of the Central Committee amounted to only
30,000 paper roubles.

The intelligentsia hardly came into the Bolshevik party at all. A broad
layer of so-called “old Bolsheviks,” from among the students who had
associated themselves with the revolution of 1905, had since turned into
extraordinarily successful engineers, physicians, government officials,
and they now unceremoniously showed the party the hostile aspect of
their backs. Even in Petrograd there was felt at every step a lack of
journalists, speakers, agitators; and the provinces were wholly deprived
of what few they had had. “There are no leaders; there are no
politically literate people who can explain to the masses what the
Bolsheviks want!” – this cry came from hundreds of remote corners, and
especially from the front. In the villages there were almost no
Bolshevik nuclei at all. Postal communications were in complete
disorder. The local organizations, left to their own devices, would
occasionally reproach the Central Committee – and not without foundation
– that it was concerning itself only with Petrograd.

How was it that with this weak apparatus and this negligible circulation
of the party press, the ideas and slogans of Bolshevism were able to
take possession of the people? The explanation is very simple: those
slogans which correspond to the keen demands of a class and an epoch
create thousands of channels for themselves. A red-hot revolutionary
medium is a high conductor of ideas. The Bolshevik papers were read
aloud, were read all to pieces. The most important articles were learned
by heart, recited, copied, and wherever possible reprinted. “Our staff
printing plant,” says the soldier, Pereiko, “performed a great service
for the revolution. How many individual articles from _Pravda_ were
reprinted by us, and how many small brochures, very close and
comprehensible to the soldiers! And all these were swiftly distributed
along the front with the help of air mails, bicycles and motorcycles
...” At the same time the bourgeois press, although supplied to the
front free of cost in millions of copies, hardly found a reader. The
heavy bales remained unopened. This boycott of the “patriotic” press at
times assumed a demonstrative form. Representatives of the 18th Siberian
division passed a resolution asking the bourgeois parties to stop
sending literature, inasmuch as it was “fruitlessly used to boil the hot
water for tea.” The Bolshevik press was very differently employed. Hence
the coefficient of its useful – or if you prefer, harmful –
effectiveness was incomparably higher.

The usual explanation of the success of Bolshevism reduced itself to a
remark upon “the simplicity of its slogans,” which fell in with the
desires of the masses. In this there is a certain element of truth. The
wholeness of the Bolshevik policy was due to the fact that, in contrast
to the “democratic parties,” the Bolsheviks were free from unexpressed
or semi-expressed gospels reducing themselves in the last analysis to a
defense of private property. However, that distinction alone does not
exhaust the matter. While on the right the “democracy” was competing
with the Bolsheviks, on the left too there were the anarchists, the
Maximalists, the Left Social Revolutionaries, trying to crowd them out.
But these groups too – none of them ever emerged from its impotent
state. What distinguished Bolshevism was that it subordinated the
subjective goal, the defense of the interests of the popular masses, to
the laws of revolution as an objectively conditioned process. The
scientific discovery of these laws, and first of all those which govern
the movement of popular masses, constituted the basis of the Bolshevik
strategy. The toilers are guided in their struggle not only by their
demands, not only by their needs, but by their life experiences.
Bolshevism had absolutely no taint of any aristocratic scorn for the
independent experience of the masses. On the contrary, the Bolsheviks
took this for their point of departure and built upon it. That was one
of their great points of superiority.

Revolutions are always verbose, and the Bolsheviks did not escape from
this law. But whereas the agitation of the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries was scattered, self-contradictory and oftenest of all
evasive, the agitation of the Bolsheviks was distinguished by its
concentrated and well thought-out character. The Compromisers talked
themselves out of difficulties; the Bolsheviks went to meet them. A
continual analysis of the objective situation, a testing of slogans upon
facts, a serious attitude to the enemy even when he was none too
serious, gave special strength and power of conviction to the Bolshevik
agitation.

The party press did not exaggerate success, did not distort the
correlation of forces, did not try to win by shouting. The school of
Lenin was a school of revolutionary realism. The data supplied by the
Bolshevik press of 1917 are proving, in the light of historic criticism
and the documents of the epoch, incomparably more correct than the data
supplied by all the other newspapers. This correctness was a result of
the revolutionary strength of the Bolsheviks, but at the same time it
reinforced their strength. The renunciation of this tradition has
subsequently become one of the most malignant features of epigonism.

“We are not charlatans,” said Lenin immediately after his arrival. “We
must base ourselves only upon the consciousness of the masses. Even if
it is necessary to remain in a minority, be it so ... We must not be
afraid to be a minority ... We will carry on the work of criticism in
order to free the masses from deceit. Our line will prove right. All the
oppressed will come to us. They have no other way out.” Here we have the
Bolshevik policy, comprehensible from beginning to end as the direct
opposite of demagoguism and adventurism.

Lenin is in hiding. He is intently watching the papers, reading as
always between the lines, or catching in personal conversations – not
very frequent – the echo of ideas not thought out, intentions not
expressed. The masses are on the ebb. Martov, while defending the
Bolsheviks from slander, is at the same time indulging in mournful irony
at the expense of a party which has been so “crafty” as to defeat
itself. Lenin guesses – and direct rumors of this will soon reach him –
that even some of the Bolsheviks, too, are not free from a note of
repentance, that the impressionable Lunacharsky is not alone. Lenin
writes about the whimpering of the petty bourgeois, and about the
“renegadism” of those Bolsheviks who show a disposition to respond to
this whimpering. The Bolsheviks in the districts and in the provinces
catch up with approval these austere words. They are again and more
solidly convinced: “The old man is not losing his head. His will is
firm. He will not surrender to any accidental mood.”

A member of the central committee of the Bolsheviks – perhaps Sverdlov –
writes to a province: “We are temporarily without newspapers ... The
organization is not broken up ... The congress is not postponed.” Lenin,
so far as his enforced isolation permits, attentively follows the
preparation for the party congress, and designates its fundamental
problem: to plan the further offensive. The congress was described in
advance as a joint congress, since it was to bring about the inclusion
in the Bolshevik party of certain autonomous revolutionary groups. Chief
among these was the Petrograd inter-district organization to which
belonged Trotsky, Joffe, Uritsky, Riazanov, Lunacharsky, Pokrovsky,
Manuilsky, Karakhan, Urenev, and several other revolutionists known in
the past, or still only coming to be known.

On July 2, on the very eve of the demonstration, a conference had been
held of the Mezhrayontsi[1] representing about 4,000 workers. “The
majority,” writes Sukhanov, who was present in the gallery, “were
workers and soldiers unknown to me ... A feverish work had been carried
on and its success was palpable to us all. There was only one
difficulty: What is the difference between you and the Bolsheviks, and
why are you not with them?” In order to hasten that fusion which certain
individual leaders of the organization were trying to postpone, Trotsky
published in _Pravda_ the following statement: “There are in my opinion
at the present time no differences either in principle or tactics
between the inter-district and the Bolshevik organizations. Accordingly
there are no motives which justify the separate existence of these
organizations.”

The joint congress opened on July 26 – in essence the 6th congress of
the Bolshevik party – and it conducted its meetings semi-legally,
concealing itself alternately in two different workers’ districts. There
were 175 delegates, 157 with a vote, representing 112 organizations,
comprising 176,750 members. In Petrograd there were 41,000 members:
36,000 in the Bolshevik organization, 4,000 Mezhrayontsi, and about
1,000 in the Military Organization. In the central industrial regions,
of which Moscow is the focus, the party had 42,000 members; in the Urals
25,000; in the Donetz Basin about 15,000. In the Caucasus, big Bolshevik
organizations were to be found in Baku, Grozny, and Tiflis. The first
two were almost wholly composed of workers; in Tiflis the soldiers
predominated.

The personnel of the congress embodied the pre-revolutionary past of the
party. Out of 171 delegates who filled out a questionnaire, 110 had
spent 245 years in prison, 10 delegates had spent 41 years at hard
labor, 24 had spent 73 years in penal settlements, 55 delegates had been
in exile 127 years; 27 had been abroad for 89 years; 150 had been
arrested 549 times.

“At that congress,” as Piatnitsky, one of the present secretaries of the
Communist International, later remembered, “neither Lenin, nor Trotsky,
nor Zinoviev, nor Kamenev was present ... Although the question of the
party program was withdrawn from the agenda, nevertheless the congress
went off well and in a businesslike way without the leaders of the party
...” At the basis of the work lay the theses of Lenin. Bukharin and
Stalin made the principal reports. The report of Stalin is a good
measure of the distance travelled by the speaker himself, along with all
the cadres of the party, in the four months since Lenin’s arrival. With
theoretical diffidence, but political decisiveness, Stalin tries to name
over those features which define “the deep character of a socialist
workers’ revolution.” The unanimity of this conference in comparison
with the April one is noticeable at once.

On the subject of elections to the Central Committee, the report of the
congress reads: “The names of the four members of the Central Committee
receiving the most votes are read aloud: Lenin – 133 votes out of 134.
Zinoviev 132, Kamenev 131, and Trotsky 131. Besides these four, the
following members were elected to the Central Committee: Nogin,
Kollantai, Stalin, Sverdlov, Rykov, Bukharin, Artem, Joffe, Uritsky,
Miliutin, Lomov.” The membership of this Central Committee should be
well noted. Under its leadership the October Revolution is to be
achieved.

Martov greeted the congress with a letter in which he again expressed
his deep indignation against the campaign of slander, but on fundamental
problems remained standing upon the threshold of action. “We must not
substitute for the conquest of power by a majority of the revolutionary
democracy, the conquest of power in a struggle with that majority and
against it ...” By “a majority of the revolutionary democracy” Martov
meant, as before, the official soviet representation which had no longer
any ground under its feet. “Martov is bound up with the social patriots,
not only by an empty factional tradition,” wrote Trotsky at that time,
“but by a profoundly opportunistic attitude to the social revolution as
to a far-off goal which cannot determine our approach to the problems of
today. That of itself separates him from us.”

Only a small number of Left Mensheviks, headed by Larin, decisively came
over to the Bolsheviks during this period. Urenev, future soviet
diplomat, making the report to the conference on the subject of fusion
with these Internationalists, came to the conclusion that it was
necessary to fuse with “a minority of the minority of the Mensheviks
...” A copious flow of former Mensheviks into the party began only after
the October revolution. Adhering not to the proletarian insurrection,
but to the power which issued from it, the Mensheviks here revealed the
fundamental quality of opportunism – submission to the existing powers.
Lenin, always extremely sensitive to the question of the ingredients of
the party, soon came forward with the demand that 99 per cent of the
Mensheviks who had joined after the October revolution be expelled. He
was far from attaining that goal. Subsequently the doors were opened
wide to Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries, and former Compromisers
have become one of the bulwarks of the Stalinist party régime. But all
that has to do with later times.

Sverdlov, the practical organizer of the congress, reported: “Trotsky
had already before the congress joined the editorial staff of our paper,
but his imprisonment prevented his actual participation.” It was only at
this July congress that Trotsky formally joined the Bolshevik party. The
balance was here struck to years of disagreement and factional struggle.
Trotsky came to Lenin as to a teacher whose power and significance he
understood later than many others, but perhaps more fully than they.
Raskolnikov, who was in close contact with Trotsky from the time of his
arrival from Canada, and afterward passed several weeks side by side
with him in prison, has written in his memoirs: “Trotsky’s attitude to
Vladimir Ilych (Lenin) was one of enormous esteem. He placed him higher
than any contemporary he had met with, either in Russia or abroad. In
the tone in which Trotsky spoke of Lenin you felt the devotion of a
disciple. In those times Lenin had behind him thirty years’ service to
the proletariat, and Trotsky twenty. The echoes of their disagreements
during the pre-war period were completely gone. No difference existed
between the tactical line of Lenin and Trotsky. Their rapprochement,
already noticeable during the war, was completely and unquestionably
determined, from the moment of the return of Lyev Davidovich (Trotsky)
to Russia. After his very first speeches all of us old Leninists felt
that he was ours.” To this we may add that the mere number of votes cast
for Trotsky in electing him to the Central Committee proves that even at
the very moment of his entrance into the party, nobody in Bolshevik
circles looked upon him as an outsider.

Invisibly present at the congress, Lenin introduced into its work a
spirit of responsibility and audacity. The founder and teacher of this
party could not endure slovenliness, either in theory or in practical
politics. He knew that an incorrect economic formula, like an
inattentive political observation, takes cruel vengeance in the hour of
action. In defending his fastidiously attentive attitude to every party
text, even the secondary ones, Lenin said more than once: “This is not a
trivial detail. We must have accuracy. Our agitators will learn this and
not go astray ...” “We have a good party,” he would add, having in view
just this serious, meticulous attitude of the rank-and-file agitator
upon the question what to say and how to say it.

The audacity of the Bolshevik slogans more than once produced a
fantastic impression. Lenin’s April theses were greeted in this way. In
reality the fantastic thing in a revolutionary epoch is
near-sightedness. Realism at such times is unthinkable without a policy
of long aim. It is not enough to say that anything fantastic was wholly
alien to Bolshevism. The fact is that the party of Lenin was the sole
party of political realism in the revolution.

In June and early July the worker Bolsheviks complained more than once
that they were often compelled to play the rôle of fire hose in relation
to the masses – and this, too, not always successfully. July brought,
along with its defeat, a lesson dearly paid for. The masses became far
more attentive to the warnings of the party, more understanding of its
tactical calculations. The July congress of the party ratified those
warnings. “The proletariat must not yield to the provocations of the
bourgeoisie, who at the present time would be only too glad to incite us
to a premature battle.” The whole of August, and especially the latter
half, was marked by continual warnings from the party to the workers and
soldiers: Do not go into the street. The Bolshevik leaders themselves
often joked about the similarity of their warnings to the political
_leitmotif_ of the German social democracy, which has invariably
restrained the masses from every serious struggle by referring to the
danger of provocateurs and the necessity of accumulating strength. In
reality the similarity was imaginary. The Bolsheviks well understood
that strength is accumulated in struggle and not in passive evasion of
it. The study of reality was for Lenin only a theoretical reconnoitre in
the interests of action. In appraising a situation he always conceived
his party in its very center as an active force. He viewed with especial
hostility – or more accurately, disgust – that Austro-Marxism of Otto
Bauer, Hilferding and others for whom theoretical analysis consists
merely of the learned commentaries of passivity. Prudence is a brake and
not a motive force. Nobody ever made a journey on brakes, and nobody
every created anything out of prudence. But the Bolsheviks knew well,
just the same, that a struggle demands a calculation of forces – that
one must be prudent to win the right to be bold.

The resolution of the 6th Congress, in giving its warning against
premature conflicts, at the same time pointed out that the battle must
be joined at that moment “when the all-national crisis and the deep
movement of the masses have created a favorable condition for the coming
over of the city and country poor to the side of the workers.” At the
tempo of the revolution, this was a question not of decades, nor of
years, but of a few months.

In placing upon the order of the day the task of explaining to the
masses the necessity of getting ready for an armed insurrection, the
congress decided at the same time to withdraw the central slogan of the
preceding period: transfer of power to the soviets. The one thing was
bound up with the other. Lenin had opened the way to this change of
slogan with his articles, letters and personal conversations.

The transfer of power to the soviets meant, in its immediate sense, a
transfer of power to the Compromisers. That might have been accomplished
peacefully, by way of a simple dismissal of the bourgeois government,
which had survived only on the good will of the Compromisers and the
relics of the confidence in them of the masses. The dictatorship of the
workers and soldiers had been a fact ever since the 27th of February.
But the workers and soldiers were not to the point necessary aware of
that fact. They had confided the power to the Compromisers, who in their
turn had passed it over to the bourgeoisie. The calculations of the
Bolsheviks on a peaceful development of the revolution rested, not on
the hope that the bourgeoisie would voluntarily turn over the power to
the workers and soldiers, but that the workers and soldiers would in
good season prevent the Compromisers from surrendering the power to the
bourgeoisie.

The concentration of the power in the soviets under a régime of soviet
democracy, would have opened before the Bolsheviks a complete
opportunity to become a majority in the soviet, and consequently to
create a government on the basis of their program. For this end an armed
insurrection would have been unnecessary. The interchange of power
between parties could have been accomplished peacefully. All the efforts
of the party from April to July had been directed towards making
possible a peaceful development of the revolution through the soviet.
“Patiently explain” – that had been the key to the Bolshevik policy.

The July Days had radically changed the situation. From the soviets the
power had gone over into the hands of a military clique in close contact
with the Kadets and the embassies, a clique which only tolerated
Kerensky temporarily in the character of a democratic trademark. If the
Executive Committee should now have decided to introduce a resolution
transferring the power into its own hands, the result would have been
wholly different from three days before. A Cossack regiment with men
from the military schools would probably have entered the Tauride Palace
and attempted to arrest the “usurpers.” The slogan “Power to the
Soviets” from now on meant armed insurrection against the government and
those military cliques which stood behind it. But to raise an
insurrection in the cause of “Power to the Soviets” when the soviets did
not want the power, was obvious nonsense.

On the other hand, it had become doubtful from this point on – some even
considered it improbable – whether the Bolsheviks could win a majority
in those powerless soviets by means of peaceful elections. Having
associated themselves with the July raids upon workers and peasants, the
Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries would of course continue to
furnish a screen for acts of violence against the Bolsheviks. Remaining
compromisist, the soviets would turn into a spineless opposition under a
counterrevolutionary government, and then soon come to an end
altogether.

Under these circumstances there could no longer be any talk of a
peaceful transfer of power to the proletariat. For the Bolshevik party
this meant: We must prepare for an armed insurrection. Under what
slogan? Under the candid slogan of the conquest of power by the
proletariat and the peasant poor. We must present the revolutionary task
in its naked form. We must liberate the class essence of the thing from
its equivocal soviet form. This was not a renunciation of the soviets as
such. After winning the power, the proletariat would have to organize
the state upon the soviet type. But those would be other soviets,
fulfilling a historic work directly opposite to the defensive function
of the compromisist soviets.

“The slogan of the transfer of power to the soviets,” wrote Lenin, under
the first volleys of slander and attack, “would now sound like Quixotism
or like a joke. That slogan, taken objectively, would be a deceiving of
the people – a suggesting to them of the illusion that it would be now
enough for the soviets to desire to take the power or pass a resolution
to that effect, in order to receive the power. As though there were in
the Soviet a party which had not disgraced itself by helping the
hangman! As though we could make what has been as though it had not
been.”

Renounce the demand for a transfer of power to the soviets? At the first
blush this idea shocked the party – or rather it shocked the agitatorial
cadres, who for the preceding three months had so much lived with this
popular slogan, that they had almost come to identify it with the whole
content of the revolution. A discussion began in the party circles. Many
eminent party workers, such as Manuilsky, Urenev and others, argued that
withdrawing the slogan “Power to the Soviets” would create a danger of
isolating the proletariat from the peasantry. This argument substituted
institutions for classes. The fetishism of organizational forms –
strange as it may seem at a first glance – is an especially common
disease among revolutionary circles. “Insofar as we remain within the
membership of these soviets,” wrote Trotsky, “... we will try to bring
it about that the soviets, reflecting the past days of the revolution,
may be able to raise themselves to the height of the future task. But no
matter how important is the question of the rôle and fate of the
soviets, it is for us wholly subordinate to the question of the struggle
of the proletariat and the semi-proletarian masses of the city, the army
and the country, for political power, for a revolutionary dictatorship.”

The question, what mass organizations were to serve the party for
leadership in the insurrection, did not permit an _a priori_, much less
a categorical, answer. The instruments of the insurrection might have
been the factory committees and trade unions, already under the
leadership of the Bolsheviks, and at the same time in individual cases
certain soviets that had broken free from the yoke of the Compromisers.
Lenin, for example, said to Ordzhonikidze: “We must swing over the
center of gravity to the factory and shop committees. The factory and
shop committees must become the organs of insurrection.”

After the masses had come into conflict with the soviets in July,
finding them at first passive opponents and then active enemies, this
change of slogan found in their consciousness a prepared soil. Just here
lay the everlasting preoccupation of Lenin: to express with the utmost
simplicity that which on the one hand flowed from the objective
conditions, and on the other formulated the subjective experience of the
masses. It is not to Tseretelli’s soviets that we must now offer the
power – so the advanced workers and soldiers felt. We must now take it
in our own hands.

The Moscow strike demonstration against the State Conference not only
came about against the will of the soviets, but did not put forward the
demand for a soviet power. The masses had succeeded in learning the
lesson offered by events and interpreted by Lenin. At the same time the
Moscow Bolsheviks did not for a moment hesitate to occupy fighting
positions as soon as a danger arose that the counter-revolution would
attempt to strangle the compromisist soviets. The Bolshevik policy
always united revolutionary implacableness with the greatest
flexibility, and in just this combination lay the whole secret of its
power.

Events in the theater of the war soon subjected the policy of the party,
so far as concerns its internationalism, to a very severe test. After
the fall of Riga the question of the fate of Petrograd touched the
workers and soldiers to the quick. At a meeting of the factory and shop
committees in Smolny, the Menshevik Mazurenko, an officer who had
recently taken the lead in disarming the Petrograd workers, made a
speech about the danger threatening Petrograd, and raised practical
questions concerning defense. “What are you trying to say to us,” cried
one of the Bolshevik orators. “Our leaders are in prison and you ask us
to take up questions connected with the defense of the capital?” As
industrial workers, as citizens of a bourgeois republic, the
proletarians of the Vyborg district had no intention of sabotaging the
defense of the revolutionary capital, but as Bolsheviks, as members of
the party, they did not for a minute intend to share with the ruling
groups the responsibility before the Russian people and the people of
other countries for the war. Fearing that defensive moods would turn
into a defensist policy, Lenin wrote: “We will become defensists only
after the transfer of power to the proletariat ... Neither the capture
of Riga nor the capture of Petersburg will make us defensists. Up to
that moment we are for the proletarian revolution. We are against the
war. We are not defensists.” “The fall of Riga,” wrote Trotsky from
prison, “is a cruel blow. The fall of Petersburg would be a misfortune.
But the fall of the international policy of the Russian proletariat
would be ruinous.”

Was this the doctrinairism of fanatics? During the very days while
Bolshevik sharpshooters and sailors were dying under the walls of Riga,
the government was withdrawing troops for the purpose of raiding the
Bolsheviks, and the supreme commander-in-chief was making ready to wage
war on the government. For this policy, whether at the front or rear,
whether for defense or offense, the Bolsheviks could not and would not
bear a shadow of responsibility. Had they behaved otherwise, they would
not have been Bolsheviks.

Kerensky and Kornilov were two variants of one and the same danger. But
those two variants, the one chronic and the other acute, came into
conflict with each other towards the end of August. It was necessary to
ward off the acute danger first, in order afterwards to settle with the
chronic one. The Bolsheviks not only entered the committee of defense,
although condemned there to the position of a small minority, but they
announced that in the struggle with Kornilov they were prepared to form
a military-technical union even with the directory. On this theme
Sukhanov writes: “The Bolsheviks revealed extraordinary tact and
political wisdom ... To be sure, in entering a compromise not proper to
their natures, they were pursuing certain aims of their own not foreseen
by their allies. But so much the greater was their wisdom in this
matter.” There was nothing whatever “not proper” to the nature of
Bolshevism in this policy: on the contrary, nothing could correspond
better to the whole character of the party. The Bolsheviks were
revolutionists of the deed and not the gesture, of the essence and not
the form. Their policy was determined by the real grouping of forces,
and not by sympathies and antipathies. When taunted by the Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, Lenin wrote: “It would be the
profoundest mistake to imagine that the revolutionary proletariat is
capable, so to speak, out of ‘vengeance’ upon the Social Revolutionaries
and Mensheviks for the support they have given to anti-Bolshevik raids,
to shootings at the front, and the disarming of workers, of refusing to
‘support’ them against the counterrevolution.”

Support them technically, but not politically. Lenin gave a decisive
warning against political support in one of his letters to the Central
Committee: “We ought not even now to support the government of Kerensky.
That would be unprincipled. You ask: But mustn’t we fight Kornilov? Of
course, yes. But that is not the same thing. There is a limit here. Some
of the Bolsheviks are crossing it, slipping into ‘compromisism,’ getting
carried away by the flood of events.”

Lenin knew how to catch the finest shadings of a political mood from
afar. On the 29th of August at a session of the Kiev city duma, one of
the local Bolshevik leaders, G. Piatakov, declared: “In this dangerous
moment we must forget all the old accounts ... and unite with all
revolutionary parties which stand for a decisive struggle against
counter-revolution. I summon you to unity, etc.” This was that false
political tone against which Lenin gave his warning. “To forget the old
accounts” would have meant to open new credits for the candidates in
bankruptcy. “We will fight, we are fighting against Kornilov,” wrote
Lenin, “but we are not supporting Kerensky, but exposing his weakness.
This is a different thing ... We must struggle ruthlessly against
phrases ... about supporting the Provisional Government, etc., etc.,
precisely as mere phrases.” The workers had no illusions about the
nature of their bloc with the Winter Palace. “In fighting Kornilov the
proletariat will fight not for the dictatorship of Kerensky, but for all
the conquests of the revolution.” Thus spoke factory after factory – in
Petrograd, in Moscow, in the provinces. Without making the slightest
political concession to the Compromisers, without confusing either
organizations or banners, the Bolsheviks were ready as always to
harmonize their action with that of opponent and enemy, if this made it
possible to deal a blow at another enemy more dangerous at the given
moment.

In the struggle against Kornilov, the Bolsheviks were pursuing their own
“special aims.” Sukhanov hints that they had already at that time set
themselves the task of converting the committee of defense into an
instrument of proletarian revolution. It is indubitable that the
revolutionary committees of the Kornilov days became to a certain extent
the prototype of those organs which subsequently led the proletarian
insurrection. But Sukhanov nevertheless attributes too much foresight to
the Bolsheviks, when he thinks they saw this organizational factor in
advance. The “special aims” of the Bolsheviks were to shatter the
counter-revolution, tear away the Compromisers from the Kadets if
possible, unite the largest masses possible under their own leadership,
arm as many revolutionary workers as they could. Of these aims the
Bolsheviks made no secret. The persecuted party saved the government
which had repressed and slandered it, but it saved the government from
military destruction only in order the more surely to destroy it
politically.

The last days of August brought another abrupt shift in the correlation
of forces, but this time from right to left. The masses once called into
the fight had no difficulty in re-establishing the soviets in the
position which they had occupied before the July crisis. Henceforth the
fate of the soviets was in their own hands. The power could be seized by
them without a struggle. For this the Compromisers had only to ratify
the situation which had already been created in reality. The whole
question was, did they want to do this? The Compromisers now declared
with heat that a coalition with the Kadets was no longer thinkable. If
that was so, then it had been unthinkable at any time. The renunciation
of a coalition, however, could mean nothing but the transfer of power to
the Compromisers.

Lenin immediately seized the essence of the new situation, and made the
necessary inferences from it. On the 3rd of September he wrote an
admirable article, _On Compromises_. The rôle of the soviets has again
changed, he declared: At the beginning of July they were organs of
struggle against the proletariat. At the end of August they have become
organs of struggle against the bourgeoisie. The soviets have again got
the troops in their control. History again half-opens the possibility
for a peaceful development of the revolution. That is an extraordinarily
rare and precious possibility. We must make an attempt to achieve it. In
passing Lenin made fun of those phrasemakers who reject all compromises
whatever: the problem is “throughout all compromises insofar as they are
inevitable” to carry out your own aims and fulfil your own tasks. “The
compromise upon our part,” he said, “will be a return to our pre-July
demand: All power to the soviets, a government of Social Revolutionaries
and Mensheviks responsible to the soviets. Now and now only, perhaps
only in the course of a few days, or one or two weeks, such a government
might be created and fortified in a wholly peaceful manner.” That short
date was meant to characterize the acuteness of the whole situation: the
Compromisers had only days in which to make their choice between the
bourgeoisie and the proletariat.

The Compromisers recoiled hastily from Lenin’s proposal as from a wily
trap. In reality there was not the slightest hint of wiliness in Lenin’s
proposal. Confident that his party was destined to stand at the head of
the people, Lenin made a frank attempt to soften the struggle, weakening
the resistance of the enemy against the inevitable.

Lenin’s bold changes of policy, always resulting from changes in the
situation itself, and invariably preserving the unity of his strategic
design, constitute an invaluable textbook of revolutionary strategy.
This proposal of compromise was significant first of all as an object
lesson to the Bolshevik party itself. It demonstrated that in spite of
their experience with Kornilov, there was no longer a possibility of the
Compromisers’ turning down the road of revolution. The Bolshevik party
now conclusively felt itself to be the sole party of revolution.

The Compromisers refused to play the part of a transmitting mechanism
carrying the power from the bourgeoisie to the proletariat, as they had
in March carried the power from the proletariat to the bourgeoisie. By
virtue of this fact, the slogan “Power to the Soviets” was again
suspended. However, not for long: In the next few days the Bolsheviks
got a majority in the Petrograd Soviet, and afterward in a number of
others. The phrase “Power to the soviets” was not, therefore, again
removed from the order of the day, but received a new meaning: All power
to the Bolshevik soviets. In this form the slogan had decisively ceased
to be a slogan of peaceful development. The party was launched on the
road of armed insurrection through the soviets and in the name of the
soviets.

In order to understand the further course of events, it is necessary to
raise the question: In what manner did the compromisist soviets regain
at the beginning of September the power which they had squandered in
July? Throughout the resolutions of the Sixth Congress of the Bolshevik
party there runs the assertion that, as a result of the July events, the
dual power has been liquidated and replaced by a dictatorship of the
bourgeoisie. The most recent soviet historians have copied this idea
from book to book, without even trying to revalue it in the light of the
events which followed. Moreover it has never occurred to them to ask: If
in July the power went over wholly into the hands of a military clique,
why was this same military clique compelled in August to resort to an
insurrection? Those who have power do not choose the risky path of
conspiracy, only those who want to get it.

The formula of the Sixth Congress was, to say the least, inaccurate.
Once we designate as a dual power that régime in which an essentially
fictitious power lies in the hands of the official government and the
real power in the hands of the Soviet, then there is no reason to assert
that the dual power is liquidated from the moment when a part of the
real power passes over from the Soviet to the bourgeoisie. From the
point of view of the military problems of the moment it was permissible,
and indeed necessary, to overestimate the concentration of power in the
hands of the counter-revolution. Politics is not a mathematical science.
Practically, it would have been incomparably more dangerous to minimize
the significance of the change, than to magnify it. But a historical
analysis has no need of those exaggerations proper to agitation.

Simplifying the thought of Lenin, Stalin said at the congress: “The
situation is clear. Nobody talks now of the dual power. If the soviets
formerly represented a real power, they are now merely instruments of
the union of the masses, possessing no power.” Some of the delegates
replied to the effect that the reaction had triumphed in July, but that
the counter-revolution was not victorious. Stalin answered with a
surprising aphorism: “During a revolution there is no reaction.” As a
matter of fact a revolution triumphs only through a series of
intermittent reactions. It always makes a step back for every two steps
forward. Reaction is to counter-revolution as reform is to revolution.
We may call victories of the reaction those changes in the régime which
bring it in the direction of the demands of the counter-revolutionary
class, without, however, altering the possessor of power; but a victory
of the counter-revolution is unthinkable without the transfer of power
to a different class. This decisive transfer of power did not occur in
July.

“If the July insurrection was a semi-insurrection, then to a certain
degree the victory of the counter-revolution was a semi-victory.” Thus
wrote Bukharin a few months ago – correctly enough, but without drawing
the necessary inferences from his words. A semi-victory could not give
the power to the bourgeoisie. The dual power was reconstructed,
transformed, but it did not disappear. In the factories it was
impossible as before to do anything against the will of the workers; the
peasants retained enough power to prevent the landlord from enjoying his
property rights; the commanders felt no confidence before the soldiers.
But what is the power if it is not the material possibility to dispose
of property rights and the military force? On August 13 Trotsky wrote in
regard to the shifts which had occurred: “It was not merely that
alongside the government stood the soviets, fulfilling a whole series of
governmental functions ... The essence of the thing was that behind the
soviets and behind the government stood two different régimes relying
upon different classes ... The régime of the capitalist republic imposed
from above, and the régime of the workers’ democracy taking form below,
paralyzed each other.”

It is absolutely indubitable that the Executive Committee had lost the
lion’s share of its importance. But it would be a mistake to imagine
that the bourgeoisie had received all that the compromise leaders had
lost. These leaders had lost not only to the right, but also to the left
– not only to the benefit of the military cliques, but also to the
benefit of the factory and regimental committees. The power was
decentralized, scattered – in part concealed underground together with
that weapon which the worker hid away after the July defeat. The dual
power had ceased to be “peaceful,” contractual, regulated. It had become
more concealed, more decentralized, more antithetic and explosive. At
the end of August this concealed dual power again became active. We
shall see what significance this fact acquired in October.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. The above-mentioned inter-district organization – _Trans._



CHAPTER 37 THE LAST COALITION


 

True to its tradition, not to survive a single serious shock, the
Provisional Government went to pieces, as we remember, on the night of
August 26. The Kadets withdrew in order to make it easier for Kornilov.
The socialists withdrew in order to make it easier for Kerensky. Thus
began a new governmental crisis. First of all arose the problem of
Kerensky himself. The head of the government had turned out to be an
accomplice in the conspiracy. The indignation against him was so great
that at the mention of his name the compromise leaders would
occasionally even resort to the vocabulary of the Bolsheviks. Chernov,
who had recently jumped out of the ministerial train while travelling at
full speed, wrote in the central organ of his party about “this general
mix-up in which you can’t make out where Kornilov ends and where
Filonenko and Savinkov begin, where Savinkov ends and where begins the
Provisional Government as such.” The hint was sufficiently clear. “The
Provisional Government as such” – that was of course Kerensky, who
belonged to the same party as Chernov.

But having relieved their feelings with strong words, the Compromisers
decided that they could not get along without Kerensky. Although they
would not let Kerensky grant an amnesty to Kornilov, they themselves
promptly granted one to Kerensky. By way of compensation he agreed to
make concessions on the question of the form of the Russian government.
Only yesterday it had been maintained that a Constituent Assembly alone
could decide this question. Now the juridical difficulty suddenly
disappeared. In the declaration of the government, the removal of
Kornilov was explained by the necessity of “saving the fatherland,
freedom and the republican régime.” This purely verbal, and moreover
belated, donation to the Left did not, of course, in the least
strengthen the authority of the government – especially since Kornilov
too had declared himself a republican.

On August 30 Kerensky was compelled to discharge Savinkov, who a few
days later would even be expelled from the all-embracing party of the
Social Revolutionaries. But a political equivalent of Savinkov was
immediately appointed to the post of Governor-General – Palchinsky, who
began by closing the Bolshevik paper. The Executive Committee protested.
Izvestia called this act a “crude provocation.” Palchinsky had to be
removed in three more days. How little Kerensky intended to change the
course of his policy at large, is demonstrated by the fact that as early
as the 31st he had formed a new government with the participation of
Kadets. Even the Social Revolutionaries would not go that far: they
threatened to recall their representatives. It was Tseretelli who found
a new recipe for the power: “Preserve the idea of the Coalition, but
remove all those elements which hang like a millstone upon the
government.” “The idea of Coalition has been strengthened,” sang
Skobelev in chorus, “but there can be no place in the government for
that party which was connected with the conspiracy of Kornilov.”
Kerensky would not agree to this limitation, and in his way he was
right.

A Coalition with the bourgeoisie which excluded the ruling bourgeois
party was obviously absurd. This was pointed out at a joint session of
the Executive Committees by Kamenev, who in his characteristic tone of
admonition drew the conclusions from the recent events. “You want to
start us off on the still more dangerous road of Coalition with
irresponsible groups. But you have forgotten about that coalition sealed
and ratified by the ominous events of these past days – the coalition
between the revolutionary proletariat, the peasantry, and the
revolutionary army.” The Bolshevik orator recalled the words spoken by
Trotsky on May 26, in defending the Kronstadt sailors against the
accusation of Tseretelli: “When a counter-revolutionary general tries to
throw a noose around the neck of the revolution, the Kadets will soap
the rope, and the Kronstadt sailors will come to fight and die with us.”
This recollection hit the mark. To the bombast about a “united
democracy” and about an “honest coalition,” Kamenev answered: “The unity
of the democracy depends upon whether or not you enter into coalition
with the Vyborg district ... Any other coalition is dishonest.” The
speech of Kamenev made an indubitable impression, registered by Sukhanov
in these words: “Kamenev spoke very intelligently and tactfully.” But it
did not go beyond making an impression. The courses of the two sides
were predetermined.

From the beginning the break between the Compromisers and the Kadets had
been merely a matter of show. The liberal Kornilovists themselves
understood that it behooved them to stay in the shadow for a few days.
Behind the scenes it was therefore decided – in obvious agreement with
the Kadets – to create a government standing to such a degree above all
the real forces of the nation, that its temporary character could be a
matter of doubt to nobody. Besides Kerensky, the directory of five
members included the Minister of Foreign Affairs, Tereshchenko, who had
already become irreplaceable thanks to his connections with the
diplomats of the Entente; the commander of the Moscow military district,
Verkhovsky, who was hastily promoted for this purpose from colonel to
general; Admiral Verderevsky, who was for this purpose hastily let out
of prison; and finally, the dubious Menshevik, Nikitin, whom his own
party soon after acknowledged to be sufficiently ripe for expulsion from
its ranks.

Having conquered Kornilov with the hands of others, Kerensky had only
one concern, it would seem, and that was to carry out Kornilov’s
program. Kornilov had wished to unite the power of the
commander-in-chief with the power at the head of the government.
Kerensky accomplished this. Kornilov had intended to screen a personal
dictatorship behind a directory of five members. Kerensky carried out
this plan. Chernov, whose resignation had been demanded by the
bourgeoisie, Kerensky put out of the Winter Palace. General Alexeiev,
the hero of the Kadet party and its candidate for Minister-President, he
named chief of the headquarters staff – that is, _de facto_ head of the
army. In his order to the army and fleet, Kerensky demanded a cessation
of political struggle among the troops – that is, a restoration of the
original situation. Lenin from his hiding-place described this situation
in the upper circles with the extreme simplicity characteristic of him:
“Kerensky is a Kornilovist who has accidentally quarrelled with
Kornilov, and continues in intimate union with the other Kornilovists.”
There was only one drawback: the victory over the counter-revolution had
been far more sweeping than was demanded by the personal plans of
Kerensky.

The directory hastened to let out of prison the former War Minister,
Guchkov, who was considered one of the instigators of the conspiracy. In
general, the Department of Justice did not raise a hand against the
Kadet instigators. In these circumstances it became more and more
difficult to keep the Bolsheviks under lock and key. The government
found a way out: without withdrawing the indictment, it would release
the Bolsheviks on bail. The Petrograd soviet and trade unions took upon
themselves “the honor of furnishing bail for the esteemed leader of the
revolutionary proletariat,” and on the 4th of September Trotsky was set
free under the modest – indeed essentially fictitious – bail of 3,000
roubles. In his _History of the Russian Disturbance_ General Denikin
writes with unction: “On the 1st of September General Kornilov was
arrested, and on the 4th of September Bronstein-Trotsky was set free by
the same Provisional Government. Those two dates ought to remain in the
memory of Russia.” The liberation of Bolsheviks under bond continued
during the next few days. Those liberated from prison wasted no time.
The masses were waiting and calling. The party needed men.

On the day of Trotsky’s liberation, Kerensky issued an order in which,
“recognizing that the Military Committee had given very substantial help
to the governmental power,” he commanded this committee to cease from
any further activity. Even _Izvestia_ conceded that the author of this
order revealed a rather feeble understanding of the situation. An
inter-district conference of the soviets in Petrograd adopted a
resolution: “Not to dissolve the revolutionary organizations of struggle
with the counter-revolution.” The pressure from below was so strong that
the compromisist Military Revolutionary Committee decided not to accede
to the order of Kerensky, and summoned its local branches “in view of
the continued alarming situation to work with their former energy and
restraint.” Kerensky took this in silence. There was nothing else for
him to do.

The omnipotent head of the Directory was compelled to observe at every
step that the situation had altered, that the opposition had grown, and
that it was necessary to make some change at least in words. On
September 7, Verkhovsky announced in the press that the program for the
revival of the army prepared before the Kornilov rebellion must be set
aside for the time being, since “in the present psychological condition
of the army it would only bring about its further demoralization.” In
token of the beginning of a new era, the War Minister appeared before
the Executive Committee. Let them have no fear, he announced, General
Alexeiev is going, and along with him everybody who had any connection
whatever with the Kornilov insurrection. Healthy principles must be
inoculated into the army, he went on, “not with whips and machine guns,
but by way of the suggestion of right, justice and firm discipline.”
That sounded quite like the spring days of the revolution. But it was
September outdoors, and the autumn was coming. Alexeiev was actually
removed after a few days, and his place taken by General Dukhonin. The
superiority of this general lay in the fact that nobody knew him.

In return for these concessions the Minister of War and Marine demanded
immediate help from the Executive Committee: the officers are standing
under the sword of Damocles; it is worst of all in the Baltic Fleet; you
must pacify the sailors. After long debate it was decided, as usual, to
send a delegation to the fleet. The Compromisers insisted, moreover,
that the delegation should include Bolsheviks, and above all Trotsky:
only upon this condition, they said, could the delegation be sure of
success. Trotsky announced: “We decisively reject the form of
co-operation with the government which Tseretelli defends ... The
government is conducting a policy false to the bottom, against the
interests of the people, and uncontrolled by them. But when this policy
runs into a bag’s end or produces a catastrophe, then they want to
impose upon the revolutionary organizations the hard labor of smoothing
out the inevitable consequences ... One of the tasks of this delegation,
as you formulate it, is to hunt out in the staff of the garrison the
“dark forces” – that is, provocateurs and spies ... Have you forgotten
then that I myself am indicted under Article 108? ... In the struggle
against lynch-law we will travel our own road ... Not hand in hand with
the Attorney General and the Intelligence Service, but as a
revolutionary party which is persuading, organizing, and educating.”

The convocation of a “Democratic Conference” had been decided upon in
the days of the Kornilov insurrection. Its functions were: to reveal the
strength of the democracy, to instil respect for it among its enemies,
both right and left, and finally – by no means the least of its tasks –
to bridle the too eager Kerensky. The Compromisers seriously intended to
subject the government to some sort of improvised representative
institution until the convocation of the Constituent Assembly. The
bourgeoisie took a hostile attitude in advance, looking upon this
Conference as an attempt to fortify the position which the democracy had
regained through the victory over Kornilov. “This device of Tseretelli,”
writes Miliukov in his history, “was in essence a complete capitulation
before the plans of Lenin and Trotsky.” Exactly the contrary:
Tseretelli’s device was aimed to paralyze the struggle of the Bolsheviks
for a soviet government. The Democratic Conference was set over against
the Congress of the Soviets. The Compromisers were creating a new base
for themselves, trying to strangle the soviets by an artificial
combination of all kinds of organizations. The democrats apportioned the
votes at their own discretion, guiding themselves by one thought only:
to guarantee themselves an indubitable majority. The higher-up
organizations were vastly better represented than the lower. The organs
of self-government, among them the undemocratic zemstvos, enormously
outbalanced the soviets. The Cooperators[1] appeared in the rôle of
masters of destiny.

Having up to this time occupied no place in politics, the Cooperators
were first pushed forward into the political arena during the days of
that Moscow conference, and from then on they began to appear no
otherwise than as the representatives of their 20 million members – or,
to put it more simply, of some half the population of Russia. The
cooperatives sent their roots down into the village through its upper
strata, through those who approved of a “just” expropriation of the
nobility on condition that their own landed property, often very
considerable, should receive not only defense but augmentation. The
leaders of the cooperatives were recruited from the liberal-Narodnik and
partly the liberal-Marxist intelligentsia, which formed a natural bridge
between the Kadets and the Compromisers. To the Bolsheviks the
Cooperators took the same attitude of hatred which the Kulak takes to an
unsubmissive hired man. The Compromisers eagerly seized upon the
Cooperators, after the latter had thrown off the mask of neutrality, in
order to strengthen themselves against the Bolsheviks. Lenin mercilessly
denounced these chefs of the democratic kitchen. “Ten convinced soldiers
or workers from a backward factory are worth a thousand times more than
a hundred of these hand-picked ... delegates.” Trotsky argued in the
Petrograd Soviet that the officials of the cooperatives as little
expressed the political will of the peasants as a physician the
political will of his patients, or a Post Office clerk the views of
those who send and receive letters. “The Cooperators have to be good
organizers, merchants, bookkeepers, but for the defense of their class
rights the peasants, like the workers, trust the soviets.” This did not
prevent the Cooperators from receiving 150 seats and, along with the
unreformed zemstvos and all sorts of other organizations dragged in by
the hair, completely dislocating the representation of the masses.

The Petrograd Soviet included Lenin and Zinoviev in the list of its
delegates to the Conference. The government issued an order for the
arrest of both delegates at the entrance to the theater building, but
not in the actual hall of the Conference. Such was, evidently, the
agreement arrived at between the Compromisers and Kerensky. But the
matter went no farther than a political demonstration on the part of the
Soviet: neither Lenin nor Zinoviev intended to appear at the Conference.
Lenin considered that the Bolsheviks had no business there at all.

The Democratic Conference opened on the 14th of September, exactly a
month after the State Conference, in the auditorium of the Alexandrinsky
Theatre. The credentials of 1,775 representatives were accepted; about
1,200 were present at the opening. The Bolsheviks of course were in the
minority, but in spite of all the tricks of the elective method, they
constituted a very considerable group, which upon certain questions
gathered around itself more than a third of the whole assembly.

Would it be suitable for a strong government to appear before a mere
“private” conference of this sort? That question became a matter of
enormous indecision in the Winter Palace, and of reflected excitements
in the Alexandrinsky. In the long run the head of the government decided
to show himself to the democracy. “He was met with applause,” says
Shliapnikov, describing the arrival of Kerensky, “and went over to the
praesidium to shake hands with those sitting at the table. We (the
Bolsheviks) were sitting not far from each other, and when it came our
turn, we glanced at each other and agreed not to extend our hands. A
theatrical gesture across the table – I drew back from the hand offered
me, and Kerensky with his hand extended, not meeting ours, passed along
the table!” The head of the government got a like greeting on the
opposite wing from the Kornilovists – and besides the Bolsheviks and the
Kornilovists there were now no real forces left.

Being compelled by the whole situation to offer an explanation on the
subject of his rôle in the conspiracy, Kerensky once again relied too
much upon improvisation.

“I knew what they wanted,” he let fall. “Before they went to Kornilov
they came to me and suggested that I take the same course.” Cries on the
left: “Who came? Who suggested?” Frightened by the echo of his own
words, Kerensky closed up. But the political background of the plot had
already been revealed to the most naïve. The Ukrainian Compromiser Porsh
reported to the _rada_[2] in Kiev upon his return: “Kerensky did not
succeed in proving his non-participation in the Kornilov uprising.” But
the head of the government dealt himself another no less heavy blow in
his speech, when in answer to those phrases that everybody was sick of –
“In the moment of danger all will come forward and give an account of
themselves,” etc., somebody shouted: “And the death penalty?” The
orator, losing his equilibrium, cried out, to the complete surprise of
everybody probably including himself: “Wait a little. When one single
death penalty has been signed by me, the supreme commander-in-chief,
then I will permit you to curse me.” A soldier came right up to the edge
of the platform and shouted at close quarters. “You are the calamity of
the country!” So that is what it had come to! He, Kerensky, had been
ready to forget the high place which he occupied, and talk things over
with the conference as a man. “But not all here understand a man.”
Therefore he would speak in the language of authority: “Anyone who dares
...” Alas, that had been heard before in Moscow, and Kornilov
nevertheless had dared.

“If the death penalty was necessary,” asked Trotsky in his speech, “then
how does he, Kerensky, dare say that he will not make use of it? And if
he considers it possible to give his promise to the democracy not to
apply the death penalty, then ... its restoration becomes an act of
light-mindedness transcending the limits of criminality.” The whole
assembly agreed to that – some silently, some with an uproar. “With that
confession Kerensky seriously discredited both himself and the
Provisional Government,” says his colleague and admirer, the Assistant
Minister of Justice, Demianov.

Not one of the ministers was able to report anything that the government
had done besides solving the problem of how to exist. Economic measures?
Not one could be named. Peace policy? “I do not know,” said the former
Minister of Justice, Zarudny – more frank than the others – “whether the
Provisional Government has done anything in this regard. I have not seen
it.” Zarudny complained perplexedly that “the whole power has arrived in
the hands of a man” at whose nod ministers come and go. Tseretelli
incautiously took up this theme: “Let the democracy upbraid itself, if
on the heights its representative has got a little dizzy.” But it was
Tseretelli who most fully incarnated all those traits of the democracy
which had given rise to Bonapartist tendencies in the government. “Why
does Kerensky occupy the place which he occupies today?” retorted
Trotsky. “A place was opened for Kerensky by the weakness and
irresolution of the democracy ... I have not heard a single speaker here
who would take upon himself the unenviable honor of defending the
directory or its president ...” After an outbreak of protests the
speaker continued: “I am sorry to say that the point of view which now
finds such a stormy expression in the hall has not found any deliberated
expression from this tribune. Not one speaker has come out here and said
to us: ‘Why are you arguing about the past of the Coalition? Why are you
worrying about the future? We have Kerensky and that is enough ...’” But
the Bolshevik presentation of the question almost automatically united
Tseretelli with Zarudny, and united them both with Kerensky. Of this
Miliukov has pointedly written: Zarudny could complain of the arbitrary
power of Kerensky; Tseretelli could throw out a hint that the government
was getting dizzy – “those were mere words”. But when Trotsky stated
that nobody in the conference would undertake the open defense of
Kerensky “the assembly immediately felt that this was spoken by a common
enemy.”

The power was spoken of by these people who embodied it no otherwise
than as a burden and a misfortune. A struggle for power? Minister
Peshekhonov instructed the delegates: “The power has now become a thing
from which everybody is trying to protect himself.” Was this true?
Kornilov had not tried to protect himself. But that quite fresh lesson
was already half forgotten. Tseretelli stormed at the Bolsheviks because
they did not take the power themselves, but were pushing the soviets
toward the power. Others took up the thought of Tseretelli. Yes, the
Bolsheviks ought to take the power! – murmured the praesidium, as they
sat around the table. Avksentiev turned to Shliapnikov who sat near him:
“Take the power, the masses will follow you. Answering his neighbor in
the same tone, Shliapnikov suggested that they first lay the power on
the table of the praesidium. These semi-ironical challenges to the
Bolsheviks, issued both through speeches in the tribune and
conversations in the couloir, were partly taunts and partly
reconnoiters. What are these people going to do next, now that they have
come to the head of the Petrograd, the Moscow, and many of the
provincial soviets? Can it be that they will really dare seize the
power? This could hardly be believed. Ten days before the challenging
speech of Tseretelli, Rech had declared that the best way to get rid of
Bolshevism for many years would be to turn the country over to its
leaders. “But those sorry heroes of the day are themselves far from
desirous of seizing the whole power ... Practically their position
cannot be taken seriously from any standpoint.” This proud conclusion
was, to say the least, a little hasty.

An immense advantage of the Bolsheviks – and one up to this time, it
seems to me, not adequately appreciated – was the fact that they
excellently understood their enemies, that they completely saw through
them. They were aided in this by the materialistic method, the Leninist
school of clarity and simplicity, and the keen vigilance proper to
people who have decided to carry a struggle through to the end. On the
other hand, the Liberals and Compromisers invented Bolsheviks to suit
themselves and the demands of the moment. It could not have been
otherwise. Those parties for whom evolution has left no future never
prove capable of looking reality in the face – just as a hopeless
invalid dares not look in the face of his disease.

However, although they did not believe in the insurrection of the
Bolsheviks, the Compromisers feared it. This was best of all expressed
by Kerensky. “Make no mistake,” he cried out suddenly in the midst of
his speech. “Do not think that when the Bolsheviks bait me, the forces
of the democracy are not there to support me. Do not think that I am
hanging in the air. Remember that if you start something, the railroads
will stop. There will be no transmission of dispatches ...” A part of
the hall applauded, a part kept an embarrassed silence. The Bolshevik
section laughed outright. It is a poor dictatorship which is compelled
to argue that it is not hanging in the air!

To these ironical challenges, accusations of cowardice, and clumsy
threats, the Bolsheviks made answer in their Declaration: “In struggling
for the power in order to realize its program, our party has never
desired and does not desire to seize the power against the organized
will of the majority of the toiling masses of the country. – That meant:
We will take the power as the party of the soviet majority. Those words
about “the organized will of the toiling masses” referred to the coming
Congress of Soviets. “Only such decisions and proposals of the present
Conference ... can find their way to realization” said the Declaration,
“as are recognized by the All-Russian Congress of Soviets.

During the reading of the Bolshevik Declaration by Trotsky, its mention
of the necessity of immediately arming the workers evoked persistent
cries from the benches of the majority: “What for? What for?” Here was
that same note of alarm and provocation. What for? “In order to create a
real bulwark against the counter-revolution,” answered the orator. But
not only for that: “I say to you in the name of our party and the
proletarian masses adhering to it that the armed workers ... will defend
the country of the revolution against the armies of imperialism with a
heroism such as Russian history has never known ...” Tseretelli
characterized this promise, which sharply divided the hall, as an empty
phrase. The history of the Red Army subsequently refuted him.

Those hot moments when the compromise chiefs had renounced their
coalition with the Kadets were now far behind: without the Kadets a
coalition had proved impossible. Surely you wouldn’t ask us to take the
power ourselves! “We might have seized the power on the 27th of
February,” meditated Skobelev, “but ... we employed all our influence in
helping the bourgeois elements recover from their confusion ... and come
into the power.” Why then had these gentlemen prevented the
Kornilovists, as they recovered from their confusion, from taking the
power? A purely bourgeois government, explained Tseretelli, is still
impossible: that would cause a civil war. It was necessary to break
Kornilov in order that with his adventure he should not prevent the
bourgeoisie from coming to power through a series of stages. “Now when
the revolutionary democracy has proven victorious, the moment is
especially favorable for a coalition.”

The political philosophy of the cooperatives was expressed by their
leader, Berkenheim: “Whether we want it or not, the bourgeoisie is the
class to whom the power will belong.” The old revolutionary Narodnik,
Minor, beseeched the conference to adopt a unanimous decision in favor
of coalition. Otherwise “there is no use deceiving ourselves. Otherwise
we will slaughter ...” “Whom?” cried the Left benches. “We will
slaughter each other,” concluded Minor in an ominous silence. But in
reality what made a governmental bloc necessary according to the views
of the Kadets, was the struggle against the “anarchist hooliganism” of
the Bolsheviks. “That really constitutes the essence of the idea of the
coalition,” as Miliukov quite frankly explained. While Minor was hoping
that a coalition would make it possible for the Compromisers and the
Bolsheviks not to slaughter each other, Miliukov, on the contrary, was
firmly calculating that the coalition would make it possible for the
joint forces of the Compromisers and the Kadets to slaughter the
Bolsheviks.

During the debate about a coalition, Riazanov read an editorial from
Rech of August 29 which Miliukov had withdrawn at the last moment,
leaving a blank space in the paper: “Yes, we do not fear to state that
General Kornilov was pursuing those same objects which we consider
necessary for the salvation of the fatherland.” The reading made a
sensation. “They will save it all right!” somebody shouted on the left.
But the Kadets found their defenders: After all, the editorial had not
been printed! Moreover, not all the Kadets had stood for Kornilov, and
we must learn to distinguish the sinners from the saints.

“They say that we must not accuse the whole Kadet Party of participation
in the Kornilov insurrection,” Trotsky answered. “Znamensky has said to
us Bolsheviks here and not for the first time: ‘You protested when we
held your whole party responsible for the movement of July 3-5; do not
repeat the same mistake; do not hold all the Kadets responsible for the
insurrection of Kornilov.’ But in my opinion there is a slight
inaccuracy in this comparison. When they accused the Bolsheviks of
calling out the movement of July 3-5, it was not a question of inviting
them into the ministry, but of inviting them into the jails. Zarudny
(the Minister of Justice) will not, I trust, deny this difference. We
say now too: If you want to drag the Kadets to prison for the Kornilov
movement, don’t do this wholesale, but inspect each individual Kadet
from all sides (_Laughter; voice: ‘Bravo!’_). When it is a question of
introducing the Kadet Party into the ministry, then the decisive thing
is not the circumstance that this or that Kadet was in contact with
Kornilov behind the scenes – not that Maklakov stood at the telegraph
apparatus while Savinkov conducted his negotiations with Kornilov – not
that Rodichev went to the Don and conducted political negotiations with
Kaledin – not that is the essence of the thing; the essence of it is
that the whole bourgeois press either openly welcomed Kornilov or
cautiously kept mum awaiting his victory ... That is why I tell you that
you have no partners for a coalition!” The next day a representative
from Helsingfors and Sveaborg, the sailor Shishkin, spoke more briefly
and suggestively on the same theme: “A Coalition Ministry will have
neither confidence nor support among the sailors of the Baltic Fleet and
the garrison of Finland ... Against the creation of a Coalition Ministry
the sailors have raised their battle flag!” Arguments from reason had
been ineffective. The sailor Shishkin advanced the argument of the naval
guns. He was heartily supported by other sailors doing sentry duty at
the entrance to the hall. Bukharin subsequently related how “the sailors
posted by Kerensky to defend the Democratic Conference against us, the
Bolsheviks, turned to Trotsky and asked him, shaking their bayonets:
‘How soon can we get to work with these things?’” That was merely a
repetition of the question asked by the sailors of the _Aurora_ at the
interview in Kresty prison. But now the moment was drawing near.

If we disregard fine shades, it is easy to distinguish three groupings
in the Democratic Conference: an extensive but very unstable center
which does not dare seize the power, agrees to a coalition, but does not
want the Kadets; a weak Right Wing which stands unconditionally for
Kerensky and a coalition with the bourgeoisie; a Left Wing, twice as
strong, which stands for a government of the soviets or a socialist
government. At a caucus of the soviet delegates to the Democratic
Conference, Trotsky spoke for the transfer of power to the soviets,
Martov for a homogeneous socialist ministry. The first formula got 86
votes, the second 97. Formally only about one-half of the workers’ and
soldiers’ soviets were at that moment in the control of the Bolsheviks;
the other half were wavering between the Bolsheviks and the
Compromisers. But the Bolsheviks spoke in the name of the powerful
soviets of the more industrial and cultural centers of the country. In
the soviets they were immeasurably stronger than at the Conference, and
in the proletariat and army immeasurably stronger than in the soviets.
The backward soviets were, moreover, rapidly drawing up to the advanced
ones.

At the Democratic Conference 766 deputies against 688 voted for a
coalition, with 38 abstaining. The two camps were almost equal! An
amendment excluding the Kadets from the coalition got a majority: 595
against 493, with 72 abstaining. But the removal of the Kadets made a
coalition entirely purposeless. For that reason the resolution as a
whole was voted down by a majority of 813 – that is, a bloc of the
extreme wings, the resolute partisans and implacable enemies of the
coalition, against the center, which had melted to 133 votes, with 80
abstaining. That was the most united of all the votes, but it was just
as meaningless as the idea of a coalition without the Kadets which it
rejected.

“Upon the basic question ...” as Miliukov justly observes, “the
Conference thus remained without an opinion and without a formula.”

What remained for the leaders to do? To trample on the will of the
democracy which had rejected their own will. A praesidium was assembled
consisting of representatives of separate parties and groups to
re-decide a question which had already been decided by a plenary
session. The result: 50 votes for a coalition, 60 against. Now it would
seem that the thing was clear? The question whether the government
should be responsible to the Democratic Conference as a permanent body,
was unanimously decided in the affirmative by this same enlarged
praesidium. 56 hands against 48 with 10 abstaining were raised in favor
of filling out the body with representatives of the bourgeoisie.
Kerensky then appeared and announced that he would refuse to participate
in a homogeneous government. After that the only thing left to do was to
send the unhappy Conference home, and replace it with institutions in
which the partisans of unconditional coalition would be in the majority.
To attain this desired consummation it was only necessary to understand
the rules of arithmetic. In the name of the praesidium Tseretelli
introduced a resolution in the Conference to the effect that this
representative body had been summoned “to co-operate in the creation of
a government,” and that the government would have to “sanction this
body.” The dream of putting a bridle on Kerensky was thus filed in the
archives. Having been filled out with the necessary proportion of
bourgeois representatives, the future Council of the Republic, or
Pre-Parliament, would have as its task the sanctioning of a coalition
government with the Kadets. The resolution of Tseretelli meant the exact
opposite of what the conference wanted, and what the praesidium had just
now resolved upon, but the general breakdown, decay and demoralization
were so great that the assembly adopted the slightly disguised
capitulation presented to it by 829 votes against 106, with 69
abstaining. “And so for the moment you have conquered, Messrs.
Compromisers and Kadets,” wrote the Bolshevik paper. “Play your game.
Make your new experiment. It will be your last – we will vouch for
that.”

“The Democratic Conference,” says Stankevich, “astonished even its own
initiators with its extraordinary looseness of thought.” In the
compromise parties – “complete confusion”; on the Right, in the
bourgeois circles – “a noise of muttering, slanders conveyed in a
whisper, a slow corroding of the last remnants of governmental authority
...; and only on the Left, a consolidation of moods and forces.” This
was spoken by an opponent. This is the testimony of an enemy who will
again be shooting at the Bolsheviks in October. This Petrograd parade of
the democracy proved to be for the Compromisers what the Moscow parade
of national unity had been for Kerensky – a public confession of
bankruptcy, a review of political prostration. Whereas the State
Conference gave an impetus to the insurrection of Kornilov, the
Democratic Conference finally cleared the road for the Bolshevik
insurrection.

Before dispersing, the Conference appointed from its members a permanent
body composed of 15 per cent of the membership of each of its groups –
in all, about 350 delegates. The institutions of the possessing classes
were to receive in addition to this 120 seats. The government in its own
name added 20 seats for the Cossacks. All these together were to
constitute a Council of the Republic, or Pre-Parliament, which was to
represent the nation until the Constituent Assembly.

What attitude to adopt toward the Council of the Republic immediately
became for the Bolsheviks an acute tactical problem. Should they enter
it or not? The boycott of parliamentary institutions on the part of
anarchists and semi-anarchists is dictated by a desire not to submit
their weakness to a test on the part of the masses, thus preserving
their right to an inactive _hauteur_ which makes no difference to
anybody. A revolutionary party can turn its back to a parliament only if
it has set itself the immediate task of overthrowing the existing
régime. During the years between the two revolutions, Lenin had gone
with great profundity into this problem of revolutionary
parliamentarism.

Even a parliament based on the most limited franchise may become, and
has more than once in history become, an expression of the actual
correlation of classes. Such were, for example, the State Dumas after
the defeated revolution of 1905-7. To boycott such parliaments is to
boycott the actual correlation of forces, instead of trying to change it
to the advantage of the revolution. But the Pre-Parliament of Tseretelli
and Kerensky did not correspond in the slightest degree to the
correlation of forces. It was created by the impotence and trickery of
the upper circles – by their mystic faith in institutions, their
fetishism of forms, their hope of subjecting to this fetishism an
incomparably more powerful enemy and therewith disciplining him.

In order to compel the revolution, hunching its shoulders and bending
its back, to pass submissively under the yoke of the Pre-Parliament, it
was first necessary to shatter the revolution, or in any case to inflict
upon it a serious defeat. In reality, however, it was only three weeks
ago that the vanguard of the bourgeoisie had suffered a defeat. The
revolution had experienced an influx of forces. It had taken for its
goal not a bourgeois republic, but a republic of workers and peasants.
It had no reason for crawling under the yoke of the Pre-Parliament when
it was steadily broadening its power in the soviets.

On the 20th of September, the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks called
a party conference consisting of the Bolshevik delegates to the
Democratic Conference, the members of the Central Committee itself, and
of the Petrograd committee. As spokesman for the Central Committee,
Trotsky proposed the slogan of boycotting the Pre-Parliament. The
proposal was met with decisive resistance by some (Kamenev, Rykov,
Riazanov) and with sympathy by others (Sverdlov, Joffé, Stalin). The
Central Committee, having divided in two on the debated question, had
found itself compelled, in conflict with the constitution and traditions
of the party, to submit the question to the decision of the conference.
Two spokesmen, Trotsky and Rykov, took the floor as champions of the
opposing views. It might seem, and for the majority it did seem, that
this hot debate was purely tactical in character. In reality the quarrel
revived the April disagreements and initiated the disagreements of
October. The question was whether the party should accommodate its tasks
to the development of a bourgeois republic, or should really set itself
the goal of conquering the power. By a majority of 77 votes against 50,
this party conference rejected the slogan of boycott. On September 22nd,
Riazanov had the satisfaction of announcing at the Democratic Conference
in the name of the party that the Bolsheviks would send their
representatives to the Pre-Parliament, in order “in this new fortress of
compromisism to expose all attempts at a new coalition with the
bourgeoisie.” That sounded very radical, but it really meant
substituting a policy of oppositional exposure for a policy of
revolutionary action.

Lenin’s April theses had been appropriated by the whole party; but upon
every big question that arose, the March attitudes would swim out from
under them. And these attitudes were very strong in the upper layers of
the party, which in many parts of the country had only just now divided
from the Mensheviks. Lenin was able to take his part in this argument
only after the event. On the 23rd of September he wrote: “We must
boycott the Pre-Parliament. We must go out into the soviets of workers,
soldiers, and peasants’ deputies, go out into the trade unions, go out
in general to the masses. We must summon them to the struggle. We must
give them a correct and clear slogan: To drive out the Bonapartist gang
of Kerensky with its fake Pre-Parliament ... The Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries even after the Kornilov events refused to accept our
offer of compromise ... Ruthless struggle against them! Ruthless
expulsion of them from all revolutionary organizations! ... Trotsky was
for the boycott. Bravo, Comrade Trotsky! Boycottism was defeated in the
faction of the Bolsheviks who attended the Democratic Conference. Long
live the boycott!”

The deeper down this question went into the party, the more decisively
did the correlation of forces change in favor of the boycott. Almost all
the local organizations formed into majorities and minorities. In the
Kiev committee, for example, the advocates of boycott, Efgenia Bosh at
their head, were a weak minority. But only a few days later at a general
city conference, a resolution in favor of boycotting the Pre-Parliament
was adopted by an overwhelming majority. “There is no use wasting time,”
the resolution declared, “in chattering and spreading illusions.” Thus
the party promptly corrected its leaders.

During this time Kerensky, having abandoned all languid pretenses at
democracy, was trying with all his might to show the Kadets that he had
a firm hand. On September 18 he issued an unexpected order dissolving
the central committee of the fleet. The sailors answered: “The order
dissolving the Centroflot, being unlawful, is to be considered
inoperative, and its immediate annulment is demanded.” The Executive
Committee intervened, and supplied Kerensky with a formal pretext for
annulling his decision after three days. In Tashkent the soviet, which
had a Social Revolutionary majority, seized the power and removed the
old officials. Kerensky sent the general designated to put down Tashkent
a telegram: “No negotiations whatever with the rebels ... The most
decisive measures are necessary.” The troops occupied the city, and
arrested the representatives of the soviet power. A general strike
occurred immediately with forty trade unions participating. For a week
no papers were published, and the garrison was in a ferment. Thus in
pursuit of a phantom law and order, the government was sowing
bureaucratic anarchy.

On the day the Conference adopted its decision against a coalition with
the Kadets, the central committee of the Kadet party had proposed to
Konovalov and Kishkin that they accept Kerensky’s offer of a place in
the ministry. The move, it is said, was directed by Buchanan. That,
however, you need not take too literally. If Buchanan was not himself
the director, his shadow was: a government acceptable to the Allies had
to be born. The Moscow industrialists and brokers had got their backs
up. They had raised their price, and presented an ultimatum. The
Democratic Conference passed off in voting, imagining that its votes had
a real significance. In reality the question had been decided in the
Winter Palace at a joint session of the fragments of the government with
the representatives of the coalition parties. The Kadets had sent here
their most frank Kornilovists. All joined in persuading each other of
the necessity of unity. Tseretelli, that inexhaustible layer-down of
commonplaces, discovered that the chief obstacle to an agreement “has
consisted up to this point in mutual distrust ... This distrust ought to
be removed.” The Minister of Foreign Affairs, Tereshchenko, figured up
and reported that out of the 197 days’ existence of the revolutionary
government, 56 days had been occupied in crises. How the remaining days
had been occupied he did not state.

Even before the Democratic Conference in direct conflict with its own
intentions had swallowed Tseretelli’s resolution, the correspondents of
the English and American papers had cabled home that a Coalition with
the Kadets was assured, and had confidently given the names of the new
ministers. On its part, the Moscow Council of Public Men, with our old
friend Rodzianko in the chair, sent congratulations to its member
Tretiakov who had been invited to enter the government. On the 9th of
August these same gentlemen had sent Kornilov a telegram: “In this
threatening hour of severe trial all thinking Russia looks to you with
hope and faith.”

Kerensky graciously consented to the existence of the Pre-Parliament on
condition that “it be recognized that the organization of the power and
the appointment of the staff of the government belong to the Provisional
Government only.” This humiliating condition was dictated by the Kadets.
The bourgeoisie could not, of course, fail to understand that the
membership of a Constituent Assembly would be far less favorable to it
than the membership of the Pre-Parliament. “The elections for the
Constituent Assembly” – to quote Miliukov – “can only give the most
accidental and perhaps pernicious results.” If in spite of this, the
Kadet party – which had not long ago tried to subject the government to
the tzarist Duma – absolutely refused legislative rights to the
Pre-Parliament, this could only mean that it had not given up hope of
quashing the Constituent Assembly.

“Either Kornilov or Lenin”: thus Miliukov defined the alternative. Lenin
on his part wrote: “Either a Soviet government or Kornilovism. There is
no middle course.” To this extent Miliukov and Lenin coincided in their
appraisal of the situation – and not accidentally. In contrast to the
heroes of the compromise phrase, these two were serious representatives
of the basic classes of society. According to Miliukov the Moscow State
Conference had already made it clearly obvious that “the country is
dividing into two camps, between which there can be no essential
conciliation or agreement.” But where there can be no agreement between
two social camps, the issue is decided by civil war.

However, neither the Kadets nor the Bolsheviks withdrew the slogan of
the Constituent Assembly. It was needful to the Kadets as the last court
of appeal against immediate social reform, against the soviets, against
the revolution. That shadow which democracy cast before it in the form
of the Constituent Assembly, was employed by the bourgeoisie in
opposition to the living democracy. The bourgeoisie could openly reject
the Constituent Assembly only after they had crushed the Bolsheviks.
They were far from that. At the given stage the Kadets were trying to
assure the government’s independence of those organizations bound up
with the masses, in order afterward the more surely and completely to
subject the government to themselves.

But the Bolsheviks also, although finding no way out on the road of
formal democracy, had not yet renounced the idea of the Constituent
Assembly. Moreover, they could not do this without abandoning
revolutionary realism. Whether the future course of events would create
the conditions for a complete victory of the proletariat, could not with
absolute certainty be foreseen. Exactly as the Bolsheviks defended the
compromisist soviets and the democratic municipalities against Kornilov,
so they were ready to defend the Constituent Assembly against the
attempts of the bourgeoisie.

The thirty day crisis ended at last in the creation of a new government.
The chief rôle, after Kerensky, was to be played by the very rich Moscow
industrialist, Konovalov, who at the beginning of the revolution had
financed Gorky’s paper, had thereafter become a member of the first
coalition government, had resigned in protest after the first congress
of the soviets, entered the Kadet party when it was ripe for the
Kornilov events, and now returned into the government in the capacity of
Vice-President and Minister of Commerce and Industry. Along with
Konovalov, ministerial posts were occupied by Tretiakov, the president
of the Moscow stock exchange committee, and Smirnov, president of the
Moscow Military Industrial Committee. The sugar manufacturer from Kiev,
Tereshchenko, remained Minister of Foreign Affairs. The other ministers
– among them the Socialists – had no traits of identification, but were
wholly prepared to sing in tune. The Entente could be the more satisfied
with the government in that the old diplomatic official, Nabokov,
remained ambassador in London; the Kadet Maklakov, an ally of Kornilov
and Savinkov, went as an ambassador to Paris; and to Berne, the
“progressive” Efremov. The struggle for a democratic peace was thus
placed in reliable hands. The Declaration of the new government was a
spiteful parody of the Moscow Declaration of the democracy. The meaning
of the Coalition lay, however, not in its program of transformations,
but in its attempt to carry through the business of the July days: to
behead the revolution by shattering the Bolsheviks. But here _Rabochy
Put_, one of the reincarnations of _Pravda_, impudently reminded the
partners: “You have forgotten that the Bolsheviks are now the Soviets of
Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies.” This reminder touched a sore point. As
Miliukov recognizes: “The fatal question presented itself: Is it not now
too late to declare war on the Bolsheviks?”

And indeed it actually was too late. On the day the new government was
formed, with six bourgeois and ten semi-socialist ministers, the
Petrograd Soviet completed the formation of a new Executive Committee,
consisting of thirteen Bolsheviks, six Social Revolutionaries and three
Mensheviks. The Soviet greeted the governmental coalition with a
resolution introduced by its new president, Trotsky. “The new government
... will go into the history of the revolution as the civil war
government ... The news of the formation of the government will be met
by the whole revolutionary democracy with one answer: Resign! Relying
upon this unanimous voice of the authentic democracy, the All-Russian
Congress of Soviets will create a genuinely revolutionary government.”
The enemy tried to see in this resolution a mere ritual vote of
non-confidence. In reality it was a program of revolution. Exactly a
month was required for its realization.

The curve of industry continued sharply downward. The government, the
Central Executive Committee, and soon the newly created Pre-Parliament,
registered the facts and symptoms of decline as arguments against
anarchy, the Bolsheviks, and the revolution. But they had not themselves
the ghost of an industrial plan. A body constituted by the government
for the regulation of industry did not take one single serious step. The
capitalists were shutting down the factories; the movement of the
railroads was decreasing through lack of coal; electric power stations
were dying down in the cities; the press was wailing about a
catastrophe; prices were rising; the workers were striking, layer after
layer, in spite of the warnings of parties, soviets, and trade unions.
Only those layers of the working class did not enter the strike
conflict, which were already consciously moving towards a revolution.
The most peaceful city of all, perhaps, was Petrograd.

The government, with its inattention to the masses, its light-minded
indifference to their needs, its impudent phrasemongering in answer to
protests and cries of despair, was raising up everybody against it. It
seemed as though the government were deliberately seeking a conflict.
The railroad workers and clerks almost since the February revolution had
been demanding a raise. Commission had followed commission, nobody had
made an answer, and this was getting on the nerves of the railroad
workers. The Compromisers had pacified them; the Vikzhel had held them
back. But on the 24th of September the explosion came. Only then did the
government wake up to the situation. Some sort of concessions were made
to the railroad workers, and on September 27th the strike, which had
already seized a large section of the railroads, was called off.

August and September were months of swift deterioration in the food
situation. Already in the Kornilov days the bread ration had been cut
down in Moscow and Petrograd to half a pound a day. In Moscow county
they began to give out no more than two pounds a week. The Volga, the
South, the Front, and the immediate rear – all parts of the country were
experiencing a sharp food crisis. In the textile district near Moscow a
number of factories had already begun to starve in the literal sense of
the word. The working-men and women of the Smirnov factory – whose owner
was in those very days invited as State Auditor into the new coalition
ministry – held a demonstration in the neighboring town of Orekhov-Zuyev
with placards reading: “We are starving”, “Our children are starving”,
“Whoever is not for us is against us.” The workers of Orekhov and the
soldiers of the local military hospital divided their scanty rations
with the demonstrators. That was another coalition rising against the
Coalition Government.

The newspapers were every day recording new centers of conflict and
rebellion. Workers, soldiers and the town petty bourgeoisie were
protesting. Soldiers’ wives were demanding increased subventions, living
quarters, wood for the winter. Black Hundred agitation was trying to
find fuel in the hunger of the masses. The Moscow Kadet paper _Russkie
Vedornosti_, which in the old times united Liberalism with Narodnikism,
now looked with hatred and disgust upon the authentic _narod_ – the
people. “A broad wave of disorders has swept through all Russia,” wrote
the liberal professors. “The spontaneousness and meaninglessness of
these pogroms ... more than anything else, makes it difficult to
struggle with them ...” Resort to measures of repression, to the aid of
armed forces? But it is exactly the armed forces, in the shape of
soldiers from the local garrison, that play the chief part in these
pogroms. The crowd comes into the streets and begins to feel itself
master of the situation.

The Saratov district attorney reported to the Minister of Justice
Maliantovich, who in the epoch of the first revolution had counted
himself a Bolshevik: “The chief evil against which we have no power to
fight is the soldiers. Lynch-law, arbitrary arrests and searches,
requisitions of every kind – all these things are carried out in the
majority of cases either exclusively by the soldiers, or with their
immediate participation.” In Saratov itself, in the county seats, in the
villages, there is “a complete absence on all sides of assistance to the
Department of Justice.” The district attorney’s offices have no time
even to register the crimes which a whole people are committing.

The Bolsheviks had no illusions about the difficulties which would fall
upon them along with the power. “In advancing the slogan ‘All power to
the soviets,’” said the new president of the Petrograd Soviet, “we know
that it will not heal all sores in a minute. We need a power created in
the image of the executive of the trade unions, which will give the
strikers all that it can, which will conceal nothing, and when it cannot
give, will openly acknowledge the fact.”

One of the first sittings of the government was devoted to the problem
of “anarchy” in the localities, especially in the villages. Once more it
was declared necessary “not to stop at the most decisive measures.” In
passing, the government discovered that the cause of the failure of the
struggle against disorders lay in the “inadequate popularity” of the
government commissars among the masses of the peasant population. In
order to help out, it was decided to organize immediately in all
provinces affected by disorders “special committees of the Provisional
Government.” Henceforth the peasantry were expected to meet punitive
detachments with shouts of welcome.

Inexorable historic forces were dragging the rulers down. Nobody
seriously believed in the success of the new government. Kerensky’s
isolation was beyond mending. The ruling classes could not forget his
betrayal of Kornilov. “Those who were ready to fight against the
Bolsheviks,” writes the Cossack officer Kakliugin, “did not want to do
it in the name of, or in defense of, the power of the Provisional
Government.” Although hanging on to the power, Kerensky himself feared
to make any use of it. The growing force of the opposition paralyzed his
will to the last fibre. He evaded any decisions whatever, and avoided
the Winter Palace where the situation compelled him to act. Almost
immediately after the formation of the new government he slipped the
presidency to Konovalov, and himself went to headquarters where there
was the least possible need of him. He came back to Petrograd only to
open the Pre-Parliament. Although urged to remain by his ministers, he
nevertheless returned to the front on the 14th. Kerensky was running
away from a fate which followed at his heels.

Konovalov, the closest colleague of Kerensky and his Vice-President, got
into a state of despair, according to Nabokov, over Kerensky’s
instability and the complete impossibility of relying upon his word. But
the mood of the other members of the cabinet differed little from that
of their chief. The ministers kept looking round and listening in alarm,
waiting, jotting down little notes of evasion, occupying themselves with
trifles. The Minister of Justice, Maliantovich, was dreadfully troubled,
according to Nabokov, over the fact that the senators would not admit
into their body the new colleague Sokolov, who wore a black business
suit. “What do you think must be done?” asked Maliantovich with alarm.
According to the ritual established by Kerensky, and carefully observed,
the ministers addressed each other, not by the first and middle name as
simple mortals do, but by the title of their position – “Mr. Minister of
this or that” – as the representatives of a strong power are supposed
to. The memoirs of the members sound like a satire. Kerensky himself
subsequently wrote about his own war minister: “That was the most
unfortunate of all my appointments. Verkhovsky introduced something
indescribably comic into his activities.” But the misfortune was that a
tint of the involuntary comic lay over the whole activity of the
Provisional Government. These people did not know what to do or where to
turn. They did not govern, they played at government as little boys play
soldier, though far more amusingly.

Speaking as an eye-witness, Miliukov has depicted in very definite
strokes the condition of the head of the government at this period:
“Having lost the ground under his feet, the further he went the more
Kerensky revealed all the signs of that pathological condition of spirit
which may be called in medical language ‘psychic neurasthenia.’ It had
long been known to a close circle of his friends that from periods of
extreme failure of energy in the morning, Kerensky would pass over in
the latter half of the day into a condition of extreme excitement under
the influence of the drugs he was taking.” Miliukov explains the special
influence of the Kadet minister, Kishkin, a psychiatrist by profession,
on the ground of his skilful handling of the patient. These testimonies
we leave entirely upon the responsibility of the liberal historian, who
had, to be sure, every possibility of knowing the truth, but was far
from choosing truth as his supreme criterion.

The testimony of a man as near to Kerensky as Stankevich confirms, if
not the psychiatric, at least the psychological, characterization given
by Miliukov. “Kerensky gave me the impression,” writes Stankevich, “of a
kind of emptiness in the whole situation, and a strange unprecedented
tranquillity. He had around him his invariable ‘little _aides-de-camp_,’
but there was no longer the continual crowd surrounding him, neither
delegations nor lime-lights ... There appeared strange periods of a kind
of leisure, and I got the rare opportunity to converse with him for
whole hours, during which he would manifest a strange unhurriedness.”

Every new transformation of the government was accomplished in the name
of a strong power, and each new ministry would open on a major key, only
to fall in a very few days into nervous prostration. It would then only
wait for an external impetus in order to fall apart. The impetus would
be given each time by a movement of the masses. The transformations of
the government, if you penetrate below the deceiving exterior, moved in
every case in a direction opposite to that of the mass movement. The
passage from one government to another would be accompanied by a crisis
becoming every time more long drawn out and morbid in its character.
Each new crisis squandered a part of the governmental power, enfeebled
the revolution, demoralized the ruling groups. The Executive Committee
of the first two months could do anything – even summon the bourgeoisie
to a nominal power. In the next two months the Provisional Government
together with the Executive Committee could still do much – even start
an offensive on the front. The third government, together with the
enfeebled Executive Committee, was able to begin the destruction of the
Bolsheviks, but powerless to carry it through. The fourth government,
arising after the longest crisis of all, was incapable of doing
anything. Hardly born, it began to die and sat waiting with wide open
eyes for the undertaker.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Official personnel of the cooperatives.

2. Parliament.

 



THE HISTORY OF THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION


[Red Flag]



VOLUME THREE: THE TRIUMPH OF THE SOVIETS



CHAPTER 38 THE PEASANTRY BEFORE OCTOBER


 

Civilisation has made the peasantry its pack animal. The bourgeoisie in
the long run only changed the form of the pack. Barely tolerated on the
threshold of the national life, the peasant stands essentially outside
the threshold of science. The historian is ordinarily as little
interested in him as the dramatic critic is in those grey figures who
shift the scenery, carrying the heavens and earth on their backs, and
scrub the dressing-rooms of the actors. The part played by the peasantry
in past revolutions remains hardly cleared up to this day.

“The French bourgeoisie began by liberating the peasantry,” wrote Marx
in 1848. “With the help of the peasantry they conquered Europe. The
Prussian bourgeoisie was so blinded by its own narrow and close-by
interests that it lost even this ally, and turned it into a weapon in
the hands of the feudal counter-revolution.” In this contrast what
relates to the German bourgeoisie is true; but the assertion that “the
French bourgeoisie began by liberating the peasantry” is an echo of that
official French legend which exercised an influence in its day even upon
Marx. In reality the bourgeoisie, in the proper sense of the term,
opposed the peasant revolution with all the power it had. Even from the
rural insurrections of 1789 the local leaders of the Third Estate threw
out, under the guise of editing, the keenest and most bold demands. The
famous decision of August 4, adopted by the National Assembly amid the
glow of rural conflagrations, long remained a pathetic formula without
content. The peasants who would not reconcile themselves to this deceit
were adjured by the Constituent Assembly to “return to the fulfilment of
their duties and have the proper respect for [feudal] property.” The
civil guard tried more than once to put down the peasantry in the
country. But the city workers, taking the side of those in revolt, met
the bourgeois punitive expeditions with stones and broken tile.

Throughout five years the French peasantry rose at every critical moment
of the revolution, preventing a deal between the feudal and bourgeois
property-holders. The Parisian _Sans-culottes_, pouring out their blood
for the republic, liberated the peasant from his feudal chains. The
French republic of 1792 marked a new social régime – in
contradistinction to the German republic of 1918, or the Spanish
republic of 1931, which mean only the old régime minus the dynasty. At
the bottom of this difference it is not hard to find the agrarian
question.

The French peasant did not think directly of a republic; he wanted to
throw off the landlord. The Parisian republicans ordinarily forgot all
about the country. But it was only the peasant pressure upon the
landlord which guaranteed the creation of a republic, clearing the
feudal rubbish out of its road. A republic with a nobility is not a
republic. This was excellently understood by the old man Machiavelli,
who in his Florentine exile 400 years before the presidency of Ebert,
between hunting thrushes and playing at _tric-trac_ with the butcher,
generalised the experience of democratic revolutions. “Who ever wants to
found a republic in a country where there are many nobles, can only do
this if to begin with he exterminates them all. The Russian _Muzhiks_
were essentially of the same opinion, and they revealed this openly
without any “Machiavellianism.”

While Petrograd and Moscow played the main rôle in the movement of the
workers and soldiers, the first place in the peasant movement must be
accorded to the backward Great Russian agricultural centre, and the
middle region of the Volga. Here the relics of serfdom had especially
deep roots; the nobles’ proprietorship in the land was most parasitic in
character; the differentiation of the peasantry was far behind and the
poverty of the village thus more nakedly revealed. Bursting out in this
region as early as March, the movement had been immediately adorned with
acts of terror. Through the efforts of the dominant parties it was soon
switched, however, into the channel of compromise politics.

In the industrially backward Ukraine, agriculture, carried on for
export, had acquired a far more progressive and consequently more
capitalistic character. Here the stratification of the peasantry had
gone considerably farther than in Great Russia. The struggle for
national liberation moreover inevitably delayed, at least for the time
being, other forms of social struggle. But the variation in regional,
and even national, conditions expressed itself in the long run only in a
difference of dates. By autumn the territory of the peasant struggle had
become almost the whole country. Out of the 624 counties constituting
old Russia, 482, or 77 per cent, were involved in the movement. And
omitting the borderlands, distinguished by special agrarian conditions –
the northern district, the Transcaucasus, the region of the steppes, and
Siberia – out of 481 counties, 439, or 91 per cent, were drawn into the
peasant revolt.

The methods of struggle differ according to whether it is a question of
ploughed land, forest, pasture, of rentals or of hired labour. The
struggle changed its forms and methods, too, at various stages of the
revolution. But in general the movement of the villages passed, with
inevitable delay, through the same two great stages as the movement of
the cities. In the first stage the peasants were still accommodating
themselves to the new régime, and trying to solve their problems by
means of the new institutions. Even here, however, it was more a matter
of form than substance. The Moscow liberal newspaper – tinted before the
revolution with a Narodnik hue – expressed with admirable directness the
state of mind of the landlord circles in the summer of 1917. “The muzhik
is glancing round, he is not doing anything yet, but look in his eyes –
his eyes will tell you that all the land lying around him is his land.”
A perfect key to this “peaceful” policy of the peasantry, is a telegram
sent in April by one of the Tambov villages to the Provisional
Government:

“We desire to keep the peace in the interests of the freedom won. But
for this reason, forbid the sale of the landlords’ land until the
Constituent Assembly. Otherwise we will shed blood, but we will not let
anyone else plough the land.”

The muzhik found it easy to maintain a tone of respectful threat,
because in bringing his pressure to bear against historic rights, he
hardly had to come into direct conflict with the state at all. Organs of
the governmental power were lacking in the localities. The village
committees controlled the militia, the courts were disorganised, the
local commissars were powerless, “We elected you,” the peasants would
shout at them, “and we will kick you out.”

During the summer the peasants, developing the struggle of the preceding
months, came nearer and nearer to civil war, and their left wing even
stepped over its threshold. According to a report of the landed
proprietors of the Taganrog district, the peasants on their own
initiative seized the hay crop, took possession of the land, hindered
the ploughing, named arbitrary rental prices, and removed proprietors
and overseers. According to a report of the Nizhegorod commissar,
violent activities and seizures of land and forest in his province were
multiplying. The county commissars were afraid of seeming to the
peasants like defenders of the big landlords. The rural militia were not
to be relied on. “There have been cases when officers of the militia
took part in violence together with the mob.” In Schliasselburg county a
local committee prevented the landlords from cutting their own forest.
The thought of the peasants was simple: No Constituent Assembly can
resurrect the trees that are cut down. The commissar of the Ministry of
the Court complains of the seizure of hay: We have had to buy hay for
the court horses. In Kursk province the peasants divided among
themselves the fertilised fallow land of Tereshchenko. The proprietor
was Minister of Foreign Affairs. The peasants declared to Schneider, a
horse breeder of Orlov province, that they would not only cut the clover
on his estate, but him too they might “send into the army.” The village
committee directed the overseer of Rodzianko’s estate to surrender the
hay to the peasants: If you don’t listen to this land committee, you’ll
get treated differently, you’ll get arrested. Signed and sealed.

From all corners of the country complaints and wails poured in – from
victims, from local authorities, from noble-minded observers. The
telegrams of the landowners constitute a most brilliant refutation of
the crude theory of class struggle. These titled nobles, lords of the
latifundia, spiritual and temporal rulers, are worrying exclusively
about the public weal. Their enemy is not the peasants, but the
Bolsheviks – sometimes the anarchists, Their own property engages the
landlord’s interest solely from the point of view of the welfare of the
fatherland. 300 members of the Kadet Party in Chernigov province declare
that the peasants, incited by Bolsheviks, are removing the war prisoners
from work and themselves independently reaping the harvest. As a result,
they cry, we are threatened with “inability to pay the taxes.” The very
meaning of existence for these liberal landlords lay in supporting the
national treasury! The Podolsk branch of the State Bank complains of the
arbitrary actions of village committees, “whose presidents are often
Austrian prisoners.” Here it is injured patriotism that speaks. In
Vladimir province, in the manor of a registrar of deeds, Odintsov, the
peasants took away building materials that had been “made ready for
philanthropic institutions.” Public officials live only for the love of
mankind! A bishop from Podolsk reports the arbitrary seizure of a forest
belonging to the house of the Archbishop. The procurator complains of
the seizure of meadowlands from the Alexandro-Nevsky Monastery. The
Mother Superior of the Kizliarsk Convent calls down thunder and
lightning upon the members of the local committee. They are interfering
in the affairs of the convent, confiscating rentals for their own use,
“inciting the nuns against their superiors.” In all these cases the
spiritual needs of the church are directly affected. Count Tolstoi, one
of the sons of Leo Tolstoi, reports in the name of the League of
Agriculturists of Ufimsk province that the transfer of land to the local
committees “without waiting for a decision of the Constituent Assembly
... is causing an outburst of dissatisfaction among the peasant
proprietors, of whom there are more than 200,000 in the province.” The
hereditary lord is troubled exclusively about his lesser brothers.
Senator Belgardt, a proprietor of Tver province, is ready to reconcile
himself to cuttings in the forest, but is grieved and offended that the
peasants “will not submit to the bourgeois government.” A Tambov
landlord, Veliaminop, demands the rescue of two estates which “are
serving the needs of the army.” By accident these two estates happened
to belong to him. For the philosophy of idealism these landlord
telegrams of 1917 are verily a treasure. A materialist will rather see
in them a display of the various models of cynicism. He will add perhaps
that great revolutions deprive the property-holders even of the
privilege of dignified hypocrisy.

The appeals of the victims to the county and provincial authorities, to
the Minister of the Interior, to the President of the Council of
Ministers, brought as a general rule no result. From whom then shall we
ask aid? From Rodzianko, president of the State Duma! Between the July
Days and the Kornilov insurrection, the Lord Chamberlain again felt
himself an influential figure: much was done at a ring from his
telephone.

The functionaries of the Ministry of the Interior send out circulars to
the localities about bringing the guilty to trial. The brusque landlords
of Samara telegraph in answer: “Circulars without the signature of the
socialist minister have no force.” The function of socialism is thus
revealed. Tseretelli is compelled to overcome his bashfulness. On the
18th of July he sends out a wordy instruction about taking “swift and
decisive measures.” Like the landlords themselves, Tseretelli worries
solely about the army and the state. It seems to the peasants, however,
that Tseretelli is protecting the landlords.

There came a sudden change in the government’s method of pacifying the
peasants. Up to July the prevailing method had been talking them out of
it. If military detachments were also sent into the localities, it was
only in the capacity of a guard for the government orator. After the
victory over the Petrograd workers and soldiers, however, cavalry troops
– now without vocal persuaders – put themselves directly at the disposal
of the landlords. In Kazan province, one of the most tumultuous, they
succeeded – to quote the young historian, Yugov – “only by means of
arrests, by bringing armed troops into the villages, and even by
reviving the custom of flogging ... in reducing the peasants to
submission.” In other places, too, these measures of repression were not
without effect. The number of damaged landlord properties fell somewhat
in July: from 516 to 503. In August the government achieved still
further successes: the number of unsatisfactory counties fell from 325
to 288 – that is, 11 per cent; the number of properties involved in the
movement was even reduced 33 per cent.

Certain districts, heretofore the most restless, now quiet down or
retire to second place. On the other hand, districts which were reliable
yesterday now come into the struggle. Only a month ago the Penza
commissar was painting a consoling picture: “The country is busy reaping
the harvest ... Preparations are under way for the elections to the
village zemstvos. The period of governmental crisis passed quietly. The
formation of the new government was greeted with great satisfaction.” In
August there is not a trace left of this idyll. “Mass depredations upon
orchards and the cutting down of forests ... To quell the disorders, we
have had to resort to armed force.”

In its general character the summer movement still belongs to the
“peaceful” period. However, unmistakable, although indeed weak, symptoms
of radicalisation are already to be observed. Whereas in the first four
months cases of direct attack upon the landlords’ manors decreased, from
July on they begin to increase. Investigators have established in
general the following classification of the July conflicts, arranged in
a diminishing order starting with the most numerous: Seizure of meadows,
of crops, of food-stuffs and fodder, of ploughed fields, of implements;
conflict over the conditions of employment; destruction of manors. In
August the order is as follows: Seizure of crops, of reserve provisions
and fodder, of meadows and hay, of land and forest; agrarian terror.

At the beginning of September Kerensky, in his capacity of
commander-in-chief, issued a special order repeating the recent
arguments and threats of his predecessor, Kornilov, against “violent
activities” on the part of the peasants. A few days later Lenin wrote:
“Either ... all the land to the peasants immediately ... or the
landlords and capitalists ... will bring things to the point of an
endlessly ferocious peasant revolt.” During the months following this
became a fact.

The number of properties affected by agrarian conflicts in September
rose 30 per cent over that in August; in October, 43 per cent over that
in September. In September and the first three weeks of October there
occurred over a third as many agrarian conflicts as all those recorded
since March. Their resoluteness rose, however, incomparably faster than
their number. During the first months even direct seizures of various
appurtenances wore the aspect of bargains mitigated and camouflaged by
the compromisist institutions. Now the legal mask falls away. Every
branch of the movement assumes a more audacious character. From various
forms and degrees of pressure, the peasants are now passing over to
violent seizures of the various parts of the landlord’s business, to the
extermination of the nests of the gentility, the burning of manors, even
the murder of proprietors and overseers.

The struggle for a change in the conditions of rent, which in June
exceeded in number of cases the destructive movement, falls in October
to ¹/40 the number. Moreover the rent movement itself changes its
character, becoming merely another way of driving out the landlord. The
veto on buying and selling land and forest gives place to direct
seizure. The mass wood-cuttings and mass grazings acquire the character
of a deliberate destruction of the landlord’s goods. In September 279
cases of open destruction of property are recorded; they now constitute
more than one eighth of all the conflicts. Over 42 per cent of all the
cases of destruction recorded by the militia between the February and
the October revolution occurred in the month of October.

The struggle for the forests was especially bitter. Whole villages were
frequently burned to the ground. The timber was strongly guarded and
selling at a high price; the muzhik was starving for timber; moreover
the time had come to lay up firewood for the winter. Complaints came in
from Moscow, Nizhegorod, Petrograd, Orel, and Volyn provinces – from all
corners of the country – about the destruction of forests and the
seizure of the reserves of corded wood. “The peasants are arbitrarily
and ruthlessly cutting down the forest. Two hundred _dessiatins_ of the
landlord’s forest have been burned by the peasants.” “The peasants of
Klimovichevsky and Cherikovsky counties are destroying the forests and
laying waste the winter-wheat ...” The forests guards are in flight; the
landlord’s forests are groaning; the chips are flying throughout the
whole country. All that autumn the muzhik’s axe was feverishly beating
time for the revolution.

In the districts which imported grain the food situation in the villages
deteriorated at a faster pace than in the city. Not only food was
lacking, but seed. In the exporting regions, in consequence of a
redoubled pumping out of food resources, the situation was but little
better. The raising of the fixed price of grain hit the poor. In a
number of provinces there occurred hunger riots, plundering of
granaries, assaults on the institutions of the Food Administration. The
population resorted to substitutes for bread. Reports came in of cases
of scurvy and typhus, of suicides from despair. Hunger and its advancing
shadow made the neighbourhood of opulence and luxury especially
intolerable. The more destitute strata of the villages moved into the
front ranks of the fight.

These waves of bitter feeling raised up no little slime from the bottom.
In Kostroma province “a Black Hundred and anti-Jew agitation is
observed. Criminality is on the increase ... A waning of interest in the
political life of the country is noticeable.” This latter phrase in the
report of the commissar means: The educated classes are turning their
back on the revolution. The voice of Black Hundred monarchism suddenly
rings out from Podolsk province: The committee of the village of
Demidovka does not recognise the Provisional Government and considers
the Czar Nikolai Alexandrovich “the most loyal leader of the Russian
people. If the Provisional Government does not retire, we will join the
Germans.” Such bold acknowledgements, however, are unique. The
monarchists among the peasants have long ago changed colour, following
the example of the landlords. In places – for instance, in that same
Podolsk province – military detachments in company with the peasants
invade the wine cellars. The commissar reports anarchy. “The villages
and the people are perishing; the revolution is perishing.” No, the
revolution is far from perishing. It is digging itself a deeper channel
The raging waters are nearing their mouth.

On a night about the 8th of September, the peasants of the village
Sychevka in Tambov province, going from door to door armed with clubs
and pitchforks, called out everybody, small and great, to raid the
landlord, Romanov. At a village meeting one group proposed that they
take the estate in an orderly fashion, divide the property among the
population, and keep the buildings for cultural purposes. The poor
demanded that they burn the estate, leaving not one stone upon another.
The poor were in the majority. On that same night an ocean of fire
swallowed up the estates of the whole township. Everything inflammable
was burned, even the experimental fields. The breeding cattle were
slaughtered. “They were drunk to madness.” The flames jumped over from
township to township. The rustic warriors were now no longer content
with the patriarchal scythe and pitchfork. A provincial commissar
telegraphed: “Peasants and unknown persons armed with revolvers and hand
grenades are raiding the manors in Ranenburg and Riazhsky counties.” It
was the war that introduced this high technique into the peasant revolt.
The League of Landowners reported that 24 estates were burned in three
days. “The local authorities were powerless to restore order.” After
some delay troops arrived, sent by the district commander. Martial law
was declared, meetings forbidden, the instigators arrested. Ravines were
filled with the landlord’s possession and much of the booty was sunk in
the river.

A Penza peasant, Begishev, relates: “In September all rode out to raid
Logvin (he was raided in 1905, too). A troop of teams and wagons
streamed out to his estate and back, hundreds of muzhiks and wenches
began to drive and carry off his cattle, grain, etc.” A detachment
called out by the land administration tried to get back some of the
booty, but the muzhiks and wenches assembled 500 strong in the village,
and the detachment dispersed. The soldiers wore evidently not at all
eager to restore the trampled rights of the landlord. In Tauride
province, beginning with the last seven days of September, according to
the recollections of the peasant, Gaponenko, “the peasants began to raid
the buildings, drive out the overseers, take the work animals, the
machinery, the grain from the granaries ... They even tore off the
blinds from the windows, the doors from their frames, the floors from
the rooms, and the zinc roofs, and carried them away ...” “At first they
only came on foot, took what they could and lugged it off,” relates
Grunko, a peasant from Minsk, “but afterwards they hitched up the
horses, whoever had any, and carried things away in whole wagon-loads.
There was no room to pass. They just dragged and carried things off,
beginning at twelve o’clock noon, for two days and two nights without a
stop. In those forty-eight hours they cleaned out everything.” The
seizure of property, according to a Moscow peasant, Kuzmichev, was
justified as follows: “The landlord was ours, we worked for him, and the
property he had ought to belong to us alone.” Once upon a time the
landlords used to say to the serfs: “You are mine and what is yours is
mine.” Now the peasants were giving their answer: “He was our lord and
all his goods are ours.”

“In several localities they began to knock up the landlords in the
night,” remembers another Minsk peasant, Novikov. “Oftener and oftener
they would burn the landlord’s manor.” It came the turn of the estate of
the Grand Duke Nikolai Nikolaievich, former commander-in-chief. “When
they had taken away all they could get, they began breaking up the
stoves, removing the flue-plates, ripping up the floors and planks, and
dragging it all home ...”

Behind these destructive activities stood the century-old,
thousand-year-old strategy of all peasant wars: to raze to the ground
the fortified position of the enemy. Leave him no place to cover his
head. “The more reasonable ones,” remembers a Kursk peasant, Tzygankov,
“would say ‘We must not burn up the buildings – they will be of use to
us for schools and hospitals,’ but the majority were the kind that shout
out ‘We must destroy everything so that in case anything happens our
enemy will have no place to hide.’” “The peasants seized all the
landlords’ property,” relates an Orel peasant, Savchenko, “drove the
landlords out of the estates, smashed the windows, doors, ceilings and
floors of the landlords’ houses ... The soldiers said ‘If you destroy
the wolves’ nests, you must strangle the wolves too.’ Through such
threats the biggest and most important landlords hid out, and for that
reason there was no murder of landlords.”

In the village of Zalessye, in Vitebsk province, they burned barns full
of grain and hay in the estate belonging to a Frenchman, Barnard. The
muzhiks were the less inclined to investigate questions of nationality,
since many of the landlords had transferred their land in a hurry to
privileged foreigners. “The French embassy requests that measures be
taken ...” In the front region in the middle of October it was difficult
to take “measures,” even in behalf of the French embassy.

The destruction of the great estates near Riazan continued four days.
“Even children took part in the looting.” The League of Landed
Proprietors brought to the attention of the ministers that if measures
were not taken “lynch-law, famine and civil war would break out.” It is
difficult to understand why the landlords were still speaking of civil
war in the future tense. At a congress of the Co-operatives at the
beginning of September, Berkenheim, one of the leaders of the strong
trading peasantry, said: “I am convinced that not yet all Russia has
become a madhouse, that as yet for the most part only the population of
the big cities has gone mad.” This self-complacent voice of the solid
and conservative part of the peasantry was hopelessly behind the times.
It was during that very month that the villages totally broke loose from
all the nooses of reason, and the ferocity of their struggle left the
“madhouse” of the cities far behind.

In April Lenin had still considered it possible that the patriotic
Co-operators and the _kulaks_ would drag the main mass of the peasantry
after them along the road of compromise with the bourgeoisie and the
landlord. For this reason he so tirelessly insisted upon the creation of
special soviets of farm hands’ deputies, and upon independent
organisations of the poorest peasantry. Month by month it became clear,
however, that this part of the Bolshevik policy would not take root.
Except in the Baltic state there were no soviets of farm hands. The
peasant poor also failed to find independent forms of organisation. To
explain this merely by the backwardness of the farm hands and the
poorest strata of the villages, would be to miss the essence of the
thing. The chief cause lay in the substance of the historic task itself
– a democratic agrarian revolution.

Upon the two principal questions, rent and hired labour, it becomes
convincingly clear how the general interests of a struggle against the
relics of serfdom cut off the road to an independent policy not only for
the poor peasants, but for the hired hands. The peasants rented from the
landlords in European Russia 27 million _dessiatins_ – about 60 per cent
of all the privately owned land – and they paid a yearly-rental tribute
of 400 million roubles. The struggle against peonage conditions of rent
became after the February revolution the chief element of the peasant
movement. A smaller, but still very important, place was occupied by the
struggle of the rural wage-workers, which brought them in opposition not
only to the landlord, but also to the peasant exploiters. The tenant was
struggling for an alleviation of the conditions of rent, the worker for
an improvement in the conditions of labour. Both of them, each in his
own way, started out by recognising the landlord as property-holder and
boss. But as soon as the possibility opened of carrying the thing
through to the end – that is, of taking the land and occupying it
themselves – the poor peasants ceased to be interested in questions of
rent, and the trade union began to lose its attraction for the hired
hand. It was these rural workers and poor tenants who by joining the
general movement gave its ultimate determination to the peasant war and
made it irrevocable.

But the campaign against the landlord did not draw in quite so
completely the opposite pole of the village. So long as it did not come
to open revolt, the upper circles of the peasantry played a prominent
rôle in the movement, at times a leading rôle. In the autumn period,
however, the well-to-do muzhiks looked with continually increasing
distrust at the spread of the peasant war. They did not know how this
would end; they had something to lose; they stood aside. But they did
not succeed in holding off entirely: the village would not permit it.

More reserved and hostile than “our own” communal _kulaks_, were the
small landowners standing outside the commune. In the whole country
there were 600,000 homesteads of peasants owning plots up to 50
_dessiatins_. In many localities they constituted the backbone of the
Co-operatives, and gravitated, especially in the south, towards the
conservative Peasant Union which had already become a bridge towards the
Kadets. “The Secessionists and rich peasants,” according to Gullis, a
Minsk peasant, “supported the landlords and tried to appease the
peasantry with arguments.” In some places, under the influence of local
conditions, the struggle within the peasantry assumed a furious
character even before the October revolution. The Secessionists[1]
suffered most cruelly in this struggle. “Almost all their farm buildings
were burnt,” says Kuzmichev, a Nizhegorod peasant. “Their property was
partly annihilated and partly seized by the peasants.” The Secessionist
was “the landlord’s servant entrusted with several of the landlord’s
forest tracts; he was a favourite of the police, the gendarmerie and the
rulers.” The richest peasants and merchants of several villages of
Nizhegorod county disappeared in the autumn and returned to their
neighbourhoods only after two or three years.

But in most sections of the country the inner relations among the
peasantry were far from reaching such bitterness. The _kulaks_ conducted
themselves diplomatically, put on the breaks and resisted, but tried not
to set themselves too sharply against the “_mir_.”[2] The rank-and-file
villager, on his part, jealously watched the _kulaks_ and would not let
them unite with the landlords. The struggle between the nobles and the
peasantry for influence upon the _kulak_ continued throughout the whole
year 1917 in various different forms, from “friendly” pressure to
ferocious terrorism.

While the lords of the latifundia were ingratiatingly throwing open to
the peasant proprietors the main entrances to the assemblies of the
nobility, the small landowners were demonstratively drawing apart from
the nobility in order not to perish with them. In politics this found
expression in the fact that the landlords, who had belonged before the
revolution to the extreme right party, redecorated themselves now in the
tints of liberalism, adopting them from memory as a protective
colouration, whereas the peasant proprietors, who had often supported
the Kadets in the past, now shifted to the left.

A congress of petty proprietors of Perm province, held in September,
emphatically distinguished itself from the Moscow Congress of Landed
Proprietors at the head of whom stood “counts, dukes and barons.” An
owner of 50 _dessiatins_ said: “The Kadets never wore _armyaki_ and
_lapti_[3] and therefore will never defend our interests.” Pushing away
from the liberals, the labouring proprietor would look around for such
“socialists” as would stand for property rights. One of the delegates
came out for the social democracy. “The worker?” he said. “Give him land
and he will come to the village and stop spitting blood. The social
democrats will not take the land away from us.” He was speaking, of
course of the Mensheviks. “We will not give away our land to anybody.
Those will easily part with it who easily got it, as for example, the
landlord, but the peasant had a hard time getting the land.”

In that autumn period the villages were struggling with the _kulaks_,
not throwing them off, but compelling them to adhere to the general
movement and defend it against blows from the right. There were even
cases where a refusal to participate in a raid was punished by the death
of the culprit. The _kulak_ maneuvered while he could, but at the last
moment, scratching the back of his head once more, hitched the well-fed
horses to the iron-rimmed wagon and went out for his share. It was often
the lion’s share. “The well-to-do got the most out of it,” says the
Penza peasant, Begishev, “those who had horses and free men.” Savchenko
from Orel expressed himself in almost the same words: “The _kulaks_
mostly got the best of it, being well-fed and with something to draw the
wood in.”

According to the calculations of Vermenichev, to 4,954 agrarian
conflicts with landlords between February and October, there were 324
conflicts with the peasant bourgeoisie. An extraordinarily clear
correlation It alone firmly establishes the fact that the peasant
movement of 1917 was directed in its social foundations not against
capitalism, but against the relics of serfdom. The struggle against
kulakism developed only later, in 1918, after the conclusive liquidation
of the landlord.

This purely democratic character of the peasant movement, which should,
it would seem, have given the official democracy an unconquerable power,
did in fact completely reveal its rottenness. If you look at the thing
from above, the peasants were wholly led by the Social Revolutionaries,
elected them, followed them, almost blended with them. At the May
congress of peasant soviets, in the elections to the executive
committee, Chernov received 810 votes, Kerensky 804, whereas Lenin got
only 20 votes all in all. It was not for nothing that Chernov dubbed
himself Rural Minister! But it was not for nothing, either, that the
strategy of the villages brusquely parted company with Chernov’s
strategy. Their industrial isolation makes the peasants, so determined
in struggle with a concrete landlord, impotent before the general
landlord incarnate in the state. Hence the organic need of the muzhiks
to rely upon some legendary state as against the real one. In olden
times they created pretenders, they united round an imagined Golden
Edict of the czar, or around the legend of a righteous world. After the
February revolution they united round the Social Revolutionary banner
“Land and Freedom,” seeking help in it against the liberal landlord who
had become a governmental commissar. The Narodnik programme bore the
same relation to the real government of Kerensky, as the imagined edict
of the czar to the real autocrat.

In the programme of the Social Revolutionaries there was always much
that was Utopian. They hoped to create socialism on the basis of a petty
trade economy. But the foundation of their programme was democratically
revolutionary: to take the land from the landlord. When confronted with
the necessity of carrying out its programme, the party got tangled up in
a coalition. Not only the landlords rose against the confiscation of the
land, but also the Kadet bankers. The banks had loaned against real
estate no less than four billion roubles. Intending to dicker with the
landlords at the Constituent Assembly regarding prices but end things in
a friendly manner, the Social Revolutionaries zealously kept the muzhik
away from the land. They went to pieces, therefore, not on the Utopian
character of their socialism, but on their democratic inconsistency. It
might have taken years to test out their Utopianism. Their betrayal of
agrarian democracy became clear in a few months. Under a government of
Social Revolutionaries the peasants had to take the road of insurrection
in order to carry out the Social Revolutionary programme.

In July, when the government was coming down on the villages with
measures of repression, the peasants in hot haste ran for defence to
those same Social Revolutionaries. From Pontius the young they appealed
for protection to Pilate the old. The month of the greatest weakening of
the Bolsheviks in the cities was the month of the greatest expansion of
the Social Revolutionaries in the country. As usually happens,
especially in a revolutionary epoch, the maximum of organizational scope
coincided with the beginning of a political decline. Hiding behind
Social Revolutionaries from the blows of a Social Revolutionary
government, the peasants steadily lost confidence both in the government
and the party. Thus the swelling out of the Social Revolutionary
organisations in the villages became fatal to this universal party,
which was rebelling at the bottom but restoring order at the top.

In Moscow at a meeting of the Military Organisation on the 30th of July,
a delegate from the front, himself a Social Revolutionary, said:
Although the peasants still think themselves Social Revolutionaries, a
rift has formed between them and the party. The soldiers confirmed this:
Under the influence of Social Revolutionary agitation the peasants are
still hostile to the Bolsheviks, but in practice they decide the
questions of land and power in a Bolshevik manner. The Bolshevik,
Povolzhsky, who worked in the Volga region, testifies that the most
respected Social Revolutionaries, those who had taken part in the
movement of 1905, were more and more feeling themselves pushed aside:
“The muzhiks called them ‘old men,’ treating them with external
deference, but voting in their own way.” It was the workers and soldiers
who had taught the villages to vote and take action “in their own way”.
It is impossible to weigh the influence of the revolutionary workers
upon the peasantry. It was continuous, molecular, penetrating
everywhere, and therefore not capable of calculation. A mutual
penetration was made easier by the fact that a considerable number of
the industrial plants were situated in rural districts. But even the
workers of Petrograd, the most European of cities, kept up a close
connection with their native villages. Unemployment, increasing during
the summer months, and the lockout of the employers, threw back many
thousand of workers into the villages. A majority of them became
agitators and leaders.

From May to June there were created in Petrograd back-home clubs
corresponding to different provinces, counties and even villages. Whole
columns in the workers’ press were devoted to announcements of back-home
club meetings, where reports about journeys to the villages would be
heard, instructions drawn up for delegates, and money collected for
agitation. Not long before the uprising, these clubs united round a
special central bureau under the leadership of the Bolsheviks. This
back-home club movement soon spread to Moscow, Tver, and probably to a
number of other industrial cities.

However, in the matter of direct influence upon the village the soldiers
were still more important. It was only in the artificial conditions of
the front or in the city barrack that the young peasants, overcoming to
a certain degree their isolation, would come face to face with problems
of nationwide scope. Here too, however, their political dependence made
itself felt. While continually falling under the leadership of patriotic
and conservative intellectuals and then striving to get free of them,
the peasants tried to organise in the army separately from other social
groups. The authorities looked unfavourably upon these inclinations, the
War Ministry opposed them, the Social Revolutionaries did not welcome
them: The soviets of peasants’ deputies took but weak root in the army.
Even under the most favourable conditions the peasant is unable to
convert his overwhelming quantity into a political quality! Only in the
big revolutionary centres under the direct influence of the workers did
the soviets of peasant soldiers succeed in developing any important
work. Thus between April 1917 and January 1, 1918, the peasant soviet in
Petrograd sent 1,395 agitators into the villages with special mandates;
and about the same number without mandates. These delegates covered 65
provinces. In Kronstadt back-home clubs were formed among the sailors
and soldiers, following the example of the workers, and they supplied
their delegates with credentials giving them the “right” to free passage
on railroads and steamboats. The private lines accepted these papers
without a murmur. Conflicts arose on the government lines.

These official delegates of organisations were after all, however, mere
drops in the peasant ocean. An infinitely greater work was accomplished
by those hundreds of thousands and millions of soldiers who quit the
front and the rear garrisons of their own accord with the strong slogans
of mass-meeting speeches ringing in their ears. Those who had sat silent
at the front became garrulous at home in the villages. They found no
lack of greedy listeners. “Among the peasantry surrounding Moscow,” says
Muralov, one of the Moscow Bolsheviks, “there was a tremendous swing to
the left ... The villages and towns of Moscow province were swarming
with deserters from the front. They were visited also by city
proletarians who had not yet cut off their connections with the
country.” The dreamy and backward villages of Kaluga province, according
to the peasant Naumchenkov, “were waked up by soldiers coming home from
the front for various reasons during June and July.” The Nizhegorod
commissar reports that “all the lawbreaking and lawlessness is connected
with the appearance within the boundaries of the province of deserters,
soldiers on furlough, or delegates from the regimental committees.” The
overseer of the properties of Princess Bariatinsky of Zolotonoshzky
county complains in August of the arbitrary acts of the land committee
whose president is a Kronstadt sailor, Gatran. “Soldiers and sailors on
furlough,” reports the commissar of Bugulminsk county, “are carrying on
an agitation with a view to creating anarchy and a pogrom state of
mind.” “In Mglinsk county, in the village of Bielogosh, an arriving
sailor on his own authority forbade the preparation and export of
firewood and railroad ties from the forest.” And when it was not the
soldiers who began the struggle, it was they who finished it. In
Nizhegorod county the muzhiks harried a convent, cut the meadow grass,
broke down the fences, and bothered the nuns. The mother superior
refused to give in, and the militia would carry off the muzhiks and
punish them. “So the thing dragged along,” writes the peasant Arbekov,
“until the soldiers arrived. The buddies immediately took the bull by
the horns The convent was cleaned out.” In Moghiliev province, according
to the peasant Bobkov, “the soldiers home from the front were the first
leaders in the committee, and directed the expulsion of the landlords.”

The men from the front introduced into the business the heavy
determination of people accustomed to handle their fellow men with rifle
and bayonet. Even the soldiers’ wives caught this fighting mood from
their husbands. Says the Penza peasant, Begishev: “In September there
was a strong movement of soldiers’ wives who spoke at meetings in favour
of the raids.” The same thing was observed in other provinces. In the
cities, too, the soldiers wives were often the leaven in the lump.

Those cases in which soldiers took the lead in peasant disorders
constituted in March, according to Vermenichev’s calculations, 1 per
cent, in April, 8 per cent, in September, 12 per cent, and in October,
17 per cent. These figures cannot pretend to be accurate, but they show
the general tendency unmistakably. The dying leadership of the Social
Revolutionary teachers, town-clerks and functionaries, was giving place
to the leadership of soldiers who would stop at nothing.

Parvus, a German Marxian writer prominent in his day, who succeeded in
acquiring wealth and losing both his principles and his penetration
during the war, has compared the Russian soldiers with the mercenary
troopers, robbers and hold-up men of medieval times. For this it is
necessary to shut one’s eyes to the fact that in all their lawlessness
the Russian soldiers remained merely the executive organ of the greatest
agrarian revolution in history.

So long as the movement had not broken completely with legality, the
sending of troops into the villages preserved a symbolic character. In
practice it was almost the Cossacks alone who could be used as punitive
troops. “Four hundred Cossacks were sent into Serdobsky county ... this
measure had a tranquilizing effect; the peasants declared that they
would await the Constituent Assembly,” says the liberal paper, _Russkoe
Selo_, on the 11th of October. Four hundred Cossacks is certainly an
argument in favour of the Constituent Assembly. But there were not
enough Cossacks, and moreover they too were uncertain. Meantime the
government was oftener and oftener being compelled to “take decisive
measures.” During the first four months of the revolution Vermenichev
counts 17 cases in which armed forces were sent against the peasants; in
July and August, 39 cases; in September and October, 105 cases.

To put down the peasantry by armed force was only to pour oil on the
fire. In a majority of cases the soldiers went over to the peasants. A
county commissar of Podolsk province reports: “The army organisations
and even individual units are deciding social and economic questions,
are forcing (?) the peasants to carry out seizures and cut the forest,
and at times, in certain localities, they themselves take part in the
looting ... The local military units refuse to join in putting down acts
of violence ...” Thus the rural revolt loosened the last bolts of the
army. There was not the slightest possibility that in the circumstances
of a peasant war headed by the workers, the army would permit itself to
be thrown against the insurrection in the cities.

From the workers and soldiers the peasants first learned something new –
something other than what the Social Revolutionaries had told them –
about the Bolsheviks. The slogans of Lenin, and his name, penetrated the
village. The steadily increasing complaints against Bolsheviks were,
however, in many cases invented or exaggerated. The landlords hoped in
this way to make more sure of getting help. “In Ostroysky county
complete anarchy reigns, a consequence of Bolshevik propaganda.” From
Ufa province comes the news: “A member of a village committee,
Vassiliev, is distributing the programme of the Bolsheviks and openly
declaring that the landlords are to be hanged.” In seeking “protection
from robbery” the Novgorod landlord, Polonnik, does not forget to add:
“The Executive Committees are brimful of Bolsheviks.” That means that
they are unfavourable to the landlord. “In August,” remembers a Simbirsk
peasant, Zumorin, “workers began to make the rounds of the villages,
agitating for the Bolshevik Party and telling about its programme.” An
investigator of Sebezh county tells about the arrival from Petrograd of
a weaver Tatiana Mikhailova, 26 years old, who “called on the people of
her village to overthrow the Provisional Government, and praised the
tactics of Lenin.” In Smalensk province towards the end of August,
according to the peasant Kotov, “We began to interest ourselves in
Lenin, began to listen to the voice of Lenin ...” In the village
zemstvo, however, they were still electing an immense majority of Social
Revolutionaries.

The Bolshevik Party was trying to get closer to the peasant. On the 10th
of September Nevsky demanded that the Petrograd committee undertake the
publication of a peasant newspaper: “We must fix things so that we shall
not have the experience of the French Commune, where the peasantry did
not understand Paris and Paris did not understand the peasantry.” The
newspaper, _Byednotá_, soon came out. But even so, the purely party work
among the peasants remained insignificant. The strength of the Bolshevik
Party lay not in technical resources, not in machinery, but in a correct
policy. As air currents carry seeds, the whirlwinds of the revolution
scattered the ideas of Lenin.

“By September,” remembers a Tver peasant, Vorobiev, “not only the
soldiers, but the poor peasants themselves were oftener and more boldly
beginning to come out at meetings in defence of the Bolsheviks ...” This
is confirmed by the Simbirsk peasant, Zumorin: “Among the poor and some
of the middle peasants the name of Lenin was on everybody’s lips; the
talk was only of Lenin.” A Novgorod peasant, Grigoriev, tells how a
Social Revolutionary in the village called the Bolsheviks “usurpers” and
“traitors” and how the muzhiks thundered: “Down with the dog! Pound him
with rock! Don’t tell us any more fairy stories. Where is the land?
That’s enough from you! Give us the Bolsheviks!” It is possible, by the
way, that this episode – and there were many like it – derives from the
post-October period. Facts stand strong in a peasant’s memory but his
chronology is weak.

The soldier Chinenov, who came back to his home in Orel province with a
trunkful of Bolshevik literature, had not been welcomed by the home
village. It’s probably German gold, they said. But in October “the
village nucleus has 700 members and many rifles, and always comes out in
defence of the Soviet power.” The Bolshevik Vrachev tells how the
peasants of the purely agricultural province of Voronezh “woke up from
the effects of the Social Revolutionary fumes and began to take an
interest in our party. Thanks to which we already had a number of
village and township locals and subscribers to our papers, and received
many good fellows in the tiny headquarters of our committee.” In
Smolensk province, according to the recollections of Ivanov, “Bolsheviks
were very rare in the villages. There were very few of them in the
counties. There were no Bolshevik papers. Leaflets were very rarely
given out ... And nevertheless the nearer it came to October, the more
the villages swung over to the Bolsheviks.”

“In those counties where there was a Bolshevik influence in the Soviet
before October,” writes Ivanov again, “the element of raids upon
landlords’ estates either did not appear, or appeared only to a small
extent.” In this respect, however, it was not the same everywhere. “The
Bolshevik demand for the transfer of land to the peasants,” says, for
example, Tadeush, “was taken up with extraordinary rapidity by the mass
of the peasants of Moghiliev county, who laid waste the estates, in some
cases burning them, and seized the harvests and the forest.” In essence
there is no contradiction between the two testimonies. The general
agitation of the Bolsheviks undoubtedly nourished the civil war in the
country. But wherever the Bolsheviks had succeeded in putting down firm
roots, they naturally tried, without weakening the assault of the
peasants, to regulate its forms and decrease the amount of destruction.

The land question did not stand alone. The peasant suffered especially
during the last period of the war, both as seller and buyer. Grain was
taken from him at a fixed price, and the products of industry were
becoming more and more unattainable. The problem of economic correlation
between the country and the city, destined subsequently under the name
of the “scissors” to become the central problem of Soviet economy, was
already showing its threatening face. The Bolsheviks were saying to the
peasants: The soviets must seize the power, give you the land, end the
war, demobilise industry, establish workers’ control of production, and
regulate the price relations between industrial and agricultural
products. However summary this answer may have been, it did indicate the
road. “The partition wall between us and the peasantry,” said Trotsky on
the 10th of October at a conference of factory committees, “is the
little counsellors of Avksentiev. We must break through this wall. We
must explain to the village that all the attempts of the worker to help
the peasant by supplying the village with agricultural implements will
give no result until workers’ control of organised production is
established.” The conference issued a manifesto to the peasants in this
sense.

The Petrograd workers created at the factories in those days special
commissions which would assemble metals, damaged parts and fragments for
the use of a special centre called “Worker to Peasant.” This scrap-iron
was used for making the simplest agricultural implements and reserve
parts. That first planned entry of the workers into the process of
production – still tiny in scope and with agitational aims prevailing
over economics – nevertheless opened out a prospect for the near future.
Frightened at this entrance of the Bolsheviks into the forbidden sphere
of the village, the peasant Executive Committee made an attempt to get
hold of the new enterprise. But the decrepit Compromisers were no longer
in any condition to compete with the Bolsheviks on the city arena when
the ground was already slipping from under their feet in the villages.

The echoes of the Bolshevik agitation “so aroused the peasant poor,”
writes Vorobiev, the Tver peasant, “that we may definitely say: If
October had not come in October it would have come in November.” This
colourful description of the political strength of Bolshevism does not
contradict the fact of its organizational weakness. Only through such
striking disproportions does a revolution make its way. It is for this
very reason, to tell the truth, that its movement cannot be forced into
the framework of formal democracy. To accomplish the agrarian
revolution, whether in October or November, the peasantry had no other
course but to make use of the unravelling web of that same Social
Revolutionary Party. Its left elements were hastily and unsystematically
forming a group under the pressure of the peasant revolt – following the
Bolsheviks and competing with them. During the coming months the
political shift of the peasantry will take place chiefly under the
glossy banner of the Left Social Revolutionaries. This ephemeral party
will become a reflected and unstable form of rural Bolshevism, a
temporary bridge from the peasant war to the proletarian revolution.

The agrarian revolution had to have its own local institutions. How did
they look? There existed several types of organisation in the village:
state institutions such as the executive committee of the township, the
land and food committees; social institutions like the soviets; purely
political institutions like the parties; and finally organs of
self-government exemplified in the town zemstvos. The peasant soviets
had as yet developed only on a province, or to some extent a county
scale. There were few town soviets. The town zemstvos had been slow to
take root. The land and executive committees, on the other hand,
although state organs in design, became – strange as it may seem at a
first glance – the organs of the peasant revolution.

The head land committee, consisting of governmental functionaries,
landlords, professors, scientific agriculturists, Social Revolutionary
politicians and an admixture of dubious peasants, became in essence the
main brake of the agrarian revolution. The province committees never
ceased to be the conducting wires of the governmental policy. The county
committees oscillated between the peasants and the men higher up. The
town committees, however – elected by the peasants and working right
there before the eyes of the village – became the instruments of the
agrarian movement. The circumstance that the members of these committees
usually registered as Social Revolutionaries made no difference. They
kept step with the peasant’s hut and not the lord’s manor. The peasants
especially treasured the state character of their land committees,
seeing in this a sort of patent-right to civil war.

“The peasants say that they recognise nothing but the town committee,”
complains one of the chiefs of militia in Saransky county as early as
May. “All the county and city committees, they say, work for the
landlords.” According to a Nizhegorod commissar, “the attempts of
certain town committees to oppose the independent action of the peasants
almost always ends in failure and brings about a change of membership of
the committee.” According to Denissov, a peasant from Pskov, “the
committees were always on the side of the peasants’ movement against the
landlord because the most revolutionary part of the peasantry and
soldiers from the front were elected to them.”

The county, and more especially the province committees were led by the
functionary “intelligentsia,” which was trying to keep up peaceful
relations with the landlord. “The peasants saw,” writes the Moscow
peasant, Yurkov, “that this was the same coat only inside out, the same
power but with another name.” “An effort is under way,” reports the
Kurksk commissar, “... to get new elections to the county committees,
which are invariably carrying out the directions of the Provisional
Government.” It was very hard, however, for the peasants to get into the
county committees. The Social Revolutionaries kept hold of the political
ties between the villages and townships, and the peasants were thus
compelled to act through a party whose chief mission consisted of
turning the old coat inside out.

The coolness of the peasantry toward the March soviets, astonishing at
first glance, had as a matter of fact very deep causes. The soviet was
not a special organisation like the land committee, but a universal
organ of the revolution. Now in the sphere of general politics the
peasant cannot take a step without leadership. The only question is,
where is it to come from. The provincial and county peasant soviets were
created on the initiative, and to a considerable extent at the expense,
of the Co-operatives, not as organs of a peasant revolution but as
organs of a conservative guardianship over the peasants. The villagers
tolerated these Right Social Revolutionary soviets standing above them
as a shield against the authorities. But at home, among themselves, they
preferred the land committees.

In order to prevent the village from shutting itself up in a circle of
“purely peasant interests,” the government made haste to create
democratic zemstvos. That alone was enough to put the muzhik on his
guard. It was frequently necessary to enforce the elections. “There were
cases of lawlessness,” reports the Penza commissar, “resulting in a
break-up of the elections.” In Minsk province the peasants arrested the
president of the electoral commission of the town, Prince
Drutskoi-Liubetskoi, accusing him of tampering with the lists. It was
not easy for the muzhiks to come to an agreement with him about the
democratic solution of their age-old quarrel. The county commissar of
Bugulminsk reported: “The elections to the town zemstvos throughout the
county have not gone quite according to plan ... The members of the
electorate are exclusively peasants. There is a noticeable estrangement
from the local intelligentsia, especially from the landowners.” In this
form the zemstvo was but little different from the committee. “The
attitude of the peasant masses toward the intelligentsia, and especially
the landowners,” complains the Minsk county commissar, “is adverse.” We
read in a Moghiliev newspaper of September 23: “Cultural work in the
country is accompanied with a certain risk, unless one categorically
promises to cooperate toward the immediate transfer of all the land to
the peasants.” Where agreement and even intercourse between the
fundamental classes of the population becomes impossible, the ground for
democratic institutions disappears. The still-birth of the town zemstvos
unmistakably foretold the collapse of the Constituent Assembly.

“The local peasantry,” reports the Nizhegorod commissar, “have got a
fixed opinion that all civil laws have lost their force, and that all
legal relations ought now to be regulated by peasant organisations.”
Getting control of the militia in certain localities, the town
committees would issue local laws, establish rents, regulate wages, put
their own overseers on estates, take over the land, the crops, the
woods, the forests, the tools, take the machinery away from the
landlords, and carry out searches and arrests. The voice of centuries
and the fresh experience of the revolution both said to the muzhik that
the question of land is a question of power. The agrarian revolution
needed the organs of a peasant dictatorship. The muzhik did not yet know
this Latin word, but the muzhik knew what he wanted. That “anarchy” of
which the landlords, liberal commissars, and compromise politicians
complained, was in reality the first stage of the revolutionary
dictatorship In the village.

The necessity of creating special, purely peasant organs of land
revolution in the localities had been defended by Lenin during the
events of 1905-6. “The peasant revolutionary committees,” he argued at
the party congress in Stockholm, “present the sole road along which the
peasant movement can travel.” The muzhiks had not read Lenin, but Lenin
knew how to read the minds of the muzhiks.

The villages changed their attitude to the soviets only in the fall,
when the soviets themselves changed their political course. The
Bolshevik and Left Social Revolutionary soviets in the county or
provincial city now no longer held back the peasants, but on the
contrary pushed them forward. Whereas during the first months the
villages had looked to the compromisist soviets for a legal covering,
only to come later into hostile conflict with them, now they first began
to find in the revolutionary soviets a real leadership. The Saratov
peasants wrote in September: “The power throughout all Russia ought to
go ... to the Soviets of Workers, Peasants and Soldiers’ Deputies. That
will be safer.” Only in the fall did the peasantry begin to join their
land programme to the slogan of Power to the Soviets. But here, too,
they did not know by whom or how these soviets were to be led.

Agrarian disturbances in Russia had their great tradition, their simple
but clear programme, their local martyrs and heroes. The colossal
experience of 1905 had not passed without leaving its trace in the
villages. And to this we must add the work of the sectarian ideas which
had taken hold of millions of peasants. “I knew many peasants,” writes a
well-informed author, “who accepted ... the October revolution as the
direct realisation of their religious hopes.” Of all the peasant revolts
known to history the movement of the Russian peasantry in 1917 was
undoubtedly in the highest degree fertilised by political ideas. If
nevertheless it proved incapable of creating an independent leadership
and taking the power in its own hands, the causes of this are to be
found in the organic nature of an isolated, petty and routine industry.
While sucking all the juice out of the muzhik, his economic position did
not give him in return the ability to generalise.

The political freedom of a peasant means in practice the ability to
choose between different city parishes. But even this choice is not made
_a priori_. The peasantry pushed the Bolsheviks toward power with their
revolt. But only after conquering the power could the Bolsheviks win
over the peasantry, converting their agrarian revolution into the laws
of a workers’ state.

A group of investigators under the guidance of Yakovlev have made an
extremely valuable classification of material, characterising the
evolution of the agrarian movement from February to October. Designating
the number of disorganised actions in each month as 100, these
investigators have estimated that there were in April, 33 organised
conflicts; in June, 86; in July, 120. July was the moment of highest
success of the Social Revolutionary organisations in the country. In
August for one hundred disorganised conflicts there were only 62
organised, and in October, 14. From these figures – wonderfully
instructive, although of qualified significance – Yakovlev draws a
totally unexpected conclusion. “Whereas up to August,” he says, “the
movement had grown steadily more organised; in the fall it acquired a
more and more ‘spontaneous’[4] character.” Another investigator,
Vermenichev, arrives at the same formula: “The lowering of the figure of
organised movements in the period of the pre-October waves, testifies to
the spontaneousness of the movements of those months.” If the
spontaneous is contrasted to the conscious, as blindness to eyesight –
and this is the only scientific contrast – then we must come to the
conclusion that the consciousness of the peasant movement increased up
to August, and then began to fall rapidly enough to disappear completely
at the moment of the October insurrection. But this our investigators
obviously did not wish to say. Taking a somewhat reflective attitude to
the question, it is not difficult to understand, for example, that the
peasant elections to the Constituent Assembly, in spite of their
externally “organised” character, were incomparably more “spontaneous” –
that is, thoughtless, sheeplike, blind – than the “disorganised” peasant
campaigns against the landlord, where each peasant knew quite well what
he wanted.

In the autumn crisis the peasants did not abandon conscious action for
spontaneousness, but abandoned compromisist leadership for the civil
war. The decline in organisation was really a superficial feature; the
compromisist organisation fell away, but what was left was by no means a
vacant space. The peasants came out on the new road under the direct
leadership of the most revolutionary elements, the soldiers, sailors and
workers. In entering upon decisive activities the peasants would quite
often call a mass-meeting, and even take pains that the resolution
adopted should be signed by all those living in the same village. “In
the autumn period of the peasant movement with its raiding forms,”
writes a third investigator, Shestakov, “what oftenest appears upon the
scene is the ‘old peasant assembly’. By means of the assembly the
peasants divide the appropriated goods, through the assembly they
conduct negotiations with the landlord and overseers, with the county
commissars and with punitive expeditions of all kinds.”

The question why the town committees, which have led the peasants right
up to the civil war, now disappear from the scene, finds no direct
answer in these materials. But the explanation comes of itself. A
revolution very quickly wears out its organs and implements. Owing to
the mere fact that the land committees had been conducting semi-peaceful
activities, they were bound to seem of little use for direct assaults.
And this general cause is supplemented by particular ones no less
weighty. In taking the road of open war with the landlord, the peasants
knew too well what awaited them in case of defeat. A number of the land
committees even without that were under Kerensky’s lock and key. To
scatter the responsibility became a tactical need. The “_mir_” offered
the most expedient form for this. The customary mutual mistrust of the
peasants undoubtedly worked in the same direction. It was a question now
of the direct seizure and division of the landlords’ goods; each wanted
to take part in this himself, not entrusting his rights to anybody. Thus
the highest tension of the struggle led to a temporary retirement of the
representative organs in favour of primitive peasant democracy in the
form of the assembly and the communal decree.

This crude mistake in defining the character of the peasant movement may
seem especially surprising from the pen of Bolshevik investigators. But
we must not forget that these are Bolsheviks of the new mould. The
bureaucratisation of thought has inevitably led to an overvaluing of
those forms of organisation which were imposed upon the peasants from
above, an undervaluing of those which the peasants themselves assumed.
The educated functionary, following the liberal professor, looks upon
social processes from the point of view of administration. In his
position as People’s Commissar of Agriculture, Yakovlev subsequently
showed the same summary bureaucratic mode of approach to the peasantry,
but in an infinitely broader and more responsible sphere – that namely
of introducing “complete collectivisation”. Theoretic superficiality
takes a cruel revenge when it comes to a practical action on a large
scale!

But we are still a good thirteen years before the mistakes of complete
collectivisation. It is now only a question of the expropriation of the
landed estates. 134,000 landlords are still trembling for their 18
million _dessiatins_. Most threatened is the situation of those on the
summit, the 30,000 lords of old Russia who own 70 million _dessiatins_ –
2,000 on the average per person. A lord, Boborykin, writes to the
Chamberlain, Rodzianko: “I am a landlord, and somehow it won’t fit into
my head that I am to be deprived of my land, and that, too, for a most
improbable purpose – for an experimental test of socialistic teachings.”
But it is the task of revolution to accomplish just those things which
will not fit into the heads of the ruling class.

The more far-sighted landlords cannot help realising, however, that they
will not be able to keep their estates. They are no longer even trying
to. The sooner we get rid of our land, they are saying, the better. The
Constituent Assembly presents itself to them primarily as a vast
clearing-house where the state will recompense them not only for the
land, but also for their anxieties.

The peasant landowners adhered to this programme of theirs on the left.
They were not unwilling to have an end of the parasitical nobility, but
they were afraid of unsettling the conception of landed property. The
state is rich enough, they declared at their meetings, to pay the
landlords something like 12 billion roubles. In their quality of
“peasants” they were counting on being able to make use of these noble
estates, once they had been paid for by the people, on favourable terms.

The proprietors understood that the extent of the indemnity was a
political magnitude to be determined by the correlation of forces at the
moment of payment. Up to the end of August there remained a hope that
the Constituent Assembly, convoked _á la_ Kornilov, would follow a line
of agrarian reform midway between Rodzianko and Miliukov. The collapse
of Kornilov meant that the possessing classes had lost the game.

During September and October the possessing classes were awaiting the
outcome as a hopelessly sick man awaits death. Autumn with muzhiks is
the time for politics. The fields are mowed, illusions are scattered,
patience is exhausted. Time to finish things up The movement now
overflows its banks, invades all districts, wipes out local
peculiarities, draws in all the strata of the villages, washes away all
considerations of law and prudence, becomes aggressive, fierce, furious,
a raging thing, arms itself with steel and fire, revolvers and
hand-grenades, demolishes and burns up the manorial dwellings, drives
out the landlords, cleanses the earth and in some places waters it with
blood.

Gone are the nests of the gentility celebrated by Pushkin, Turgeniev and
Tolstoi. The old Russia has gone up in smoke. The liberal press is a
collection of groans and outcries about the destruction of English
gardens, of paintings from the brushes of serfs, of patrimonial
libraries, the parthenons of Tambov, the riding horses, the ancient
engravings, the breeding bulls. Bourgeois historians have tried to put
the responsibility upon the Bolsheviks for the “vandalism” of the
peasant’s mode of settling accounts with the “culture” of his lords. In
reality the Russian muzhik was completing a business entered upon many
centuries before the Bolsheviks appeared in the world. He was fulfilling
his progressive historic task with the only means at his disposal. With
revolutionary barbarism he was wiping out the barbarism of the middle
ages. Moreover, neither he himself, nor his grandfather, nor his great
grandfather before him ever saw any mercy or indulgence!

When the feudal landlords got the best of the Jacquerie four and a half
centuries before the liberation of the French peasants, a pious monk
wrote in his chronicle: “They did so much evil to the country that there
was no need of the coming of the English to destroy the kingdom; these
never could have done what was done by the nobles of France.” Only the
bourgeoisie – in May 1871 – proved able to exceed the French nobles in
ferocity. The Russian peasants, thanks to the leadership of the workers,
and the Russian workers, thanks to the support of the peasants, avoided
learning this twofold lesson from the defenders of culture and humanity.

The inter-relations between the fundamental classes of Russia at large
were reproduced in the village. Just as the workers and soldiers went
into a fight with the monarchy contrary to the plans of the bourgeoisie,
so the peasant poor rose boldest of all against the landlord, not
heeding the warnings of the _kulak_. Just as the Compromisers believed
that the revolution would stand firmly on its feet only from the moment
it was recognized by Miliukov, so the middle peasants, glancing round to
right and left, imagined that the signature of the _kulak_ would
legitimise the seizures. And finally, somewhat as the bourgeoisie,
although hostile to the revolution, did not hesitate to appropriate the
power, so the _kulaks_, after resisting the raids, did not refuse to
enjoy their fruits. The power did not remain long in the hands of the
bourgeoisie, nor the landlord’s chattels in the hands of the _kulaks_ –
for like reasons.

The strength of the agrarian-democratic and essentially bourgeois
revolution was manifested in the fact that it overcame for a time the
class contradictions of the village: the farm hand helped the _kulak_ in
raiding the landlord. The 17th, 18th and 19th centuries of Russian
history climbed up on the shoulders of the 20th, and bent it to the
ground. The weakness of this belated bourgeois revolution was manifested
in the fact that the peasant war did not urge the bourgeois
revolutionists forward, but threw them back conclusively into the camp
of reaction. Tseretelli, the hard-labour convict of yesterday, defended
the estates of the landlords against anarchy! The peasant revolution,
thus rejected by the bourgeoisie, joined hands with the industrial
proletariat. In this way the 20th century not only got free of those
past centuries hanging upon it, but climbed up on their shoulders to a
new historic level. In order that the peasant might clear and fence his
land, the worker had to stand at the head of the state: that is the
simplest formula for the October revolution.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Peasants who had left the commune and taken private land under
Stolypin’s law of November 9, 1906. – _Trans._

2. This word, applied to the village as a commune, literally means “the
world” – that is, everybody. – _Trans._

3. _Armyaki_ is a home-made woollen coat, _lapti_ are shoes made out of
woven strips of bark. – _Trans._

4. The Russian word translated “spontaneous” means literally elemental,
and is commonly contrasted in revolutionary literature to
class-conscious movements led by an organisation with a theory and
programme. – _Trans._



CHAPTER 39 THE PROBLEM OF NATIONALITIES


 

Language is the most important instrument of human communication, and
consequently of industry. It becomes national together with the triumph
of commodity exchange which integrates nations. Upon this foundation the
national state is erected as the most convenient, profitable and normal
arena for the play of capitalist relations. In Western Europe the epoch
of the formation of bourgeois nations, if you leave out the struggle of
the Netherlands for independence and the fate of the island country,
England, began with the great French revolution, and was essentially
completed approximately one hundred years later with the formation of
the German Empire.

But during that period when in Europe the national state could no longer
contain the productive forces and was overgrown into the imperialist
state, in the East – in Persia, the Balkans, China, India – the era of
national democratic revolutions, taking its impetus from the Russian
revolution of 1905, was only just beginning. The Balkan war of 1912
marked the completion of the forming of national states in south-eastern
Europe. The subsequent imperialist war completed incidentally the
unfinished work of the national revolutions in Europe leading as it did
to the dismemberment of Austria-Hungary, the establishment of an
independent Poland, and of independent border states cut from the empire
of the czars.

Russia was formed not as a national state, but as a state made up of
nationalities. This corresponded to its belated character. On a
foundation of extensive agriculture and home industry commercial capital
developed not deeply, not by transforming production, but broadly, by
increasing the radius of its operation. The trader, the landlord and the
government official advanced from the centre toward the periphery,
following the peasant settlers who, in search of fresh lands and freedom
from imposts, were penetrating new territory inhabited by still more
backward tribes. The expansion of the state was in its foundation an
expansion of agriculture, which with all its primitiveness showed a
certain superiority to that of the nomads in the south and east. The
bureaucratic-caste state which formed itself upon this enormous and
continually broadening basis, became sufficiently strong to subjugate
certain nations in the west, possessed of a higher culture but unable
because of their small numbers or condition of inner crisis to defend
their independence (Poland, Lithuania, the Baltic states, Finland).

To the seventy million Great Russians constituting the main mass of the
country, there were gradually added about ninety million “outlanders”
sharply divided into two groups: the western peoples excelling Russia in
their culture, and the eastern standing on a lower level. Thus was
created an empire of whose population the ruling nationality constituted
only 43 per cent. The remaining 57 per cent, were nationalities of
various degrees of culture and subjection, including Ukrainians 17 per
cent, Poles 6 per cent, White Russians 4½ per cent.

The greedy demands of the state and the meagreness of the peasant
foundation under the ruling classes gave rise to the most bitter forms
of exploitation. National oppression in Russia was incomparably rougher
than in the neighbouring states not only on its western but even on its
eastern borders. The vast numbers of these nationalities deprived of
rights, and the sharpness of their deprivation, gave to the national
problem in czarist Russia a gigantic explosive force.

Whereas in nationally homogeneous states the bourgeois revolutions
developed powerful centripetal tendencies, rallying to the idea of
overcoming particularism, as in France, or overcoming national disunion,
as in Italy and Germany – in nationally heterogeneous states on the
contrary, such as Turkey, Russia, Austria-Hungary, the belated bourgeois
revolution released centrifugal forces. In spite of the apparent
contrariness of these processes when expressed in mechanical terms,
their historic function was the same. In both cases it was a question of
using the national unity as a fundamental industrial reservoir. Germany
had for this purpose to be united, Austria-Hungary to be divided.

Lenin early learned the inevitability of this development of centrifugal
national movements in Russia, and for many years stubbornly fought –
most particularly against Rosa Luxemburg – for that famous paragraph 9
of the old party programme which formulated the right of nations to
self-determination – that is, to complete separation as states. In this
the Bolshevik Party did not by any means undertake an evangel of
separation. It merely assumed an obligation to struggle implacably
against every form of national oppression, including the forcible
retention of this or that nationality within the boundaries of the
general state. Only in this way could the Russian proletariat gradually
win the confidence of the oppressed nationalities.

But that was only one side of the matter. The policy of Bolshevism in
the national sphere had also another side, apparently contradictory to
the first but in reality supplementing it. Within the framework of the
party, and of the workers’ organisations in general, Bolshevism insisted
upon a rigid centralism, implacably warring against every taint of
nationalism which might set the workers one against the other or
disunite them. While flatly refusing to the bourgeois states the right
to impose compulsory citizenship, or even a state language, upon a
national minority, Bolshevism at the same time made it a verily sacred
task to unite as closely as possible, by means of voluntary class
discipline, the workers of different nationalities. Thus it flatly
rejected the national-federation principle in building the party. A
revolutionary organisation is not the prototype of the future state, but
merely the instrument for its creation. An instrument ought to be
adapted to fashioning the product; it ought not to include the product.
Thus a centralised organisation can guarantee the success of
revolutionary struggle – even where the task is to destroy the
centralised oppression of nationalities.

For the oppressed nations of Russia the overthrow of the monarchy
inevitably meant also their own national revolution. In this matter,
however, we observe the same thing as in all other departments of the
February régime: the official democracy, held in leash by its political
dependence upon an imperialist bourgeoisie, was totally incapable of
breaking the old fetters. Holding inviolable its right to settle the
fate of all other nations, it continued jealously to guard those sources
of wealth, power and influence which had given the Great Russian
bourgeoisie its dominant position. The compromisist democracy merely
translated traditions of the czarist national policy into the language
of libertarian rhetoric: it was now a question of defending the unity of
the revolution. But the ruling coalition had also another more pointed
argument: wartime expediency. This meant that the aspirations of
individual nationalities toward freedom must be portrayed as the work of
the Austro-German General Staff. Here too the Kadets played first violin
and the Compromisers second.

The new government could not, of course, leave absolutely untouched that
disgusting legal tangle, the complicated medieval mockeries of the
outlanders. But it did hope and endeavour to stop at a mere annulment of
the exceptional laws against individual nations – that is, to establish
a bare equality of all parts of the population before the Great Russian
state bureaucracy.

This formal equality gave most of all to the Jews, for the laws limiting
their rights had reached the number of 650. Moreover, being city
dwellers and the most scattered of all the nationalities, the Jews could
make no claim either to state independence or even territorial autonomy.
As to the project of a so-called “national-cultural autonomy” which
should unite the Jews throughout the whole country around schools and
other institutions, this reactionary Utopia, borrowed by various Jewish
groups from the Austrian theoretician, Otto Bauer, melted in those first
days of freedom like wax under the sun’s rays.

But a revolution is a revolution for the very reason that it is not
satisfied either with doles or deferred payments. The abolition of the
more shameful national limitations established a formal equality of
citizens regardless of their nationality, but this revealed only the
more sharply the unequal position of the nationalities as such, leaving
the major part of them in the position of step-children or
foster-children of the Great Russian state.

The proclamation of equal rights meant nothing to the Finns especially,
for they did not desire equality with the Russians but independence of
Russia. It gave nothing to the Ukrainians, for their rights had been
equal before, they having been forcibly proclaimed to be Russian. It
changed nothing in the situation of the Letts and Esthonians, oppressed
by the German landlord’s manor and the Russo-German city. It did not
lighten in the least the fate of the backward peoples and tribes of
Central Asia, who had been held down to the rock bottom not by juridical
limitations, but by economic and cultural ball and chain. All these
questions the Liberal-Compromisist coalition refused even to bring up.
The democratic state remained the same old state of the Great Russian
functionary, who did not intend to yield his place to anybody.

The deeper the revolution sank among the masses in the borderlands, the
more clear it became that the Russian state language was there the
language of the possessing classes. The régime of formal democracy, with
its freedom of press and assemblage, made the backward and oppressed
nationalities only the more painfully aware to what extent they were
deprived of the most elementary means of cultural development: their own
schools, their own courts, their own officials. References to a future
Constituent Assembly only irritated them. They knew well enough that the
same party would dominate that assembly which had created the
Provisional Government, and was continuing to defend the tradition of
Russification, making clear with its jealous greed that line beyond
which the ruling classes would not go.

Finland became from the first a thorn in the flesh of the February
régime. Thanks to the bitterness of the agrarian problem, in Finland a
problem of “_torpars_” – that is, small enslaved tenants – the
industrial workers, although comprising only 14 per cent of the
population, carried the rural population with them. The Finnish Seim was
the only parliament in the world where the social-democrats got a
majority: 103 seats out of 200. Having by their law of June 5 declared
the Seim a sovereign power except on questions of war and foreign
policy, the Finnish social-democrats appealed for support “to the
comrade party of Russia.” But their appeal, as it turned out, was sent
quite to the wrong address. The Provisional Government stepped aside at
first, permitting the “comrade party” to act. An advisory delegation
headed by Cheidze went to Helsingfors and returned empty-handed. Then
the socialist ministers of Petrograd – Kerensky, Chenov, Skobelev,
Tseretelli – decided to dissolve by force the socialist government at
Helsingfors. The chief of the headquarters staff, the monarchist
Lukomsky, gave warning to the civil authorities and the population of
Finland that in case of any action against the Russian army “their
cities, and Helsingfors, first of all, would be laid waste.” After this
preparation, the Government issued a solemn manifesto – a plagiarism
from the monarchy even in its literary style – dissolving the Seim. And
on the first day of the offensive they placed Russian soldiers withdrawn
from the front at the doors of the Finnish parliament. Thus the
revolutionary masses of Russia – making their way to October – got a
good lesson on the qualified place occupied by the principles of
democracy in a struggle of class forces.

Confronted by this unbridled nationalism of the ruling classes, the
revolutionary troops in Finland adopted a worthy attitude. A regional
congress of the soviets held in Helsingfors early in September
announced: “If the Finnish democracy finds it advisable to renew the
sessions of the Seim, any attempt to hinder this will be regarded by the
Soviet congress as a counter-revolutionary act.” That was a direct offer
of military help. But the Finnish democracy, in which compromisist
tendencies predominated, was not ready to take the road of insurrection.
New elections, held under the threat of a new dissolution, gave a
majority of 180 out of 200 to those bourgeois parties in agreement with
whom the government had dissolved the Seim.

But here domestic questions come to the front, questions which in this
Switzerland of the North, a land of granite mountains and greedy
proprietors, would lead inexorably to civil war. The Finnish bourgeoisie
was half openly preparing its military cadres. Secret nuclei of the Red
Guard were forming at the same time. The bourgeoisie turned to Sweden
and Germany for weapons and instructors. The workers found support in
the Russian troops. Meanwhile in bourgeois circles – yesterday still
inclined to agreement with Petrograd – a movement was developing for
complete separation from Russia. Their leading newspaper,
_Khuvudstatsbladet_, wrote: “The Russian people are possessed by an
anarchist frenzy ... Ought we not in these circumstances ... to separate
ourselves as far as possible from that chaos?” The Provisional
Government found itself obliged to make concessions without awaiting the
Constituent Assembly. On the 23rd of October a decree was adopted
recognising “in principle” the independence of Finland except in
military and foreign affairs. But “independence” given by the hand of
Kerensky was not worth much: it was now only two days before his fall.

A second and far more gigantic thorn in the flesh was the Ukraine. Early
in June, Kerensky forbade the holding of a Ukrainian soldier-congress
convoked by the Rada. The Ukrainians did not submit. In order to save
the face of his government Kerensky legalised the congress _ex post
facto_, sending a declamatory telegram which the assembled-deputies
greeted with disrespectful laughter. This bitter lesson did not prevent
Kerensky from forbidding three weeks later a military congress of the
Mussulmans in Moscow. The democratic government seemed anxious to make
it plain to the discontented nations: you will get only what you grab.

In its first “universal” issued on June 10th, the Rada, accusing
Petrograd of opposing national independence, declared: “Henceforth we
will build our own life.” The Kadets denounced the Ukrainian leaders as
German agents; the Compromisers addressed them with sentimental
admonitions; the Provisional Government sent a delegation to Kiev. In
the heated atmosphere of the Ukraine, Kerensky, Tseretelli and
Tereschenko felt obliged to take a few steps to meet the Rada. But after
the July raids on workers and soldiers, the Government veered right on
the Ukrainian question also. On August 5, the Rada by an overwhelming
majority accused the government, “imbued with the imperialist tendencies
of the Russian bourgeoisie,” of having broken the agreement of July 3rd.
“When the time came for the government to redeem its pledge,” declared
the head of the Ukrainian government, Vinnichenko, “it turned out that
the Provisional Government ... is a petty cheat, who hopes to get rid of
a great historic problem by swindling.” This unequivocal language
conveys an adequate idea of the authority of the government even in
those circles which ought politically to be rather close to it. For in
the long run the Ukrainian Compromiser, Vinnichenko, was distinguished
from Kerensky only as a mediocre novelist from a mediocre lawyer.

It is true that in September the government did finally issue a decree
recognising for all the nationalities of Russia – within limits to be
designated by the Constituent Assembly – the “right of
self-determination.” But this wholly unguaranteed and inwardly
contradictory promise for the future – extremely vague in everything but
its limitations – inspired no confidence In anybody. The doings of the
Provisional Government were already crying Out too loudly against it.

On September 2 the Senate – that same body which refused to admit new
members without the old uniform – decided to deny publication to the
instructions issued to the Ukrainian General Secretariat – that is, to
the Ministerial Cabinet in Kiev – and confirmed by the Government.
Justification: no law provides for this Secretariat, and it is
impossible to issue instructions to an illegal institution. The lofty
jurists did not conceal the fact, either, that the very agreement
entered into between the government and the Rada was a usurpation of the
rights of the Constituent Assembly – these czarist senators having now
become the most inflexible partisans of pure democracy. In this show of
courage the oppositionists from the Right were risking nothing at all:
they knew that their opposition was quite after the heart of the ruling
classes. Although the Russian bourgeoisie had swallowed a certain amount
of independence for Finland – united to Russia as she was by weak
economic ties – it could not possibly agree to an “autonomy” of
Ukrainian grain, Donetz coal, and the ores of Krivorog.

On October 19, Kerensky sent a telegraphic order to the General
Secretary of the Ukraine “to come promptly to Petrograd for personal
explanations” in regard to a criminal agitation started there in favour
of a Ukrainian Constituent Assembly. At the same time the District
Attorney of Kiev was directed to begin an investigation of the Rada. But
these threats gave as little fright to the Ukraine as the acts of grace
had given joy to Finland.

The Ukrainian Compromisers were at this time feeling infinitely more
secure than their elder cousins in Petrograd. Aside from the auspicious
atmosphere surrounding their struggle for national rights, the
comparative stability of the petty bourgeois parties in the Ukraine – as
also in a number of other oppressed nations – had economic and social
roots describable in one word, backwardness. In spite of the swift
industrial development of the Donetz and Krivorog Basins, the Ukraine as
a whole continued to lag behind Great Russia. The Ukrainian proletariat
was less homogeneous, less tempered. The Bolshevik Party was weak both
in numbers and quality, had been slow in breaking away from the
Mensheviks, and was poorly vested in the political, and especially the
national situation. Even in the industrial eastern parts of the Ukraine,
a regional conference of the soviets as late as the middle of October
showed a slight compromisist majority!

The Ukrainian bourgeoisie was comparatively still weaker. One of the
causes of the social instability of the Russian bourgeoisie taken as a
whole lay, we remember, in the fact that its more powerful section
consisted of foreigners not even dwelling in Russia. In the borderlands
this fact was supplemented by another no less significant: their own
domestic bourgeoisie did not belong to the same nation as the principal
mass of the people.

The population of the cities in these borderland was completely
different in its national ingredients from the population of the
country. In the Ukraine and White Russia the landlord, capitalist,
lawyer, journalist, was a Great Russian, a Pole, a Jew, a foreigner; the
rural population was wholly Ukrainian and White Russian. In the Baltic
states the cities were havens of the German, Russian and Jewish
bourgeoisie; the country was altogether Lettish and Esthonian. In the
cities of Georgia, a Russian and Armenian population predominated, as
also in Turkish Azerbaidjan, being separated from the fundamental mass
of the people not only by their level of life and culture, but also by
language, as are the English in India. Being indebted for the protection
of their possessions and income to the bureaucratic machine, and being
closely bound up with the ruling classes of all other countries, the
landlords, industrialists and merchants in these borderlands grouped
around themselves a narrow circle of Russian functionaries, clerks,
teachers, physicians, lawyers, journalists, and to some extent workers
also, converting the cities into centres of Russification and
colonisation.

It was possible to ignore the villages so long as they remained silent.
When they began, however, more and more impatiently to lift their
voices, the city resisted and stubbornly continued to resist, defending
its privileged position. The functionary, the merchant, the lawyer, soon
learned to disguise his struggle to retain the commanding heights of
industry and culture under the form of a top-lofty condemnation of an
increasing “chauvinism.” The desire of a ruling nation to maintain the
status quo frequently dresses up as a superiority to “nationalism,” just
as the desire of a victorious nation to hang on to its booty easily
takes the form of pacifism. Thus MacDonald in the face of Gandhi feels
as though he were an internationalist. Thus, too, the gravitation of the
Austrians toward Germany appears to Poincaré an offence against French
pacifism.

“People living in the cities of the Ukraine” – so wrote a delegation of
the Rada to the Provisional Government in May – “see before them the
Russified streets of these cities ... and completely forget that these
cities are only little islets in the sea of the whole Ukrainian people.”
When Rosa Luxemburg, in her posthumous polemic against the programme of
the October revolution, asserted that Ukrainian nationalism, having been
formerly a mere “amusement” of the commonplace petty bourgeois
intelligentsia, had been artificially raised up by the yeast of the
Bolshevik formula of self-determination, she fell, notwithstanding her
luminous mind, into a very serious historic error. The Ukrainian
peasantry had not made national demands in the past for the reason that
the Ukrainian peasantry had not In general risen to the height of
political being. The chief service of the February revolution – perhaps
its only service, but one amply sufficient – lay exactly in this, that
it gave the oppressed classes and nations of Russia at last an
opportunity to speak out. This political awakening of the peasantry
could not have taken place otherwise, however, than through their own
native language – with all the consequences ensuing in regard to
schools, courts, self-administration. To oppose this would have been to
try to drive the peasants back into non-existence.

The difference in nationality between the cities and the villages was
painfully felt also in the soviets, they being predominantly city
organisations. Under the leadership of the compromise parties the
soviets would frequently ignore the national interests of the basic
population. This was one cause of the weakness of the soviets in the
Ukraine. The soviets of Riga and Reval forgot about the interests of the
Letts and the Esthonians. The compromisist soviet in Baku scorned the
interests of the basic Turcoman population. Under a false banner of
internationalism the soviets would frequently wage a struggle against
the defensive nationalism of the Ukrainians or Mussulmans, supplying a
screen for the oppressive Russifying movement of the cities. A little
time after, under the rule of the Bolsheviks, the soviets of these
borderlands began to speak the language of the villages.

Their general economic and cultural primitiveness did not permit the
Siberian outlanders – kept down as they were both by nature and
exploitation – to rise even to that level where national aspirations
begin. Vodka, taxes and compulsory orthodoxy were here from time
immemorial the principal instruments of statehood. That disease which
the Italians called the French evil, and the French, the Neapolitan, was
called “Russian” by the Siberian peoples. That shows from what sources
came the seeds of civilisation. The February revolution did not reach
that far. The hunters and reindeer breeders of the polar wastes must
still wait long for their dawn.

The peoples and tribes along the Volga, in the northern Caucasus, in
Central Asia – awakened for the first time out of their pre-historic
existence by the February revolution – had as yet neither national
bourgeoisie nor national proletariat. Above the peasant or shepherd mass
a thin layer had detached itself from among their upper strata,
constituting an intelligentsia Not yet rising to a programme of national
self-administration, the struggle here was about matters like having
their own alphabet, their own teachers – even at times their own
priests. In these ways the most oppressed were being compelled to learn
in bitter experience that the educated masters of the state would not
voluntarily permit them to rise in the world. The most backward of the
backward were thus compelled to seek the most revolutionary class as an
ally. Through the left elements of their young intelligentsia the
Votiaks, the Chuvashes, the Zyrians, the tribes of Daghestan and
Turkestan, began to find their way toward the Bolsheviks.

The fate of the colonial possessions, especially in central Asia, would
change together with the industrial evolution of the centre, passing
from direct and open robbery, including trade robbery, to those more
disguised methods which converted the Asiatic peasants into suppliers of
industrial raw material, chiefly cotton. Hierarchically organised
exploitation, combining the barbarity of capitalism with the barbarity
of patriarchal life, successfully held down the Asiatic peoples in
extreme national abasement. And here the February régime left everything
as it was.

The best lands, seized under czarism from the Bashkirs, Buriats,
Kirghiz, and other nomadic tribes, had continued in the possession of
the landlords and wealthy Russian peasants scattered about in colonising
oases among the native population. The awakening of a national spirit of
independence here meant first of all a struggle against these
colonisers, who had created an artificial strip system of land-ownership
and condemned the nomads to hunger and gradual extinction. The
colonisers, on their side, furiously defended the unity of Russia – that
is, the sanctity of their grabbings – against the “separatism” of the
Asiatics. The hatred of the colonisers for the native movements assumed
zoological forms in the Transbaikal. Pogroms of the Buriats were in full
swing under the leadership of March Social Revolutionaries recruited
from village clerks and non-commissioned officers returning from the
front.

In their anxiety to preserve the old order as long as possible, all the
exploiters and violaters in the colonised regions appealed henceforth to
the sovereign rights of the Constituent Assembly. This phraseology was
supplied them by the Provisional Government, which had found here its
surest bulwark. On the other hand, the privileged upper circles of the
oppressed peoples were also calling more and more often on the name of
the Constituent Assembly. Even the Mussulman clergy who would lift above
the awakening mountain peoples and the tribes of the northern Caucasus,
the green banner of the Shariat whenever a pressure from below made
their position difficult, were now postponing the question “until the
Constituent Assembly.” This became the slogan of conservatism, of
reaction, of special interest and privilege all over the country. To
appeal to the Constituent Assembly meant to postpone and gain time.
Postponement meant: assemble your forces and strangle the revolution.

The leadership fell into the hands of the clergy or feudal gentry,
however, only at first, only among the backward peoples – almost only
among the Mussulmans. In general, the national movement in the villages
was headed as a matter of course by rural teachers, village clerks,
functionaries and officers of low rank, and, to some extent, merchants.
Alongside the Russian or Russianised intelligentsia, composed of the
more respectable and well provided elements, there was formed in the
borderland cities another layer, a younger layer, closely bound up with
its village origin and lacking access to the banquet of capital, and
this layer naturally took upon itself the task of representing
politically the national, and in part also the social interests of the
basic peasant mass.

Although hostilely disposed to the Russian Compromisers along the line
of this national aspiration, these borderland Compromisers belonged to
the same fundamental type, and even for the most part went by the same
name. The Ukrainian Social Revolutionaries and social democrats, the
Georgian and Lettish Mensheviks, the Lithuanian “Trudoviks,” tried like
their Great Russian namesakes to confine the revolution within the
framework of the bourgeois régime. But the extreme weakness of the
native bourgeoisie here compelled the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries, instead of entering a coalition, to take the state
power into their own hands. Compelled to go farther on agrarian and
labour questions than the central government, these borderland
Compromisers had also the great advantage of being able to appear before
the army and the country as opponents of the coalitional Provisional
Government. All this was sufficient, if not to create different
destinies for the Russian Compromisers and those of the borderlands, at
least to give a different tempo to their rise and fall.

The Georgian social democrats not only led after them the pauper
peasantry of Little Georgia, but also laid claim – and that not without
success – to lead the movement of the “revolutionary democracy” for all
Russia. During the first months of the revolution the heads of the
Georgian intelligentsia regarded Georgia not as a national fatherland,
but as a Gironde – a blessed southern province called to provide leaders
for the whole country. At the Moscow State Conference one of the
prominent Georgian Mensheviks, Chenkeli, boasted that the Georgians had
always said even under czarism, in fair weather and foul: “A single
fatherland, Russia.” “What shall we say of the Georgian nation?” cried
this same Chenkeli a month later at the Democratic Conference. “It is
wholly at the service of the Great Russian revolution.” And it is quite
true that the Georgian Compromisers, like the Jewish, were always “at
the service” of the great Russian bureaucracy when it was necessary to
moderate, or put brakes on the national claims of individual regions.

This continued only so long, however, as the Georgian social democrats
still hoped to confine their revolution within the framework of
bourgeois democracy. In proportion as the danger appeared of a victory
of the masses led by Bolshevism, the Georgian social democrats relaxed
their ties with the Russian Compromisers and united closely with the
reactionary elements of Georgia itself. The moment the soviets were
victorious, these Georgian partisans of a single Russia became the
trumpeters of separation, and showed to the other peoples of
Transcaucasia the yellow fangs of their chauvinism.

This inevitable national disguise of social contradictions – less
developed in the borderlands, anyway, as a general rule – adequately
explains why the October revolution was destined to meet more opposition
in most of the oppressed nations than in Central Russia. But, on the
other hand, the conflict of nationalities by its very nature cruelly
shook the February régime and created sufficient favourable surroundings
for the revolution in the centre.

In these circumstances the national antagonisms whenever they coincided
with class contradictions became especially hot. The age-old hostility
between the Lettish peasants and the German barons impelled many
thousands of labouring Letts to volunteer at the outbreak of the war.
The sharp-shooting regiments of Lettish farm hands and peasants were
among the best troops at the front. As early as May, however, they had
already come out for a Soviet government. Their nationalism was only the
outer shell of an immature Bolshevism. A like process took place in
Esthonia.

In White Russia, with its Polish or Polised landlords, its Jewish
population in the cities and small towns, and its Russian officials, the
twice and thrice oppressed peasantry had some time before October, under
the influence of the nearby front, poured its national and social
indignation into the channel of Bolshevism. In the elections for the
Constituent Assembly the overwhelming mass of White Russians would cast
its vote for the Bolsheviks.

All these processes in which an awakened national dignity was linked up
with social indignation, now holding it back, now pushing it forward,
found an extremely sharp expression in the army. Here there was a
veritable fever for creating national regiments, and these were at one
time patronised, at another tolerated, at still another persecuted by
the central government, according to their attitude to the war and the
Bolsheviks. But in general they kept growing more and more hostile to
Petrograd.

Lenin kept a firm hand on the “national” pulse of the revolution. In a
famous article, _The Crisis is Ripe_, written toward the end of
September, he insistently pointed out that the National curia of the
Democratic Conference “had stood second in the matter of radicalism
yielding only to the trade unions, and standing higher than the Soviet
curia in its percentage of votes against the Coalition (40 out of 55).”
This meant that the oppressed people were no longer hoping for any
benefit from the Great Russian bourgeoisie. They were more and more
trying to get their rights by independent action, a bite at a time and
in the form of revolutionary seizures.

In an October congress of the Buriats in far off Verkhneyudinsk, a
speaker declared that “the February revolution introduced nothing new”
in the position of the outlander. His summing up of the situation made
it seem necessary, if not yet to take the side of the Bolsheviks, at
least to observe an attitude of more and more friendly neutrality toward
them.

An all-Ukrainian soldier-congress which met during the very days of the
Petrograd insurrection, adopted a resolution to struggle against the
transfer of power to the Ukrainian Soviet, but at the same time refused
to regard the insurrection of the Great Russian Bolsheviks as an
“anti-democratic action,” and promised to take all measures to prevent
the soldiers being sent to put down the insurrection. This equivocation
which perfectly characterises the petty bourgeois stage of the national
struggle, facilitated that revolution of the proletariat which intended
to put an end to all equivocations.

On the other hand the bourgeois circles in the borderlands, which had
heretofore invariably and always gravitated toward the central power,
now launched into a separatism which in many cases no longer had a shred
of national foundation. The Baltic bourgeoisie, which only yesterday had
been following in a state of hurrah-patriotism the German barons, the
first bulwark of the Romanovs, took its stand in the struggle against
Bolshevik Russia and its own masses, under the banner of separatism.
Still more curious phenomena appeared along this road. On the 20th of
October the foundations were laid for a new state formation, “The
South-eastern Union of the Cossack Troops, Caucasian Mountaineers and
Free Peoples of the Steppes.” Here the leaders of the Don, Kuban, Tyer
and Astrakhan Cossacks, the chief bulwark of imperial centralism, were
transformed in the course of a few months into passionate defenders of
the federal principle, and united on this ground with the leaders of the
Mussulman mountaineers and steppe-dwellers. The boundaries of the
federative structure were to serve as a barrier against the Bolshevik
danger coming from the north. However, before creating the principal
drill ground for the civil war against the Bolsheviks, this
counter-revolutionary separatism went directly against the ruling
coalition, demoralising and weakening it.

Thus the national problem, along with all others, showed the Provisional
Government a Medusa’s head on which every hair of the March and April
hopes had changed into a snake of hate and indignation.

A Further Note on the Problem of Nationalities

The Bolshevik Party did not by any means immediately after the February
revolution adopt that attitude on the national question which in the
long run guaranteed its victory. This was true not only in the
borderlands, with their weak and inexperienced party organisations, but
also in the Petrograd centre. During the war the party had so weakened,
the theoretical and political level of its cadres had become so lowered,
that on the national question too its official leaders took an extremely
confused and half-way position until the arrival of Lenin.

To be sure, following their tradition, the Bolsheviks defended the right
of a nation to self-determination. But the Mensheviks also subscribed to
this formula in words. The text of the two programmes remained
identical. It was the question of power which was decisive. And the
temporary leaders of the party proved wholly incapable of understanding
the irreconcilable antagonism between the Bolshevik slogans on the
national, as well as the agrarian, question, and the preservation of a
bourgeois-imperialistic régime, even though disguised in democratic
forms.

The democratic position found its most crass expression from the pen of
Stalin. On March 25, in an article dealing with a government decree on
the abolition of national limitations, Stalin tried to formulate the
national question on a historic scale. “The social basis of national
oppression,” he writes, “the power inspiring it, is a decaying land
aristocracy.” The fact that national oppression developed
unprecedentedly during the epoch of capitalism, and found its most
barbaric expression in colonial policies, seems to be beyond the ken of
the democratic author. “In England,” he continues, “where the landed
aristocracy shares the power with the bourgeoisie, where the unlimited
power of this aristocracy long ago ceased to exist, national oppression
is milder, less inhumane – leaving out of account, of course, the
circumstance that during the course of the war, when the power had gone
over into the hands of the landlords(!) national oppression was
considerably strengthened (persecution of Ireland and India).” Those
guilty of oppressing Ireland and India are the landlords, who –
evidently in the person of Lloyd George – have seized the power thanks
to the war. “... In Switzerland and North America,” continues Stalin,
“where there is no landlordism and never has been (!), where the power
is undivided in the hands of the bourgeoisie, nationalities have
developed freely. National oppression, generally speaking, finds no
place ...” The author completely forgets the Negro, Indian, immigrant
and colonial problems in the United States.

From this hopelessly provincial analysis, which comes only to a confused
contrasting of feudalism with democracy, purely liberal political
inferences are drawn. “To remove the feudal aristocracy from the
political scene, to snatch the power from it – that is exactly the same
thing as to put an end to national oppression, to create the actual
conditions necessary for national freedom.” “Insofar as the Russian
revolution has conquered,” writes Stalin, “it has actually created these
conditions ...” We have here perhaps a more principled apology for the
imperialistic “democracy” than all that has been written on this theme
by the Mensheviks. Just as in foreign policy Stalin, along with Kamenev,
hoped to achieve a democratic peace by means of a division of labour
with the Provisional Government, so in domestic policy he found in the
democracy of Prince Lvov the “actual conditions” of national freedom.

As a matter of fact the fall of the monarchy first fully exposed the
fact that not only the reactionary landlords, but also the whole liberal
bourgeoisie, and following after it the whole petty bourgeois democracy,
along with the patriotic upper crust of the working class, was
implacably hostile to a genuine equality of national rights – that is to
say, an abolition of the privileges of the dominant nation. Their whole
programme came down to a business of mitigation, of cultural
sugar-coating, of democratic concealment of the Great Russian
ascendancy.

At the April conference, in defending Lenin’s resolution on the national
question, Stalin formally starts from the thesis that “national
oppression is that system ... those measures which are adopted by the
imperialistic circles.” But he straightway and inevitably gets off the
track and goes back to his March position. “The more democratic a
country, the weaker its national oppression and vice versa.” Such is the
speaker’s own summary, and not the one he borrowed from Lenin. The fact
that democratic England is oppressing feudal and caste-ridden India
escapes, as before, from his limited field of vision. In distinction
from Russia, where “an old land aristocracy” has dominated – continues
Stalin – “in England and Austria-Hungary the national oppression has
never taken the form of pogroms.” As though a land aristocracy “never”
dominated in England, and as though it does not dominate to this day in
Hungary! The combined character of historic development which unites
“democracy” with the strangling of weak nations, had remained for Stalin
a sealed book.

That Russia took form as a state made up of nationalities, is the result
of her historic belatedness. But belatedness is a complex conception
inevitably contradictory. The backward country does not follow in the
tracks of the advanced, keeping the same distance. In an epoch of
world-wide economy the backward nations, becoming involved under
pressure from the advanced in the general chain of development, skip
over whole series of intermediate stages. Moreover the absence of firmly
established social forms and traditions makes the backward country – at
least within certain limits – extremely hospitable to the last word in
international technique and international thought. Backwardness does
not, however, for this reason cease to be backwardness. The whole
development gets a contradictory and combined character. A predominance
of historic extremes is proper to the social structure of a belated
nation – predominance of the backward peasants and the advanced
proletarians over the intermediate formations of the bourgeoisie. The
tasks of one class are shouldered off upon another. In the national
sphere also, the uprooting of medieval remnants falls to the lot of the
proletariat.

Nothing so clearly characterises the historic belatedness of Russia when
considered as a European country, as the fact that in the twentieth
century she had to liquidate compulsory land rent and the pale – those
twin barbarisms, serfdom and the Ghetto. But in performing these tasks
Russia, exactly because of her belated development, made use of new and
utterly modem classes, parties, programmes. To make an end of the idea
and methods of Rasputin, she required the ideas and methods of Marx.

Political practice remained, of course, far more primitive than
political theory. For things are harder to change than ideas. But theory
nevertheless only carried the demands of practical action clear through.
In order to achieve liberation and a cultural lift, the oppressed
nationalities were compelled to link their fate with that of the working
class. And for this they had to free themselves from the leadership of
their own bourgeois and petty bourgeois parties – they had to make a
long spurt forward, that is, on the road of historic development.

This subordination of the national movements to the fundamental process
of the revolution, the struggle of the proletariat for power, was not
accomplished at once, but in several stages – and moreover differently
in different regions. The Ukrainian, White Russian and Tartar workers,
peasants, and soldiers who were hostile to Kerensky, the war and the
Russification, became thereby, in spite of their compromisist
leadership, allies of the proletarian insurrection. From being an
objective support of the Bolsheviks, they became obliged at a further
stage to go over consciously also to the Bolshevik road. In Finland,
Latvia and Esthonia, and more weakly in the Ukraine, the stratification
of the national movement had taken such sharp forms by October, that
only the interference of foreign troops could prevent the success of the
proletarian revolution. In the Asiatic East, where the national
awakening was taking place in more primitive forms, it could only by
degrees and with a considerable lag come under the leadership of the
proletariat – only, indeed, after the proletariat had conquered the
power. If you take this complicated and contradictory process as a whole
the conclusion is obvious: the national current, like the agrarian, was
pouring into the channel of the October revolution.

The irrevocable and irresistible going over of the masses from the most
rudimentary tasks of political, agrarian and national emancipation and
abolition of serfdom to the slogan of proletarian rulership, resulted
not from “demagogic” agitation, not from preconceived schemes, not from
the theory of Permanent Revolution as the Liberals and Compromisers
thought, but from the social structure of Russia and the conditions of
the worldwide situation. The theory of Permanent Revolution only
formulated the combined process of this development.

It is a question here not of Russia alone. This subordination of belated
national revolutions to the revolution of the proletariat follows a law
which is valid throughout the world. Whereas in the nineteenth century
the fundamental problem of wars and revolutions was still to guarantee a
national market to the productive forces, the problem of our century is
to free the productive forces from the national boundaries which have
become iron fetters upon them. In the broad historic sense the national
revolutions of the East are only stages of the world revolution of the
proletariat, just as the national movements of Russia became stepping
stones to the Soviet dictatorship.

Lenin appraised with admirable profundity the revolutionary force
inherent in the development of the oppressed nationalities, both in
czarist Russia and throughout the world. That hypocritical “pacifism,”
which “condemns” in the same way the war of Japan against China aiming
at her enslavement, and the war of China against Japan in the cause of
her liberation, got nothing but scorn from Lenin. For him a war of
national liberation, in contrast to wars of imperialistic oppression,
was merely another form of the national revolution which in its turn
enters as a necessary link in the liberating struggle of the
international working class.

This appraisal of national wars and revolutions does not by any means
imply, however, that the bourgeoisie of the colonial and semi-colonial
nations have a revolutionary mission. On the contrary, this bourgeoisie
of backward countries from the days of its milk teeth grows up as
agentry of foreign capital, and notwithstanding its envious hatred of
foreign capital, always does and always will in every decisive situation
turn up in the same camp with it. Chinese compradorism is the classic
form of the colonial bourgeoisie, and the Kuomintang is the classic
party of compradorism. The upper circles of the petty bourgeoisie,
including the intelligentsia, may take an active and occasionally a very
noisy part in the national struggles, but they are totally incapable of
playing an independent rôle. Only the working class standing at the head
of the nation can carry either a national or an agrarian revolution
clear through.

The fatal mistake of the Epigones, and above all Stalin, lies in this,
that from Lenin’s teaching about the progressive historic significance
of the struggle of oppressed nations they have inferred a revolutionary
mission of the bourgeoisie of the colonial countries. A failure to
understand the permanent character of revolution in an imperialist
epoch; a pedantic schematisation of the course of development; a
chopping up of the living and combined process into dead stages imagined
to be necessarily separated in time – all these errors have brought
Stalin to a vulgar idealisation of democracy or a “democratic
dictatorship,” a thing which can be nothing in reality but either an
imperialist dictatorship or a dictatorship of the proletariat. Step by
step Stalin’s groups have proceeded along this road to a complete break
with the position of Lenin on the national question, and to their
catastrophic policy in China.

In August 1927, in conflict with the Opposition (Trotsky, Rakovsky, and
others) Stalin said at a plenary session of the Central Committee of the
Bolsheviks: “A revolution in imperialist countries is one thing; there
the bourgeoisie ... is counter-revolutionary at all stages of the
revolution ... A revolution in colonial and dependent countries is
something else. There the national bourgeoisie can at a given stage and
a given date support the revolutionary movement of their country against
imperialism.”

With side remarks and softenings due only to his lack of confidence in
himself, Stalin here transfers to the colonial bourgeoisie those same
traits with which he was adorning the Russian bourgeoisie in March.
Obedient to its deeply organic nature Stalin’s opportunism finds its way
as though impelled by some law of gravitation, through whatever channels
always in the same direction. The choice of theoretic arguments becomes
here a purely accidental matter.

From this transfer of his March appraisal of the Provisional Government
to the “national” government of China resulted Stalin’s three-year
co-operation with the Kuomintang, a policy which led up to one of the
most shocking facts of modern history. In the capacity of loyal
armour-bearer, the Bolshevism of the Epigones accompanied the Chinese
bourgeoisie right up to April 11, 1927, the day of its bloody massacre
of the Shanghai proletariat. “The fundamental mistake of the Opposition”
– thus Stalin tried to justify his comradeship in arms with Chang Kai
Shek – “lies in the fact that it identifies the revolution of 1905 in
Russia – in an imperialist country oppressing other peoples, with the
revolution in China, an oppressed country ...” It is astonishing even in
Stalin that he has never thought of viewing the revolution in Russia,
not from the standpoint of the nation “oppressing other peoples,” but
from the standpoint of the experience of these same “other peoples” of
Russia who have suffered no less oppression than the Chinese.

In that gigantic field of experience represented by Russia in the course
of her three revolutions, you can find every variant of national and
class struggle except one: that in which the bourgeoisie of any
oppressed nation played a liberating rôle in relation to its own people.
At every stage of its development every borderland bourgeoisie, no
matter in what colours it might dance, was invariably dependent upon the
central banks, trusts, and commercial institutions which were in essence
the agents of all Russian capital. They subjected the bourgeoisie to the
Russifying movement, and subjected to the bourgeoisie broad circles of
the liberal and democratic intelligentsia. The more “mature” a
borderland bourgeoisie might be, the more closely was it bound up with
the general state machine. Taken as a whole, the bourgeoisie of the
oppressed nation played the same role in relation to the ruling
bourgeoisie that the latter played in relation to international finance
capital. The complex hierarchy of antagonisms and dependencies did not
remove for one single day the fundamental solidarity of the three in the
struggle against the insurrectionary masses.

In the period of counter-revolution (1907-1917), when the leadership of
the national movements was in the hands of the native bourgeoisie, they
were even more candid than the Russian liberals in seeking a working
agreement with the Russian monarchy. The Polish, Baltic, Tartar,
Ukrainian, Jewish bourgeois vied with each other in the display of
imperialist patriotism. After the February revolution they hid behind
the backs of the Kadets – or, like the Kadets, behind the backs of their
own national Compromisers. The bourgeoisie of the border nations entered
the road of separatism in the autumn of 1917, not in a struggle against
national oppression, but in a struggle against the advancing proletarian
revolution. In the sum total the bourgeoisie of the oppressed nations
manifested no less hostility to the revolution than the Great Russian
bourgeoisie.

This gigantic historic lesson of three revolutions has left not a trace,
however, in the minds of many of those who took part in the events –
notably in the mind of Stalin. The compromisist – that is, petty
bourgeois – conception of the correlation of classes within colonial
nations, that conception which killed the Chinese revolution of
1925-1927, has even been introduced by the Epigones into the programme
of the Communist International, converting this programme in that
section into a mere trap for the oppressed peoples of the East.

In order to understand the real character of Lenin’s policy on the
national question, it is a good idea – following the method of contrasts
– to compare it with the policy of the Austrian social democrats.
Bolshevism based itself upon the assumption of an outbreak of national
revolutions continuing for decades to come, and instructed the advanced
workers in this spirit. The Austrian social democracy, on the contrary,
submissively accommodated itself to the policy of the ruling classes; it
defended the compulsory co-citizenship of ten nations in the
Austro-Hungarian monarchy, and at the same time, being absolutely
incapable of achieving a revolutionary union of the workers of these
different nationalities, fenced them off in the party and in the trade
unions with vertical partitions. Karl Renner, an educated Hapsburg
functionary, was never tired of probing the inkwells of Austro-Marxism
in search of some means of rejuvenating the rule of the Hapsburgs –
until one day he found himself the bereaved theoretician of the
Austro-Hungarian monarchy. When the Central Empires were crushed, the
Hapsburg dynasty again tried to raise the banner of a federation of
autonomous nations under its sceptre. The official programme of the
Austrian social democracy, based as it was upon the assumption of a
peaceful development within the framework of the monarchy, now became in
one second the programme of the monarchy itself, covered with the bloody
filth of its four years of war. But that rusty hoop which had bound ten
nations together flew to pieces. Austria-Hungary fell apart as a result
of internal centrifugal tendencies reinforced by the surgery of
Versailles. New states were formed, and the old ones reconstructed. The
Austrian Germans hung over an abyss. Their problem was no longer to
preserve their dominance over other nations, but to avoid falling
themselves under a foreign yoke. And Otto Bauer, representing the “left”
wing of the Austrian social democracy, considered this a suitable moment
to bring forward the formula of national self-determination. That
programme which during the preceding decades should have inspired the
struggle of the proletariat against the Hapsburgs and the ruling
bourgeoisie, was now brought in as an instrument of self-preservation
for the nation which had dominated yesterday, but today was in danger
from the side of the liberated Slavic peoples. Just as the reformist
programme of the Austrian social democracy had become in the wink of an
eye the straw at which a drowning monarchy tried to grab, so the formula
of self-determination, emasculated by these Austro-Marxists, was now to
become the anchor of salvation for the German bourgeoisie.

On October 3, 1918, when the matter no longer depended on them in the
slightest degree, the social democratic deputies of the Reichsrath
magnanimously “recognised” the right of the peoples of the former empire
to self-determination. On October 4th, the bourgeois parties also
adopted the programme of self-determination. Having thus outstripped the
Austro-German imperialists by one day, the social democrats immediately
resumed their waiting policy, it being still uncertain what turn things
would take and what Wilson was going to say. Only on the 13th of
October, when the conclusive collapse of the army and the monarchy had
created – in the words of Otto Bauer – “the revolutionary situation for
which our national programme was designed,” did the Austro-Marxists
raise the question of self-determination in a practical form. In very
truth they had now nothing to lose. “With the collapse of its rulership
over other nations,” explains Bauer quite frankly, “the German national
bourgeoisie considered at an end that historic mission in whose cause it
had voluntarily suffered a separation from the German fatherland.” Thus
the new programme was put in circulation not because it was needful to
the oppressed, but because it had ceased to be dangerous to the
oppressors. The possessing classes, driven into a tight place
historically, had found themselves obliged to recognise the national
revolution juridically, and Austro-Marxism found this an appropriate
moment to legitimise it theoretically. This was a mature revolution,
they said, timely, historically prepared – it is all over anyway. The
spirit of the social democracy is here before us as though in the palm
of the hand!

It was quite otherwise with the social revolution, which could not hope
for any recognition from the possessing classes. This had to be
postponed, compromised, robbed of glory. Since the empire had split up
along the weakest, that is the national, seams, Otto Bauer drew the
following conclusion as to the character of the revolution: “It was by
no means a social, but a national revolution.” In reality the movement
had had from the very beginning a deep social-revolutionary content. Its
“purely national” character is fairly well illustrated by the fact that
the possessing classes of Austria openly invited the Entente to take
prisoner the whole army. The German bourgeoisie beseeched the Italian
general to seize Vienna with Italian troops!

This vulgar and pedantic separation of national form from social content
in the revolutionary process, as though they constituted two independent
historic stages – we see here how closely Otto Bauer approaches Stalin!
– had an extremely utilitarian destination. Its purpose was to justify
the collaboration of the social democracy with the bourgeoisie in its
struggle against the danger of social revolution.

If you adopt the formula of Marx that revolution is the locomotive of
history, then Austro-Marxism occupies the position of the brake. Even
after the actual collapse of the monarchy, the social democracy, called
to participate in the government, was still unable to make up its mind
to a rupture with the old Hapsburg ministry. The “national” revolution
limited itself to reinforcing the old ministers with state secretaries.
Only after October 9th, when the German revolution had thrown out the
Hohenzollern, did the Austrian social democrats propose to the State
Council that they proclaim a republic, frightening their bourgeois
partners into it with the movement of the masses at which they were
already themselves quaking to the marrow of their bones. “The Christian
Socialists,” says Otto Bauer with imprudent irony, “who on the 9th and
10th of November were still on the side of the monarchy, decided on
November 11 to cease their resistance ...” For two whole days the social
democrats were in advance of this party of the Black Hundred Monarchy!
All the heroic legends of humanity grow pale before this revolutionary
audacity.

Against its will the Austrian social democracy took its place
automatically from the beginning of the revolution at the head of the
nation, just as had the Russian Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries.
Like them too it feared above all things its own power. In the coalition
government the social democrats tried to occupy just as small a place as
possible. Otto Bauer explains this as follows: “The fact that the social
democrats at first demanded only a modest participation in the
government corresponded primarily to the purely national character of
the revolution.” The question of power was decided by those people not
on a basis of the real correlation of forces, the might of the
revolutionary movement, the bankruptcy of the ruling classes, the
political influence of the party, but by a pedantic little label “purely
national revolution” pasted by some wiseacre classifiers upon the actual
course of events.

Karl Renner waited out the storm in the position of head secretary of
the State Council. The other social democratic leaders converted
themselves into assistants of the bourgeois ministers. In other words,
the social democrats hid under the office tables. The masses, however,
were not satisfied to feed on the national shell of that nut whose
social meat the Austro-Marxists were saving up for the bourgeoisie. The
workers and soldiers shoved out the bourgeois ministers and compelled
the social democrats to come out of hiding. The irreplaceable
theoretician, Otto Bauer, explains this also: “Only the events of the
following days, driving the national revolution over to the side of
social revolution, increased our weight in the government.” To translate
this into intelligible language: under the assault of the masses, the
social democrats were compelled to crawl out from under the tables.

But this did not change their function for a moment. They took the
power, but only to start a war against romanticism and adventurism, with
which titles these sycophants now designated that same social revolution
which had “increased their weight in the government.” If these
Austro-Marxists successfully fulfilled in 1918 their historic mission as
guardian angels protecting the Vienna Kreditanstalt from the
revolutionary romanticism of the proletariat, it is only because they
met no obstacle from the side of a genuine revolutionary party.

The two states composed of nationalities, Russia and Austria-Hungary,
have with their most recent fate set a seal upon the difference between
Bolshevism and Austro-Marxism. Throughout a decade and a half Lenin, in
implacable conflict with all shades of Great Russian chauvinism,
preached the right of all oppressed nations to cut away from the empire
of the czars. The Bolsheviks were accused of aspiring toward the
dismemberment of Russia, but this bold revolutionary formulation of the
national problem won for the Bolshevik party the indestructible
confidence of the small and oppressed peoples of czarist Russia. In
April 1917 Lenin said: “If the Ukranians see that we have a Soviet
republic they will not cut away, but if we have a Miliukov republic they
will.” In this he proved right. History has provided an incomparable
check-up of the two policies on the national question. Whereas
Austria-Hungary, whose proletariat was educated in the spirit of a
cowardly halfway policy, went all to pieces under a formidable shake-up,
and moreover the initiative in this process was taken in the main by the
national sections of the social democratic party, in Russia on the ruins
of czarism a new state composed of nationalities has been formed, and
has been closely welded together both economically and politically by
the Bolshevik Party.

Whatever may be the further destiny of the Soviet Union – and it is
still far from a quiet haven – the national policy of Lenin will find
its place among the eternal treasures of mankind.



CHAPTER 40 WITHDRAWAL FROM THE PRE-PARLIAMENT AND STRUGGLE FOR THE SOVIET CONGRESS


 

Every additional day of war was disintegrating the front, weakening the
government, damaging the international position of the country. At the
beginning of October the German fleets, both naval and air, developed
active operations in the Gulf of Finland. The Baltic sailors fought
courageously trying to protect the road to Petrograd. But they, more
clearly and profoundly than any other unit of the front, understood the
deep contradiction in their position as vanguards of a revolution and
involuntary participants in an imperialist war, and through the radio
stations on their ships they sent out a cry to the four corners of the
horizon for international revolutionary help. “Attacked by superior
German forces our fleet will go down in unequal battle. Not one of our
ships will decline the fight. The slandered and maligned fleet will do
its duty – but not at the command of a miserable Russian Bonaparte,
ruling by the long-suffering patience of the revolution ... not in the
name of the treaties of our rulers with the Allies, binding in chains
the hands of Russian freedom ...” No, but in the name of the defence of
the approaches to the hearth-fire of the revolution, Petrograd. “In the
hour when the waves of the Baltic are stained with the blood of our
brothers, while the waters are closing over their bodies, we raise our
voice: ... Oppressed people of the whole world! Lift the banner of
revolt!”

These words about battles and victims were not empty. The squadron had
lost the ship _Slava_ and retired after fighting. The Germans had
captured the Moonsund Archipelago. One more black page in the book of
the war had been turned. The government decided to use this new military
blow as a pretext for moving the capital. This old idea swam out at
every suitable opportunity. It was not that the ruling circles had any
particular affection for Moscow, but they hated Petrograd. The
monarchist reaction, the liberals, the democracy – all strove in turn to
denote the capital, to bring it to its knees, to beat it down. The most
extreme patriots were now hating Petrograd with a far more bitter hatred
than they felt for Berlin.

The question of evacuating the capital was taken up as a thing to be
accomplished in extraordinary haste. Only two weeks were allotted for
the transfer of the government together with the Pre-Parliament. It was
also decided to evacuate in the briefest possible time the factories
working for the defence. The Central Executive Committee as a “private
institution” would have to look out for itself.

The Kadet instigators of the plan understood that a mere transfer of the
government would not settle their problem, but they counted on afterward
capturing the seat of revolutionary infection with hunger, disease and
exhaustion. An internal blockade of Petrograd was already in full swing.
The factories were being deprived of orders; the supply of fuel had been
cut down three-quarters; the Ministry of Provisions was holding up
cattle on their way to the capital; freight movements on the Mariinsky
Railroad System had been stopped.

The warlike Rodzianko, president of that state Duma which the government
had at last dissolved at the beginning of October, spoke quite frankly
in the liberal Moscow newspaper _Utro Rossii_ about the military danger
threatening the capital. “I say to myself, God help her, God help
Petrograd ... A fear was expressed in Petrograd lest the central
institutions (that is the soviets, etc.) will be destroyed. To this I
answered that I would be very glad if those institutions were destroyed,
for they have brought nothing whatever but evil to Russia.” To be sure,
with the capture of Petrograd the Baltic fleet also would have been
destroyed, but against that too Rodzianko had no complaint: “The ships
there are completely depraved.” Thanks to the fact that the Lord
Chamberlain could not keep his tongue behind his teeth, the people had
this chance to find out the most intimate thoughts of noble and
bourgeois Russia.

The Russian _chargé d’affaires_ reported from London that the British
naval headquarters, in spite of all urgings, did not consider it
possible to relieve the situation of its Ally in the Baltic. It was not
the Bolsheviks alone who interpreted this answer to mean that the
Allies, in common with the patriotic upper circles of Russia herself,
looked only for benefits to the common cause from a German blow at
Petrograd. The workers and soldiers had no doubt – especially after
Rodzianko’s confession – that the government was consciously getting
ready to send them to school to Ludendorff and Hoffmann.

On the 6th of October the soldiers’ section adopted with a unanimity
hitherto unknown the resolution introduced by Trotsky: “If the
Provisional Government is incapable of defending Petrograd, it must
either make peace or give place to another government.” The workers were
no less irreconcilable. They considered Petrograd their fortress. Their
revolutionary hopes were bound up with her. They did not intend to
surrender Petrograd. Frightened by the military danger, the evacuation,
the indignation of the soldiers and workers, the excitement of the whole
population, the Compromisers, on their side, sounded an alarm: We must
not abandon Petrograd to the caprice of fate. Convinced that an
attempted evacuation would meet resistance from all sides, the
government began to draw back: We were not troubled so much, you know,
about our own safety as about the question of a meeting-place for the
future Constituent Assembly. But this position, too, they could not
maintain. In less than a week the government was compelled to announce
that it not only intended to remain in the Winter Palace itself, but
proposed as before to convoke the Constituent Assembly in the Tauride
Palace. This announcement changed nothing in the military and political
situation. But it revealed once more the political power of Petrograd,
which considered itself called to put an end to the government of
Kerensky, and would not let that government escape from its walls. It
was only the Bolsheviks who subsequently dared transfer the capital to
Moscow. They carried this out without the slightest difficulty because
for them it was really a strategic move. They could not have any
political reason for flying from Petrograd.

That contrite declaration about the defence of the capital was made by
the government upon the demand of the compromisist majority of a
commission of the Council of the Russian Republic or “Pre-Parliament.”
This wonderful institution had at last succeeded in getting born.
Plekhanov, who loved jokes and knew how to make them, disrespectfully
named this impotent and ephemeral Council of the Republic “the little
house on chicken’s feet.” Politically this definition is not at all
inaccurate. It is only necessary to add that for a little house the
Pre-Parliament put up a pretty good front: the magnificent Mariinsky
Palace, which had formerly sheltered the State Council of Ministers, was
placed at its disposal. The contrast between this elegant palace and
Smolny Institute, run-down and saturated with soldier smells, made a
great impression upon Sukhanov: “Amid all this magnificence,” he
confesses, “one wanted to rest, to forget about labour and struggle,
about hunger and war, about ruin and anarchy, about the country and the
revolution.” But there was very little time left for rest and
forgetfulness.

The so-called “democratic” majority of the Pre-Parliament consisted of
308 men: 120 Social Revolutionaries, among them about 20 Lefts, 60
Mensheviks of various shades, 66 Bolsheviks; after that came the
Co-operators, the delegates of the peasant executive committee, etc. The
possessing classes were accorded 156 seats, of which the Kadets occupied
almost half. Together with the Co-operators, the Cossacks, and the
rather conservative members of Kerensky’s Executive Committee, the Right
Wing on a number of questions came near being a majority. The
distribution of seats in that comfortable little house on chicken’s feet
was thus in flagrant contradiction to all decisive expressions of the
will of the people that had been made either in city or country.
Moreover, in opposition to the dull grey representation to be found in
the soviets and elsewhere, the Mariinsky Palace assembled within its
walls the “flower of the nation.” Inasmuch as the members of the
Pre-Parliament did not depend upon the accidents of elective
competition, upon local influences and provincial preferences, each
social group and each party sent its most eminent leaders. The personnel
was, to quote Sukhanov, “extraordinarily brilliant.” When the
Pre-Parliament assembled for its first session, a weight was lifted,
says Miliukov, from the hearts of many sceptics: “It will be fine if the
Constituent Assembly is no worse than this.” The flower of the nation
looked upon itself in the palace mirrors with great satisfaction and
neglected to notice that it was incapable of bearing fruit.

In opening this Council of the Republic on October 7, Kerensky did not
forgo the opportunity to remark that although the government possessed
“all the fullness of power,” it was nevertheless ready to listen to “any
genuinely valuable suggestion.” Although absolute, that is to say, the
government had not ceased to be cultivated. In the præsidium, which
consisted of five members with Avksentiev as president, one place was
offered to the Bolsheviks: it remained unoccupied. The directors of this
pitiful and unhappy comedy felt sick at heart. The entire interest of
its grey opening on a rainy day was centred upon the forthcoming action
of the Bolsheviks. In the _couloirs_ of the Mariinsky Palace, according
to Sukhanov, a “sensational rumour” was in the air: “Trotsky has won by
a majority of two or three votes ... and the Bolsheviks are going to
withdraw at once from the Pre-Parliament.” In reality the decision to
withdraw demonstratively from the Mariinsky Palace was adopted on the
5th at a meeting of the Bolshevik faction by all votes except one. So
great had been the shift leftward during the preceding two weeks! Only
Kamenev remained true to his original position – or rather he alone
dared defend it. In a special declaration addressed to the Central
Committee, Kamenev candidly described the course adopted as “very
dangerous for the party.” The doubt about the intentions of the
Bolsheviks caused a certain anxiety in the Pre-Parliament. It was not so
much a breakdown of the régime that they feared, as a “scandal” before
the eyes of the Allied diplomats, whom the majority had just greeted
with an appropriate volley of patriotic applause. Sukhanov relates how
they despatched an official personage – Avksentiev himself – to the
Bolsheviks to inquire in advance: What is going to happen? “A mere
nothing,” answered Trotsky, “a mere nothing, a little shot from a
pistol.” After the opening of the session, upon the basis of rules of
order taken over from the state Duma, Trotsky was offered ten minutes
for a special announcement in the name of the Bolshevik faction. A tense
silence reigned in the hall. The declaration began by stating that the
government was at present just as irresponsible as it had been before
the Democratic Conference, which was supposed to have been convoked for
the curbing of Kerensky, and that the representatives of the possessing
classes were present in this provisional council in numbers to which
they had not the slightest right. If the bourgeois were really preparing
for a Constituent Assembly to meet in a month and a half, their leaders
would have no reason to defend so fiercely at the present time the
irresponsibility of the government even to this doctored representation.
“The essence of it all is that the bourgeois classes have decided to
quash the Constituent Assembly.” The blow was well aimed, and the Right
Wing protested the more noisily. Without departing from the text of the
declaration the speaker denounced the industrial, agrarian food policy.
It would be impossible to adopt any other policy, even if you set
yourself the conscious aim of impelling the masses to insurrection. “The
idea of surrendering the revolutionary capital to the German troops ...
we accept as a natural link in a general policy designed to promote ...
a counter-revolutionary conspiracy.” The protest here turned into a
storm. Cries about Berlin, about German gold, about the sealed train –
and on this general background, like pieces of broken bottle in the mud,
foul-mouthed abuse. Nothing like it was ever heard during the most
passionate conflicts in Smolny, dirty and rundown and spat all over by
soldiers as it was. “We only have to get into the good society of
Mariinsky Palace,” writes Sukhanov, “in order to revive at once that
atmosphere of the low-class saloon which prevailed in the state Duma
with its restricted franchise.”

Picking his way through these explosions of hatred alternating with
moments of hush, the speaker concluded: “No, the Bolshevik faction
announce that with this government of treason to the people and with
this Council of counter-revolutionary connivance we have nothing
whatever in common ... In withdrawing from the provisional council we
summon the workers, soldiers and peasants of all Russia to be on their
guard, and to be courageous. Petrograd is in danger! The revolution is
in danger! The people are in danger! ... We address ourselves to the
people. All power to the soviets!” As the orator descended from the
tribune the few score of Bolsheviks left the hall accompanied by curses.
After their moment of alarm the majority heaved a happy sigh of relief.
Only the Bolsheviks went out. The flower of the nation remained at their
posts. The Left Wing of the Compromisers bent a little under a blow not
directed, it seemed, at themselves. “We, the nearest neighbours of the
Bolsheviks,” confesses Sukhanov, “sat there completely appalled by all
that had happened.” These Immaculate Knights of the word were sensing
the fact that the time for words had passed.

The Minister of Foreign Affairs, Tereshchenko, informed the Russian
ambassadors about the opening of the Pre-Parliament in a secret
telegram: “The first session passed off uneventfully with the exception
of a scandal created by the Bolsheviks.” The historic break between the
proletariat and the state mechanism of the bourgeoisie was conceived by
those people as a mere “scandal.” The bourgeois press did not miss the
opportunity to goad the government by references to the resoluteness of
the Bolsheviks: The honourable ministers will only then lead the country
out of anarchy when they “acquire as much resolution and will to action
as is to be found in Comrade Trotsky.” As though it were a question of
resolution and the will of individual people and not of the historic
destiny of classes! And as though the sorting out of people and
characters goes on independently of historic tasks. “They spoke and
acted,” wrote Miliukov on the subject of the Bolshevik withdrawal from
the Pre-Parliament. “like people feeling a power behind them, knowing
that the morrow belonged to them.”

The loss of the Moonsund Islands, the growing danger to Petrograd, and
the withdrawal of the Bolsheviks from the Pre-Parliament into the
street, compelled the Compromisers to take thought for the further
development of the war. After a three-day discussion participated in by
the Minister of War and Navy, and the commissars and delegates of the
army organisations, the Central Executive Committee came at last to a
saving decision: “To insist that representatives of the Russian
democracy be admitted to the Paris Conference of the Allies.” After
renewed efforts they named Skobelev as delegate. Detailed instructions
were drawn up: Peace without annexations or indemnities; neutralisation
of straits and canals, including the Suez and Panama Canals – the
Compromisers had a wider outlook geographically than politically;
abolition of secret diplomacy; gradual disarmament. The Central
Executive Committee explained that the aim of its delegate in the Paris
Conference was “to bring pressure to bear upon the Allies.” Pressure of
Skobelev upon France, Great Britain and the United States! The Kadet
paper put a poisonous question! “What will Skobelev do if the Allies
unceremoniously reject his conditions? Will he threaten them with
another appeal to the people of the whole world?” The Compromisers,
alas, had long been blushing for that old appeal of theirs.

While intending to force upon the United States the neutralisation of
the Panama Canal, the Central Executive Committee proved incapable in
actual fact of bringing pressure to bear even upon the Winter Palace. On
the 12th, Kerensky sent Lloyd George a voluminous letter full of gentle
reproaches, sorrowful complaints, and fervent promises. The front, he
said, is “in better condition than it was last spring.” Of course the
defeatist propaganda – thus the Russian premier complains to a Britisher
against the Russian Bolsheviks – has hindered the carrying out of all
the plans indicated. But there can be no talk of peace. The government
knows only one question: “How to continue the war!” It goes without
saying that as an earnest of his patriotism Kerensky begged for credits.

Having got rid of the Bolsheviks, the Pre-Parliament also lost no time
in taking up the war. On the 10th the debate opened on improving the
fighting capacity of the army. The dialogue, which occupied three weary
sessions, developed according to one invariable scheme. We must convince
the army that it is fighting for peace and democracy, said the Left. We
must not convince but compel, answered the Right. You have nothing to
compel with; in order to compel you must first at least partially
convince, answered the Compromisers. In the matter of convincing the
Bolsheviks are stronger than you, answered the Kadets. Both sides were
right. But a drowning man is also right when he lets out a yell before
going down.

On the 18th came that decisive hour which in the nature of things
nothing in the world could alter. The formula of the Social
Revolutionaries got 95 votes against 127, with 50 abstaining. The
formula of the Right got 135 Votes against 139. Astonishing! There was
no majority. Throughout the hall, according to the newspaper accounts,
there was general movement and confusion. In spite of its unity of aim,
the flower of the nation proved incapable of adopting even a platonic
decision upon the most urgent question of the national life. This was no
accident. The same thing was being repeated day by day in the
commissions and in the plenary sessions upon all other questions. The
fragments of opinion could not be put together. All the groups were
living on illusive shadings of political thought: thought itself was
absent. Maybe it had gone out into the street with the Bolsheviks? ...
The blind alley of the Pre-Parliament was the blind alley of the whole
régime.

To reconvince the army was difficult, but to compel it was also
impossible. To a new shout from Kerensky at the Baltic fleet, which had
just been through a battle and lost victims, a congress of the sailors
addressed to the Central Executive Committee a demand that they remove
from the staff of the Provisional Government “a person who is disgracing
and destroying the great revolution with his shameless political
chantage.” It was the first time Kerensky had heard such language from
the sailors. The Regional Committee of the Army, Fleet and Russian
Workers in Finland, functioning as a sovereign power, held up the
government freight. Kerensky threatened the Soviet commissars with
arrest. The answer was: The Regional Committee tranquilly accepts the
challenge of the Provisional Government. Kerensky made no reply. In
essence the Baltic fleet was already in a state of insurrection. On the
land front, things had not yet gone so far, but they were travelling in
the same direction. The food situation was rapidly deteriorating
throughout October. The commander-in-chief of the Northern front
reported that hunger “is the chief cause of the moral disintegration of
the army.” At the same time that the compromisist upper circles on the
front were continuing to assert – to be sure, now only behind the backs
of the soldiers – that the fighting capacity of the army was improving,
the lower ranks, regiment after regiment, were putting forth demands for
a publication of the secret treaties and an immediate offer of peace.
The commissar of the Western front, Zhdanov, reported during the first
days of October: “The mood is extremely alarming, taken in connection
with the nearness of cold weather and the deterioration of the food ...
The Bolsheviks are scoring a definite success.”

The governmental institutions at the front were hanging in the air. The
commissar of the 2nd Army reported that the military courts could not
function because the soldier-witnesses refused to appear and testify.
“The mutual relations between the commanding staff and the soldiers is
embittered. The officers are blamed for dragging out the war.” The
hostility of the soldiers to the government and the commanding staff had
long ago been transferred also to the army committees, which had not
been renewed since the beginning of the revolution. Over the heads of
the committees the regiments were sending delegates to Petrograd, to the
Soviet, to complain of the intolerable situation in the trenches, where
they lived without bread, without clothing, without faith in the war. On
the Roumanian front, where the Bolsheviks were very weak, whole
regiments were refusing to shoot. “In two or three weeks the soldiers
themselves will declare an armistice and lay down their arms.” The
delegates from one of the divisions reported: “With the coming of the
first snow the soldiers have decided to go home.” The delegates of the
133rd Army Corps made this threat at a plenary session of the Petrograd
Soviet: “If there is not a real struggle for peace, the soldiers
themselves will take the power and declare an armistice.” The commissar
of the 2nd Army reported to the War Minister: “There is no little talk
to the effect that with the arrival of cold weather they will abandon
their position.”

Fraternising, which had almost stopped since the July days, began again
and grew rapidly. Instances not only of the arrest of officers by the
soldiers, but of the murder of the more hateful began to multiply. These
things were done almost publicly, before the eyes of the soldiers.
Nobody interfered: the majority did not want to, the small minority did
not dare. The murderer always succeeded in hiding: he was drowned and
lost in the soldier mass. One of the generals wrote: “We convulsively
grasp at this or that, we pray for some sort of miracle, but the
majority of us understand that there is already no hope of salvation.”

Mixing cunning with stupidity, the patriotic papers continued to write
about a continuation of the war, about an offensive and about victory.
The generals shook their heads; some of them equivocally joined in.
“Only completely crazy people,” wrote Baron Budberg, the commander of a
corps near Dvinsk, on the 7th of October, “could dream about an
offensive at the present time.” The very next day he was compelled to
write in the same diary “Startled and appalled to receive orders for an
offensive not later than October 20th.” Headquarters, believing in
nothing and shrugging its shoulders at everything, was drawing up plans
for a new operation. There were not a few generals who saw the last hope
of salvation in a repetition on a grand scale of Kornilov’s experiment
with Riga: Drag the army into battle and try to bring down a defeat on
the head of the revolution.

On the initiative of War Minister Verkhovsky it was decided to transfer
the oldest classes into the reserve. The railroad groaned under the
burden of these returning soldiers. In the overloaded cars the springs
broke and the floors fell through. This did not improve the mood of
those left behind. “The trenches are breaking down,” writes Budberg.
“The communication trenches are flooded; there is refuse and excrement
everywhere ... The soldiers flatly refuse to work at cleaning up the
trenches ... It is dreadful to think where this will lead when spring
comes and all this begins to rot and decompose.” In a state of
embittered inaction the soldiers refused in droves even to undergo
preventive inoculation. This too became a form of struggle against the
war.

After vain efforts to raise the fighting capacity of the army by
decreasing its numbers, Verkhovsky suddenly came to the conclusion that
only peace could save the country. At a private conference with the
Kadet leaders, whom this young and naïve minister imagined he could
bring over to his side, Verkhovsky drew a picture of the material and
spiritual collapse of the army: “Any attempt to prolong the war can only
bring on a catastrophe.” The Kadets could not understand this. But while
the others remained silent Miliukov scornfully shrugged his shoulders:
“The honour of Russia,” “loyalty to the Allies.” ... Not believing in
one of these words, the leader of the bourgeoisie was stubbornly
striving to bury the revolution under the ruins and piles of corpses
that would be left by the war. Verkhovsky revealed a certain amount of
political audacity. Without informing or warning the government, he
appeared on the 20th before the commission of the Pre-Parliament and
announced the necessity of an immediate peace with or without the
consent of the Allies. He was furiously attacked by all those who agreed
with him in private conversations. The patriotic press wrote that the
war minister “had jumped on the footboard of Comrade Trotsky’s chariot.”
Burtsev hinted at the presence of German gold. Verkhovsky was sent away
on a vacation. In heart to heart conversations the patriots were saying:
In essence he is right. Budberg had to speak cautiously even in his
diary: “From the point of view of keeping our word,” he wrote, “the
proposal, of course, is tricky. But from the standpoint of the egoistic
interests of Russia, it is perhaps the only one which offers hope of a
saving way out.” Incidentally the baron confessed his envy of the German
generals to whom “fate has given the good luck to be the authors of
victories.” He did not foresee that the turn of the German generals
would come next. Those people never foresaw anything, even the cleverest
of them. The Bolsheviks foresaw much and that was their strength.

The withdrawal from the Pre-Parliament in the eyes of the people burned
the last bridges uniting the party of insurrection with official
society. With renewed energy – for the nearness of the goal redoubles
one’s strength – the Bolsheviks carried on their agitation, an agitation
called demagogism by the enemy because it brought out into the public
square what they themselves were hiding in the chancelleries and private
offices. The convincingness of this tireless evangel grew out of the
fact that the Bolsheviks understood the course of the objective
development, subjected their policy to it, were not afraid of the
masses, and unconquerably believed in their own truth and their victory.
The people never tired of hearing them. The masses felt a need to stand
close together. Each wanted to test himself through others, and all
tensely and attentively kept observing how one and the same thought
would develop in their various minds with its different shades and
features. Unnumbered crowds of people stood about the circuses and other
big buildings where the more popular Bolsheviks would address them with
the last arguments and the last appeals.

The number of leading agitators had greatly decreased by October. First
of all Lenin was lacking – both as an agitator and still more as an
immediate day-to-day inspiration. His simple and deep generalisations
which could so lastingly insert themselves into the consciousness of the
masses, his clear sayings caught up from the people and handed back to
them, were sadly missed. The first-class agitator Zinoviev was lacking.
Having hidden from prosecution under an indictment for “insurrection” in
July, he decisively turned against the October insurrection, and thus
for the whole critical period withdrew from the field of action.
Kamenev, the irreplacable propagandist, the experienced political
instructor of the party, condemned the policy of insurrection, did not
believe in the victory, saw catastrophes ahead and gloomily retired into
the shadows. Sverdlov, by nature an organiser rather than an agitator,
appeared often at mass meeting and his even, powerful and tireless bass
voice inspired tranquil confidence. Stalin was neither agitator nor
orator. He never appeared as a spokesman at party conferences. But did
he appear so much as once in the mass meetings of the revolution? In the
documents and memoirs no record of it has been preserved.

A brilliant agitation was conducted by Volodarsky, Lashevich, Kollontai,
Chudnovsky, and after them by scores of agitators of lesser calibre.
People listened with interest and sympathy – and the mature also with a
certain condescension – to Lunacharsky, a skilled orator who knew how to
present fact and generalisation and pathos and joke, but who did not
pretend to lead anybody. He himself needed to be led. In proportion as
the revolution approached, Lunacharsky faded rapidly and lost his
colourful effects.

Sukhanov says of the president of the Petrograd Soviet[1]: “Tearing
himself from the work in revolutionary headquarters he would fly from
the Obukhovsky factory to the Trubocheny, from the Putilov to the Baltic
shipyards, from the Riding Academy to the barracks, and seemed to be
speaking simultaneously in all places. Every Petrograd worker and
soldier knew him and heard him personally. His influence – both in the
masses and in headquarters – was overwhelming. He was the central figure
of those days, and the chief hero of this remarkable page of history.”

But incomparably more effective in that last period before the
insurrection was the molecular agitation carried on by nameless workers,
sailors, soldiers, winning converts one by one, breaking down the last
doubts, overcoming the last hesitations. Those months of feverish
political life had created innumerable cadres in the lower ranks, had
educated hundreds and thousands of rough diamonds, who were accustomed
to look on politics from below and not above, and for that very reason
estimated facts and people with a keenness not always accessible to
orators of the academic type. The Petrograd workers stood In the front
rank – hereditary proletarians who had produced a race of agitators and
organisers of extraordinary revolutionary temper and high political
culture, independent in thought, word and action. Carpenters, fitters,
blacksmiths, teachers of the unions and factories, each already had
around him his school, his pupils, the future builders of the Republic
of Soviets. The Baltic sailors, close comrades in arms of the Petrograd
workers – to a considerable extent issued from their midst – put forward
a brigade of agitators who took by storm the backward regiments, the
county towns, the villages of the muzhiks. A generalising formula tossed
out in the _Cirque Moderne_ by one of the revolutionary leaders would
take flesh and blood in hundreds of thinking heads, and so make the
rounds of the whole country.

From the Baltic states, from Poland and Lithuania, thousands of
revolutionary workers and soldiers had been evacuated during the retreat
of the Russian armies, coming with the industrial enterprises or one by
one. All these became agitators against the war and those guilty of it.
The Lettish Bolsheviks, torn away from their home soil and
wholeheartedly standing on the soil of the revolution, convinced,
stubborn, resolute, were carrying on day by day and all day long a
mining operation in all parts of the country. Their angular faces, harsh
accent, and often their broken Russian phrases, gave special
expressiveness to an unceasing summons to insurrection.

The mass would no longer endure in its midst the wavering, the dubious,
the neutral. It was striving to get hold of everybody, to attract, to
convince, to conquer. The factories joined with the regiments in sending
delegates to the front. The trenches got into connection with the
workers and peasants near by in the rear. In the towns along the front
there was an endless series of meetings, conferences, consultations in
which the soldiers and sailors would bring their activity into accord
with that of the workers and peasants. It was in this manner that the
backward White Russian front was won over to Bolshevism.

In places where the local party leadership was irresolute and disposed
to wait, as for example in Kiev, Voronezh, and many other points, the
masses not infrequently fell into a passive condition. To justify their
policy, the leaders would point to this mood of depression which they
themselves had created. On the other hand: “The more resolute and bold
was his summons to insurrection,” writes Povolzhsky, one of the Kazan
agitators, “the more trustful and hearty would be the attitude of the
soldier mass toward the speaker.”

The factories and regiments of Petrograd and Moscow were now more
insistently knocking at the wooden gates of the villages. The workers
would join together in sending delegates into their native provinces.
The regiments would pass resolutions summoning the peasants to support
the Bolsheviks. The workers in factories within the cities would make
pilgrimages to the surrounding villages, distributing newspapers and
laying the foundations of Bolshevik nuclei. From these rounds they would
come back bringing in the pupil of their eyes a reflection from the
flames of the peasant war.

Bolshevism took possession of the country. The Bolsheviks became an
unconquerable power. The people were with them. The city dumas of
Kronstadt, Czaritsyn, Kostroma, Shuia, elected on a universal franchise,
were wholly in the hands of the Bolsheviks. The Bolsheviks received 52
per cent of the votes at an election to the district dumas of Moscow. In
far-off and tranquil Tomsk, as also in the wholly non-industrial Samara,
the Bolsheviks dominated in the duma. Out of four members of the
Schlusselberg county zemstvo, three were Bolsheviks. In the Ligovsky
county zemstvo, the Bolsheviks got 50 per cent, of the votes. It was not
so favourable everywhere, but everywhere it was changing in the same
direction. The relative weight of the Bolshevik Party was on the rapid
rise.

The Bolshevisation of the masses revealed itself far more clearly,
however, in the class organisations. The trade unions in the capital
comprised over a half million workers. The Mensheviks themselves, who
still had the administration of certain unions, felt that they were a
relic of past days. No matter what parts of the proletariat might form
an organisation, and no matter what its immediate aim might be, it would
inevitably arrive at Bolshevik conclusions. And this was no accident:
The trade unions, the factory committees, the economic and cultural
assemblies of the working class, both permanent and transitory, were
compelled by the whole situation, upon every private problem which might
arise, to raise one and the same question: Who is the master of the
house?

The workers of the artillery factories, being called together in
conference to regulate their relations with the administration, decided
that they could best regulate them through a Soviet government. This was
no longer a mere formula, but a programme of economic salvation. As they
approached the power the workers also approached more and more
concretely the problems of industry. The artillery conference even
established a special centre for the study of methods of transition from
munition factories to peaceful production.

The Moscow conference of factory and shop committees declared that the
local Soviet should in the future decide all strike conflicts by decree,
on its own authority open the plants shut down by the lockouts, and by
sending its own delegates to Siberia and the Donetz Basin guarantee coal
and grain to the factories. The Petrograd conference of factory and shop
committees devoted its attention to the agrarian question, and upon a
report by Trotsky drew up a manifesto to the peasants: The proletariat
feels itself to be not only a special class, but also the leader of the
people.

The All-Russian conference of factory and shop committees, meeting
during the second half of October, raised the question of workers’
control to the position of a national problem: “The workers are more
interested than the owners in the correct and uninterrupted operation of
the plants.” Workers’ control “is in the interest of the whole country
and ought to be supported by the revolutionary peasantry and the
revolutionary army.” This resolution, opening the door to a new economic
order, was adopted by the representatives of all the industrial
enterprises of Russia with only five votes opposing and nine abstaining
from the vote. The few individual abstainers were old Mensheviks no
longer able to follow their own party, but still lacking courage to
raise their bands openly for the Bolshevik revolution, Tomorrow they
will do it.

The democratic municipal governments, only recently created, were dying
away along with the organs of the governmental power. The most important
tasks, such as guaranteeing water, light, fuel and food to the cities,
were all falling more and more upon the soviets and other workers’
organisations. The factory committee of the lighting station of
Petrograd was rushing about the city and the surroundings hunting up at
one time coal, at another grease for the turbines, and getting them both
through committees of other plants acting in opposition to their owners
and the administration.

No, the government of the soviets was not a chimera, an arbitrary
construction, an invention of party theoreticians. It grew up
irresistibly from below, from the breakdown of industry, the impotence
of the possessors, the needs of the masses.

The soviets had in actual fact become a government. For the workers,
soldiers and peasants there remained no other road. No time left to
argue and speculate about a Soviet government: it had to be realised.

At the first congress of the soviets, in June, it had been decided to
call the congress every three months. The Central Executive Committee,
however, had not only failed to call the second conference on time, but
had shown a disposition not to call it at all, in order to avoid
confronting a hostile majority. The chief task of the Democratic
Conference had been to crowd out the soviets, replacing them with organs
of the “democracy.” But that had not been so easy. The soviets did not
intend to make way for anybody.

On September 21, at the close of the Democratic Conference, the
Petrograd Soviet raised its voice for the prompt calling of a congress
of the soviets. A resolution in this sense was adopted upon the report
of Trotsky and a guest from Moscow, Bukharin, formally based on the
necessity of getting ready for “a new wave of counter-revolution.” Their
plan for a defensive which should lay down the road to the coming
offensive relied upon the soviets as the sole organisations capable of
making the struggle. The resolution demanded that the soviets strengthen
their position among the masses. Where the _de facto_ power is already
in their hands, they are in no case to let it slip. The revolutionary
committees created in the Kornilov days must remain ready for action.
“In order to unite and co-ordinate the action of all the soviets in
their struggle with the advancing danger, and in order to decide
problems of organisation of the revolutionary power, the immediate
calling of a congress of the soviets is necessary.” Thus a resolution on
self-defence brings us right up to the necessity of overthrowing the
government. The agitation will be conducted on this political keynote
from now straight on to the moment of insurrection.

The delegates from the soviets to the Democratic Conference raised the
question of a Soviet Congress before the central Executive Committee the
next day. The Bolsheviks demanded that the Congress be called within two
weeks, and proposed, or rather threatened, to create for this purpose a
special body resting on the Petrograd and Moscow Soviets. In reality
they preferred to have the Congress called by the old Central Executive
Committee. This would obviate quarrels about the juridical rights of the
congress, and make it possible to overthrow the Compromisers with their
own co-operation. The semi-camouflaged threat of the Bolsheviks was
effective. Not yet risking a break with Soviet legality, the leaders of
the Central Executive Committee declared that they would entrust to
nobody the fulfilment of their duties. The Congress was called for
October 20 – within less than a month.

The provincial delegates had no more than departed, however, when the
leaders of the Central Executive Committee suddenly opened their eyes to
the fact that the Congress would be untimely – it would withdraw local
party workers from the electoral campaign, and thus do harm to the
Constituent Assembly. Their real fear was that the Congress would prove
a mighty pretender to the power, but about this they kept a diplomatic
silence. On the 26th of September Dan made haste to introduce into the
bureau of the Central Executive Committee, without bothering about the
necessary preparation, a proposal to postpone the Congress.

With the elementary principles of democracy these patent medicine
democrats were least of all concerned. They had just got through
quashing the resolution of a Democratic conference, which they
themselves had summoned, rejecting a coalition with the Kadets. And now
they revealed their sovereign contempt for the soviets, beginning with
the Petrograd Soviet upon whose shoulders they had been lifted into
their seats. After all, how could they, without abandoning their league
with the bourgeoisie, pay any attention to the hopes and demands of
those tens of millions of workers, soldiers and peasants who stood for
the soviets?

Trotsky answered the proposal of Dan by stating that the Congress would
be called just the same, if not constitutionally, then by revolutionary
means. The usually so submissive bureau refused this time to follow
along the road of a Soviet _coup d’état_. But this little defeat was far
from compelling the conspirators to lay down their arms. On the contrary
it seemed to egg them on. Dan found an influential support in the
military section of the Central Executive Committee, which decided to
“query” the organisations of the front as to whether they should carry
out a decision twice adopted by the highest Soviet body. In the interval
the compromise press opened a campaign against the Congress. In this the
Social Revolutionaries were particularly furious. “Shall a congress be
summoned or not?” wrote _Dyelo Naroda_. “It can have nothing to say in
solution of the question of power ... The government of Kerensky will
not submit in any case.” To what will it not submit? asked Lenin. “To
the power of the soviets, to the power of the workers and peasants,
which _Dyelo Naroda_, in order to keep up with the pogrom-makers and
anti-Semites, the monarchists and Kadets, calls the power of Trotsky and
Lenin.”

The peasant Executive Committee, in its turn, declared this calling of
the Congress “dangerous and undesirable.” A confusion of ill-will thus
prevailed in the Soviet upper-circles. Delegates of the compromise
parties travelling over the country mobilised the local organisations
against a congress which had been officially called by the supreme
Soviet body. The official organ of the Central Executive Committee
printed from day to day resolutions against the Congress adopted at the
bidding of the leading Compromisers, inspired entirely by the old March
ghosts – wearing, to be sure, very imposing names. _Izvestia_ buried the
soviets in a leading article, declaring them temporary barricades which
should be removed as soon as the Constituent Assembly crowns the
“edifice of the new structure.”

The Bolsheviks least of all were caught napping by this agitation
against the Congress. On the 24th of September the Central Committee of
the party, without banking upon any action by the Central Executive
Committee, had decided to set in motion from below, through the local
soviets and organisations of the front, a campaign for the Congress. The
Bolsheviks delegated Sverdlov to sit in the Central Executive
Committee’s official commission on the calling – or rather the sabotage
– of the Congress. Under his leadership the local organisations of the
party were mobilised, and through them also the soviets. On the 27th all
the revolutionary institutions of Reval demanded that the Pre-Parliament
be immediately dissolved, and a conference of the soviets for the
formation of a government immediately called; they moreover solemnly
promised to support it “with all the forces and instrumentalities to be
found in the fortress.” Many local soviets, beginning with the districts
of Moscow, proposed that the function of summoning the Congress be
withdrawn from the hands of the disloyal Central Executive Committee.
Against the resolutions of the army committees opposing the Congress
demands for its convocation flowed in from battalions, regiments, corps
and local garrisons. “The Congress of Soviets must seize the power and
stop at nothing,” says a mass meeting of soldiers in Kyshtin in the
Urals. The soldiers of Novgorod province summoned the peasants to take
part in the Congress, and pay no attention to the resolution of the
peasants’ Executive Committee. Provincial soviets, county soviets –
these, too, in the farthest corners of the country – factories, mines,
regiments, dreadnoughts, destroyers, war hospitals, meetings, an
automobile detachment in Petrograd, an ambulance squad in Moscow – all
were demanding the removal of the government and the transfer of power
to the soviets.

Not content with this agitational campaign, the Bolsheviks created an
important organisational base by calling a congress of the soviets of
the northern region consisting of 150 delegates from 23 points. That was
a well-calculated blow! The Central Executive Committee under the
leadership of its great masters in small affairs declared this northern
congress a private conference. The handful of Menshevik delegates
refused to take part in the work of the Congress, remaining only “for
purposes of information.” As though that could diminish by a tittle the
significance of a congress in which were represented the soviets of
Petrograd and its suburbs, Moscow, Kronstadt, Helsingfors, and Reval –
that is to say, both capitals, the naval fortresses, the Baltic fleet
and the garrisons surrounding Petrograd. The Congress, opened by Antonov
– to whom a military tint was being intentionally given – took place
under the presidency of Ensign Krylenko, the best agitator of the party
at the front, the future Bolshevik commander-in-chief. At the centre of
the political report, made by Trotsky, stood the question of the new
attempt of the government to remove the revolutionary regiments from
Petrograd: The Congress will not permit “the disarming of Petrograd and
strangling the Soviet.” The question of the Petrograd garrison is an
element in the fundamental problem of power. “The whole people is voting
for the Bolsheviks; the people are trusting us and authorising us to
seize the power.” The resolution proposed by Trotsky read: “The hour has
come when the question of the central government ... can be decided only
by a resolute and unanimous coming-out of all the soviets.” This almost
undisguised summons to insurrection was adopted by all votes with three
abstaining.

Lashevich urged the other soviets to follow Petrograd’s example and get
control of the local garrisons. The Lettish delegate, Peterson, promised
forty thousand Lettish sharp-shooters for the defence of the Congress of
Soviets. This announcement of Peterson, rapturously greeted, was no
empty phrase. Only a few days later the Soviet of the Lettish regiments
announced:

“Only a popular insurrection ... will make possible the transfer of
power to the soviets.” On the 13th the radio stations of the warships
broadcast throughout the whole country the summons of the Northern
Congress to prepare for an All-Russian Congress of Soviets. “Soldiers,
sailors, peasants, workers! It is your duty to overcome all obstacles.”

The Central Committee of the party suggested to the Bolshevik delegates
of the Northern Congress that in view of the approaching Congress of the
Soviets they should not leave Petrograd. Individual delegates, at the
direction of a bureau elected by the Congress, went to the army
organisations and the local soviets to make reports – in other words, to
prepare the province for insurrection. The Central Executive Committee
saw a powerful apparatus grown up beside itself, resting upon Petrograd
and Moscow, conversing with the country through the radio stations on
the dreadnoughts, and ready at any moment to replace the decrepit
supreme Soviet organ in the matter of summoning the Congress. Petty
organisational tricks could be of no help to the Compromisers here.

The struggle for and against the Congress gave the last impulse in the
localities to the Bolshevisation of the soviets. In a number of backward
provinces, Smolensk for example, the Bolsheviks, either alone or
together with the Left Social Revolutionaries, got their first majority
only during this campaign for the Congress or during the election of
delegates to it. Even in the Siberian congress of the soviets the
Bolsheviks succeeded in the middle of October in creating with the Left
Social Revolutionaries a permanent majority which easily placed its
imprint upon the local soviets. On the 15th the Soviet of Kiev, by 159
votes against 28, with 3 abstaining, recognised the coming Congress of
Soviets as “the sovereign organ of power.” On the 16th the Congress of
Soviets of the north-western region at Minsk – that is, in the centre of
the Western front – declared the calling of the Congress unpostponable.
On the 18th the Petrograd Soviet held elections for the coming Congress;
443 votes were cast for the Bolshevik list (Trotsky, Kamenev,
Volodarsky, Yurenev and Lashevich); for the Social Revolutionaries, 162
– these all Left Social Revolutionaries, tending toward the Bolsheviks;
for the Mensheviks 44. Under the presidency of Krestinsky a congress of
the soviets of the Urals, where 80 out of the 110 delegates were
Bolsheviks, demanded in the name of 223,900 organised workers and
soldiers that the Congress of Soviets be called at the appointed date.
On the same day, the 19th, an All-Russian conference of factory and shop
committees, the most direct and indubitable representation of the
proletariat in the whole country, came out for an immediate transfer of
power to the soviets. On the 20th Ivanovo-Voznesensk declared all the
soviets of the provinces to be “in a state of open and ruthless struggle
against the Provisional Government,” and summoned them to solve
independently the industrial and administrative problems of their
localities. Against this resolution, which meant the overthrow of local
governmental authorities, only one voice was raised, with one
abstaining. On the 22nd, the Bolshevik press published a new list of 56
organisations demanding a transfer of power to the soviets. These were
all composed of the authentic masses of the people, and to a
considerable degree armed masses.

This all-powerful muster-roll of the detachments of the coming
revolution did not prevent Dan from reporting to the bureau of the
Central Executive Committee that out of 917 existing Soviet
organisations, only 50 had responded with an agreement to send
delegates, and these had done so “without any enthusiasm.” It is easy
enough to understand that those few soviets who still considered it
necessary to report their feelings to the Central Executive Committee
regarded the Congress without enthusiasm. An overwhelming majority of
the local soviets and the army committees had simply ignored the Central
Executive Committee altogether.

Although they had exposed and compromised themselves with these efforts
to sabotage the Congress, the Compromisers did not dare carry the work
through to the end. When it became utterly obvious that they could not
avoid a congress, they made an abrupt about-face and summoned all the
local organisations to elect delegates to the Congress in order not to
give the Bolsheviks a majority. Having waked up to the situation too
late, however, the Central Executive Committee found itself obliged only
two or three days before the appointed date to postpone the Congress to
October 25.

Thanks to this last manoeuvre of the Compromisers, the February régime,
and bourgeois society along with it, received an unexpected period of
grace – from which, however, it was no longer capable of deriving any
substantial benefits. The Bolsheviks, moreover, employed these five
supplementary days to great advantage. The enemy acknowledged this later
on. “The postponement of the coming-out,” says Miliukov, “was made use
of by the Bolsheviks, first of all to reinforce their position among the
Petrograd workers and soldiers. Trotsky appeared at meetings in the
various units of the Petrograd garrison. The mood created by him is
exemplified in the fact that in the Semenovsky regiment the members of
the Executive Committee appearing after him, Skobelev and Gotz, were not
allowed to speak.”

This turning of the Semenovsky regiment, whose name had been written in
letters of ill omen in the history of the revolution, had a kind of
symbolic significance. In December 1905, it was the Semenovtsi who did
the chief work of crushing the insurrection in Moscow. The commander of
the regiment, General Min, gave the order: “Take no prisoners.” On the
Moscow-Golutvino railroad section the Semenovtsi shot 150 workers and
clerks. General Min, flattered by the czar for his heroic deed, was
killed in the autumn of 1906 by a Social Revolutionary woman,
Konopliannikova. Tangled up in these old traditions the Semenovsky
regiment had held its ground longer than the majority of the units of
the guard. Its reputation for “reliability” was so strong, that in spite
of the doleful failure of Skobelev and Gotz, the government stubbornly
continued to count upon the Semenovtsi right up to the day of the
insurrection and even after it.

The question of the Congress of the Soviets remained the central
political question throughout the five weeks dividing the Democratic
Conference from the October insurrection. At the Conference itself the
declaration of the Bolsheviks had proclaimed the coming Congress of the
Soviets the sovereign organ of the country. “Only such decisions and
proposals of the present Conference ... can find their way to
realisation as are ratified by the All-Russian Congress of Workers’,
Peasants’, and Soldiers’ Deputies.” The resolution favouring a boycott
of the Pre-Parliament, supported by one-half of the members of the
Central Committee against the other half, declared: “We place the
question of our party’s participation in the Pre-Parliament in direct
dependence upon those measures which the All-Russian Congress of Soviets
shall take to create a revolutionary government.” This appeal to the
Congress of Soviets runs through all the Bolshevik documents of this
period almost without exception.

With the peasant war kindling, the national movements growing bitter,
the breakdown going deeper, the front disintegrating, the government
unravelling, the soviets were becoming the sole support of the creative
forces. Every question turned into a question about the power, and the
problem of power led straight to the Congress of Soviets. This Congress
must give the answer to all questions, among them the question of the
Constituent Assembly.

Not one party had yet withdrawn the slogan of the Constituent Assembly,
and this included the Bolsheviks. But almost unnoticeably in the course
of the events of the revolution, this chief democratic slogan, which had
for a decade and a half tinged with its colour the heroic struggle of
the masses, had grown pale and faded out, had somehow been ground
between millstones, had become an empty shell, a form naked of content,
a tradition and not a prospect. There was nothing mysterious in this
process. The development of the revolution had reached the point of a
direct battle for power between the two basic classes of society, the
bourgeoisie and the proletariat. A Constituent Assembly could give
nothing either to the one or the other. The petty bourgeoisie of the
town and country could play only an auxiliary and secondary rôle in this
conflict. They were in any case incapable of seizing the power
themselves. If the preceding months had proved anything, they had proved
that. Nevertheless in a Constituent Assembly the petty bourgeoisie might
still win – and they actually did win as it turned out – a majority, And
to what end? Only to the end of not knowing what to do with it. This
reveals the bankruptcy of formal democracy in a deep historic crisis. It
reveals the strength of tradition, however, that even on the eve of the
last battle neither camp had yet renounced the name of the Constituent
Assembly. But as a matter of fact the bourgeoisie had appealed from the
Constituent Assembly to Kornilov, and the Bolshevisks to the Congress of
Soviets.

It may be confidently assumed that rather wide sections of the people,
and even certain small strata of the Bolshevik Party, nourished certain
constitutional illusions of their own in regard to the Congress of
Soviets – that is, they associated with it the idea of an automatic and
painless transfer of power from the hands of the Coalition to the hands
of the Soviet. In reality it would be necessary to take the power by
force; it was impossible to do this by voting. Only an armed
insurrection could decide the question.

However, of all the illusions which accompany as an inevitable premise
every great popular movement, even the most realistic, this illusion of
a Soviet “parliamentarism” was in all the combined circumstances the
least dangerous. The soviets were in reality struggling for the power;
they were continually more and more relying upon armed force; they were
becoming governments in the localities; they were winning their own
congress in a fight. Thus there remained but little place for
constitutional illusions, and what few survived were washed away in the
process of the struggle.

In co-ordinating the revolutionary efforts of the workers and soldiers
of the whole country, giving them a single goal, giving them unity of
aim and a single date for action, the slogan of the Soviet Congress, at
the same time made it possible to screen the semi-conspirative,
semi-public preparation of an insurrection with continual appeals to the
legal representation of the workers, soldiers and peasants. Having thus
promoted the assembling of forces for the revolution, the Congress of
Soviets was afterward to sanction its results and give the new
government a form irreproachable in the eyes of the people.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. Trotsky. – _Trans._



CHAPTER 41 THE MILITARY-REVOLUTIONARY COMMITTEE


 

In spite of the change of mood beginning toward the end of July, the
Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks dominated the reorganised
Petrograd garrison all through August. The proletariat was disarmed; the
Red Guard had kept only a few thousand rifles. In those circumstances,
notwithstanding the fact that the masses were again coming over to the
Bolsheviks, an insurrection might end in cruel defeat.

The situation steadily changed, however, through September. After the
revolt of the generals the Compromisers swiftly lost their following in
the garrison. Distrust of the Bolshevik was replaced by sympathy, or at
the worst by a watchful neutrality. But the sympathy was not active. The
garrison remained in a political sense extremely shaky and – as muzhiks
are – suspicious. Aren’t the Bolsheviks going to deceive us? Will they
really give us peace and land? The majority of the soldiers still had no
idea of fighting for these aims under the banner of the Bolsheviks. And
since there remained in the garrison an almost completely unabsorbed
minority hostile to the Bolsheviks – five or six thousand junkers, three
Cossack regiments, a bicycle battalion and an armoured car division –
the outcome of a conflict in September seemed doubtful. To help things
along, however, the course of events brought one more object lesson in
which the fate of the Petrograd soldiers was shown to be inseparably
bound up with the fate of the revolution and the Bolsheviks.

The right to control bodies of armed men is a fundamental right of the
state power. The first Provisional Government, wished upon the people by
the Executive Committee, gave an obligation not to disarm and not to
remove from Petrograd those military units which had taken part in the
February overturn. This was the formal beginning of a military dualism
inseparable in essence from the double sovereignty. The major political
disturbances of the succeeding months – the April demonstration, the
July days, the preparation of the Kornilov insurrection and its
liquidation – each one inevitably ran into the question of the
subordination of the Petrograd garrison. But conflicts between the
government and the Compromisers upon this theme were, after all, a
family matter, and ended amicably. With the Bolshevisation of the
garrison things took a different turn. The soldiers themselves now began
to recall that obligation given by the government to the Executive
Committee in March and treacherously broken by them. On September 8 the
soldiers’ section of the Soviet put forward a demand that the regiments
transferred to the front in connection with the July events be returned
to Petrograd. This while the members of the Coalition were tearing their
hair about how to get rid of the remaining regiments.

In a number of provincial cities things stood about the same way as in
the capital. During July and August the local garrison underwent a
patriotic reconstruction; during August and September the reconstructed
garrisons underwent a process of Bolshevisation. It was then necessary
to begin over from the beginning – that is, once more undertake
transfers and reconstructions. In preparing its blow against Petrograd
the government began with the provinces. Its political motives were
carefully concealed under pretexts of strategy. On September 27 a joint
session of the soviets of Reval – that of the city and the fortress –
adopted on the question of transfers the following resolution: To
consider a regrouping of forces admissible only when agreed to in
advance by the corresponding soviets. The leaders of the Vladimir Soviet
inquired of Moscow whether they should obey an order of Kerensky
transferring the whole garrison. The Moscow regional bureau of the
Bolsheviks observed that “orders of this kind are becoming systematic in
relation to the revolutionary-minded garrisons.” Before surrendering all
its rights, the Provisional Government was trying to get hold of the
fundamental right of every government – the right to dispose of armed
bodies of men.

The reorganisation of the Petrograd garrison was becoming all the more
urgent because the coming Congress of Soviets was destined to carry to a
decision one way or other the struggle for power. The bourgeois press,
led by the Kadet organ _Rech_, was asserting every morning that we must
not “let the Bolsheviks choose the moment for a declaration of civil
war.” That meant: We must strike a timely blow at the Bolsheviks. The
attempt at a preliminary change of the correlation of forces in the
garrison flowed inevitably from this premise. Arguments from strategic
considerations looked sufficiently impressive after the fall of Riga and
the loss of the Moonsund Islands. District headquarters issued an order
for the reorganisation of the Petrograd units in preparation for an
offensive. At the same time, upon the initiative of the Compromisers,
the matter was brought up in the soldiers’ section of the Soviet. Here
the plan of the enemy was not bad: presenting a peremptory strategic
demand to the Soviet to snatch their military support from under the
feet of the Bolsheviks, or in case the Soviet resisted, to provoke a
sharp conflict between the Petrograd garrison and the front, which was
in need of supplementary forces and replacements.

The leaders of the Soviet, quite well aware of the trap which had been
set for them, made up their minds to feel out the ground carefully
before taking any irrevocable step. A flat refusal to fulfil the order
was possible only if they were sure that the motives of the refusal
would be correctly understood by the front. Otherwise it might be more
advantageous to carry out, by agreement with the trenches, a replacement
of certain units of the garrison with revolutionary units from the front
which were in need of rest. It was in this latter sense, as we have
shown above, that the Reval Soviet had already spoken.

The soldiers approached the question more brusquely. Take the offensive
at the front now, in the middle of autumn? Reconcile themselves to a new
winter campaign? No, they simply had no room in their heads for that
idea. The patriotic press immediately opened fire on the garrison: the
Petrograd regiments, grown fat in idleness, are betraying the front. The
workers took the side of the soldiers. The Putilov men were the first to
protest against the transfer of the regiments. From that time on the
question was never absent from the order of the day either in barrack or
factory. This drew together the two sections of the Soviet. The
regiments began to support most heartily the demand that the workers be
armed.

Attempting to kindle the patriotism of the masses by threatening the
loss of Petrograd, the Compromisers introduced into the Soviet on
October 9 a motion to create a “Committee of Revolutionary Defence.”
whose task should be to take part in the defence of the capital with the
active co-operation of the workers. While refusing to assume
responsibility for “the so-called strategy of the Provisional Government
and in particular the removal of troops from Petrograd,” the Soviet
nevertheless had made no haste to express itself upon the substance of
the order removing the soldiers, but had decided to test its motives and
the facts upon which it was based. The Mensheviks had raised a protest:
It is not permissible to interfere in the operative orders of the
commanding staff. But it was only a month and a half since they had
talked the same way about the conspiratorial orders of Kornilov, and
they were a reminder of this. In order to test the question whether the
removal of the troops was dictated by military or political
considerations, a competent body was needed. To the extreme surprise of
the Compromisers the Bolsheviks accepted the idea of a “Committee of
Defence.” This committee should be the one to gather all data relating
to the defence of the capital. That was an important step. Having
snatched this dangerous weapon from the hands of the enemy, the Soviet
remained in a position to turn the decision about removing the troops
this way or that according to circumstances – but in any case against
the government and the Compromisers.

The Bolsheviks quite naturally seized upon this Menshevik project of a
military committee, for there had been conversations often enough in
their own ranks about the necessity of creating in good season an
authoritative Soviet committee to lead the coming insurrection. In the
Military Organisation of the party they had even drawn up plans for such
a body. The one difficulty they had not yet got over was that of
reconciling an instrument of insurrection with an elective and openly
functioning Soviet, upon whose benches, moreover, sat representatives of
the hostile parties. The patriotic proposal of the Mensheviks,
therefore, came up most appropriately, and came up just in time to
assist in the creation of a revolutionary headquarters – a body soon to
be renamed “Military Revolutionary Committee” and to become the chief
lever of the revolution.

Two years after the events described above, the author of this book
wrote in an article dedicated to the October revolution: “As soon as the
order for the removal of the troops was communicated by Headquarters to
the Executive Committee of the Petrograd Soviet ... it became clear that
this question in its further development would have decisive political
significance.” The idea of an insurrection began to take form from that
moment. It was no longer necessary to invent a Soviet body. The real aim
of the future committee was unequivocally brought out when in the same
session Trotsky concluded his report on the withdrawal of the Bolsheviks
from the Pre-Parliament with the exclamation: “Long live the direct and
open struggle for a revolutionary power throughout the country!” That
was a translation into the language of soviet legality of the slogan:
“Long live the armed insurrection!”

On the very next day, the 10th, the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks,
adopted in secret session the resolution of Lenin presenting armed
insurrection as the practical task of the coming days. From that moment
the party assumed a clear and imperative fighting formation. The
Committee of Defence was included in its plans for a direct struggle for
power.

The government and its allies surrounded the garrison with concentric
circles. On the 11th the commander of the Northern front, General
Cheremissov, reported to the War Minister a demand of the army
committees that the tired-out front units be replaced by Petrograd units
from the rear. In this instance Headquarters was merely a transmitting
mechanism between the Compromisers in the army committees and their
Petrograd leaders, who were striving to create a broad cover for the
plans of Kerensky. The Coalition press accompanied this encircling
operation with a symphony of patriotic ravings. Daily meetings of the
regiments and factories demonstrated, however, that this music of the
ruling spheres was not making the slightest impression upon the lower
ranks. On the 12th, a mass meeting of the workers of one of the most
revolutionary factories of the capital (the Old Parviainen) made the
following answer to the attacks of the bourgeoisie: “We declare that we
will go into the street when we deem it advisable. We are not afraid of
the approaching struggle, and we confidently believe that we will come
off victorious.”

In creating a commission to draw up regulations for the “Committee of
Defence,” the Executive Committee of the Petrograd Soviet designated for
the future military body such tasks as the following: To get in touch
with the Northern front and with the headquarters of the Petrograd
district, with Centrobalt and the regional soviet of Finland, in order
to ascertain the military situation and take the necessary measures: to
take a census of the personal composition of the garrison of Petrograd
and its environs, also of the ammunition and military supplies; to take
measures for the preservation of discipline in the soldier and worker
masses. The formulæ were all-inclusive and at the same time ambiguous:
they almost all balanced on a fine line between defence of the capital
and armed insurrection. However, these two tasks, heretofore mutually
exclusive, were now in actual fact growing into one. Having seized the
power, the Soviet would be compelled to undertake the military defence
of Petrograd. The element of defence-camouflage was not, therefore,
violently dragged in, but flowed to some extent from the conditions
preceding the insurrection.

With this same purpose of camouflage a Social Revolutionary and not a
Bolshevik was placed at the head of the commission on the “Committee of
Defence.” This was a young and modest intendant, Lazimir, one of those
Left Social Revolutionaries who were already travelling with the
Bolsheviks before the insurrection – although, to be sure, not always
foreseeing whither the course would lead. Lazimir’s preliminary rough
draft was edited by Trotsky in two directions: the practical plans
relating to the conquest of the garrison were more sharply defined, the
general revolutionary goal was still more glossed over. As ratified by
the Executive Committee against the protest of two Mensheviks, the draft
included in the staff of the Military Revolutionary Committee the
præsidiums of the Soviet and of the soldiers’ section, representatives
of the fleet, of the regional committee of Finland, of the railroad
unions, of the factory committees, the trade unions, the party military
organisations, the Red Guard, etc. The organisational basis was the same
as in many other cases, but the personal composition of the committee
was determined by its new tasks. It was assumed that the organisations
would send representatives familiar with military affairs or standing
near to the garrison. The character of an organ should be conditioned by
its function.

Another new formation of this period was no less important. Under the
direction of the Military Revolutionary Committee there was created a
Permanent Conference of the Garrison. The soldiers’ section represented
the garrison politically, the deputies being elected under the party
symbols. The Garrison Conference, however, was to consist of the
regimental committees which guided the daily lives of their units and
thus constituted a more immediate practical “guild” representation. The
analogy between the regimental and the factory committees is obvious.
Through the mediation of the workers’ section of the Soviet the
Bolsheviks were able upon big political questions to rely confidently
upon the workers. But in order to become masters in the factories it had
been necessary to carry the factory and shop committees. The composition
of the soldiers’ section guaranteed to the Bolsheviks the political
sympathy of the majority of the garrison. But in order to get the
practical disposal of the military units it was necessary to rely
directly on the regimental committees. This explains why in the period
preceding the insurrection the Garrison Conference naturally crowded out
the soldiers’ section and moved to the centre of the stage. The more
prominent deputies in the section were also, by the way, members of the
Conference.

In an article written not long before these days – _The Crisis is Ripe_
– Lenin had reproachfully asked: “What has the party done in the matter
of ascertaining the attitude of the troops, etc. ...?” Notwithstanding
the devoted work of the Military Organisation, Lenin’s reproach was
just. A strictly military examination of the forces and materials was
difficult for the party to achieve: the habit of mind was lacking and
the approach. This situation changed the moment the Garrison Conference
came on the scene. Henceforth a living panorama of the garrison – not
only of the capital but also of the military ring surrounding it –
passed before the eyes of the leaders.

On the 12th the Executive Committee took up the regulations drafted by
Lazimir’s commission. In spite of the session’s being secret the debate
was carried on to a certain extent in equivocal language. “Here they
said one thing and meant another,” writes Sukhanov not unjustly. The
regulations provided for the establishment under the Committee of
departments of defence, supplies, communications, intelligence, etc.:
this was a headquarters or counter-quarters. They declared it to be the
aim of the Conference to raise the fighting capacity of the garrison:
that was entirely true, but a fighting capacity may be applied in
different ways. The Mensheviks observed with helpless indignation that
an idea advanced by them for patriotic purposes was being converted into
a screen for the preparation of an insurrection. The camouflage was by
no means impenetrable – everybody understood what the talk was about –
but at the same time it could not be broken through. Had not the
Compromisers themselves behaved in exactly the same way in the past,
grouping the garrison around themselves at critical moments and creating
sovereign bodies parallel with those of the government? The Bolsheviks
were merely following the traditions, so to speak, of the dual power.
But they were bringing a new content into these old forms. What had
formerly served the purpose of compromise was now leading to civil war.
The Mensheviks demanded that it be placed in the record that they were
against the undertaking as a whole. This platonic request was granted.

On the next day the question of the Military Revolutionary Committee and
the Garrison Conference was taken up by the soldiers’ section, which
only a little while before had constituted the lifeguard of the
Compromisers. The chief place in this very significant session was
rightly occupied by the president of the Centrobalt, the sailor Dybenko,
a black-bearded giant, a man who never had to look in his pocket for a
word. The speech of this Helsingfors guest crashed into the stagnant
atmosphere of the garrison like a keen and fresh sea wind. Dybenko told
about the final break of the fleet with the government and their new
attitudes to the command. Before the latest naval operations began, he
said, the admiral addressed a question to the Congress of Sailors then
sitting: Will they carry out military orders? We answered: “We will –
under supervision from our side. But ... if we see that the fleet is
threatened with destruction, the commanding staff will be the first to
hang from the mast-head.” To the Petrograd garrison this was a new
language. Even in the fleet it had come into use only in the last few
days. It was the language of insurrection. The little group of
Mensheviks grumbled distractedly in a corner. The præsidium looked out
with some alarm upon that compact mass of grey soldier coats. Not one
protesting voice from their ranks! Eyes burned like coals in their
excited faces. A spirit of daring was in the air.

In conclusion, stimulated by the universal sympathy, Dybenko confidently
exclaimed: “They talk about the need of bringing out the Petrograd
garrison for the defence of the approaches to Petrograd and of Reval in
particular. Don’t believe a word of it. We will defend Reval ourselves.
Stay here and defend the interests of the revolution ... When we need
your support we will say so ourselves, and I am confident that you will
support us.” This challenge, which exactly matched the mood of the
soldiers, called out a veritable whirlwind of sincere enthusiasm in
which the protests of a few individual Mensheviks were completely
drowned. The question of removing the regiments was settled from that
moment.

The regulations proposed by Lazimir were adopted by a majority of 283
votes against 1, with 23 abstaining. These figures, unexpected even to
the Bolsheviks, gave a measure of the pressure of the revolutionary
masses. The vote meant that the soldiers’ section had openly and
officially transferred the administration of the garrison from
headquarters to the Military Revolutionary Committee. The coming days
would show that this was no mere gesture.

On that same day the Executive Committee of the Petrograd Soviet made
public the creation under its supervision of a special department of the
Red Guard. The matter of arming the workers, neglected under the
Compromisers and even obstructed by them, had become one of the most
important tasks of the Bolshevik Soviet. The suspicious attitude of the
soldiers toward the Red Guard was already far in the past. On the
contrary, almost all the resolutions of the regiments contained a demand
for the arming of the workers. From now on the Red Guard and the
garrison stand side by side. Soon they will be still more closely united
by a common submission to the Military Revolutionary Committee.

The government was worried. On the morning of the 14th, a conference of
the ministers in Kerensky’s office ratified the measures undertaken by
headquarters against the “coming-out” under preparation. The rulers were
guessing: Will it stop this time at an armed demonstration or will it go
to the point of insurrection? The commander of the district said to the
representatives of the press: “In any case we are ready.” Those doomed
to death not infrequently experience an afflux of life force just before
the end.

At a joint session of the Executive Committees, Dan, imitating the June
intonations of Tseretelli, who had now taken refuge in the Caucasus,
demanded of the Bolsheviks an answer to the question: Do they intend to
come out, and if they do, when? From the answer of Riazanov, the
Menshevik Bogdanov drew the not unjustified conclusion that the
Bolsheviks were preparing an insurrection and would stand at the head of
it. The Menshevik paper wrote: “And the Bolsheviks are evidently relying
in their plans for a coming ‘seizure of power’ on the garrison’s staying
here.” But in this remark the phrase “seizure of power” was in quotation
marks. The Compromisers still did not seriously believe in the danger.
They did not fear the victory of the Bolsheviks so much as the triumph
of the counter-revolution in consequence of new civil war conflicts.

Having undertaken to arm the workers, the Soviet had to find its way to
the weapons. This did not happen all at once. Here too each practical
step forward was suggested by the masses. It was only necessary to
listen attentively to their suggestions. Four years after the event,
Trotsky, in an evening devoted to recollections of the October
revolution, told the following story: “When a delegation from the
workers came to me and said they needed weapons, I answered: ‘But the
arsenals, you see, are not in our hands.’ They answered: ‘We have been
to the Sestroretsk Arms Factory.’ ‘Well, and what about it?’ ‘They said
that if the Soviet ordered they would deliver.’ I gave an order for five
thousand rifles, and they got them the same day. That was the first
experiment.” The hostile press immediately raised a cry against this
delivery of weapons by a government factory upon the order of a person
indicted for state treason, and only released from prison on bail. The
government kept still, but the highest organ of the democracy came
forward with a strict command. Weapons were to be given to nobody
without its strict permission – the permission of the Central Executive
Committee of the Soviets. It might seem that on the question of
delivering weapons Dan and Gotz were as little in a position to forbid,
as Trotsky to permit or give orders. The factories and arsenals were
supposed to be under government administration. But ignoring the
official authorities at all serious moments had become a tradition with
the Central Executive Committee, and had permanently entered into the
customs of the government itself, corresponding as it did to the nature
of things. The violation of tradition and custom came, however, from
another direction. Having ceased to distinguish the thunderings of the
Central Executive Committee from the lightnings of Kerensky, the workers
and soldiers ignored them both.

It was more convenient to demand the transfer of the Petrograd regiments
in the name of the front than in the name of the chancelleries at the
rear. For these reasons Kerensky placed the Petrograd garrison under the
commander-in-chief of the Northern front, Cheremissov. While excluding
the capital in its military aspect from his own administration as the
head of the government, Kerensky took comfort in the thought that he
would subject it to himself as commander-in-chief of the army. In his
turn General Cheremissov, who was going to be a very hard nut to crack,
sought help from the commissars and committee-men. With their common
labours a plan of future activities was drawn up. On the 7th the
headquarters at the front, together with the army organisations, was to
summon representatives of the Petrograd Soviet to Pskov in order in the
presence of the trenches to present them with a brusque demand.

There was nothing for the Petrograd Soviet to do but accept the
challenge. The delegation of a score or so appointed at the session of
the 16th – about half members of the Soviet and half representatives of
the regiments – was headed by the president of the Workers’ Section,
Feodorov, and leaders of the Soldiers’ Section and the Military
Organisation of the Bolsheviks – Lashevich, Sadovsky, Mekhonoshin,
Dashkevich and others. A few left Social Revolutionaries and
Menshevik-Internationalists, included in the delegation, promised to
defend the policy of the Soviet. At a conference of the delegates held
before their departure the draft of a declaration proposed by Sverdlov
was adopted.

The same session of the Soviet took up the regulations of the Military
Revolutionary Committee. This institution had barely come into existence
when it assumed in the eyes of the enemy an aspect growing every day
more hateful. “The Bolsheviks make no answer,” cried an orator of the
opposition, “to the direct question: Are they preparing an attack? This
is either cowardice or lack of confidence in their forces.” The meeting
greeted this remark with hearty laughter: the representative of the
government party was demanding that the party of insurrection open the
secrets of its heart to him. The new committee, continued the orator, is
nothing else but “a revolutionary headquarters for the seizure of
power.” They, the Mensheviks would not enter it. “How many are there of
you?” cried a voice from the benches: there were indeed only a few
Mensheviks in the Soviet, fifty altogether. But nevertheless it seemed
authoritatively known to them that “the masses are not in favour of
coming out.” In his reply Trotsky did not deny that the Bolsheviks were
preparing for a seizure of power: “We make no secret of that.” But at
present, he said, that is not the question. The government has demanded
the removal of the revolutionary troops from Petrograd and to that “we
have to answer yes or no.” The regulations drafted by Lazimir were
adopted by an overwhelming majority. The president proposed to the
Military Revolutionary Committee to begin work on the following day.
Thus one more forward step was taken.

The commander of the district, Polkovnikov, had that day once more
reported to the government that an action was under preparation by the
Bolsheviks. The report was couched in bold language: the garrison as a
whole is on the side of the government; the officers’ schools have
received an order to be ready. In an appeal to the population
Polkovnikov promised in case of necessity to adopt “the most extreme
measures.” The burgomaster, Schreider, a Social Revolutionary, added a
prayer on his part that “no disorders shall be instigated so that we may
avoid actual famine in the capital.” Threatening and adjuring, making
bold and making timid, the press meanwhile was rising to a higher and
higher note.

To impress the imagination of delegates from the Petrograd Soviet, a
military-theatrical setting was arranged for the reception in Pskov. In
the office of headquarters around tables covered with imposing maps
stood notable generals, high commissars, with Voitinsky at their head,
and representatives of the army committees. The chiefs of the
departments read reports of the military situation on land and sea. All
the reports came to one and the same conclusion: It is necessary to call
out the Petrograd garrison immediately for the defence of the approaches
to the capital. The commissars and committee-men indignantly refuted all
suspicions in regard to hidden political motives: the whole operation,
they declared, has been dictated by strategic necessity. The delegates
had no direct proofs to the contrary: in this kind of business evidence
does not grow on every bush. But the whole situation was a refutation.
The front had no lack of men. What it lacked was willingness to fight.
The mood of the Petrograd garrison was by no means such as to reinforce
a front so shaken. Moreover the lessons of the Kornilov days were still
in the memories of all. Thoroughly convinced of their correctness, the
delegation easily resisted the assault of headquarters, and returned to
Petrograd more unanimous than when they had left.

Those direct proofs which the participants at that time lacked are now
at the disposal of the historian. The secret military correspondence
proves that it was not the front which had demanded the Petrograd
regiments, but that Kerensky had imposed them upon the front. To a
telegram from his War Minister, the commander-in-chief of the Northern
front answered on the direct wire: “Secret. 17. X. The initiative for
sending the troops of the Petrograd garrison to the front was yours and
not mine ... When it became clear that the troops of the Petrograd
garrison did not want to go to the front, that is, that they are not
capable of fighting, I then in a private conversation with your
officer-representative said that ... we have already plenty of such
troops at the front; but in view of the desire expressed by you to send
them to the front, I did not refuse them and I do not refuse them now,
if you, as before, consider their transfer from Petrograd necessary.”
The semi-bellicose tone of this telegram is explained by the fact that
Cheremissov, a general with a taste for high politics, having been
considered “Red” while in the czar’s army, and having afterward become,
according to Miliukov’s expression, “the favourite of the revolutionary
democracy,” had evidently come to the conclusion that it would be better
to draw apart in good season from the government and its conflict with
the Bolsheviks. The conduct of Cheremissov during the days of the
revolution wholly confirms this assumption.

The struggle about the garrison interwove with the struggle about the
Soviet Congress. Only four or five days remained before the date
originally designated. The “coming-out” was expected in connection with
the Congress. It was assumed that as in the July Days the movement would
develop on the type of an armed mass demonstration with street fighting.
The right Menshevik Potressov, obviously relying upon data supplied by
the Intelligence Service, or by the French War Mission – always bold in
the manufacture of forged documents – expounded in the bourgeois press
the plan of a Bolshevik action which was to take place on the night of
October 17. The ingenious authors of the plan did not forget to foretell
that at one of the gates of the city the Bolsheviks were to pick up the
“dark elements.” The soldiers of the Guard regiments were as good at
laughing as the gods of Homer. The white pillars and chandeliers of
Smolny shook with uproarious volleys when Potressov’s article was read
at a meeting of the Soviet. But the all-wise government, unable as ever
to see what was taking place before its eyes, took serious fright at
this awkward forgery, and hastily assembled at two o’clock in the
morning in order to hold off these “dark elements.” After renewed
conferences between Kerensky and the military authorities the necessary
measures were taken. The guards of the Winter Palace and the State Bank
were reinforced; two training schools were called in from Oranienbaum,
and even an armoured train from the Rumanian front. “At the last
moment,” writes Miliukov, “the Bolsheviks revoked their preparations.
Why they did this is not clear.” Even several years after the event the
learned historian still prefers to believe an invention which contained
its own refutation.

The authorities directed the militia to investigate the environs of the
city to see if they could find signs of any preparation for a
coming-out. The reports of the militia were a combination of live
observations with police stupidity. In the Alexandro-Nevsky section,
which contains a number of big factories, the investigators found
complete tranquillity. In the Vyborg district the necessity of
overthrowing the government was being openly preached, but “externally”
all was quiet. In the Vassilie-Ostrov district the mood was high, but
here too “external” signs of an action were not to be observed. On the
Narva side a redoubled agitation in favour of action was going on, but
it was impossible to get an answer from anybody to the question, just
when. Either the day and hour were being kept strictly secret, or they
were really unknown to anybody. Decision: to reinforce the patrols in
the suburbs and have the commissars of the militia inspect the sentry
posts more frequently.

Certain correspondence in the Moscow liberal press is not a bad
supplement to the reports of the militia: “In the suburbs, at the
Petersburg factories, Nevsky, Obukhovsky and Putilov, Bolshevik
agitation in favour of a coming-out is in progress everywhere. The
workers are in a state to start moving at any moment. During recent days
there has been observed in Petrograd an unheard of influx of deserters
... At the Warsaw station you can’t get through because of the soldiers
with their suspicious looks, their burning eyes in excited faces ...
There is information of the presence in Petrograd of whole gangs of
thieves who have caught the smell of their prey. The dark forces are
being organised, and the dens and lunch-rooms are brim full of them ...”
Philistine fright and police rumour here interweave with a certain
amount of austere fact. In approaching its climax the revolutionary
cries stirred up the social deeps to the very bottom. Deserters and
robber-gangs and the dens of iniquity did actually all rise at the
rumble of the approaching earthquake. The leaders of society gazed with
physical horror at the unleashed forces of their own régime, at its
ulcers and vices. The revolution had not created but only uncovered
them.

At the headquarters of a corps in Dvinsk in those days, Baron Budberg, a
man already known to us, a bilious reactionary, but not wanting a gift
of observation and his own kind of penetration, wrote: “The Kadets, the
Kadetoids, the Octobrists, and the many-coloured revolutionists of the
ancient and of the March formation, feel their end approaching and chirp
and chatter on all sides, reminding one of the Mussulman who tried to
stop an eclipse of the moon with a rattle.”

The Garrison Conference was first called together on the 18th. The
telephonogram sent to the military units told them to refrain from
actions on their own initiative, and fulfil only those orders of
headquarters which should be countersigned by the Soldiers’ Sections. In
this the Soviet was making a decisive and open attempt to take control
of the garrison. The telephonogram was in essence nothing else than a
summons to overthrow the existing authorities. But it could be
interpreted if one wished, as a peaceful act of replacing the
Compromisers with Bolsheviks in the mechanic of the dual power.
Practically this came to the same thing, but the more flexible
interpretation left room for illusions. The præsidium of the Central
Executive Committee, considering itself the master of Smolny, made an
attempt to stop the despatch of the telephonogram. It only compromised
itself once more. The assembly of representatives of the regimental and
company committees of Petrograd and the environs occurred at the
designated hour, and turned out to be extraordinarily large.

Thanks to the atmosphere created by the enemy, the reports of the
participants in this Garrison Conference automatically concentrated upon
the question of the prospective “coming-out.” There occurred a
significant muster-roll, upon which the leaders would scarcely have
ventured upon their own initiative. Those against the action were the
military school in Peterhof and the Ninth Cavalry regiment. The
squadrons of the cavalry of the Guard were inclined to neutrality. The
military School in Oranienbaum would submit only to the commands of the
Central Executive Committee. That exhausted the hostile or neutral
voices. Those declaring their readiness to come out at a word from the
Petrograd Soviet were the following: the Egersky, the Moscow, the
Volynsky, the Pavolvsky, the Keksgolmsky, the Semenovsky, the
Izmailovsky, the first sharpshooters and the third reserve regiments,
the second Baltic crew, the electro-technical battalion and the
artillery division of the Guard; the grenadier regiment would come out
only at the summons of the Congress of Soviets. That was enough. The
less important units followed the lead of the majority. The
representatives of the Central Executive Committee, who had not long ago
justly considered the Petrograd garrison the source of their power, were
now almost unanimously denied the floor. In a state of impotent
exasperation they left the “unauthorised” assembly, which immediately
thereafter at the suggestion of the president declared: No orders are
valid without the countersign of the Soviet.

That which had been preparing in the minds of the garrison during the
last months, and especially weeks was now crystallising. The government
turned out more insignificant than it had been possible to think. While
the town was buzzing with rumours of a coming-out and of bloody battles,
the Conference of regimental Committees, showing an overwhelming
predominance of Bolsheviks, made both demonstrations and mass battles
essentially unnecessary. The garrison was confidently advancing to the
revolution, seeing it not as an insurrection, but as a realisation of
the irrefutable right of the Soviet to decide the fate of the country.
This movement had incomparable power, but at the same time a certain
heaviness. The party was obliged to attune its activity with some skill
to the political stride of the regiments, a majority of whom were
awaiting a summons from the Petersburg Soviet, but some from the
Congress of Soviets.

In order to ward off the danger of even a temporary interference with
the development of the offensive, it was necessary to answer one
question which was disturbing not only enemies but friends: Will not an
insurrection spontaneously break out almost any day? In the tramways, on
the streets, in the stores, there was no talk but of an expected
coming-out. On the Palace Square, in front of the Winter Palace and the
General Staff, long queues of officers were offering the government
their services and receiving revolvers in exchange: in the hours of
danger neither the revolvers nor their owners will put in one second’s
appearance. The leading editorials in all the current papers were
devoted to the question of the insurrection. Gorky demanded of the
Bolsheviks that unless they were the “helpless playthings of the enraged
multitude,” they should refute these rumours. This alarm of uncertainty
penetrated even the workers’ sections, and still more the regiments. To
them, too, it began to seem as though a coming-out were being prepared
without them. And by whom? Why was Smolny silent? The self-contradictory
situation of the Soviet as a public parliament and at the same time a
revolutionary headquarters, created great difficulties in those last
moments. It became impossible to remain longer silent.

“During the last days,” declared Trotsky at the end of an evening’s
session of the Soviet, “the press has been full of communications,
rumours, articles about an impeding action ... The decisions of the
Petrograd Soviet are published and made known to everybody. The Soviet
is an elective institution, and cannot have a decision which would not
be known to the workers and soldiers ... I declare in the name of the
Soviet that no armed actions have been settled upon by us, but if the
Soviet in the course of events should be obliged to set the date for a
coming-out, the workers and soldiers would come out to the last man at
its summons. They say that I signed an order for five thousand rifles
... Yes, I signed it ... The Soviet will continue to organise and arm
the workers’ guard.” The delegates understood: the battle was near, but
without them and over their heads the signal would not be given.

However, besides a reassuring explanation, the masses had to have a
clear revolutionary prospective. For this purpose the speaker united the
two questions – removal of the garrison and coming Congress of Soviets.
“We are in conflict with the government upon a question which may become
extremely sharp ... We will not permit them ... to strip Petrograd of
its revolutionary garrison.” This conflict is in its turn subordinate to
another that approaches. “It is known to the bourgeoisie that the
Petrograd Soviet is going to propose to the Congress of Soviets that
they seize the power ... And foreseeing an inevitable battle, the
bourgeois classes are trying to disarm Petrograd.” The political set-up
of the revolution was first given in this speech with complete
definition: We expect to seize the power, we need the garrison, and we
will not give it up. “At the first attempt of the counter-revolution to
break up the Congress, we will answer with a counter-attack which will
be ruthless, and which we will carry through to the end.” Here, too, the
announcement of a decisive political offensive was made under the
formula of military defence.

Sukhanov, who turned up at this meeting with a hopeless plan to draw the
Soviet into a celebration of Gorky’s fiftieth anniversary, subsequently
made an apt comment on the revolutionary knot which was tied there. For
Smolny, he said, the question of the garrison is a question of
insurrection; for the soldiers it is a question of their own fate. “It
would be difficult to imagine a more fortunate starting point for the
policy of those days.” This did not prevent Sukhanov from considering
the policy of the Bolsheviks as a whole ruinous. Along with Gorky and
thousands of radical intellectuals he feared above all things that
so-called “enraged multitude” which was with admirable deliberation
developing its offensive from day to day.

The Soviet was sufficiently powerful to announce openly its programme of
state revolution and even set the date. At the same time – right up to
the date set by itself for the complete victory – the Soviet was
powerless in thousands of great and small questions. Kerensky,
politically already reduced to a zero, was still giving out decrees in
the Winter Palace. Lenin, the inspirer of this incomparable movement of
the masses, was hiding underground, and the Minister of Justice,
Miliantovich, had renewed in those days his instructions to the district
attorney to bring about Lenin’s arrest. Even in Smolny, on its own
territory, the all-powerful Petrograd Soviet seemed to be living only by
grace of the authorities. The administration of the building, of the
cashbox, of the despatching room, the automobiles, the telephones – all
was still in the hands of the Central Executive Committee which itself
only hung on by the mere thread of an abstract right of succession.

Sukhanov tells how after the meeting he came out in the thick of night
on Smolny Square, in black darkness with rain coming down in sheets. The
whole crowd of delegates were hopelessly milling around a couple of
smoking and stinking automobiles which had been assigned to the
Bolshevik Soviet from the opulent garages of the Central Executive
Committee. “The president, Trotsky, was also about to approach the
automobile,” relates this omnipresent observer. “But after stopping and
looking on for a minute he chuckled and, splashing through the puddles,
disappeared in the darkness.” On the platform of the tramcar, Sukhanov
ran into some unknown small-sized fellow of modest appearance with a
black goatee. The unknown tried to console Sukhanov in all the
discomforts of the long journey. “Who is that?” asked Sukhanov of his
Bolshevik companion. “An old party worker, Sverdlov.” In less than two
weeks this small man with a little black goatee will be president of the
Central Executive Committee, the supreme governing power of the Soviet
Republic. It may be that Sverdlov consoled his travelling companion out
of a feeling of gratitude: Eight days before that in the apartment of
Sukhanov – to be sure, without his knowledge – had occurred that meeting
of the Bolshevik Central Committee which placed the armed insurrection
on the order of the day.

The next morning the Central Executive Committee made an attempt to turn
back the wheel of events. The præsidium convoked a “lawful” assembly of
the garrison, drawing into it also those backward committees which
should long ago have been re-elected, and which had not been present the
day before. This supplementary test of the garrison, while also giving
something new, still more clearly confirmed yesterday’s picture. This
time those opposed to the coming-out were a majority of the committees
of the troops quartered in the Peter and Paul fortress, and the
committees of the armoured car division. They both announced their
submission to the Central Executive Committee. This information was not
to be ignored.

Situated on an island washed by the Neva and its canal, between the
centre of the city and two outlying districts, this fortress dominates
the nearby bridges, and protects – or, if you will, lays bare – from the
side of the river the approaches to the Winter Palace where the
government had its seat. Although deprived of military significance in
large scale operations, the fortress can speak a weighty word in a
street fight. Moreover – and this, perhaps, is more important – the
well-stocked Kronverksky arsenal adjoins the fortress. The workers were
in need of rifles – yes, and the more revolutionary regiments, too, were
almost disarmed. The importance of armoured cars in a street battle
needs no explanation. On the side of the government they might cause
many fruitless sacrifices; on the side of the insurrection they would
shorten the road to victory. In the approaching days the Bolsheviks
would have to give special attention to the fortress and the armoured
car division. For the rest, the correlation of forces at this new
conference turned out to be the same as on the preceding day. The
attempt of the Central Executive Committee to carry its own very
cautious resolution was coldly repulsed by an overwhelming majority. Not
having been summoned by the Petrograd Soviet, it was noted, the
conference does not consider itself empowered to adopt decisions. The
Compromise leaders had themselves begged for this supplementary slap in
the face.

Finding the approach to the regiments barricaded below, the Central
Executive Committee tried to get hold of the garrison from above. By
agreement with the staff, they appointed Captain Malevsky, a Social
Revolutionary, chief commissar for the whole district, and announced
their willingness to recognise the commissars of the Soviet on condition
that they submit to the chief commissar. This attempt to get astride of
the Bolshevik garrison through the instrumentality of a captain unknown
to anybody was obviously hopeless. Having rejected it, the Soviet broke
off the negotiations.

The insurrection, laid bare by Potressov had not occurred. The enemy now
confidently named another date, the 20th of October. On that day, as we
know, the Congress of Soviets was originally to have opened, and the
insurrection followed that Congress like its own shadow. To be sure, the
Congress had already postponed its opening five days. Never mind: the
object had moved, but the shadow remained. This time, too, all necessary
measures were taken by the government to prevent a “coming-out.”
Reinforced sentry guards were placed in the suburbs; Cossack patrols
rode through the workers’ districts all night long; cavalry reserves
were concealed at various points throughout the city; the militia was
made ready for action, and half of its members did continual duty in the
commissariats. Armoured cars, light artillery and machine-guns were set
up near the Winter Palace. The approaches to the Palace were guarded by
patrols.

Once more the insurrection which no one was preparing, and for which no
one had issued a call, did not take place. The day went by more
peacefully than many others; work in the shops and factories never
ceased. _Izvestia_, edited by Dan, crowed about this victory over the
Bolsheviks: “Their adventuring with armed demonstrations in Petrograd is
about over.” The Bolsheviks have been crushed by the mere indignation of
the united democracy: “They are already surrendering.” One might
literally think that the enemy had lost their heads and were
deliberately trying with untimely frights and still less timely
trumpetings of victory to lead “public opinion” astray, and conceal the
actual plans of the Bolsheviks.

The decision to create a Military Revolutionary Committee, first
introduced on the 9th, was passed at a plenary session of the Soviet
only a week later. The Soviet is not a party; its machinery is heavy.
Four days more were required to form the Committee. Those ten days,
however, did not go for nothing: the conquest of the garrison was in
full swing, the Conference of regimental Committees had demonstrated its
viability, the arming of the workers was going forward. And thus the
Military Revolutionary Committee, although it went to work only on the
20th, five days before the insurrection, found – ready to its hands – a
sufficiently well organised dominion. Being boycotted by the
Compromisers, the staff of the Committee contained only Bolsheviks and
Left Social Revolutionaries: that eased and simplified the task. Of the
Social Revolutionaries only Lazimir did any work, and he was even placed
at the head of the bureau in order to emphasise the fact that the
Committee was a Soviet and not a party institution. In essence, however,
the Committee, whose president was Trotsky, and its chief workers
Podvoisky, Antonov-Ovseenko, Lashevich, Sadovsky, and Mekhonoshin,
relied exclusively upon Bolsheviks. The committee hardly met once in
plenary session with delegates present from all the institutions listed
in its regulations. The work was carried on through the bureau under the
guidance of the president, with Sverdlov brought in upon all important
matters. And that was the general staff of the insurrection.

The bulletin of the Committee thus modestly registers its first step:
commissars were appointed in the combatant units of the garrison and in
certain institutions and store houses “for observation and leadership.”
This meant that, having won the garrison politically, the Soviet was now
getting organisational control of it. The dominant rôle in selecting
these commissars was played by the Military Organisation of the
Bolsheviks. Among its Petrograd members, approximately a thousand, there
was no small number of resolute soldiers and young officers utterly
devoted to the revolution, and who had since the July Days been tempered
in the prisons of Kerensky. The commissars recruited from its midst
found in the troops of the garrison a soil well prepared. The garrison
considered them its own and submitted to their orders with complete
willingness.

The initiative in getting possession of institutions came in most cases
from below. The workers and clerical employees of the arsenal adjoining
the Peter and Paul fortress themselves raised the question of the
necessity of establishing control over the giving out of arms. A
commissar sent there succeeded in stopping a supplemental arming of the
junkers, held back 10,000 rifles on their way to the Don region, and
smaller assignments to a number of suspicious organisations and persons.
This control was soon extended to other arsenals and even to private
dealers in weapons. It was only necessary to appeal to the committee of
the soldiers, workers or clerical employees of the given institution or
store, and the resistance of the administration would be immediately
broken. Weapons were given out henceforth only upon the order of the
commissars.

The typographical workers, through their union, called the attention of
the Committee to an increase of Black Hundred leaflets and brochures. It
was decided that in all suspicious cases the printers’ union should come
for instructions to the Military Revolutionary Committee. This control
through the typographical workers was the most effective of all possible
forms of control over the printed agitation of the counter-revolution.

Not satisfied with its formal denial of the rumour of an insurrection,
the Soviet openly designated Sunday the 22nd as the day for a peaceful
review of its forces – not, however, in the form of street processions,
but of meetings in the factories, barracks, and all the major
institutions of Petrograd. With the obvious aim of provoking bloody
interference, some mysterious worshippers set the same day for a church
procession through the streets of the capital. Their summons, issued in
the name of some unknown Cossacks, invited the citizens to take part in
a religious procession “in memory of the delivery of Moscow from the
enemy in 1812.” This historical pretext was none too genuine, but over
and above this the organisations proposed to the Almighty to hand down a
blessing upon the Cossack arms “standing guard against the enemies of
the Russian land,” a proposal which clearly related to the year 1917.

There was no reason to fear a serious counter-revolutionary
manifestation. The clergy had no power among the Petrograd masses; they
could raise up against the Soviet under church banners only pitiful
remnants of the Black Hundred gangs. But with the co-operation of the
experienced provocateurs of the Intelligence Service and of Cossack
officers, bloody encounters were not impossible. As a measure of
prevention the Military Revolutionary Committee undertook in the first
place to strengthen its influence upon the Cossack regiments; a stricter
régime was also introduced in the building occupied by the revolutionary
staff. “It was no longer easy to get into Smolny,” writes John Reed.
“The pass system was changed every few hours; for spies continually
sneaked through.” At a meeting of the Garrison Conference on the 21st
devoted to a discussion of the “Soviet Day” to follow, the spokesman
proposed a series of measures for the prevention of possible street
clashes. The fourth Cossack regiment, which stood farthest to the Left,
announced through its delegates that it would not take part in the
religious procession. The fourteenth Cossack regiment announced that it
would struggle with all its power against the attempts of the
counter-revolution, but at the same time that it considered a coming-out
for the seizure of power “untimely.” Of the three Cossack regiments only
one was absent – the Uralsky – the most backward regiment, one brought
into Petrograd in July for the crushing of the Bolsheviks.

Upon the proposal of Trotsky, the Conference adopted three short
resolutions:

1.  (1) “The garrison of Petrograd and its environs promises the
    Military Revolutionary Committee full support in all its steps ...”;
2.  (2) October 22nd is to be a day devoted to a peaceful review of
    forces. The garrison appeals to the Cossacks: “We invite you to our
    meeting tomorrow. You are welcome, brother Cossacks!”;
3.  (3) “The All-Russian Congress of Soviets must take the power in its
    hands and guarantee to the people peace, land and bread.” The
    garrison solemnly promises to place all its forces at the disposal
    of the Soviet Congress. “Rely upon us, authorised representatives of
    the soldiers, workers and peasants. We are all at our posts ready to
    conquer or die.”

Hundreds of hands were raised for this resolution which sealed the
programme of the insurrection. Fifty-seven men abstained. These were the
“neutrals” – that is, the wavering enemy. Not one hand was raised
against the resolution. The noose around the neck of the February régime
was being drawn in a reliable knot.

In the course of the day it became known that the mysterious instigators
of the religious procession had given up their demonstration “at the
suggestion of the commander-in-chief of the district.” This serious
moral success, an excellent measure of the social pressure of the
Garrison Conference, permitted a confident prediction that on the
following day the enemy, generally speaking, would not venture to poke
their heads into the street.

The Military Revolutionary Committee appointed three commissars to the
district headquarters – Sadovsky, Mekhonishin and Lazimir. Orders of the
commander were to become effective only when countersigned by one of
these three. At a telephone call from Smolny the staff sent an
automobile for the delegation – the customs of the dual power were still
in effect – but contrary to expectations this extreme politeness of the
staff did not imply a readiness to make concessions.

After listening to the declaration of Sadovsky, Polkovnikov stated that
he did not recognise any commissars and had no need of any guardianship.
To a hint from the delegation that along that road headquarters might
meet with resistance from the side of the troops, Polkovnikov dryly
answered that the garrison was in his hands and its submission was
assured. “His assurance was sincere,” writes Mekhonoshin in his memoirs.
“We felt no affectation in it.” For the return trip to Smolny the
delegates did not receive an official automobile.

A special session of the Conference, to which Trotsky and Sverdlov were
summoned, adopted a decision: To consider the break with headquarters an
accomplished fact, and make it the starting point for a further
offensive. The first condition of success: The districts must be kept in
touch with all stages and episodes of the struggle. The enemy must not
be allowed to catch the masses unaware. Through the district soviets and
committees of the party the information was sent into all parts of the
town. The regiments were immediately informed of what had happened. The
instructions were confirmed: Carry out only those orders which are
countersigned by the commissars. It was also suggested that they send
out only the most reliable soldiers for patrol duty.

But headquarters also decided to take measures. Spurred on evidently by
his compromisist allies, Polkovnikov called together at one o’clock in
the afternoon his own conference of the garrison, with representatives
of the Central Executive Committee present. Anticipating this move of
the enemy, the Military Revolutionary Committee called an emergency
conference of the regimental committees at eleven o’clock, and here it
was decided to formulate the break with headquarters. The appeal to the
troops of Petrograd and the environs drawn up at this meeting speaks the
language of a declaration of war. “Having broken with the organised
garrison of the capital, headquarters is a direct instrument of the
counter-revolutionary forces.” The Military Revolutionary Committee
disclaims all responsibility for the activities of headquarters, and
standing at the head of the garrison takes upon itself “the defence of
revolutionary order against counter-revolutionary attempts.”

That was a decisive step on the road to insurrection. Or was it perhaps
only the next conflict in the mechanics of that dual power which is so
full of conflicts? Headquarters, at any rate, tried for its own
consolation so to interpret it – after conferring with the
representatives of those units which had not received in good season the
summons of the Military Revolutionary Committee. A delegate sent from
Smolny under the leadership of the Bolshevik ensign, Dashkevich, briefly
made known to headquarters the resolution of the Garrison Conference.
The few representatives of the troops present reaffirmed their loyalty
to the Soviet, but refused to make a decision and dispersed. “After a
prolonged exchange of opinions” – the press so quoted the words of
headquarters – “no definite decision was adopted; it was thought
necessary to await a solution of the conflict between the Central
Executive Committee and the Petrograd Soviet.” Headquarters thus
conceived its downfall as a quarrel between two soviet institutions as
to which one should control its activities. That policy of voluntary
blindness had this advantage, that it relieved them of the necessity of
declaring war on Smolny, for which act the rulers lacked adequate
forces. Thus the revolutionary conflict, already on the point of
breaking out, was once more with the help of the governmental organs,
confined within the legal framework of the dual power. Fearing to look
reality in the face, headquarters the more loyally co-operated in
camouflaging the insurrection. But was not this light-minded conduct of
the powers only a camouflage for their own actual purpose? Did not
headquarters intend, under cover of this bureaucratic naïveté, to deal
an unexpected blow at the Military Revolutionary Committee? Such an
attempt upon the part of the distraught and demoralised organs of the
Provisional Government was considered highly improbable in Smolny. The
Military Revolutionary Committee, however, took the most simple measures
of precaution: in the nearby barracks companies were kept under arms
night and day, ready at the first signal of alarm to come to the aid of
Smolny.

In spite of the calling-off of the religious procession, the bourgeois
press foretold bloodshed on Sunday. The compromisist paper announced in
its morning edition: “Today the authorities expect a coming-out with
better probability than on the 20th.” Thus for the third time in one
week – the 17th, the 20th, the 22nd – this naughty boy had deceived the
people with a false cry of “wolf!” The fourth time, if we can believe
the old fable, the boy will fall into the wolf’s jaws. The Bolshevik
press, in summoning the masses to attend meetings, spoke of a peaceful
appraisal of revolutionary forces on the eve of the Congress of Soviets.
This fully answered the plan of the Military Revolutionary Committee: to
carry out a gigantic review without clashes, without employing weapons,
even without showing them. They wanted to show the masses their own
numbers, their strength, their resolution. They wanted with unanimous
numbers to compel the enemy to hide, to keep out of sight, to stay
indoors. By exposing the impotence of the bourgeoisie beside their own
masses, they wanted to erase from the consciousness of the workers and
soldiers the last hindering recollections of the July Days – to bring it
about that having seen themselves the masses should say: Nothing and
nobody can any longer oppose us.

“The frightened population,” wrote Miliukov five years later, “remained
at home or stood aside.” It was the bourgeoisie that remained at home,
and they really had been frightened by their own press. All the rest of
the population thronged out to meetings from early morning to night –
young and old, men and women, boys and girls, mothers with children in
their arms. No meetings like this had been seen before throughout the
revolution. All Petrograd, with the exception of its upper strata, was
one solid meeting. In those auditoriums, continually packed to the
doors, the audiences would be entirely renewed in the course of a few
hours. Fresh and ever fresh waves of workers, soldiers and sailors would
roll up to the buildings and flood them full. The petty bourgeoisie of
the town bestirred themselves, too, aroused by these waves and by those
warnings which were supposed to frighten them. Tens of thousands brimmed
that immense building known as the House of the People. They filled all
the theatres, filled the auditoriums of the theatres, their smoke-rooms,
buffets, and foyers – filled them with a solid and excited and at the
same time disciplined mass. From iron columns and upstairs windows human
heads, legs and arms were hanging in garlands and clusters. There was
that electric tension in the air which forebodes a coming discharge.
Down with Kerensky! Down with the war! Power to the Soviets! None of the
Compromisers any longer dared appear before these red hot crowds with
arguments or warnings. The Bolsheviks had the floor. All the oratorical
forces of the party, including delegates to the Congress who were
beginning to arrive from the provinces, were brought into action.
Occasionally Left Social Revolutionaries spoke – in some places
anarchists – but they both tried as little as possible to distinguish
themselves from Bolsheviks.

The people of the slums, of the attics and basements, stood still by the
hour in threadbare coat or grey uniform, with caps or heavy shawls still
on their heads, the mud of the streets soaked through their shoes, an
autumn cough catching at their throats. They stood there packed shoulder
to shoulder, and crowding even closer to make room for more, to make
room for all, listening tirelessly, hungrily, passionately, demandingly,
fearing lest they miss a word of what it is so necessary to understand,
to assimilate, and to do. It had seemed as though during the months
past, the weeks – at least during the very last days – all the words had
been spoken. But no! Today at least those words have a different sound.
The masses are experiencing them in a new way, not as a gospel but as an
obligation to act. The experience of the revolution, the war, the heavy
struggle of a whole bitter lifetime, rose from the deeps of memory in
each of those poverty-driven men and women, expressing itself in simple
and imperious thoughts: This way we can go no farther, we must break a
road into the future.

Everyone who took part in the events here described has subsequently
turned his eyes back to that simple and wonderful day so clearly shining
out against the background of the revolution – vivid enough even without
that. The image of that inspired human flood – inspired, and yet in its
unconquerable power restrained – is chiselled for ever in the memory of
those who saw it. “The day of the Petrograd Soviet,” writes the Left
Social Revolutionary, Mstislavsky, “was celebrated at innumerable
meetings with enormous enthusiasm.” The Bolshevik, Testkovsky, who spoke
at two factories of the Vassilie-Ostrov district, says: “We spoke
frankly to the masses of the coming seizure of power by us, and heard
but words of encouragement.” “Around me,” says Sukhanov, describing a
meeting in the House of the People, “there was a mood very near to
ecstasy ... Trotsky had formulated some brief general resolution ...
Those in favour ... Thousands and thousands raised their hands as one
man. I looked at the lifted hands and burning eyes of men, women, boys,
workers, soldiers, peasants, and of typically petty-bourgeois characters
too ... Trotsky continued to speak. The multitude continued to hold
their hands in the air. Trotsky chiselled out each word: Let this vote
of yours be your oath ... The multitude held their hands high. They
agreed. They took the oath.” The Bolshevik Popov tells of a rapturous
oath sworn by the masses: “To rush out at the first word from the
Soviet.” Mstislavsky tells of an electrified crowd taking an oath of
loyalty to the soviets. The same scene was to be observed on a smaller
scale in all parts of the city from centre to suburbs. Hundreds of
thousands of people, at one and the same hour, lifted their hands and
took a vow to carry the struggle through to the end. The daily meetings
of the Soviet, the soldiers’ section, the Garrison Conference, the
factory and shop committees, had given inner solidarity to a big group
of leaders; separate mass meetings had united the factories and
regiments; but that day, the 22nd of October, welded in one gigantic
cauldron and under high temperature the authentic popular masses. The
masses saw themselves and their leaders; the leaders saw and listened to
the masses. Each side was satisfied with the other. The leaders were
convinced: We can postpone no longer! The masses said to themselves:
This time the thing will be done!

The success of this Sunday’s review of forces by the Bolsheviks
shattered the self-confidence of Polkovnikov and his high command. By
agreement with the government and the Central Executive Committee,
headquarters made an attempt to come to terms with Smolny. Why not after
all re-establish the good old friendly customs of contact and
compromise? The Military Revolutionary Committee did not refuse to send
emissaries for an exchange of opinion: A better opportunity for
reconnoitring could hardly be wished. “The negotiations were brief,”
remembers Sadovsky. “The representatives of headquarters agreed in
advance to all the conditions put forth by the Soviet in exchange for
which the order of the Military Revolutionary Committee for October 22
was to be annulled.” This referred to the document declaring
headquarters an instrument of the counter-revolutionary forces. The very
same emissaries whom Polkovnikov had so discourteously sent home two
days ago now demanded, and received in their hands for the purpose of
their report to Smolny, the rough draft of an agreement signed by
headquarters. On Saturday these conditions of semi-honourable
capitulation would have been accepted. Today, on Monday, they were
already too late. Headquarters awaited an answer which never came.

The Military Revolutionary Committee addressed to the population of
Petrograd a proclamation explaining the appointment of commissars in the
military units and the most important points of the capital and its
environs. “The commissars as representatives of the Soviet are
inviolable. Opposition to the commissars is opposition to the Soviet of
Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies.” The citizens were invited in case of
disturbances to appeal to the nearest commissar to call out armed
forces. That was the language of sovereignty. But still the Committee
did not give the signal for open insurrection. Sukhanov asks: “Is Smolny
acting stupidly, or is it playing with the Winter Palace like a cat with
a mouse, trying to provoke an attack?” Neither the one nor the other.
The Committee is crowding out the government with the pressure of the
masses, with the weight of the garrison. It is taking all that it can
without a battle. It is advancing its positions without firing,
integrating and reinforcing its army on the march. It is measuring with
its own pressure the resisting power of the enemy, not taking its eyes
off him for a second. Each new step forward changes the disposition of
forces to the advantage of Smolny. The workers and the garrison are
growing up to the insurrection. Who is to be first to issue the call to
arms, will become known in the course of this offensive, this crowding
out. It is now only a question of hours. If at the last moment the
government finds the courage, or the despair, to give the signal for
battle, responsibility for this will lie upon the Winter Palace. But the
initiative just the same will have been taken by Smolny. Its declaration
of October 23 had meant the overthrow of the power before the government
itself was overthrown. The Military Revolutionary Committee was tying up
the arms and legs of the enemy régime before striking him on the head.
It was possible to apply this tactic of “peaceful penetration,” to break
the bones of the enemy legally and hypnotically paralyse the remnants of
his will, only because of the indubitable superiority of forces on the
side of the Committee and because they were increasing hour by hour.

The Committee had been studying from day to day the map of the garrison
wide open before it. It knew the temperature of each regiment, and
followed every shift in the views and sympathies of the barracks. A
surprise from that side was impossible. There remained, however, some
dark shadows on the map. An attempt must be made to eradicate, or at
least decrease, them. It had become clear on the 19th that the majority
of the committees of the Peter and Paul fortress were unfavourably, or
at least dubiously, disposed. Now when the whole garrison is for the
Committee and the fortress is caught in a ring, at least politically, it
is time to take decisive measures for its conquest. Corporal
Blagonravov, the commissar appointed to the fortress, had met
resistance. The governmental commandant of the fortress had refused to
recognise this Bolshevik guardianship; there were even rumours of his
boasting that he would arrest the young guardian. It was necessary to do
something and do it quickly. Antonov offered to take a reliable
battalion of the Pavlovsky regiment into the fortress and disarm the
hostile units. But that was a too drastic operation, one which might be
used by the officers to cause bloodshed and break the unity of the
garrison. Was it really necessary to adopt such extreme measures? Says
Antonov in his memoirs: “Trotsky was called in to consider this question
... Trotsky was then playing the decisive rôle. The advice he gave us
was a product of his revolutionary intuition: that we capture the
fortress from within. ‘It cannot be that the troops there are not
sympathetic,’ he said. And he was right. Trotsky and Lashevich went to a
meeting in the fortress.” The results of this enterprise, which seemed
risky, were awaited in Smolny with the greatest excitement. Trotsky
subsequently wrote: “On the 23rd I went to the fortress at about two
o’clock in the afternoon. A meeting was in progress in the court. The
orators of the right wing were in the highest degree cautious and
evasive ... The soldiers listened to us and they came with us.” On the
third floor of Smolny they drew a deep breath when the telephone brought
this joyful news: The garrison of Peter and Paul has solemnly promised
to take orders henceforth only from the Military Revolutionary
Committee.

That change in the mood of the fortress troops was not of course the
result of one or two speeches. It had been well prepared in the past.
The soldiers turned out to be far to the left of their committees. It
was only the cracked shell of the old discipline that held out a little
longer behind the fortress walls than in the city barracks. One tap was
enough to shatter it.

Blagonravov could now confidently establish himself in the fortress,
organise his little headquarters, and set up communications with the
Bolshevik soviet of the adjoining district and the committees of the
nearest barracks. Meanwhile delegates from the factories and military
units were coming up to see what they could do about getting weapons. An
indescribable liveliness now prevailed in the fortress. “The telephone
rang continually bringing news of our new successes at assemblies and
mass meetings.” Occasionally an unfamiliar voice would announce the
arrival at some railroad station of punitive detachments from the front.
Immediate investigation would reveal that this was an invention put in
circulation by the enemy.

That day the evening session of the Soviet was distinguished by the
exceptional number present and the exalted mood. The occupation of Peter
and Paul and the conquest of the Kronverksky arsenal containing 100,000
rifles – this was no small guarantee of success. The spokesman for the
Military Revolutionary Committee was Antonov. He drew a picture of the
crowding out of the governmental organs step by step by the agents of
the Military Revolutionary Committee. These agents, he said, are being
received everywhere as natural authorities; they obeyed not through fear
but through principle. “From all sides come demands for the appointment
of commissars.” The backward units are hurrying to catch up to the
advanced. The Preobrazhsnsky, which in July had been the first to fall
for the slander about German gold, had now issued through its commissar
Chudnovsky a violent protest against the rumour that the Preobrazhentsi
are for the government. The very idea is regarded as a malicious insult!
... To be sure, the customary patrol duties are still being carried out,
relates Antonov, but this is done with the consent of the Committee.
Orders of headquarters for the delivery of weapons and automobiles are
not being carried out. Headquarters thus had ample opportunity to find
out who is the master of the capital.

To a question: “Does the committee know about the movement of government
troops from the front and the surrounding districts, and what measures
have been taken against this?” the spokesman answered: “Cavalry units
were sent from the Rumanian front, but they have been held up at Pskov;
the 17th Infantry Division, finding out on the road where and why they
had been sent, refused to go; in Venden two regiments successfully
resisted the attempt to send them against Petrograd; we have as yet no
news about the Cossacks and junkers supposed to have been sent from
Kiev, or the shock troops summoned from Tsarskoe Selo. They do not dare,
and they will not dare, lay hands on the Military Revolutionary
Committee.” Those words sounded pretty good in the white hall of Smolny.
As Antonov read his report, one had the impression that the headquarters
of the insurrection was working with wide open doors. As a matter of
fact, Smolny had almost nothing to hide. The political set-up of the
revolution was so favourable that frankness itself became a kind of
camouflage: Surely this isn’t the way they make an insurrection? That
word “insurrection,” however, was not spoken by any one of the leaders.
This was not wholly a formal measure of caution, for the term did not
fit the actual situation. It was being left to the government of
Kerensky, as you might say, to insurrect. In the account in _Izvestia_
it does say that Trotsky at the session of the 23rd first acknowledged
that the aim of the Military Revolutionary Committee was a seizure of
power. It is unquestionably true that the original attitude, when the
task of the Committee had been declared to be a testing out of the
strategic arguments of Cheremissov, had long been abandoned. The
transfer of the regiments was indeed all but forgotten. But on the 23rd
the talk was still not about insurrection, but about the “defence” of
the coming Congress of Soviets – with armed forces if necessary. It was
still in this spirit that the resolution was adopted on the report of
Antonov.

How were these events estimated in the governmental upper circles? On
the night of the 22nd, in communicating to the chief of the headquarters
staff, Dukhonin, the news of the attempt of the Military Revolutionary
Committee to get the regiments away from the command, Kerensky added: “I
think we can easily handle this.” His own departure for headquarters was
delayed, he said, not at all through fear of any sort of an
insurrection: “That matter could be regulated without me, since
everything is organised.” To his anxious ministers Kerensky reassuringly
declared that he personally, unlike them, was very glad of the coming
attack since it would give him the opportunity to “settle once for all
with the Bolsheviks.” “I would be ready to offer a prayer,” says the
head of the government to the Kadet Nabokov, a frequent guest at the
Winter Palace, “that such an attack may occur.” “But are you sure that
you will be able to handle them?” “I have more forces than I need. They
will be stamped out for good.”

In their subsequent ridicule of this optimistic light-mindedness of
Kerensky, the Kadets have evidently been a little forgetful. In reality
Kerensky was looking at those events through their own eyes. On the
21st, Miliukov’s paper wrote that if the Bolsheviks, corroded as they
are with a profound inner crisis, dare to come out, they will be put
down instantly and without difficulty. Another Kadet paper added: “A
storm is coming, but it will perhaps clear the air.” Dan testifies that
in the _couloirs_ of the Pre-Parliament the Kadets and those grouped
around them were talking aloud of their wish that the Bolsheviks might
come out as soon as possible: “In an open battle they will be beaten to
the last man.” Prominent Kadets said to John Reed: After being defeated
in an insurrection, the Bolsheviks won’t dare lift their heads at the
Constituent Assembly.

During the 22nd and 23rd Kerensky took counsel, now with the leaders of
the Central Executive Committee, now with headquarters: Would it not be
advisable to arrest the Military Revolutionary Committee. The
Compromisers did not advise it: they themselves would try to regulate
the question about commissars. Polkovnikov also thought it would hardy
be worth while to hasten with the arrests: the military forces in case
of need are “more than adequate.” Kerensky listened to Polkovnikov, but
still more to his friends, the Compromisers. He was confidently
calculating that in case of danger the Central Executive Committee, in
spite of all family misunderstandings, would come to his aid in time. It
was so in July and in August. Why should it not continue so?

But now it is no longer July and no longer August. It is October. Cold
and raw Baltic winds from the direction of Kronstadt are blowing through
the squares and along the quays of Petrograd. Junkers in long coats to
their heels are patrolling the streets, drowning their anxiety in songs
of triumph.

The mounted police are riding up and down, prancing, their revolvers in
brand-new holsters. No. The power still looks imposing enough! Or is
this perhaps an optical illusion? At a corner of the Nevsky, John Reed,
an American with naïve and intelligent eyes in his head, buys a brochure
of Lenin’s entitled _Will the Bolsheviks Be Able To Hold the State
Power?_ paying for it with one of those postage stamps which are now
circulating in place of money.



CHAPTER 42 LENIN SUMMONS TO INSURRECTION


 

Besides the factories, barracks, villages, the front and the soviets,
the revolution had another laboratory: the brain of Lenin. Driven
underground, Lenin was obliged for a hundred and eleven days – from July
6 to October 25 – to cut down his meetings even with members of the
Central Committee. Without any immediate intercourse with the masses,
and deprived of contacts with any organisations, he concentrated his
thought the more resolutely upon the fundamental problems of the
revolution, reducing them – as was both his rule and the necessity of
his nature – to the key problems of Marxism.

The chief arguments of the democrats, even the most leftward, against
seizing the power, was that the toilers were incapable of mastering the
machinery of state. Opportunist elements even within the Bolshevik Party
cherished the same fears. “The machinery of state!” Every petty
bourgeois is brought up in adoration of this mystic principle elevated
above people and above classes. And the educated philistine carries in
his marrow the same awe that his father did, or his uncle, the
shopkeeper or well-off peasant, before these all-powerful institutions
where questions of war and peace are decided, where commercial patents
are given out, whence issue the whips of the taxes, where they punish
and once in a while also pardon, where they legitimise marriages and
births, where death itself has to stand in line respectfully awaiting
recognition. The machinery of state! Removing in imagination not only
his hat but his shoes too, the petty bourgeois comes tip-toeing into the
temple of the idol on stockinged feet – it matters not what his name is,
Kerensky, Laval, MacDonald or Hilferding – that is the way he comes when
personal good-luck or the force of circumstances makes him a minister.
Such gracious condescension he can answer with a humble submission
before the “machinery of state.” The Russian radical intelligentsia who
had never dared crawl into the seats of power even during the revolution
except behind the backs of titled landlords and big business men, gazed
with fright and indignation upon the Bolsheviks. Those street agitators,
those demagogues, think that they can master the machinery of state!

After the Soviet, confronted by the spineless impotence of the official
democracy, had saved the revolution in the struggle against Kornilov,
Lenin wrote: “Let those of little faith learn from this example. Shame
on those who say, ‘We have no machine with which to replace that old one
which gravitates inexorably to the defence of the bourgeoisie.’ For we
have a machine. And that is the soviets. Do not fear the initiative and
independence of the masses. Trust the revolutionary organisations of the
masses, and you will see in all spheres of the state life that same
power, majesty and unconquerable will of the workers and peasants, which
they have shown in their solidarity and enthusiasm against Kornilovism.”

During the first months of his underground life Lenin wrote a book _The
State and Revolution_, the principal material for which he had collected
abroad during the war. With the same painstaking care which he dedicated
to thinking out the practical problems of the day, he here examines the
theoretic problems of the state. He cannot do otherwise: for him theory
is in actual fact a guide to action. In this work Lenin has not for a
minute proposed to introduce any new word into political theory. On the
contrary, he gives his work an extraordinarily modest aspect,
emphasising his position as a disciple. His task, he says, is to revive
the genuine “teaching of Marxism about the state.”

With its meticulous selection of quotations, its detailed polemical
interpretations, the book might seem pedantic – to actual pedants,
incapable of feeling under the analysis of texts the mighty pulsation of
the mind and will. By a mere re-establishment of the class theory of the
state on a new and higher historical foundation, Lenin gives to the
ideas of Marx a new concreteness and therewith a new significance. But
this work on the state derives its immeasurable importance above all
from the fact that it constituted the scientific introduction to the
greatest revolution in history. This “commentator” of Marx was preparing
his party for the revolutionary conquest of a sixth part of the
habitable surface of the earth.

If the state could simply re-accommodate itself to the demands of a new
historic régime, revolutions would never have arisen. As a fact,
however, the bourgeoisie itself has never yet come to power except by
way of revolution. Now it is the workers’ turn. Upon this question, too,
Lenin restored to Marxism its significance as the theoretic weapon of
the proletarian revolution.

You say the workers cannot master the machinery of state? But it is not
a question – Lenin teaches – of getting possession of the old machine
and using it for new aims: that is a reactionary Utopia. The selection
of personages in the old machine, their education, their mutual
relations, are all in conflict with the historic task of the
proletariat. After seizing the power our task is not to re-educate the
old machine, but to shatter it to fragments. And with what replace it?
With the soviets. From being leaders of the revolutionary masses,
instruments of education, the soviets will become organs of the new
state order.

In the whirlpool of the revolution this work will find few readers; it
will be published, indeed, only after the seizure of power. Lenin is
working over the problem of the state primarily for the sake of his own
inner confidence and for the future. One of his continual concerns was
to preserve the succession of ideas. In July he writes to Kamenev:
“_Entre nous_. If they bump me off I ask you to publish my little
notebook _Marxism on the State_ (stranded in Stockholm). Bound in a blue
cover. All the quotations are collected from Marx and Engels, likewise
from Kautsky against Pannekoek. There is a whole series of notes and
comments. Formulate it. I think you could publish it with a week’s work.
I think it important, for it is not only Plekhanov and Kautsky who got
off the track. My conditions: all this to be absolutely _entre nous_.”
The revolutionary leader, persecuted as the agent of a hostile state and
figuring on the possibility of attempted assassination by his enemies,
concerns himself with the publication of a “blue” notebook with
quotations from Marx and Engels. That was to be his secret last will and
testament. The phrase “bump me off”[1] was to serve as an antidote
against that pathos which he hated, for the commission is pathetic in
its very essence.

But while awaiting this blow in the back, Lenin himself was getting
ready to deliver a frontal blow. While he was putting in order, between
reading the papers and writing letters of instruction, his precious
notebook, procured at last from Stockholm, life did not stand still. The
hour was approaching when the question of the state was to be decided in
practical action.

While still in Switzerland immediately after the overthrow of the
monarchy, Lenin wrote: “We are not Blanquists, not advocates of the
seizure of power by a minority ...” This same thought he developed on
his arrival in Russia: “We are now in a minority – the masses do not
trust us yet. We know how to wait ... They will swing to our side, and
after explaining the correlation of forces we will then say to them: Our
day is come.” The question of the conquest of power was presented during
those first months as a question of winning a majority in the soviets.

After the July raids Lenin declared: “The power can be seized henceforth
only by an armed insurrection; we must obviously rely in this operation
not upon the soviets, demoralised by the Compromisers, but on the
factory committees; the soviets as organs of power will have to be
created anew after the victory.” As a matter of fact, only two months
after that the Bolsheviks had won over the soviets from the
Compromisers. The nature of Lenin’s mistake on this question is highly
characteristic of his strategic genius: for the boldest designs he based
his calculations upon the least favourable premises. Thus in coming to
Russia through Germany in April he counted on going straight to prison
from the station. Thus on July 5 he was saying: “They will probably
shoot us all.” And thus now he was figuring: the Compromisers will not
let us get a majority in the soviets.

“There is no man more faint-hearted than I am, when I am working out a
military plan,” wrote Napoleon to General Herthier. “I exaggerate all
dangers and all possible misfortunes ... When my decision is taken
everything is forgotten except what can assure its success.” Except for
the pose involved in the inappropriate word faint-hearted, the essence
of this thought applies perfectly to Lenin. In deciding a problem of
strategy he began by clothing the enemy with his own resolution and
farsightedness. The tactical mistakes of Lenin were for the most part
by-products of his strategic power. In the present instance, indeed, it
is hardly appropriate to use the word mistake. When a diagnostician
arrives at the definition of a disease by a method of successive
eliminations, his hypothetical assumptions, beginning with the worst
possible, are not mistakes but methods of analysis. As soon as the
Bolsheviks had got control of the soviets of the two capitals, Lenin
said: “Our day is come.” In April and July he had applied the brakes; in
August he was preparing theoretically the new step; from the middle of
September he was hurrying and urging on with all his power. The danger
now lay not in acting too soon, but in lagging. “In this matter it is
now impossible to be premature.”

In his articles and letters addressed to the Central Committee, Lenin
analyses the situation, always emphasising first of all the
international conditions. The symptoms and the facts of an awakening
European proletariat are for him, on the background of the war,
irrefutable proof that the direct threat against the Russian revolution
from the side of foreign imperialism will steadily diminish. The arrest
of the socialists in Italy, and still more the insurrections in the
German fleet, made him announce a supreme change in the whole world
situation: “We stand in the vestibule of the world-wide proletarian
revolution.”

The epigone historians have preferred to hush up this starting point of
Lenin’s thought – both because Lenin’s calculation has been refuted by
events, and because according to the most recent theories the Russian
Revolution ought to be sufficient unto itself in all circumstances. As a
matter of fact Lenin’s appraisal of the international situation was
anything but illusory. The symptoms which he observed through the screen
of the military censorship of all countries did actually portend the
approach of a revolutionary storm. Within a year it shook the old
building of the Central Empires to its very foundation. But also in the
victor countries, England and France – to say nothing of Italy – it long
deprived the ruling classes of their freedom of action. Against a
strong, conservative, self-confident capitalistic Europe, the
proletarian revolution in Russia, isolated and not yet fortified, could
not have held out even for a few months. But that Europe no longer
existed. The revolution in the west did not, to be sure, put the
proletariat into power – the reformists succeeded in saving the
bourgeois régime – but nevertheless it proved powerful enough to defend
the Soviet Republic in the first and most dangerous period of its life.

Lenin’s deep internationalism was not expressed solely in the fact that
he always gave first place to his appraisal of the international
situation. He regarded the very conquest of power in Russia primarily as
the impetus for a European revolution, a thing which, as he often
repeated, was to have incomparably more importance for the fate of
humanity than the revolution In backward Russia. With what sarcasm he
lashed those Bolsheviks who did not understand their international duty.
“Let us adopt a resolution of sympathy for the German insurrectionists,”
he mocks, “and reject the insurrection in Russia. That will be a
genuinely reasonable internationalism!”

In the days of the Democratic Conference, Lenin wrote to the Central
Committee: “Having got a majority in the soviets of both capitals ...
the Bolsheviks can and should seize the state power in their hands ...”
The fact that a majority of the peasant delegates of the stacked
Democratic Conference voted against a coalition with the Kadets, had for
him decisive significance: The muzhik who does not want a union with the
bourgeoisie has nothing left but to support the Bolsheviks. “The people
are tired of the wavering of the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries.
Only our victory in the capitals will bring the peasants over to us.”
The task of the party is: “To place upon the order of the day armed
insurrection in Petersburg and Moscow, conquest of power, overthrow of
the government ...” Up to that time nobody had so imperiously and
nakedly set the task of insurrection.

Lenin very studiously followed all the elections and votings in the
country, carefully assembling those figures which would throw light on
the actual correlation of forces. The semi-anarchistic indifference to
electoral statistics got nothing but contempt from him. At the same time
Lenin never identified the indexes of parliamentarism with the actual
correlation of forces. He always introduced a correction in favour of
direct action. “The strength of a revolutionary proletariat,” he
explained, “from the point of view of its action upon the masses and
drawing them into the struggle, is infinitely greater in an
extra-parliamentary than a parliamentary struggle. This is a very
important observation when it comes to the question of civil war.”

Lenin with his sharp eye was the first to notice that the agrarian
movement had gone into a decisive phase, and he immediately drew all the
conclusions from this. The muzhik, like the soldier, will wait no
longer. “In the face of such a fact as the peasant insurrection,” writes
Lenin at the end of September, “all other political symptoms, even if
they were in conflict with this ripening of an all-national crisis,
would have absolutely no significance at all.” The agrarian question is
the foundation of the revolution. A victory of the government over the
peasant revolt would be the “funeral of the revolution ...” We cannot
hope for more favourable conditions. The hour of action is at hand. “The
crisis is ripe. The whole future of the international workers’
revolution for socialism is at stake. The crisis is ripe.”

Lenin summons to insurrection. In each simple, prosaic, sometimes
angular line, you feel the highest tensity of passion. “The revolution
is done for,” he writes early in October to the Petrograd party
conference, “if the government of Kerensky is not overthrown by
proletarians and soldiers in the near future ... We must mobilise all
forces in order to impress upon the workers and soldiers the
unconditional necessity of a desperate, last, resolute struggle to
overthrow the government of Kerensky.”

Lenin had said more than once that the masses are to the left of the
party. He knew that the party was to the left of its own upper layer of
“old Bolsheviks.” He was too well acquainted with the inner groupings
and moods in the Central Committee to expect from it any hazardous steps
whatever. On the other hand he greatly feared excessive caution,
Fabianism, a letting slip of one of those historic situations which are
decades in preparation. Lenin did not trust the Central Committee –
without Lenin. In that lies the key to his letters from underground. And
Lenin was not so wrong in his mistrust.

Being compelled in a majority of cases to express himself after a
decision had already been reached in Petrograd, Lenin was continually
criticising the policy of the Central Committee from the left. His
opposition developed with the question of insurrection as a background.
But it was not limited to that. Lenin thought that the Central Committee
was giving too much attention to the compromisist Executive Committee,
the Democratic Conference, parliamentary doings in the upper soviet
circles in general. He sharply opposed the proposal of the Bolsheviks
for a coalition præsidium in the Petrograd Soviet. He branded as
“shameful” the decision to participate in the Pre-Parliament. He was
indignant at the list of Bolshevik candidates for the Constituent
Assembly published at the end of September. Too many intellectuals, not
enough workers. “To jam up the Constituent Assembly with orators and
littérateurs will mean to travel the worn-out road of opportunism and
chauvinism. This is unworthy of the Third International.” Moreover there
are too many new names among the candidates, members of the party not
tried out in the struggle! Here Lenin considers it necessary to make an
exception: “It goes without saying that ... nobody would quarrel with
such a candidacy, for example, as that of L.D. Trotsky, for in the first
place Trotsky took an internationalist position immediately upon his
arrival; in the second place, he fought for amalgamation among the
Mezhrayontsi; in the third place, in the difficult July Days he stood at
the height of the task and proved a devoted champion of the party of the
revolutionary proletariat. It is clear that this cannot be said of a
majority of the yesterday’s party members who have been introduced into
this list ...”

It might seem as though the April Days had returned – Lenin again in
opposition to the Central Committee. The questions stand differently,
but the general spirit of his opposition is the same: the Central
Committee is too passive, too responsive to social opinion among the
intellectual circles, too compromisist in its attitude to the
Compromisers. And above all, too indifferent, fatalistic, not attacking
_à la_ Bolshevik the problem of the armed insurrection.

It is time to pass from words to deeds: “Our party has now at the
Democratic Conference practically its own congress, and this congress
has got to decide (whether it wants to or not) the fate of the
revolution.” Only one decision is thinkable: Armed overthrow. In this
first letter on insurrection Lenin makes another exception: “It is not a
question of ‘the day’ of the insurrection, nor ‘the moment’ in a narrow
sense. This can be decided only by the general voice of those who are in
contact with the workers and soldiers, with the masses.” But only two or
three days later (letters in those days were commonly not dated – for
conspirative reasons, not through forgetfulness) Lenin, obviously
impressed by the decomposition of the Democratic Conference, insists
upon immediate action and forthwith advances a practical plan.

“We ought at once to solidify the Bolshevik faction at the Conference,
not striving after numbers ... We ought to draw up a short declaration
of the Bolsheviks ... We ought to move our whole faction to the
factories and barracks. At the same time without losing a minute we
ought to organise a staff of insurrectionary detachments, deploy our
forces, move the loyal regiments into the most important positions,
surround the Alexandrinka (the theatre where the Democratic Conference
was sitting) occupy Peter and Paul, arrest the General Staff and the
government, send against the junkers and the Savage Division those
detachments which are ready to die fighting, but not let the enemy
advance to the centre of the city; we ought to mobilise the armed
workers, summon them to a desperate, final battle, occupy the telegraph
and telephone stations at once, install our insurrectionary staff at the
central telephone station, placing in contact with it by telephone all
the factories, all the regiments, all the chief points of armed
struggle, etc.” The question of date is no longer placed in dependence
upon the “general voice of those who are in contact with the masses.”
Lenin proposed an immediate act: To leave the Alexandrinsky theatre with
an ultimatum and return there at the head of the armed masses. A
crushing blow is to be struck not only against the government, but also,
simultaneously, against the highest organ of the Compromisers.

“Lenin, who in private letters was demanding the arrest of the
Democratic Conference,” – such is the accusation of Sukhanov – “in the
press, as we know, proposed a ‘compromise’: Let the Mensheviks and
Social Revolutionaries take over the whole power and then see what the
Soviet Congress says ... The same idea was insistently defended by
Trotsky at the Democratic Conference and around it.” Sukhanov sees a
double game where there was not the slightest hint of it. Lenin proposed
an agreement to the Compromisers immediately after the victory over
Kornilov – during the first days of September. The Compromisers passed
it up with a shrug of their shoulders. They were engaged in converting
the Democratic Conference into a screen for a new coalition with the
Kadets against the Bolsheviks. With that the possibility of an agreement
fell away absolutely. The question of power could henceforth be decided
only in open struggle. Sukhanov mixes up two stages one of which
preceded the other by two weeks and politically conditioned it.

But although the insurrection flowed inexorably from the new coalition,
nevertheless the sharpness of Lenin’s change of front took even the
heads of his own party by surprise. To unite the Bolshevik faction at
the Conference on the basis of his letter, even without “striving after
numbers” was clearly impossible. The mood of the faction was such that
it rejected by seventy votes against fifty the proposal to boycott the
Pre-Parliament – the first step, that is, on the road to insurrection.
In the Central Committee itself Lenin’s plan found no support whatever.
Four years later at an evening of reminiscences, Bukharin with
characteristic exaggerations and witticisms, gave a true account of that
episode. “The letter (of Lenin) was written with extraordinary force and
threatened us with all sorts of punishments. We all gasped. Nobody had
yet posed the question so abruptly ... At first all were bewildered.
Afterwards, having talked it over, we made a decision. Perhaps that was
the sole case in the history of our party when the Central Committee
unanimously decided to burn a letter of Lenin ... Although we believed
unconditionally that in Petersburg and Moscow we should succeed in
seizing the power, we assumed that in the provinces we could not yet
hold out, that having seized the power and dispersed the Democratic
Conference we could not fortify ourselves in the rest of Russia.”

The burning of several copies of this dangerous letter, owing to
conspirative considerations, was as a matter of fact not unanimously
resolved upon, but by six votes against four with six abstaining. One
copy, luckily for history, was preserved. But it is true, as Bukharin
relates, that all the members of the Central Committee, although for
different motives, rejected the proposal. Some opposed an insurrection
in general; others thought that the moment of the conference was the
least advantageous of all; others simply vacillated and adopted a
waiting attitude.

Having run into this direct resistance, Lenin entered into a sort of
conspiracy with Smilga, who was also in Finland and as President of the
Regional Committee of the Soviets held a tolerable amount of real power
in his hands. Smilga stood in 1917 on the extreme left wing of the party
and already in July had been inclined to carry the struggle through to
the end. At turning points in his policy Lenin always found somebody to
rely on. On September 27 Lenin wrote Smilga a voluminous letter: “What
are we doing? Only passing resolutions? We are losing time, we are
setting ‘dates’ (October 20 – Congress of Soviets – Isn’t it ridiculous
to postpone this way? Isn’t it ridiculous to rely on that?) The
Bolsheviks are not carrying on a systematic work of preparing their
armed forces for the overthrow of Kerensky ... We must agitate in the
party for a serious attitude toward armed insurrection ... And further,
as to your rôle ...; To create a secret committee of the most loyal
military men, talk the thing over on all sides with them, collect (and
yourself verify) the most accurate information about the make-up and
position of the troops in and around Petrograd, about the transportation
of Finland troops to Petrograd, about the movements of the fleet, etc.”
Lenin demanded “a systematic propaganda among the Cossacks located here
in Finland ... We must study all information about the attitude of the
Cossacks and organise a sending of agitatorial detachments from our best
forces of sailors and soldiers of Finland.” And finally: “For a correct
preparation of minds we must immediately put into circulation a slogan
of this kind: The power must immediately pass to the Petrograd Soviet
which will hand it over to the Congress of Soviets. For why endure three
more weeks of war and of Kornilovist preparations by Kerensky?” In this
letter we have a new plan of insurrection: A secret committee of the
more important military men in Helsingfors as a fighting staff, the
Russian troops quartered in Finland as fighting forces. “It seems that
the only ones we can fully control and who will play a serious military
rôle are the Finland troops and the Baltic Fleet.” Thus we see that
Lenin counted on dealing the chief blow against the government from
outside Petrograd. At the same time a “correct preparation of minds” is
necessary, so that an overthrow of the government by military forces
from Finland shall not fall unexpectedly upon the Petrograd Soviet,
which until the Congress of Soviets was to be the inheritor of power.

This new draft of a plan, like the preceding one, was not realised. But
it did not go by without effect. The agitation among the Cossack
Divisions soon gave results: we have heard about this from Dybenko. The
participation of Baltic sailors in the chief blow against the
government, also entered into the plan later adopted. But that was not
the chief thing: With his extremely sharp posing of the question Lenin
permitted nobody to evade or manoeuvre. What seemed untimely as a direct
tactical proposal became expedient as a test of attitudes in the Central
Committee, a support to the resolute against the wavering, a
supplementary push to the left.

With all the means at his disposal in his underground isolation Lenin
was trying to make the cadres of the party feel the acuteness of the
situation and the strength of the mass pressure. He summoned individual
Bolsheviks to his hiding-place, put them through partisan
cross-questionings, tested out the words and deeds of the leaders, used
indirect ways to get his slogans into the party – deep down in it – in
order to compel the Central Committee to act in the face of necessity
and carry the thing through.

A day after his letter to Smilga, Lenin wrote the above quoted document
_The Crisis is Ripe_, concluding it with something in the nature of a
declaration of war against the Central Committee. “We must ...
acknowledge the truth that there is in the Central Committee and the
upper circles of the party a tendency or an opinion in favour of waiting
for the Congress of Soviets, against the immediate seizure of power,
against immediate insurrection.” This tendency we must overcome at any
cost. “Conquer Kerensky first and then summon the Congress.” To lose
time waiting for the Congress of Soviets is “complete idiocy or else
complete treachery There remain more than twelve days until the Congress
designated for the 20th: “Weeks and even days are now deciding
everything.” To postpone the show-down means a cowardly renunciation of
insurrection, since during the Congress a seizure of power will become
impossible: “They will get together the Cossacks for the day of that
stupidly ‘appointed’ insurrection.”

The mere tone of the letter shows how ruinous the Fabianism of the
Petrograd leadership seemed to Lenin. But this time he is not satisfied
with furious criticism; by way of protest he resigns from the Central
Committee. He gives his reasons: the Central Committee has made no
response since the beginning of the Conference to his insistence in
regard to the seizure of power; the editorial board of the party organ
(Stalin) is printing his articles with intentional delays, omitting from
them his indication of such “flagrant mistakes of the Bolsheviks as
their shameful decision to participate in the Pre-Parliament,” etc. This
procedure Lenin does not consider it possible to conceal from the party:
“I am compelled to request permission to withdraw from the Central
Committee, which I hereby do, and leave myself freedom of agitation in
the lower ranks of the party and at the party congress.”

The documents do not show what further formal action was taken in this
matter. Lenin in any case did not withdraw from the Central Committee.
By announcing his resignation, an act which could not possibly be with
him the fruit of momentary irritation, Lenin obviously wanted to make it
possible to free himself in case of need from the internal discipline of
the Central Committee. He could be quite sure that as in April a direct
appeal to the lower ranks would assure him the victory. But the road of
open mutiny against the Central Committee required the preparation of a
special session; it required time; and time was just what was lacking.
Keeping this announcement of his resignation in reserve, but not
withdrawing completely beyond the limits of party legality, Lenin now
continued with greater freedom to develop his offensive along internal
lines. His letter to the Central Committee he not only sent to the
Petrograd and Moscow committees, but he also saw to it that copies fell
into the hands of the more reliable party workers of the district
locals. Early in October – and now over the heads of the Central
Committee – Lenin wrote directly to the Petrograd and the Moscow
committees: “The Bolsheviks have no right to await the Congress of
Soviets. They ought to seize the power _right now_ ... Delay is a crime.
Waiting for the Congress of Soviets is a childish toying with
formalities, a shameful toying with formalities, betrayal of the
revolution.” From the standpoint of hierarchical attitudes towards
action, Lenin was by no means beyond reproach, but the question here was
of something bigger than considerations of formal discipline.

One of the members of the Vyborg District Committee, Sveshnikov,
remembers: “Ilych from underground was writing and writing untiringly,
and Nadyezhda Constantinovna (Krupskaia) often read these manuscripts to
us in the district committee ... The burning words of the leader would
redouble our strength ... I remember as though it were yesterday the
bending figure of Nadyezhda Constantinovna in one of the rooms of the
district administration, where the typists were working, carefully
comparing the copy with the original, and right alongside stood Uncle
and Gene demanding a copy each.” “Uncle” and “Gene” were old
conspirative pseudonyms for two leaders of the district. “Not long ago,”
relates the district worker, Naumov, “we got a letter from Ilych for
delivery to the Central Committee ... We read the letter and gasped. It
seems that Lenin had long ago put before the Central Committee the
question of insurrection. We raised a row. We began to bring pressure on
them.” It was just this that was needed.

In the first days of October, Lenin appealed to a Petrograd party
conference to speak a firm word in favour of insurrection. Upon his
initiative the conference “insistently requests the Central Committee to
take all measures for the leadership of the inevitable insurrection of
the workers, soldiers and peasants.” In this phrase alone there are two
kinds of camouflage: juridical and diplomatic: It speaks of the
leadership of an “inevitable insurrection” instead of the direct
preparation of insurrection, in order not to place trump cards in the
hands of the district attorney; and it “requests the Central Committee”
– it does not demand, and it does not protest – this in obvious
deference to the prestige of the highest institution of the party. But
in another resolution, also written by Lenin, the speech is more frank:
“In the upper circles of the party a wavering is to be observed, a sort
of dread of the struggle for power, an inclination to replace this
struggle with resolutions, protests, and conferences.” This is already
almost a direct pitting of the party against the Central Committee.
Lenin did not decide lightly upon such steps. But it was a question of
the fate of the revolution, and all other considerations fell away.

On October 8, Lenin addressed the Bolshevik delegates of the forthcoming
Northern Regional Congress: “We must not await the All-Russian Congress
of Soviets which the Central Executive Committee is able to postpone
even to November. We must not delay and let Kerensky bring in more
Kornilov troops.” That Regional Conference, at which Finland, the fleet
and Reval were represented, should take the initiative in “an immediate
move on Petrograd.” The direct summons to immediate insurrection was
this time addressed to the representatives of scores of soviets. The
summons came from Lenin personally. There was no party decision; the
higher institutions of the party had not yet expressed themselves.

It required a mighty confidence in the proletariat, in the party, but
also a very serious mistrust of the Central Committee, in order over its
head, upon his own personal responsibility, from underground, and by
means of a few small sheets of notepaper minutely inscribed, to raise an
agitation for an armed revolution, for an armed overthrow of the
government. How could it happen that Lenin, whom we have seen at the
beginning of April isolated among the leaders of his own party, found
himself again solitary in the same group in September and early October?
This cannot be understood if you believe the unintelligent legend which
portrays the history of Bolshevism as an emanation of the pure
revolutionary idea. In reality Bolshevism developed in a definite social
milieu undergoing its heterogeneous influences and among them the
influence of a petty bourgeois environment and of cultural backwardness.
To each new situation the party adapted itself only by way of an inner
crisis.

In order that the sharp pre-October struggle in the Bolshevik upper
circles may come before us in a true light, it is necessary again to
look back at those processes in the party of which we spoke in the first
volume. This is the more necessary since exactly at this present time
the faction of Stalin is making unheard-of efforts, and that, too, on an
international scale, to wipe out of historic memory every recollection
of how the October revolution was in reality prepared and achieved.

In the years before the war the Bolsheviks had described themselves in
the legal press as “consistent democrats.” This pseudonym was not
accidentally chosen. The slogans of revolutionary democracy, Bolshevism
and Bolshevism alone carried through to its logical conclusion. But in
its prognosis of the revolution it did not go beyond this. The war,
however, inseparably binding up the bourgeois democrats with
imperialism, proved conclusively that the programme of “consistent
democracy” could be no otherwise enacted than through a proletarian
revolution. Every Bolshevik to whom the war did not make this clear was
inevitably destined to be caught unaware by the revolution, and
converted into a left fellow-traveller of the bourgeois democracy.

However, a careful study of the materials characterising the party life
during the war and the beginning of the revolution, notwithstanding the
extreme and unprecedented scantiness of these materials – and then
beginning with 1923 their increasing disingenuousness – reveals more
clearly every day the immense intellectual backsliding of the upper
stratum of the Bolsheviks during the war when the proper life of the
party practically came to an end. The cause of this backsliding is
twofold: isolation from the masses and isolation from those abroad –
that is primarily from Lenin. The result was a drowning in isolation and
provincialism.

Not one of the old Bolsheviks in Russia, left each to himself,
formulated throughout the whole war one document which might be looked
upon as even the tiniest beacon-light on the road from the Second
International to the Third. “The problems of peace, the character of the
coming revolution, the rôle of the party in a future Provisional
Government, etc.” – thus wrote one of the old members of the party,
Antonov-Saratovsky, some years ago – “were conceived by us vaguely
enough or did not enter into our field of reflection at all.” Up to this
time there has not been published one article, not one page of a diary,
not one letter in which Stalin, Molotov, or any other of the leaders
formulated even indirectly, even very hastily, his views upon the
perspectives of the war and the revolution. This does not mean, of
course, that the “old Bolsheviks” wrote nothing on these questions
during the years of the war, of the collapse of the social democracy and
the preparation of the Russian revolution. These historic events too
insistently demanded an answer; jail and exile, moreover, gave plenty of
leisure for meditation and correspondence. But among all that was
written on these themes, not one thing has turned up which might even
with stretching be interpreted as an approach to the ideas of the
October revolution. It is sufficient to remember that the Institute of
Party History has been forbidden to print one line from the pen of
Stalin during the years 1914-1917, and has been compelled to hide
carefully the most important documents of March 1917. In the official
political biographies of a majority of the ruling stratum, the years of
the war present a vacant space. That is the unadorned truth.

One of the most recent young historians, Bayevsky, specially delegated
to demonstrate how the upper circles of the party developed during the
war in the direction of proletarian revolution, was unable, in spite of
his manifest flexibility of scientific conscience, to squeeze out of the
materials anything more than the following meagre statement: “It is
impossible to follow the course of this process, but certain documents
and memoirs indubitably prove that there were subterranean searchings of
the party mind in the direction of the April theses of Lenin ...” As
though it were a question of subterranean searchings, and not of
scientific appraisals and political prognoses!

It was possible to arrive _a priori_ at the ideas of the October
revolution, not in Siberia, not in Moscow, not even in Petrograd, but
only at the crossing of the roads of world history. The tasks of a
belated bourgeois revolution had to be seen inter-crossing with the
perspectives of a world proletarian movement, before it could seem
possible to advance a programme of proletarian dictatorship for Russia.
A higher point of observation was necessary – not a national but an
international horizon – to say nothing of a more serious armament than
was possessed by the so-called Russian “practicals” of the party.

In their eyes the overthrow of the monarchy was to open the era of a
“free” republican Russia, in which they intended, following the example
of the western countries, to begin a struggle for socialism. Three old
Bolsheviks, Rykov, Skvortzov, and Vegman, “at the direction of the
social democrats of the Narym district liberated by the revolution,”
sent a telegram in March from Tomsk: “We send a greeting to the
resurrected _Pravda_ which has so successfully prepared the
revolutionary cadres for the conquest of political liberty. We express
our profound confidence that it will succeed in uniting all around its
banner for the further struggle in the name of the national revolution.”
A whole world-philosophy emerges from this collective telegram. It is
separated by an abyss from the April theses of Lenin. The February
revolution immediately converted the leading layer of the party, with
Kamenev, Rykov and Stalin at their head, into democratic defensists – in
motion, moreover, toward the right, in the direction of a rapprochement
with the Mensheviks. The future historian of the party, Yaroslavsky, the
future head of the Central Control Commission, Ordzhonikidze, and the
future president of the Ukrainian Central Executive Committee,
Petrovsky, published during March in Yakutsk, in close union with the
Mensheviks, a paper called the Social Democrat, which stood on the
borderland of patriotic reform and liberalism. In recent years the
issues of this publication have been carefully collected and destroyed.

The Petersburg _Pravda_ tried at the beginning of the revolution to
occupy an internationalist position – to be sure, a very contradictory
one for it did not transcend the framework of bourgeois democracy. The
authoritative Bolsheviks arriving from exile immediately imparted to the
central organ a democratical-patriotic policy. Kalinin, in defending
himself on the 30th of May against a charge of opportunism, recalled
this fact: “Take _Pravda_ for example. At the beginning _Pravda_ had one
policy. Came Stalin, Muranov, Kamenev, and turned the helm of _Pravda_
to the other side.”

“We must frankly acknowledge,” wrote Angarsky, a member of this stratum,
when it was still permissible to write such things, “that an enormous
number of the old Bolsheviks held fast up to the April party conference
to the old Bolshevik views of 1905 as to the character of the revolution
of 1917, and that the renunciation of these views, the outgrowing of
them, was not so easily accomplished.” It would be well to add that
those ideas of 1905, having outlived themselves, had ceased in 1917 to
be “old Bolshevik views” and had become the ideas of patriotic reform.

“The April theses of Lenin,” says an official historic publication,
“just simply had no luck in the Petrograd committee. Only two against
thirteen voted for these theses, which created an epoch, and one
abstained from the vote.” “Lenin’s argument seemed too bold even for his
most rapturous followers,” writes Podvoisky. Lenin’s speeches – in the
opinion of the Petrograd committee and the Military Organisation –
“isolated the party of the Bolsheviks, and thus, it goes without saying,
damaged the position of the proletariat and the party in the extreme.”

“We must say frankly,” wrote Molotov some years ago, “the party lacked
that clarity and resolution which the revolutionary movement demanded
... The agitation and the whole revolutionary party work in general had
no firm foundation, since our thoughts had not yet arrived at bold
conclusions in regard to the necessity of an immediate struggle for
socialism and the socialist revolution.” The break began only in the
second month of the revolution. “From the time of Lenin’s arrival in
Russia in April 1917” – so testifies Molotov – “our party felt firm
ground under its feet ... Up to that moment the party was only weakly
and diffidently groping its way.”

Stalin at the end of March had spoken in favour of military defence, of
conditional support to the Provisional government and the pacifist
manifesto of Sukhanov, and of merging with the party of Tseretelli.
“This mistaken position,” Stalin himself retrospectively acknowledged in
1924, “I then shared with other party comrades, and I renounced it fully
only in the middle of April when I adhered to the theses of Lenin. A new
orientation was necessary. Lenin gave the party that new orientation in
his celebrated April theses.”

Kalinin even at the end of April was still standing for a voting bloc
with the Mensheviks. At the Petrograd city conference of the party Lenin
said: “I am sharply opposed to Kalinin, because a bloc with ...
chauvinists is unthinkable ... That is treason to socialism.” Kalinin’s
attitude was not exceptional even in Petrograd. It was said at the
conference: “Under the influence of Lenin the amalgamation fumes are
dissipating.”

In the provinces the resistance to Lenin’s theses lasted considerably
longer – in a number of provinces almost to October. According to a Kiev
worker, Sivtzov, “The ideas set forth in the theses (of Lenin) were not
immediately accepted by the whole Kiev Bolshevik organisation. A number
of comrades, including G. Piatakov, disagreed with the theses ...” A
railroad worker of Kharkov, Morgunov, says: “The old Bolsheviks enjoyed
a great influence among all the railroad workers ... Many of the old
Bolsheviks remained outside of our faction. After the February
revolution a number of them registered as Mensheviks by mistake, a thing
at which they themselves afterwards laughed, wondering how it could have
happened.” There is no lack of this and similar testimony.

In spite of all this, the mere mention of a rearming of the party
carried out by Lenin in April, is regarded by the present official
historians as blasphemy. These most recent historians have substituted
for the historic criterion the criterion of honour to the party uniform.
On this theme they are deprived of the right to quote even Stalin
himself, who was obliged to acknowledge the great depth of the April
change. “The famous April theses of Lenin were necessary,” he wrote, “in
order that the party should come out with one bold step on a new road.”
“A new orientation,” “a new road” – that means the rearming of the
party. Six years later, however, Yaroslovsky, who ventured in his
capacity of historian to recall the fact that Stalin had occupied at the
beginning of the revolution “a mistaken position upon fundamental
questions” was furiously denounced from all sides. The idol of prestige
is the most gluttonous of all monsters.

The revolutionary tradition of the party, the pressure of the workers
from below, and Lenin’s criticism from above, compelled the upper
stratum during the months of April and May – employing the words of
Stalin – “to come out on a new road.” But one would have to be
completely ignorant of political psychology to imagine that a mere
voting for the theses of Lenin meant an actual and complete renunciation
of the “mistaken position on fundamental questions.” In reality those
crass democratic views organically fortified during the war, merely
accommodated themselves to the new programme, remaining in silent
opposition to it.

On the 6th of August Kamenev, contrary to the decision of the April
conference of the Bolsheviks, spoke in the Executive Committee in favour
of participating in the Stockholm conference of the Social Patriots then
in preparation. Kamenev’s speech met no opposition in the central organ
of the party. Lenin wrote a formidable article, which appeared, however,
only ten days after Kamenev’s speech. The resolute insistence of Lenin
himself and other members of the Central Committee was required to
induce the editorial staff, headed by Stalin, to publish the protesting
article.

A convulsion of doubt went through the party after the July Days. The
isolation of the proletarian vanguard frightened many leaders,
especially in the provinces. During the Kornilov days these frightened
ones tried to get in contact with the Compromisers, which again evoked a
warning cry from Lenin.

On August 20, Stalin, as editor of _Pravda_, printed without dissenting
comment an article of Zinoviev, entitled _What Not to Do_, an article
directed against the preparation of an insurrection. “We must look the
truth in the face: In Petrograd there are now many conditions favourable
to the outbreak of an insurrection of the type of the Paris Commune of
1871 ...” On September 3, Lenin – in another connection and without
naming Zinoviev but striking him an indirect blow – wrote: “The
reference to the Commune is very superficial and even stupid. For in the
first place the Bolsheviks after all have learned something since 1871.
They would not fail to seize the banks, they would not renounce the
offensive against Versailles, and in these conditions even the Commune
might have succeeded. Moreover the Commune could not immediately offer
the people what the Bolsheviks can if they come to power, namely, land
to the peasants and an immediate proposal of peace ...” This was a
nameless but unequivocal warning not only to Zinoviev, but also to the
editor of _Pravda_, Stalin.

The question of the Pre-Parliament split the Central Committee in half.
The decision of the Bolshevik faction of the Conference in favour of
participating in the Pre-Parliament was ratified by many local
committees, if not a majority of them. It was so for instance in Kiev.
“On the question of ... entering the Pre-Parliament,” says E. Bosh in
her memoirs, “the majority of the committee voted for participation and
elected Piatakov as its delegate.” In many cases – as for example
Kamenev, Rykov, Piatakov and others – it is possible to trace a
succession of waverings: against the theses of Lenin in April, against
the boycott of the Pre-Parliament in September, against the insurrection
in October. On the other hand, the next lower stratum of the Bolsheviks,
standing nearer to the masses and being more fresh politically, easily
accepted the slogan of boycott and compelled the committees, including
the Central Committee itself, to make an about-face. Under the influence
of letters from Lenin, the city conference of Kiev voted with an
overwhelming majority against their committee. Similarly at almost all
sharp political turning-points Lenin relied upon the lower strata of the
party machine against the higher, or on the party mass against the
machine as a whole.

In these circumstances the pre-October waverings could least of all
catch Lenin unawares. He was armed in advance with a sharp-eyed
suspicion, was watching for alarming symptoms, was making the worst
possible assumptions; and he considered it more expedient to bring
excess pressure than to be indulgent.

It was at the suggestion of Lenin beyond a doubt that the Moscow
Regional Bureau adopted at the end of September a bitter resolution
against the Central Committee, accusing it of irresolution, wavering and
introducing confusion into the ranks of the party, and demanding that it
“take a clear and definite course toward insurrection.” In the name of
the Moscow Bureau, Lomov on the 3rd of October reported this decision to
the Central Committee. The minutes remark: “It was decided not to debate
the question.” The Central Committee was still continuing to dodge the
question what to do. But Lenin’s pressure, brought to bear through
Moscow, had its result: After two days the Central Committee decided to
withdraw from the Pre-Parliament.

That this step meant entering the road of insurrection was clear to the
enemies and opponents. “Trotsky in leading his army out of the
Pre-Parliament,” writes Sukhanov, “was definitely steering a course
towards violent revolution.” The report of the Petrograd Soviet on
withdrawal from the Pre-Parliament ended with the cry: “Long live the
direct and open struggle for revolutionary power in the country!” That
was October 9th.

On the following day, upon the demand of Lenin, occurred the famous
session of the Central Committee where the question of insurrection was
flatly posed. From the beginning of that session Lenin placed his
further policy in dependence upon its outcome: either through the
Central Committee or against it. “O new jest of the merry muse of
history!” writes Sukhanov. “That high-up and decisive session was held
in my apartment, still on the same Karpovka (32, Apartment 31). But all
this was without my knowledge.” The wife of the Menshevik, Sukhanov, was
a Bolshevik. “That time special measures were taken to assure my
sleeping outside the house: at least my wife made carefully sure of my
intention, and gave me friendly and impartial advice – not to tire
myself out after my work with the long journey home. In any case the
lofty assemblage was completely safe from any invasion from me.” What
was more important, it proved safe from invasions from Kerensky’s
police.

Twelve of the twenty-one members of the Central Committee were present.
Lenin came in wig and spectacles without a beard. The session lasted
about ten hours – deep into the night. In the intervals there were tea
with bread and sausage for reinforcement. And reinforcement was needed:
it was a question of seizing the power in the former empire of the
czars. The session began, as always, with an organisational report from
Sverdlov. This time his communication was devoted to the front – and
evidently by previous agreement with Lenin, in order to give him support
for the necessary inferences. This was quite in accord with Lenin’s
methods. Representatives of the army of the northern front gave warning
through Sverdlov of preparations by the counter-revolutionary command
for some sort of “shady plot involving a withdrawal of troops inland”;
from Minsk, the headquarters of the western front, it was reported that
a new Kornilov insurrection was in preparation; in view of the
revolutionary character of the local garrison, headquarters had
surrounded the city with Cossack troops. “Some sort of negotiations of a
suspicious character are in progress between headquarters and the
general staff”; it is quite possible to seize the headquarters in Minsk:
the local garrison is ready to disarm the Cossack ring; they are also in
a position to send a revolutionary corps from Minsk to Petrograd; the
mood on the front is for the Bolsheviks; they will go against Kerensky.
– Such was Sverdlov’s report. It was not in every part sufficiently
definite, but it was entirely encouraging in character.

Lenin immediately took the offensive: “From the beginning of September
there has been a kind of indifference to the question of insurrection.”
References are made to the cooling off and disappointment of the masses.
No wonder. “The masses are tired of words and resolutions.” We must take
the situation as a whole. Events in the city are now taking place
against the background of a gigantic peasant movement. The government
would require colossal forces in order to quell the agrarian
insurrection. “The political situation is thus ready. We must talk of
the technical side. That is the whole thing. Meanwhile in the manner of
the defensists we are inclined to regard the systematic preparation of
insurrection as something in the nature of a political sin.” The speaker
was obviously restraining himself: He had too much feeling piled up in
him. “We must make use of the northern regional congress and the
proposal from Minsk in order to start a decisive action.”

The northern congress opened exactly on the day of this session of the
Central Committee, and was to close in two or three days. The beginning
of “decisive action” Lenin presented as the task of the next days. We
must not wait. We must not postpone. On the front – as we have heard
from Sverdlov – they are preparing an overturn. Will the Congress of
Soviets ever be held? We do not know. We must seize the power
immediately and not wait for any congresses. “Never to be communicated
or reproduced,” wrote Trotsky several years later, “was the general
spirit of those tense and passionate impromptu speeches, saturated with
a desire to instil into the objecting, the wavering, the doubtful, his
thought, his will, his confidence, his courage ...”

Lenin expected strong resistance, but his fears were soon dispelled. The
unanimity with which the Central Committee had rejected the proposal of
immediate insurrection in September had been episodic: The left wing had
been against the “surrounding of the Alexandrinka” for temporary
reasons; the right for reasons of general strategy, although these were
not as yet thoroughly thought out. During the three weeks following
there had been a considerable shift to the left in the Central
Committee. Ten against two voted for the insurrection. That was a big
victory!

Soon after the revolution, at a new stage in the inner party struggle,
Lenin recalled during a debate in the Petrograd committee how up to that
session of the Central Committee, he “had fears of opportunism from the
side of the internationalist fusionists, but these were dissipated. In
our party, however, certain members (of the Central Committee) did not
agree. This grieved me deeply.” Aside from Trotsky, whom Lenin could
hardly have had in mind, the only “internationalists” in the Central
Committee were Joffé, the future ambassador in Berlin, Uritzky the
future head of the Cheka in Petrograd, and Sokolnikov, the future
inventor of the Chervonetz. All three took the side of Lenin. His
opponents were two old Bolsheviks, closest of all to Lenin in their past
work: Zinoviev and Kamenev. It is to them he referred when he said “this
grieved me very much.” That session of the 10th reduced itself almost
entirely to a passionate polemic against Zinoviev and Kamenev. Lenin led
the attack, and the rest joined in one after the other.

The resolution, written hastily by Lenin with the gnawed end of a pencil
on a sheet of paper from a child’s notebook ruled in squares, was very
unsymmetrical in architecture, but nevertheless gave firm support to the
course towards insurrection. “The Central Committee recognises that both
the international situation of the Russian revolution (the insurrection
in the German fleet, as the extreme manifestation of the growth
throughout Europe of a world-wide socialist revolution, and also the
threat of a peace between the imperialists with the aim of strangling
the revolution in Russia) – and the military situation (the indubitable
decision of the Russian bourgeoisie and Kerensky and Co. to surrender
Petersburg to the Germans) – all this in connection with the peasant
insurrection and the swing of popular confidence to our party (the
elections in Moscow), and finally the obvious preparation of a second
Kornilov attack (the withdrawal of troops from Petersburg, the
importation of Cossacks into Petersburg, the surrounding of Minsk with
Cossacks, etc.) – all this places armed insurrection on the order of the
day. Thus recognising that the armed insurrection is inevitable and
fully ripe, the Central Committee recommends to all organisations of the
party that they be guided by this, and from this point of view consider
and decide all practical questions (the Congress of Soviets of the
Northern Region, the withdrawal of troops from Petersburg, the
coming-out of Moscow and Minsk).”

A remarkable thing here as characterising both the moment and the author
is the very order in which the conditions of the insurrection are
enumerated. First comes the ripening of the world revolution; the
insurrection in Russia is regarded only as the link in a general chain.
That was Lenin’s invariable starting-point, his major premise: he could
not reason otherwise. The task of insurrection he presented directly as
the task of the party. The difficult question of bringing its
preparation into accord with the soviets is as yet not touched upon. The
All-Russian Congress of Soviets does not get a word. To the northern
regional congress and the “coming-out of Moscow and Minsk” as points of
support for the insurrection was added, upon the insistence of Trotsky,
“the withdrawal of troops from Petersburg.” This was the sole hint of
that plan of insurrection which was subsequently dictated by the course
of events in the capital. Nobody proposed any tactical amendments to the
resolution, which defined only the strategical starting-point of the
insurrection, as against Zinoviev and Kamenev who rejected the very
necessity of insurrection.

The very recent attempt of official historians to present this matter as
though the whole guiding stratum of the party except Zinoviev and
Kamenev stood for the insurrection, goes to pieces when confronted by
facts and documents. Aside from the fact that those voting for
insurrection were much of the time inclined to push it off into an
indefinite future, the open enemies of the insurrection, Zinoviev and
Kamenev, were not alone even in the Central Committee. Rykov and Nogin
who were absent at the session of the 10th stood wholly upon their point
of view, and Miliutin was close to them. “In the upper circles of the
party a wavering is to be observed, a sort of dread of the struggle for
power” – such is the testimony of Lenin himself. According to
Antonov-Saratovsky Miliutin, arriving in Saratov after the 10th, “told
about the letter of Ilych demanding that we ‘begin,’ about the waverings
in the Central Committee, the preliminary ‘failure’ of Lenin’s proposal,
about his indignation, and finally about how the course was taken
towards insurrection.” The Bolshevik, Sadovsky, wrote later about “a
certain vagueness and lack of confidence which prevailed at that time.
Even among our Central Committee of those days, as is well known, there
were debates and conflicts about how to begin and whether to begin at
all.”

Sadovsky himself was during that period one of the leaders of the
military section of the Soviet and Military Organisation of the
Bolsheviks. But it was exactly these members of the Military
Organisation – as appears from numerous memoirs – who were most
exceptionally prejudiced in October against the idea of insurrection.
The specific character of the organisation inclined its leaders to
underestimate the political conditions and overestimate the technical.
On the 16th of October, Krylenko reported: “The larger part of the
bureau (the Military Organisation) think that we should not force the
issue practically, but the minority think that we can take the
initiative.” On the 18th another prominent member of the Military
Organisation, Lashevich, said: “Ought we not to seize the power
immediately? I think that we ought not to speed up the course of events
... There is no guarantee that we will succeed in holding the power ...
The strategic plan proposed by Lenin limps on all four legs.”
Antonov-Ovseenko tells about a meeting of the chief military workers
with Lenin: “Podvoisky expressed doubt; Nevsky at first seconded him,
but then fell into the confident tone of Ilych; I described the
situation in Finland ... Lenin’s confidence and firmness had a
fortifying effect upon me and cheered up Nevsky, but Podvoisky remained
stubbornly dubious.” We must not forget that in all recollections of
this kind, the doubts are painted in with water colours and the
confidence in heavy oil.

Chudnovsky spoke decisively against the insurrection. The sceptical
Manuilsky warningly asserted that “the front is not with us.” Tomsky was
against the insurrection. Volodarsky supported Zinoviev and Kamenev.
Moreover by no means all the opponents of the insurrection spoke openly.
At a session of the Petrograd Committee on the 15th, Kalinin said: “The
resolution of the Central Committee was one of the best resolutions ever
adopted by the Central Committee ... We are practically approaching the
armed insurrection. But when it will be possible – perhaps a year from
now – is unknown.” This kind of “agreement” with the Central Committee,
although perfectly characteristic of Kalinin, was not peculiar to him.
Many adhered to the resolution in order in that way to insure their
struggle against the insurrection.

In Moscow least of all was there unanimity among the leaders. The
regional bureau supported Lenin. In the Moscow committee there were very
considerable hesitations; the prevailing mood was in favour of delay.
The provincial committee occupied an indefinite position, but in the
regional bureau, according to Yakovleva, they thought that at the
decisive moment the provincial committee would swing over to the
opponents of insurrection.

Lebedev from Saratov tells how in visiting Moscow not long before the
revolution, he took a walk with Rykov, and how the latter, pointing to
the stone houses, the rich stores, the business-like excitement about
them, complained of the difficulty of the coming task. “Here in the very
centre of bourgeois Moscow we really seem to be pygmies thinking of
moving a mountain.”

In every organisation of the party, in every one of its provincial
committees, there were people of the same mood as Zinoviev and Kamenev.
In many committees they were the majority. Even in proletarian
Ivanovo-Voznesensk, where the Bolsheviks ruled alone, the disagreement
among the ruling circles took an extraordinarily sharp form. In 1925,
when memoirs had already accommodated themselves to the demands of the
new course, Kisselev, an old worker Bolshevik, wrote: “The workers’ part
of the party, with the exception of certain individuals, went with
Lenin. Against Lenin, however, was a small group of party intellectuals
and solitary workers.” In public discussion the opponents of
insurrection repeated the same arguments as those of Zinoviev and
Kamenev. “But in private arguments,” writes Kisselev, “the polemic took
a more acute and candid form, and here they went so far as to say that
‘Lenin is a crazy man; he is pushing the working-class to certain ruin.
From this armed insurrection we will get nothing; they will shatter us,
exterminate the party and the working-class, and that will postpone the
revolution for years and years, etc.’” Such was the attitude of Frunze
in particular, a man of great personal courage but not distinguished by
a wide outlook.

Even the victory of the insurrection in Petrograd was far from breaking
everywhere the inertia of the waiting policy and the direct resistance
of the right wing. The wavering of the leaders subsequently almost
shipwrecked the insurrection in Moscow. In Kiev, the committee headed by
Piatakov, which had been conducting a purely defensive policy, turned
over the initiative in the long run – and afterward the power also – to
the Rada. “The organisation of our party in Voronezh,” says Vrachev,
“wavered very considerably. The actual overturn in Voronezh ... was
carried out not by a committee of the party, but by its active minority
with Moiseiev at the head.” In a whole series of provincial cities the
Bolsheviks formed in October a bloc with the Compromisers “against the
counter-revolution.” As though the Compromisers were not at that moment
one of its chief supports Almost everywhere a push was required both
from above and below to shatter the last indecisiveness of the local
committee, compel it to break with the Compromisers and lead the
movement. ‘The end of October and the beginning of November were verily
days of ‘the great turmoil’ in our party circles. Many quickly
surrendered to moods.” Thus reports Shliapnikov, who himself made no
small contribution to these waverings.

All those elements which, like the Kharkov Bolsheviks, had found
themselves in the Menshevik camp in the beginning of the revolution and
afterwards themselves wondered “just how that could have happened,”
found no place for themselves at all as a general rule in the October
Days but merely wavered and waited. These people have now all the more
confidently advanced their claims as “old Bolsheviks” in the period of
intellectual reaction. In spite of the vast work that has been done in
recent years towards concealing these facts, and even without the secret
archives which are now inaccessible to the investigator, plenty of
testimony has been preserved in the newspapers, memoirs and historic
journals of that time, to prove that on the eve of the overturn the
official machine even of this most revolutionary party put up a big
resistance. Conservatism inevitably finds its seat in a bureaucracy. The
machine can fulfil a revolutionary function only so long as it remains
an instrument in the service of the party, so long as it remains
subordinate to an idea and is controlled by the mass.

The resolution of October 10th became immensely important. It promptly
put the genuine advocates of insurrection on the firm ground of party
right. In all the party organisations, in all its nuclei, the most
resolute elements began to be advanced to the responsible posts. The
party organisations, beginning with Petrograd, pulled themselves
together, made an inventory of their forces and material resources,
strengthened their communications, and gave a more concentrated
character to the campaign for an overturn.

But the resolution did not put an end to disagreements in the Central
Committee. On the contrary, it only formulated them and brought them to
the surface. Zinoviev and Kamenev, who but yesterday had felt surrounded
in a certain section of the leading circles by an atmosphere of
sympathy, observed with fright how swiftly things were shifting to the
left. They decided to lose no more time, and on the very next day
distributed a voluminous address to the members of the party. “Before
history, before the international proletariat, before the Russian
revolution and the Russian working-class,” they wrote, “we have no right
to stake the whole future at the present moment upon the card of armed
insurrection.”

Their plan was to enter as a strong opposition party into the
Constituent Assembly, which “in its revolutionary work can rely only
upon the soviets.” Hence their formula: “Constituent Assembly and
soviets – that, is, the combined type of state institution toward which
we are travelling.” The Constituent Assembly where the Bolsheviks, it
was assured, would be a minority, and the soviets where the Bolsheviks
were a majority – that is, the organ of the bourgeoisie and the organ of
the proletariat – were to be “combined” in a peaceful system of dual
power. That had not succeeded even under the leadership of the
Compromisers. How could it succeed when the soviets were Bolshevik?

“It is a profound historic error,” concluded Zinoviev and Kamenev, “to
pose the question of the transfer of power to the proletarian party –
either now or at any time. No, the party of the proletariat will grow,
its programme will become clear to broader and broader masses.”

This hope for a further unbroken growth of Bolshevism regardless of the
actual course of class conflicts, crashed head on against Lenin’s
_leitmotif_ in those days: “The success of the Russian and world
revolution depends upon a two or three days’ struggle.”

It is hardly necessary to explain that the truth in this dramatic
dialogue was wholly on Lenin’s side. A revolutionary situation cannot be
preserved at will. If the Bolsheviks had not seized the power in October
and November, in all probability they would not have seized it at all.
Instead of firm leadership the masses would have found among the
Bolsheviks that same disparity between word and deed which they were
already sick of, and they would have ebbed away in the course of two or
three months from this party which had deceived their hopes, just as
they had recently ebbed away from the Social Revolutionaries and
Mensheviks. A part of the workers would have fallen into indifferentism.
Another part would have burned up their force in convulsive movements in
anarchistic flare-ups, in guerrilla skirmishes, in a Terror dictated by
revenge and despair. The breathing-spell thus offered would have been
used by the bourgeoisie to conclude a separate peace with the
Hohenzollern, and stamp out the revolutionary organisations. Russia
would again have been included in the circle of capitalist states as a
semi-imperialist, semi-colonial country. The proletarian revolution
would have been deferred to an indefinite future. It was his keen
understanding of this prospect that inspired Lenin to that cry of alarm:
“The success of the Russian and world revolution depends upon a two or
three days’ struggle.”

But now, since the 10th of the month, the situation in the party had
radically changed. Lenin was no longer an isolated “oppositionist” whose
proposals were set aside by the Central Committee. It was the right wing
that was isolated. Lenin no longer had to gain the right of free
agitation at the price of resigning from the Central Committee. The
party legality was on his side. Zinoviev and Kamenev, on the other hand,
circulating their document attacking a decision adopted by the majority
of the Central Committee, were now the violators of discipline. And
Lenin in a struggle never left unpunished the oversights of his enemy –
even far slighter ones than that!

At the session of the 10th, upon the proposal of Dzerzhinsky, a
political bureau of seven men was elected: Lenin, Trotsky, Zinoviev,
Kamenev, Stalin, Solkolnikov, Bubnov. This new institution, however,
turned out completely impracticable. Lenin and Zinoviev were still in
hiding; Zinoviev, moreover, continued to wage a struggle against the
insurrection, and so did Kamenev. The political bureau in its October
membership never once assembled, and it was soon suddenly forgotten – as
were other organisations created _ad hoc_ in the whirlpool of events.

No practical plan of insurrection, even tentative, was sketched out in
the session of the 10th. But without introducing the fact into the
resolution, it was agreed that the insurrection should precede the
Congress of Soviets and begin, if possible, not later than October 15th.
Not all eagerly agreed to that date. It was obviously too short for the
take-off planned in Petrograd. But to insist on a delay would have been
to support the right wing and mix the cards. Besides, it is never too
late to postpone!

The fact of this preliminary setting of the date at the 15th was first
made public in Trotsky’s recollections of Lenin in 1924, seven years
after the event. The statement was soon disputed by Stalin, and the
question has become an acute one in Russian historic literature. As is
known, the insurrection actually occurred only on the 25th, and
consequently the date originally set was not held to, The epigone
historians consider it impossible that there should be a mistake in the
policy of the Central Committee, or even a delay in the matter of a
date. “It would follow,” writes Stalin upon this theme, “that the
Central Committee set the date of the insurrection for October 15th and
afterwards itself violated (!) this resolution, delaying the date of the
insurrection to October 25th. Is this true? No, it is not true.” Stalin
comes to the conclusion that “Trotsky’s memory has betrayed him.” In
proof of this he cites the resolution of October 10th which did not set
any date.

This debated question of the chronology of the insurrection is very
important to an understanding of the rhythm of events and demands
clarification. That the resolution of the 10th contained no date is
quite true. But this general resolution had to do with an insurrection
throughout the whole country, and was destined for hundreds and
thousands of leading party workers. To include in it the conspirative
date of an insurrection to be carried out in the next few days in
Petrograd, would have been unreasonable in the extreme. We must remember
that out of caution Lenin did not in those days even put a date on his
letters. In the given case it was a question of so important, and withal
so simple, a decision that none of the participants could have any
difficulty in remembering it – especially seeing that it was a question
only of a few days. Stalin’s reference to the text of the resolution
shows thus a complete failure to understand.

We are prepared to concede, however, that the reference of one of the
participants to his own memory, especially when his statement is
disputed by another participant, is not sufficient for the historic
investigator. Luckily the question is decided beyond possible doubt upon
another level – that of an analysis of conditions and documents.

The Congress of Soviets was to open on the 20th of October. Between the
session of the Central Committee and the date of the Congress, there
remained an interval of ten days. The Congress was not to agitate in
favour of power to the soviets but seize it. A few hundred delegates all
by themselves, however, were powerless to conquer the power; it was
necessary to seize it for the Congress and before the Congress. “First
conquer Kerensky and then summon the Congress” – that thought had stood
in the centre of Lenin’s whole agitation since the middle of September.
All those agreed with it in principle who stood for the seizure of power
in general. Consequently the Central Committee could not help setting
itself the task of attempting to carry an insurrection between the 10th
and 20th of October. And since it was impossible to foresee how many
days the struggle would last, the beginning of the insurrection was set
for the 15th. “About the actual date,” wrote Trotsky in his
recollections of Lenin, “there was, as I remember, almost no dispute.
All understood that the date was approximate, and set, as you might say
merely for purposes of orientation, and that it might be advanced or
retarded at the dictation of events. But this could be a question of
days only, and not more. The necessity of a date, and that, too, a near
one, was completely obvious.”

This testimony of political logic essentially exhausts the question. But
there is no lack of supplementary proof. Lenin insistently and
frequently proposed that the party avail itself of the Northern Regional
Congress of the Soviets for the beginning of military activities. The
resolution of the Central Committee adopted this idea. But the Regional
Congress, which had opened on the 10th, was to close just before the
15th.

At the conference on the 16th, Zinoviev, while insisting upon the
revocation of the resolution adopted six days before, made this demand:
“We must say to ourselves frankly that in the next five days we will not
make an insurrection.” He was referring to the five days still remaining
before the Congress of Soviets. Kamenev, arguing at the same conference
that “the appointing of an insurrection is adventurism,” reminded the
conference that “it was said before that the action ought to come before
the 20th.” Nobody objected to this statement and nobody could object. It
was the very delay of the insurrection which Kamenev was interpreting as
a failure of Lenin’s resolution. According to his words, “nothing has
been done during this week” towards an insurrection. That is obviously
an exaggeration. The setting of the date had compelled all to make their
plans more strict and hasten the tempo of their work. But it is
indubitable that the five-day interval indicated at the session of the
10th had turned out too short. The postponement was already a fact. It
was only on the 17th that the Central Executive Committee transferred
the opening of the Soviet Congress to the 25th. That postponement was as
opportune as anything could be.

Lenin, to whom in his isolation all these inner hindrances and
frictions, inevitably presented themselves in an exaggerated form, was
alarmed by the delay, and insisted upon the calling of a new meeting of
the Central Committee with representatives from the more important
branches of the party work in the capital. It was at this conference,
held on the 16th in the outskirts of the city, in Lesnoi, that Zinoviev
and Kamenev advanced the arguments quoted above for revoking the old
date and against naming a new.

The dispute was reopened with redoubled vigour. Miliutin’s opinion was:
“We are not ready to strike the first blow ... Another prospect arises:
Armed conflict ... It is growing, its possibility is drawing near. And
we ought to be ready for this conflict. But this prospect is a different
thing from insurrection.” Miliutin occupied that defensive position
which was more concisely defended by Zinoviev and Kamenev. Shotman, an
old Petrograd worker who lived through the whole history of the party,
has asserted that at this city conference, both in the party committee
and in the Military Revolutionary Committee, the mood was far less
militant than in the Central Committee. “We cannot come out but we ought
to get ready.” Lenin attacked Miliutin and Shotman for their pessimistic
appraisal of the correlation of forces: “It is not a question of a
struggle with the army, but a struggle of one part of the army with
another ... The facts prove that we have the advantage over the enemy.
Why cannot the Central Committee begin?”

Trotsky was not present at this meeting. During those same hours he was
carrying through the Soviet the resolution on the Military Revolutionary
Committee. But the point of view which had firmly crystallised in Smolny
during the past days was defended by Krylenko, who had just been
conducting hand in hand with Trotsky and Antonov-Ovseenko the Northern
Regional Congress of Soviets. Krylenko had no doubt that “the water is
boiling hard enough.” To take back the resolution in favour of
insurrection “would be the greatest possible mistake.” He disagreed with
Lenin, however, “on the question who shall begin it and how it shall
begin?” To set the date of the insurrection definitely now is still
inexpedient. “But the question of the removal of the troops is just that
fighting issue upon which the struggle is taking place ... The attack
upon us is thus already a fact, and this we can make use of ... It is
not necessary to worry about who shall begin, for the thing is already
begun.” Krylenko was expounding and defending the policy laid down by
the Military Revolutionary Committee and the Garrison Conference. It was
along this road that the insurrection continued to develop.

Lenin did not respond to the words of Krylenko. The living picture of
the last six days in Petrograd had not passed before his eyes. Lenin
feared delay. His attention was fixed upon the outright opponents of
insurrection. All by-remarks, conditional formula, inadequately
categorical answers, he was inclined to interpret as an indirect support
to Zinoviev and Kamenev, who were opposing him with the determination of
people who have burned their bridges behind them. “The week’s results,”
argued Kamenev, “testify that the data for an insurrection are now
lacking. We have no machine of insurrection. The enemy’s machine is far
stronger and has probably grown still greater during this week ... Two
tactics are in conflict here: the tactic of conspiracy and the tactic of
faith in the motive forces of the Russian revolution.” Opportunists
always believe in those motive forces whenever it becomes necessary to
fight.

Lenin replied: “If you consider that an insurrection is right, it is not
necessary to argue about conspiracy. If an insurrection is politically
inevitable, then we must relate ourselves to insurrection as to an art.”
It was along this line that the fundamental and really principled
dispute in the party took place – the dispute upon whose decision, upon
whose resolution one way or the other, depended the fate of the
revolution. However, within the general frame of Lenin’s formula, which
united the majority of the Central Committee, there arose subordinate,
but very important, questions: How on the basis of the ripened political
situation are we to approach the insurrection? How find a bridge from
the politics to the technique of revolution? And how lead the masses
along that bridge?

Joffé, who belonged to the left wing, had supported the resolution of
the 10th. But he opposed Lenin in one point: “It is not true that the
question is now purely technical. Now, too, the moment of insurrection
must be considered from the political point of view.” This very last
week has shown that for the party, for the Soviet, for the masses, the
insurrection has not yet become a mere question of technique. For that
very reason we failed to keep to the date set on the 10th.

Lenin’s new resolution summoning “all organisations and all workers and
soldiers to an all-sided and most vigorous preparation of armed
insurrection,” was adopted by 20 voices against 2, Zinoviev and Kamenev,
with 3 abstaining. The official historians cite these figures as proof
of the complete insignificance of the opposition. But they simplify the
matter. The shift to the left in the depths of the party was already so
strong that the opponents of insurrection, not daring to come out
openly, felt it to their interest to remove any barrier of principle
between the two camps. If the overthrow, in spite of the date set
before, has not been realised by the 16th, can we not bring it about
that in the future, too, the thing will be limited to a platonic “course
toward insurrection”? That Kalinin was not so utterly alone was very
clearly revealed in that same session. The resolution of Zinoviev to the
effect that “any action before a conference with the Bolshevik section
of the Congress of Soviets is inadmissible,” was rejected by 15 votes
against 6, with 3 abstaining. This is where you find the real test of
opinions. Some of the “defenders” of the resolution of the Central
Committee really wanted to delay the decision until the Congress of
Soviets, and until a new conference with the Bolsheviks of the provinces
who were in their majority more moderate. Of these “defenders,” counting
also those abstaining, there were 9 men out of 24 – more, that is, than
a third. That, of course, is still a minority, but as a headquarters
rather an important one. The hopeless weakness of this headquarters lay
in the fact that it had no support in the lower ranks of the party or
the working class.

On the next day Kamenev, in agreement with Zinoviev, gave to Gorky’s
paper a declaration attacking the decision adopted the night before.
“Not only Zinoviev and I, but also a number of practical comrades,” –
thus wrote Kamenev – “think that to take the initiative in an armed
insurrection at the present moment, with the given correlation of social
forces, independently of and several days before the Congress of
Soviets, is an inadmissible step ruinous to the proletariat and the
revolution ... To stake everything ... on the card of insurrection in
the coming days would be an act of despair. And our party is too strong,
it has too great a future before it, to take such a step ...”
Opportunists always feel “too strong” to go into a fight.

Kamenev’s letter was a direct declaration of war against the Central
Committee, and that, too, upon a question upon which nobody was joking.
The situation immediately became extraordinarily acute. It was
complicated by several other personal episodes having a common political
source. At a session of the Petrograd Soviet on the 18th, Trotsky, in
answer to a question raised by the enemy, declared that the Soviet had
not set the date for an insurrection in the coming days, but that if it
became necessary to set one, the workers and soldiers would come out as
one man. Kamenev, sitting next to Trotsky in the præsidium, immediately
arose for a short statement: He wanted to sign his name to Trotsky’s
every word. That was a cunning ruse. Whereas Trotsky was juridically
screening a policy of attack with a speciously defensive formula,
Kamenev tried to make use of Trotsky’s formula – with which he was in
radical disagreement – in order to screen a directly opposite policy.

In order to annul the effect of Kamenev’s manoeuvre, Trotsky said on the
same day in a speech to the All-Russian Conference of Factory and Shop
Committees: “A civil war is inevitable. We have only to organise it as
painlessly as possible. We can achieve this not by wavering and
vacillation, but only by a stubborn and courageous struggle for power.”
All understood that those words about waverings were directed against
Zinoviev, Kamenev and their colleagues.

Besides that, Trotsky referred the question of Kamenev’s speech in the
Soviet to investigation by the next session of the Central Committee. In
the interval Kamenev, desiring to free his hands for agitation against
the insurrection, resigned from the Central Committee. The question was
taken up in his absence. Trotsky insisted that “the situation created is
absolutely intolerable,” and moved that Kamenev’s resignation be
accepted.[2]

Sverdlov, supporting Trotsky’s motion, read a letter of Lenin branding
Zinoviev and Kamenev as strikebreakers for their declaration in Gorky’s
paper, and demanding their expulsion from the party. “Kamenev’s trick at
the session of the Petrograd Soviet,” writes Lenin, “was something
positively vile. He is in complete accord, says he, with Trotsky! But is
it hard to understand that Trotsky could not, had no right, to say
before the enemy any more than he did say? Is it hard to understand that
... a decision as to the necessity of an armed insurrection, as to the
fact that it is fully ripe, as to its all-sided preparation, etc. ...
makes it necessary in public speeches to shoulder off not only the
blame, but also the initiative, upon the enemy ... Kamenev’s trick was
plain petty cheating ...”

When sending his indignant protest through Sverdlov, Lenin could not yet
know that Zinoviev, in a letter to the editors of the central organ, had
announced that his views “are very far from those which Lenin combats,”
and that he “subscribes to yesterday’s declaration of Trotsky in the
Petrograd Soviet.” Lunacharsky, a third opponent of insurrection, came
out in the press to the same effect. To complete the malicious
confusion, a letter of Zinoviev’s printed in the central organ on the
very day of the session of the Central Committee, the 20th, was
accompanied by a sympathetic remark from the editors: “We an our turn
express the hope that with the declaration made by Zinoviev (and also
the declaration of Kamenev in the Soviet) the question may be considered
settled. The sharpness of tone of Lenin’s article does not alter the
fact that in fundamentals we remain of one opinion.” That was a new blow
in the back, and moreover from a direction from which no one was
expecting it. At the time when Zinoviev and Kamenev were coming out in a
hostile press with open agitation against the decision of the Central
Committee in favour of insurrection, the central organ of the party
condemns the “sharpness” of Lenin’s tone and registers its solidarity
with Zinoviev and Kamenev “in fundamentals.” As though at that moment
there could be a more fundamental question than the question of
insurrection According to the brief minutes, Trotsky declared at the
session of the Central Committee: “The letters of Zinoviev and
Lunncharsky to the central organ, and also the remark of the editors are
intolerable.” Sverdlov supported the protest.

The editors at that time were Stalin and Solkolnikov. The minutes read:
“Solkolnikov states that he had no part in the declaration of the
editors on the subject of Zinoviev’s letter, and considers this
declaration an error.” It thus became known that Stalin personally and
alone – against the other member of the editorial board and a majority
of the Central Committee – supported Kamenev and Zinoviev at the most
critical moment, four days before the beginning of the insurrection,
with a sympathetic declaration. The indignation at this was great.

Stalin spoke against the acceptance of Kamenev’s resignation, arguing
that “our whole situation is self-contradictory.” That is, he took upon
himself the defence of that confusion which the members of the Central
Committee coming out against the insurrection had introduced into
people’s minds. Kamenev’s resignation was accepted by 5 votes against 3.
By 6 votes, again with Stalin opposing, a decision was adopted
forbidding Kamenev and Zinoviev to carry on a struggle against the
policy of the Central Committee. The minutes read: “Stalin announces
that he withdraws from the editorial board.” In order not to complicate
an already difficult situation, the Central Committee refused to accept
Stalin’s resignation.

This conduct on the part of Stalin might seem inexplicable in the light
of the legend which has been created around him. In reality it fully
corresponds to his spiritual mould and his political methods. When faced
by great problems, Stalin always retreats – not through lack of
character as in the case of Kamenev, but through narrowness of horizon
and lack of creative imagination. His suspicious caution almost
organically compels him at moments of great decision and deep difference
of opinion to retire into the shadow, to wait, and if possible to insure
himself against both outcomes. Stalin voted with Lenin for the
insurrection; Zinoviev and Kamenev were openly fighting against the
insurrection. But nevertheless – aside from the “sharpness of tone” of
Lenin’s criticism – “in fundamentals we remain of one opinion.” Stalin
made this editorial comment by no means through light-mindedness. On the
contrary he was carefully weighing the circumstances and the words. But
on the 20th of October he did not think it advisable to burn irrevocably
his bridge to the camp of the enemies of the uprising.

The testimony of these minutes, which we are compelled to quote, not
from the original, but from the official text as worked up by Stalin’s
secretariat, not only demonstrates the actual position of the figures in
the Bolshevik Central Committee, but also, in spite of its brevity and
dryness, unfolds before us an authentic panorama of the party leadership
as it existed in reality, with all its inner contradictions and
inevitable personal waverings. Not only history as a whole, but even its
very boldest turns, are accomplished by people to whom nothing human is
alien. But does this after all lessen the importance of what is
accomplished?

If we were to unfold on a screen the most brilliant of Napoleon’s
victories, the film would show us, side by side with genius, scope,
ingenuity, heroism, also the irresolution of individual marshals, the
confusion of generals unable to read the map, the stupidity of officers,
and the panic of whole detachments, even down to the bowels relaxed with
fright. This realistic document would only testify that the army of
Napoleon consisted not of the automatons of legend, but of living
Frenchmen born and brought up during the break between two epochs. And
the picture of human weaknesses would only the more plainly emphasise
the grandeur of the whole.

It is easier to theorise about a revolution afterward than absorb it
into your flesh and blood before it takes place. The approach of an
insurrection has inevitably produced, and always will produce, crisis in
the insurrectionary parties. This is demonstrated by the experience of
the most tempered and revolutionary party that history has up to this
time known. It is enough that, a few days before the battle, Lenin found
himself obliged to demand the expulsion from the party of his two
closest and most prominent disciples. The recent attempts to reduce this
conflict to “accidents” of a personal character have been dictated by a
purely churchly idealisation of the party’s past. Just as Lenin more
fully and resolutely than others expressed in the autumn months of 1917
the objective necessity of an insurrection, and the will of the masses
of revolution, so Zinoviev and Kamenev more frankly than others
incarnated the blocking tendencies of the party, the moods of
irresolution, the influence of petty bourgeois connections, and the
pressure of the ruling classes.

If all the conferences, debates, personal quarrels, which took place in
the upper layer of the Bolshevik party during October alone had been
taken down by a stenographer, posterity might convince itself with what
intense inner struggle the determination necessary for the overthrow was
crystallized among the heads of the party. The stenographic report would
show at the same time how much a revolutionary party has need of
internal democracy. The will to struggle is not stored up in advance,
and is not dictated from above – it has on every occasion to be
independently renewed and tempered.

Citing the assertion of the author of this book that “the party is the
fundamental instrument of proletarian revolution,” Stalin asked in 1924:
“How could our revolution conquer if its ‘fundamental instrument’ was no
good?” His irony did not conceal the primitive falsity of this
objection. Between the saints as the church paints them and the devils
as the candidates for sainthood portray them, there are to be found
living people. And it is they who make history. The high temper of the
Bolshevik party expressed itself not in an absence of disagreements,
waverings, and even quakings, but in the fact that in the most difficult
circumstances it gathered itself in good season by means of inner
crises, and made good its opportunity to interfere decisively in the
course of events. That means that the party as a whole was a quite
adequate instrument of revolution.

In practice a reformist party considers unshakable the foundations of
that which it intends to reform. It thus inevitably submits to the ideas
and morals of the ruling class. Having risen on the backs of the
proletariat, the social democrats became merely a bourgeois party of the
second order. Bolshevism created the type of the authentic
revolutionist, who subordinates to historic goals irreconcilable with
contemporary society the conditions of his personal existence, his
ideas, and his moral judgments. The necessary distance from bourgeois
ideology was kept up in the party by a vigilant irreconcilability, whose
inspirer was Lenin. Lenin never tired of working with his lancet,
cutting off those bonds which a petty bourgeois environment creates
between the party and official social opinion. At the same time Lenin
taught the party to create its own social opinion, resting upon the
thoughts and feelings of the rising class. Thus by a process of
selection and education – and in continual struggle – the Bolshevik
party created not only a political but a moral medium of its own,
independent of bourgeois social opinion and implacably opposed to it.
Only this permitted the Bolsheviks to overcome the waverings in their
own ranks and reveal in action that courageous determination without
which the October victory would have been impossible.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Ukokoshit.

2. In the minutes of the Central Committee for 1917, published in 1929,
it says that Trotsky explained his declaration to the Soviet on the
ground that “it was forced by Kamenev.” Here there is obviously an
erroneous record, or the record was subsequently incorrectly edited. The
declaration of Trotsky needed no special explanation; it flowed from the
circumstances. By a curious accident the Moscow Regional Comittee, which
wholly supported Lenin, found itself obliged to publish in the Moscow
party paper on the same day, the 18th, a declaration almost verbally
identical with the formula of Trotsky “We are not a conspirative party
and we do not set the date for our actions secretly ... When we decide
to come out, we will say so in our printed organ ...” It was impossible
to reply otherwise to the direct queries of the enemy. But although the
declaration of Trotsky was not, and could not have been, forced by
Kamenev, it was consciously compromised by Kamenev’s false solidarity
and that moreover under circumstances which deprived Trotsky of the
possibility of putting the missing dots on the i’s.



CHAPTER 43 THE ART OF INSURRECTION


 

People do not make revolution eagerly any more than they do war. There
is this difference, however, that in war compulsion plays the decisive
rôle, in revolution there is no compulsion except that of circumstances.
A revolution takes place only when there is no other way out. And the
insurrection, which rises above a revolution like a peak in the mountain
chain of its events, can no more be evoked at will than the revolution
as a whole. The masses advance and retreat several times before they
make up their minds to the final assault.

Conspiracy is ordinarily contrasted to insurrection as the deliberate
undertaking of a minority to a spontaneous movement of the majority. And
it is true that a victorious insurrection, which can only be the act of
a class called to stand at the head of the nation, is widely separated
both in method and historic significance from a governmental overturn
accomplished by conspirators acting in concealment from the masses.

In every class society there are enough contradictions so that a
conspiracy can take root in its cracks. Historic experience proves,
however, that a certain degree of social disease is necessary – as in
Spain, for instance, or Portugal, or South America – to supply continual
nourishment for a régime of conspiracies. A pure conspiracy even when
victorious can only replace one clique of the same ruling class by
another – or still less, merely alter the governmental personages. Only
mass insurrection has ever brought the victory of one social régime over
another. Periodical conspiracies are commonly an expression of social
stagnation and decay, but popular insurrections on the contrary come
usually as a result of some swift growth which has broken down the old
equilibrium of the nation. The chronic “revolutions” of the South
American republics have nothing in common with the Permanent Revolution;
they are in a sense the very opposite thing.

This does not mean, however, that popular insurrection and conspiracy
are in all circumstances mutually exclusive. An element of conspiracy
almost always enters to some degree into any insurrection. Being
historically conditioned by a certain stage in the growth of a
revolution, a mass insurrection is never purely spontaneous. Even when
it flashes out unexpectedly to a majority of its own participants, it
has been fertilised by those ideas in which the insurrectionaries see a
way out of the difficulties of existence. But a mass insurrection can be
foreseen and prepared. It can be organised in advance. In this case the
conspiracy is subordinate to the insurrection, serves it, smoothes its
path, hastens its victory. The higher the political level of a
revolutionary movement and the more serious its leadership, the greater
will be the place occupied by conspiracy in a popular insurrection.

It is very necessary to understand the relations between insurrection
and conspiracy, both as they oppose and as they supplement each other.
It is especially so, because the very use of the word conspiracy, even
in Marxian literature, contains a superficial contradiction due to the
fact that it sometimes implies an independent undertaking initiated by
the minority, at others a preparation by the minority of a majority
insurrection.

History testifies, to be sure, that in certain conditions a popular
insurrection can be victorious even without a conspiracy. Arising
“spontaneously” out of the universal indignation, the scattered
protests, demonstrations, strikes, street fights, an insurrection can
draw in a part of the army, paralyse the forces of the enemy, and
overthrow the old power. To a certain degree this is what happened in
February 1917 in Russia, Approximately the same picture is presented by
the development of the German and Austro-Hungarian revolutions of the
autumn of 1918. Since in these events there was no party at the head of
the insurrectionaries imbued through and through with the interests and
aims of the insurrection, its victory had inevitably to transfer the
power to those parties which up to the last moment had been opposing it.

To overthrow the old power is one thing; to take the power in one’s own
hands is another. The bourgeoisie may win the power in a revolution not
because it is revolutionary, but because it is bourgeois. It has in its
possession property, education, the press, a network of strategic
positions, a hierarchy of institutions. Quite otherwise with the
proletariat. Deprived in the nature of things of all social advantages,
an insurrectionary proletariat can count only on its numbers, its
solidarity, its cadres, its official staff.

Just as a blacksmith cannot seize the red hot iron in his naked hand, so
the proletariat cannot directly seize the power; it has to have an
organisation accommodated to this task. The co-ordination of the mass
insurrection with the conspiracy, the subordination of the conspiracy to
the insurrection, the organisation of the insurrection through the
conspiracy, constitutes that complex and responsible department of
revolutionary politics which Marx and Engels called “the art of
insurrection.” It presupposes a correct general leadership of the
masses, a flexible orientation in changing conditions, a thought-out
plan of attack, cautiousness in technical preparation, and a daring
blow.

Historians and politicians usually give the name of spontaneous
insurrection to a movement of the masses united by a common hostility
against the old régime, but not having a clear aim, deliberated methods
of struggle, or a leadership consciously showing the way to victory.
This spontaneous insurrection is condescendingly recognised by official
historians – at least those of democratic temper – as a necessary evil
the responsibility for which falls upon the old régime. The real reason
for their attitude of indulgence is that “spontaneous” insurrection
cannot transcend the framework of the bourgeois régime.

The social democrats take a similar position. They do not reject
revolution at large as a social catastrophe, any more than they reject
earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, eclipses and epidemics of the plague.
What they do reject – calling it “Blanquism,” or still worse, Bolshevism
– is the conscious preparation of an overturn, the plan, the conspiracy.
In other words, the social democrats are ready to sanction – and that
only _ex post facto_ – those overturns which hand the power to the
bourgeoisie, but they implacably condemn those methods which might alone
bring the power to the proletariat. Under this pretended objectivism
they conceal a policy of defence of the capitalist society.

From his observations and reflections upon the failure of the many
insurrections he witnessed or took part in. Auguste Blanqui derived a
number of tactical rules which if violated will make the victory of any
insurrection extremely difficult, if not impossible. Blanqui demanded
these things: a timely creation of correct revolutionary detachments,
their centralised command and adequate equipment, a well calculated
placement of barricades, their definite construction, and a systematic,
not a mere episodic, defence of them. All these rules, deriving from the
military problems of the insurrection, must of course change with social
conditions and military technique, but in themselves they are not by any
means “Blanquism” in the sense that this word approaches the German
“putschism,” or revolutionary adventurism.

Insurrection is an art, and like all arts it has its laws. The rules of
Blanqui were the demands of a military revolutionary realism. Blanqui’s
mistake lay not in his direct but his inverse theorem. From the fact
that tactical weakness condemns an insurrection to defeat, Blanqui
inferred that an observance of the rules of insurrectionary tactics
would itself guarantee the victory. Only from this point on is it
legitimate to contrast Blanquism with Marxism. Conspiracy does not take
the place of insurrection. An active minority of the proletariat, no
matter how well organised, cannot seize the power regardless of the
general conditions of the country. In this point history has condemned
Blanquism. But only in this. His affirmative theorem retains all its
force. In order to conquer the power, the proletariat needs more than a
spontaneous insurrection. It needs a suitable organisation, it needs a
plan: it needs a conspiracy. Such is the Leninist view of this question.

Engels’ criticism of the fetishism of the barricade was based upon the
evolution of military technique and of technique in general. The
insurrectionary tactic of Blanquism corresponded to the character of the
old Paris, the semi-handicraft proletariat, the narrow streets and the
military system of Louis Philippe. Blanqui’s mistake in principle was to
identify revolution with insurrection. His technical mistake was to
identify insurrection with the barricade. The Marxian criticism has been
directed against both mistakes. Although at one with Blanquism in
regarding insurrection as an art, Engels discovered not only the
subordinate place occupied by insurrection in a revolution, but also the
declining rôle of the barricade in an insurrection. Engels’ criticism
had nothing in common with a renunciation of the revolutionary methods
in favour of pure parliamentarism, as the philistines of the German
Social Democracy, in co-operation with the Hohenzollern censorship,
attempted in their day to pretend. For Engels the question about
barricades remained a question about one of the technical elements of an
uprising. The reformists have attempted to infer from his rejection of
the decisive importance of the barricade a rejection of revolutionary
violence in general. That is about the same as to infer the destruction
of militarism from considerations of the probable decline in importance
of trenches in future warfare.

The organisation by means of which the proletariat can both overthrow
the old power and replace it, is the soviets. This afterwards became a
matter of historic experience, but was up to the October revolution a
theoretical prognosis – resting, to be sure, upon the preliminary
experience of 1905. The soviets are organs of preparation of the masses
for insurrection, organs of insurrection, and after the victory organs
of government.

However, the soviets by themselves do not settle the question. They may
serve different goals according to the programme and leadership. The
soviets receive their programme from the party. Whereas the soviets in
revolutionary conditions – and apart from revolution they are impossible
– comprise the whole class with the exception of its altogether
backward, inert or demoralised strata, the revolutionary party
represents the brain of the class. The problem of conquering the power
can be solved only by a definite combination of party with soviets – or
with other mass organisations more or less equivalent to soviets.

When headed by a revolutionary party the soviet consciously and in good
season strives towards a conquest of power. Accommodating itself to
changes in the political situation and the mood of the masses, it gets
ready the military bases of the insurrection, unites the shock troops
upon a single scheme of action, works out a plan for the offensive and
for the final assault. And this means bringing organised conspiracy into
mass insurrection.

The Bolsheviks were compelled more than once, and long before the
October revolution, to refute accusations of conspiracy and Blanquism
directed against them by their enemies. Moreover, nobody waged a more
implacable struggle against the system of pure conspiracy than Lenin.
The opportunists of the international social democracy more than once
defended the old Social Revolutionary tactic of individual terror
directed against the agents of czarism, when this tactic was ruthlessly
criticised by the Bolsheviks with their insistence upon mass
insurrection as opposed to the individual adventurism of the
intelligentsia. But in refuting all varieties of Blanquism and
anarchism, Lenin did not for one moment bow down to any “sacred”
spontaneousness of the masses. He thought out before anybody else, and
more deeply, the correlation between the objective and subjective
factors in a revolution, between the spontaneous movement and the policy
of the party, between the popular masses and the progressive class,
between the proletariat and its vanguard, between the soviets and the
party, between insurrection and conspiracy.

But if it is true that an insurrection cannot be evoked at will, and
that nevertheless in order to win it must be organised in advance, then
the revolutionary leaders are presented with a task of correct
diagnosis. They must feel out the growing insurrection in good season
and supplement it with a conspiracy. The interference of the midwife in
labour pains – however this image may have been abused – remains the
clearest illustration of this conscious intrusion into an elemental
process. Herzen once accused his friend Bakunin of invariably in all his
revolutionary enterprises taking the second month of pregnancy for the
ninth. Herzen himself was rather inclined to deny even in the ninth that
pregnancy existed. In February the question of determining the date of
birth hardly arose at all, since the insurrection flared up unexpectedly
without centralised leadership. But exactly for this reason the power
did not go to those who had accomplished the insurrection, but to those
who had applied the brakes. It was quite otherwise with the second
insurrection. This was consciously prepared by the Bolshevik Party. The
problem of correctly seizing the moment to give the signal for the
attack was thus laid upon the Bolshevik staff.

_Moment_ here is not to be taken too literally as meaning a definite day
and hour. Physical births also present a considerable period of
uncertainty – their limits interesting not only to the art of the
midwife, but also to the casuistics of the Surrogate’s Court. Between
the moment when an attempt to summon an insurrection must inevitably
prove premature and lead to a revolutionary miscarriage, and the moment
when a favourable situation must be considered hopelessly missed, there
exists a certain period – it may be measured in weeks, and sometimes in
a few months – in the course of which an insurrection may be carried out
with more or less chance of success. To discriminate this comparatively
short period and then choose the definite moment – now in the more
accurate sense of the very day and hour – for the last blow, constitutes
the most responsible task of the revolutionary leaders. It can with full
justice be called the key problem, for it unites the policy of
revolution with the technique of insurrection – and it is needless to
add that insurrection, like war, is a continuation of politics with
other instruments.

Intuition and experience are necessary for revolutionary leadership,
just as for all other kinds of creative activity. But much more than
that is needed. The art of the magician can also successfully rely upon
intuition and experience. Political magic is adequate, however, only for
epochs and periods in which routine predominates. An epoch of mighty
historic upheavals has no use for witch-doctors. Here experience, even
illumined by intuition, is not enough. Here you must have a synthetic
doctrine comprehending the interactions of the chief historic forces.
Here you must have a materialistic method permitting you to discover,
behind the moving shadows of programme and slogan, the actual movement
of social bodies.

The fundamental premise of a revolution is that the existing social
structure has become incapable of solving the urgent problems of
development of the nation. A revolution becomes possible, however, only
in case the society contains a new class capable of taking the lead in
solving the problems presented by history. The process of preparing a
revolution consists of making the objective problems involved in the
contradictions of industry and of classes find their way into the
consciousness of living human masses, change this consciousness and
create new correlation of human forces.

The ruling classes, as a result of their practically manifested
incapacity to get the country out of its blind alley, lose faith in
themselves; the old parties fall to pieces; a bitter struggle of groups
and cliques prevails; hopes are placed in miracles or miracle workers.
All this constitutes one of the political premises of a revolution, a
very important although a passive one.

A bitter hostility to the existing order and a readiness to venture upon
the most heroic efforts and sacrifices in order to bring the country out
upon an upward road – this is the new political consciousness of the
revolutionary class, and constitutes the most important active premise
of a revolution.

These two fundamental camps, however – the big property holders and the
proletariat – do not exhaust the population of a country. Between them
lie broad layers of the petty bourgeoisie, showing all the colours of
the economic and political rainbow. The discontent of these intermediate
layers, their disappointment with the policy of the ruling class, their
impatience and indignation, their readiness to support a bold
revolutionary initiative on the part of the proletariat, constitute the
third political premise of a revolution. It is partly passive – In that
it neutralises the upper strata of the petty bourgeoisie – but partly
also active, for it impels the lower strata directly into the struggle
side by side with the workers.

That these premises condition each other is obvious. The more decisively
and confidently the proletariat acts, the better will it succeed in
bringing after it the intermediate layer, the more isolated will be the
ruling class, and the more acute its demoralisation. And, on the other
hand, a demoralisation of the rulers will pour water into the mill of
the revolutionary class.

The proletariat can become imbued with the confidence necessary for a
governmental overthrow only if a clear prospect opens before it, only if
it has had an opportunity to test out in action a correlation of forces
which is changing to its advantage, only if it feels above it a
far-sighted, firm and confident leadership. This brings us to the last
premise – by no means the last in importance – of the conquest of power:
the revolutionary party as a tightly welded and tempered vanguard of the
class.

Thanks to a favourable combination of historic conditions both domestic
and international, the Russian proletariat was headed by a party of
extraordinary political clarity and unexampled revolutionary temper.
Only this permitted that small and young class to carry out a historic
task of unprecedented proportions. It is indeed the general testimony of
history – the Paris Commune, the German and Austrian revolutions of
1918, the Soviet revolutions in Hungary and Bavaria, the Italian
revolution of 1919, the German crisis of 1923, the Chinese revolution of
1925-1927, the Spanish revolution of 1931 – that up to now the weakest
link in the chain of necessary conditions has been the party. The
hardest thing of all is for the working class to create a revolutionary
organisation capable of rising to the height of its historic task. In
the older and more civilised countries powerful forces work toward the
weakening and demoralisation of the revolutionary vanguard. An important
constituent part of this work is the struggle of the social democrats
against “Blanquism,” by which name they designate the revolutionary
essence of Marxism.

Notwithstanding the number of great social and political crises, a
coincidence of all the conditions necessary to a victorious and stable
proletarian revolution has so far occurred but once in history: in
Russia in October 1917. A revolutionary situation is not long-lived. The
least stable of the premises of a revolution is the mood of the petty
bourgeoisie. At a time of national crises the petty bourgeoisie follows
that class which inspires confidence not only in words but deeds.
Although capable of impulsive enthusiasm and even of revolutionary fury,
the petty bourgeoisie lacks endurance, easily loses heart under
reverses, and passes from elated hope to discouragement. And these sharp
and swift changes in the mood of the petty bourgeoisie lend their
instability to every revolutionary situation. If the proletarian party
is not decisive enough to convert the hopes and expectations of the
popular masses into revolutionary action in good season, the flood tide
is quickly followed by an ebb: the intermediate strata turn away their
eyes from the revolution and seek a saviour in the opposing camp. And
just as at flood tide the proletariat draws after it the petty
bourgeoisie, so during the ebb the petty bourgeoisie draws after it
considerable layers of the proletariat. Such is the dialectic of the
communist and fascist waves observable in the political evolution of
Europe since the war.

Attempting to ground themselves upon the assertion of Marx that no
régime withdraws from the stage of history until it has exhausted all
its possibilities, the Mensheviks denied the legitimacy of a struggle
for proletarian dictatorship in backward Russia where capitalism had far
from exhausted itself. This argument contained two mistakes, both fatal.
Capitalism is not a national but a world-wide system. The imperialist
war and its consequences demonstrated that the capitalist system had
exhausted itself on a world scale. The revolution in Russia was a
breaking of the weakest link in the system of world-wide capitalism.

But the falsity of this Menshevik conception appears also from a
national point of view. From the standpoint of economic abstraction, it
is indeed possible to affirm that capitalism in Russia has not exhausted
its possibilities. But economic processes do not take place in the
ether, but in a concrete historical medium. Capitalism is not an
abstraction, but a living system of class relations requiring above all
things a state power. That the monarchy, under whose protection Russian
capitalism developed, had exhausted its possibilities is not denied even
by the Mensheviks. The February revolution tried to build up an
intermediate state régime. We have followed its history: in the course
of eight months it exhausted itself completely. What sort of state order
could in these conditions guarantee the further development of Russian
capitalism?

“The bourgeois republic, defended only by socialists of moderate
tendencies, finding no longer any support in the masses ... could not
maintain itself. Its whole essence had evaporated. There remained only
an external shell.” This accurate definition belongs to Miliukov. The
fate of this evaporated system was necessarily, according to his words,
the same as that of the czarist monarchy: “Both prepared the ground for
a revolution, and on the day of revolution neither could find a single
defender.”

As early as July and August Miliukov characterised the situation by
presenting a choice between two names: Kornilov or Lenin? But Kornilov
had now made his experiment and it had ended in a miserable failure. For
the régime of Kerensky there was certainly no place left. With all the
varieties of mood, says Sukhanov, “the one thing upon which all united
was hate for the Kerensky régime.” Just as the czarist monarchy had
toward the end become impossible in the eyes of the upper circle of the
nobility and even the grand dukes, so the government of Kerensky became
odious even to the direct inspiritors of his régime, the “grand dukes”
of the compromisist upper crust. In this universal dissatisfaction, this
sharp political nerve-tension of all classes, we have one of the
symptoms of a ripe revolutionary situation. In the same way every
muscle, nerve and fibre of an organism is intolerably tensed just before
an abscess bursts.

The resolution of the July congress of the Bolsheviks, while warning the
workers against premature encounters had at the same time pointed out
that the battle must be joined “whenever the general national crisis and
the deep mass enthusiasm have created conditions favourable to the going
over of the poor people of the city and country to the side of the
workers.” That moment arrived in September and October.

The insurrection was thenceforth able to believe in its success, for it
could rely upon a genuine majority of the people. This, of course, is
not to be understood in a formal sense. If a referendum could have been
taken on the question of insurrection, it would have given extremely
contradictory and uncertain results. An inner readiness to support a
revolution is far from identical with an ability clearly to formulate
the necessity of it. Moreover, the answer would have depended to a vast
degree upon the manner in which the question was presented, the
institution which conducted the referendum – or, to put it more simply,
the class which held the power.

There is a limit to the application of democratic methods. You can
inquire of all the passengers as to what type of car they like to ride
in, but it is impossible to question them as to whether to apply the
brakes when the train is at full speed and accident threatens. If the
saving operation is carried out skilfully, however, and in time, the
approval of the passengers is guaranteed in advance.

Parliamentary consultations of the people are carried nut at a single
moment, whereas during a revolution the different layers of the
population arrive at the same conclusion one after another and with
inevitable, although sometimes very slight, intervals. At the moment
when the advanced detachment is burning with revolutionary impatience
the backward layers have only begun to move. In Petrograd and Moscow all
the mass organisations were under the leadership of the Bolsheviks. In
Tambov province, which has over three million population – that is, a
little less than both capitals put together – a Bolshevik faction first
appeared in the Soviet only a short time before the October revolution.

The syllogisms of the objective development are far from coinciding –
day by day – with the syllogisms of the thought process of the masses.
And when a great practical decision becomes unpostponable, in the course
of events, that is the very moment when a referendum is impossible. The
difference in level and mood of the different layers of the people is
overcome in action. The advance layers bring after them the wavering and
isolate the opposing. The majority is not counted up, but won over.
Insurrection comes into being at exactly that moment when direct action
alone offers a way out of the contradictions.

Although lacking the power to draw by themselves the necessary political
inferences from their war against the landlords, the peasants had by the
very fact of the agrarian insurrection already adhered to the
insurrection of the cities, had evoked it and were demanding it. They
expressed their will not with the white ballot, but with the red cock –
a more serious referendum. Within those limits in which the support of
the peasantry was necessary for the establishment of a soviet
dictatorship, the support was already at hand. “The dictatorship” – as
Lenin answered the doubters – “would give land to the peasants and all
power to the peasant committees in the localities. How can you in your
right mind doubt that the peasant would support that dictatorship?” In
order that the soldiers, peasants and oppressed nationalities,
floundering in the snow-storm of an elective ballot, should recognise
the Bolsheviks in action, it was necessary that the Bolsheviks seize the
power.

But what correlation of forces was necessary in order that the
proletariat should seize the power? “To have at the decisive moment, at
the decisive point, an overwhelming superiority of force,” wrote Lenin
later, interpreting the October revolution, “– this law of military
success is also the law of political success, especially in that
seething and bitter war of classes which is called revolution. The
capitals, or generally speaking, the biggest centres of trade and
industry ... decide to a considerable degree the political fate of the
people – that is, of course, on condition that the centres are supported
by sufficient local rural forces, although this support need not be
immediate.” It was in this dynamic sense that Lenin spoke of the
majority of the people, and that was the sole real meaning of the
concept of majority.

The enemy democrats comforted themselves with the thought that the
people following the Bolsheviks were mere raw material, mere historic
clay. The potters were still to be these same democrats acting in
co-operation with the educated bourgeoisie. “Can’t those people see,”
asked a Menshevik paper, “that the Petrograd proletariat and garrison
were never before so isolated from all other social strata?” The
misfortune of the proletariat and the garrison was that they were
“isolated” from those classes from whom they intended to take the power!

But was it really possible to rely upon the sympathy and support of the
dark masses in the provinces and at the front? “Their Bolshevism,” wrote
Sukhanov scornfully, “was nothing but hatred for the coalition and
longing for land and peace.” As though that were little! Hatred for the
coalition meant a desire to take the power from the bourgeoisie. Longing
for land and peace was the colossal programme which the peasant and
soldier intended to carry out under the leadership of the workers. The
insignificance of the democrats, even the most leftward, resulted from
this very distrust – the distrust of “educated” sceptics – in those dark
masses who grasp a phenomenon wholesale, not bothering about details and
nuances. This intellectual, pseudo-aristocratic, squeamish attitude
toward the people was foreign to Bolshevism, hostile to its very nature.
The Bolsheviks were not lily-handed, literary friends of the masses, not
pedants. They were not afraid of those backward strata now for the first
time lifting themselves out of the dregs. The Bolsheviks took the people
as preceding history had created them, and as they were called to
achieve the revolution. The Bolsheviks saw it as their mission to stand
at the head of that people. Those against the insurrection were
“everybody” – except the Bolsheviks. But the Bolsheviks were the people.

The fundamental political force of the October revolution was the
proletariat, and the first place in its ranks was occupied by the
workers of Petrograd. In the vanguard of these workers stood the Vyborg
district. The plan of the insurrection chose this fundamental
proletarian district as the point of departure for its offensive.

Compromisers of all shades, beginning with Martov, attempted after the
revolution to portray Bolshevism as a soldier movement. The European
social democrats grabbed up this theory with delight. But fundamental
historic facts were here ignored: the fact that the proletariat was the
first to come over to the Bolsheviks; that the Petrograd workers were
showing the road to the workers of all countries; that the garrison and
front much longer than the workers remained bulwarks of compromise; that
the Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks created all kinds of
privileges for the soldier at the expense of the worker in the soviet
system, struggled against the arming of the workers and incited the
soldiers against them; that the break in the troops was brought about
only by the influence of workers; that at the decisive moment the
leadership of the soldiers was in the hands of the workers; and finally
that a year later the social democrats of Germany, following the example
of their Russian colleagues, relied on the soldiers in their struggle
against the workers.

By autumn the Right Compromisers had ceased even to be able to make
speeches in the factories and barracks. But the Lefts were still trying
to convince the masses of the madness of insurrection. Martov, who in
the struggle against the counterrevolutionary offensive in July had
found a path to the minds of the masses, was now again serving a
hopeless cause. “We cannot expect” – he himself acknowledged on the 14th
of October, at a meeting of the Central Executive Committee – “We cannot
expect the Bolsheviks to listen to us.” Nevertheless be considered it
his duty to “warn the masses.” The masses, however, wanted action and
not moral admonition. Even where they did patiently listen to their
well-known adviser, they “thought their own thoughts as before,” as
Mstislavsky acknowledges. Sukhanov tells how he made an effort in a
drizzling rain to convince the Putilov men that they could fix things up
without an insurrection. Impatient voices interrupted him. They would
listen for two or three minutes and interrupt again. “After a few
attempts I gave it up,” be says, “It was no use ... and the rain was
drizzling down on us heavier and heavier.” Under that impatient October
sky the poor Left Democrats, even as described in their own writings,
look like wet hens.

The favourite political argument of the “Left” opponents of the
revolution – and this even among the Bolsheviks – was a reference to the
absence of fighting enthusiasm among the lower ranks. “The mood of the
labouring and soldier masses, write Zinoviev and Kamenev on October 11,
“is far from comparable even to the mood which existed before the 3rd of
July.” This assertion was not unfounded: there was a certain depression
in the Petrograd proletariat as a result of waiting too long. They were
beginning to feel disappointed even in the Bolsheviks: Can it be that
they are going to cheat us too? On October 16 Rakhia, one of the
fighting Petrograd Bolsheviks, a Finn by birth, said at a conference of
the Central Committee: “Our slogan is evidently already getting a little
out of date, for there exists a doubt as to whether we will do the thing
for which we are calling.” But this weariness of waiting, which looked
like listlessness, lasted only up to the first fighting signal.

The first task of every insurrection is to bring the troops over to its
side. The chief means of accomplishing this are the general strike, mass
processions, street encounters, battles at the barricades. The unique
thing about the October revolution, a thing never before observed in so
complete a form, was that, thanks to a happy combination of
circumstances, the proletarian vanguard had won over the garrison of the
capital before the moment of open insurrection. It had not only won them
over, but had fortified this conquest through the organisation of the
Garrison Conference. It is impossible to understand the mechanics of the
October revolution without fully realising that the most important task
of the insurrection, and the one most difficult to calculate in advance,
was fully accomplished in Petrograd before the beginning of the armed
struggle.

This does not mean, however, that insurrection had become superfluous.
The overwhelming majority of the garrison was, it is true, on the side
of the workers. But a minority was against the workers, against the
revolution, against the Bolsheviks. This small minority consisted of the
best trained elements in the army: the officers, the junkers, the shock
battalions, and perhaps the Cossacks. It was impossible to win these
elements politically; they had to be vanquished. The last part of the
task of the revolution, that which has gone into history under the name
of the October insurrection, was therefore purely military in character.
At this final stage rifles, bayonets, machine-guns, and perhaps cannon,
were to decide. The party of the Bolsheviks led the way on this road.

What were the military forces of the approaching conflict? Boris
Sokolov, who directed the military work of the Social Revolutionary
Party, says that in the period preceding the overturn, “in the regiments
all the party organisations except those of the Bolsheviks had
disintegrated, and conditions were not at all favourable to the
organisation of new ones. The mood of the soldiers was tending
definitely toward the Bolsheviks. But their Bolshevism was passive and
they lacked any tendency whatever toward active armed movements.”
Sokolov does not fail to add: “One or two regiments wholly loyal and
capable of fighting would have been enough to hold the whole garrison in
obedience.” Literally all of them, from the monarchist generals to the
“socialistic” intelligentsia, wanted only those “one or two regiments”
and they would have put down the proletarian revolution But it is quite
true that the garrison, although deeply hostile to the government in its
overwhelming mass, was not capable of fighting even on the side of the
Bolsheviks. The cause of this lay in the hostile break between the old
military structure of the troops, and their new political structure. The
backbone of a fighting unit is its commanding staff. The commanding
staffs were against the Bolsheviks. The political backbone of the troops
was composed of Bolsheviks. The latter, however, not only did not know
how to command, but in the majority of cases hardly knew how to handle a
gun. The soldier crowd was not homogeneous. The active fighting elements
were, as always, a minority. The majority of the soldiers sympathised
with the Bolsheviks, voted for them, elected them, but also expected
them to decide things. The elements hostile to the Bolsheviks in the
troops were too insignificant to venture upon any initiative whatever.
The political condition of the garrison was thus exceptionally
favourable for an insurrection. But its fighting weight was not large –
that was clear from the beginning.

However, it was not necessary to dismiss the garrison entirely from the
military count. A thousand soldiers ready to fight on the side of the
revolution were scattered here and there among the more passive mass,
and for that very reason more or less drew it after them. Certain
individual units, more happily constituted, had preserved their
discipline and fighting capacity. Strong revolutionary nuclei were to be
found even in the disintegrating regiments. In the Sixth Reserve
Battalion, consisting of about 10,000 men, out of five companies, the
first invariably distinguished itself, being known as Bolshevik almost
from the beginning of the revolution and rising to the heights in the
October Days. The typical regiments of the garrison did not really exist
as regiments; their administrative mechanism had broken down; they were
incapable of prolonged military effort; but they were nevertheless a
horde of armed men a majority of whom had been under fire. All the units
were united by a single sentiment: Overthrow Kerensky as soon as
possible, disperse, and go home and institute a new land system. Thus
that completely demoralised garrison was to rally once more in the
October Days, and rattle its weapons suggestively, before completely
going to pieces.

What force did the Petrograd workers offer from a military point of
view? This raises the question of the Red Guard. It is time to speak of
this in greater detail, for the Red Guard is soon to come out on the
great arena of history.

Deriving its tradition from 1905, the Workers’ Guard was reborn with the
February revolution and subsequently shared the vicissitudes of its
fate. Kornilov, while Commander of the Petrograd military district,
asserted that during the days of the overthrow of the monarchy, 30,000
revolvers and 40,000 rifles disappeared from the military stores. Over
and above that, a considerable quantity of weapons came into the
possession of the people during the disarming of the police and by the
hands of friendly regiments. Nobody responded to the demand to restore
the weapons. A revolution teaches you to value a rifle. The organised
workers, however, had received only a small part of this blessing.

During the first four months the workers were not in any way confronted
with the question of insurrection. The democratic régime of the dual
power gave the Bolsheviks an opportunity to win a majority in the
soviets. Armed companies of workers formed a constituent part of the
militia. This was, however, more form than substance. A rifle in the
hands of a worker involves a totally different historic principle than
the same rifle in the hands of a student.

The possession of rifles by the workers alarmed the possessing classes
from the very beginning, since it shifted the correlation of forces
sharply to the advantage of the factory. In Petrograd, where the state
apparatus supported by the Central Executive Committee was at first an
indubitable power, the Workers’ Militia was not much of a menace. In the
provincial industrial regions, however, a reinforcement of the Workers’
Guard would involve a complete change of all relations, not only within
the given plant but all around it. Armed workers would remove managers
and engineers, and even arrest them. Upon resolutions adopted by a
factory meeting the Red Guard would not infrequently receive pay out of
the factory exchequer. In the Urals, with their rich tradition of
guerilla fighting in 1905, companies of the Red Guard led by the old
veterans established law and order. Armed workers almost unnoticeably
dissolved the old government and replaced it with soviet institutions.
Sabotage on the part of the property owners and administrators shifted
to the workers the task of protecting the plants – the machines, stores,
reserves of coal and raw materials. Rôles were here interchanged: the
worker would tightly grip his rifle in defence of the factory in which
he saw the source of his power. In this way elements of a workers’
dictatorship were inaugurated in the factories and districts some time
before the proletariat as a whole seized the state power.

Reflecting as always the fright of the property owners, the Compromisers
tried with all their might to oppose the arming of the Petrograd workers
or reduce it to a minimum. According to Minichev, all the arms in the
possession of the Narva district consisted of “fifteen or twenty rifles
and a few revolvers.” At that time robberies and deeds of violence were
increasing in the capital. Alarming rumours were spreading everywhere
heralding new disturbances. On the eve of the July demonstration it was
generally expected that the district would be set fire to. The workers
were hunting for weapons, knocking at all doors and sometimes breaking
them in.

The Putilov men brought back a trophy from the demonstration of July
3rd: a machine-gun with five cases of cartridgebelt. “We were happy as
children,” said Minichev. Certain individual factories were somewhat
better armed. According to Lichkov, the workers of his factory had 80
rifles and 20 big revolvers. Riches indeed! Through the Red Guard
headquarters they got two machine-guns. They put one in the dining-room,
one in the attic. “Our commander,” says Lichkov, “was Kocherovsky, and
his first assistants were Tomchak, who was killed by White Guards in the
October Days near Tsarskoe Selo, and Efimov, who was shot by White bands
near Hamburg.” These scant words enable us to glance into the factory
laboratory where the cadres of the October revolution and the future Red
Army were forming, where the Tomchaks and Efimovs were being chosen out,
tempered, and were learning to command, and with them those hundreds and
thousands of nameless workers who won the power, loyally defended it
from its enemy, and fell subsequently on all the fields of battle.

The July Days introduced a sudden change in the situation of the Red
Guard. The disarming of the workers was now carried out quite openly –
not by admonition but by force. However, what the workers gave up as
weapons was mostly old rubbish. All the very valuable guns were
carefully concealed. Rifles were distributed among the most reliable
members of the party. Machine-guns smeared with tallow were buried in
the ground. Detachments of the Guard closed up shop and went
underground, closely adhering to the Bolsheviks.

The business of arming the workers was originally placed in the hands of
the factory and district committees of the party. It was only after the
recovery from the July Days that the Military Organisation of the
Bolsheviks, which had formerly worked only in the garrison and at the
front, took up the organisation of the Red Guard, providing the workers
with military instructors and in some cases with weapons. The prospect
of armed insurrection put forward by the party gradually prepared the
advanced workers for a new conception of the function of the Red Army.
It was no longer a militia of the factories and workers’ districts, but
the cadres of a future army of insurrection.

During August, fires in the shops and factories multiplied. Every new
crisis is preceded by a convulsion of the collective mind, sending forth
waves of alarm. The factory and shop committees developed an intense
labour of defending the plants from attacks of this kind. Concealed
rifles came out into the open. The Kornilov insurrection conclusively
legalised the Red Guard. About 25,000 workers were enrolled in companies
and armed – by no means fully, to be sure – with rifles, and in part
with machine-guns. Workers from the Schlüsselberg powder factory
delivered on the Neva a bargeful of hand grenades and explosives –
against Kornilov! The compromisist Central Executive Committee refused
this gift of the Greeks! The Red Guards of the Vyborg side distributed
the gift by night throughout the district.

“Drill in the art of handling a rifle,” says the worker Skorinko,
“formerly carried on in flats and tenements, was now brought out into
the light and air, into the parks, the boulevards.” “The shops were
turned into camps,” says another worker, Rakitov ... “The worker would
stand at his bench with knapsack on his back and rifle beside him.” Very
soon all those working in the bomb factory except the old Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks were enrolled in the Guard. After the
whistle all would draw up in the court for drill. “Side by side with a
bearded worker you would see a boy apprentice, and both of them
attentively listening to the instructor ...” Thus while the old czarist
army was disintegrating, the foundation of a future Red Army was being
laid in the factories.

As soon as the Kornilov danger passed, the Compromisers tried to slow up
on the fulfilment of their promises. To the 30,000 Putilov men, for
instance, only 500 rifles were given out. Soon the giving out of weapons
stopped altogether. The danger now was not from the right, but the left;
protection must be sought not among the proletarians but the junkers.

An absence of immediate practical aims combined with the lack of weapons
caused an ebbing of workers from the Red Guard, but this only for a
short interval. The foundation cadres had been laid down solidly in
every plant; firm bonds had been established between the different
companies. These cadres now knew from experience that they had serious
reserves which could be brought to their feet in case of danger.

The going over of the Soviet to the Bolsheviks again radically changed
the position of the Red Guard. From being persecuted or tolerated, it
now became an official instrument of the Soviet already reaching for the
power. The workers now often found by themselves a way to weapons,
asking only the sanction of the Soviet. From the end of September on,
and more especially from the 10th of October, the preparation of an
insurrection was openly placed on the order of the day. For a month
before the revolution in scores of shops and factories of Petrograd an
intense military activity was in progress – chiefly rifle practice. By
the middle of October the interest in weapons had risen to a new height.
In certain factories almost every last man was enrolled in a company.

The workers were more and more impatiently demanding weapons from the
Soviet, but the weapons were infinitely fewer than the hands stretched
out for them. “I came to Smolny every day,” relates the engineer,
Kozmin, “and observed how both before and after the sitting of the
Soviet, workers and sailors would come up to Trotsky, offering and
demanding weapons for the arming of the workers, making reports as to
how and where these weapons were distributed, and putting the question:
‘But when does business begin?’ The impatience was very great ...”

Formally the Red Guard remained non-party. But the nearer the final day
came, the more prominent were the Bolsheviks. They constituted the
nucleus of every company; they controlled the commanding staff and the
communications with other plants and districts. The non-party workers
and Left Social Revolutionaries followed the lead of the Bolsheviks.

However, even now, on the eve of the insurrection, the ranks of the
Guard were not numerous. On the 16th, Uritzky, a member of the Bolshevik
Central Committee, estimated the workers’ army of Petrograd at 40,000
bayonets. The figure is probably exaggerated. The resources of weapons
remained still very limited. In spite of the impotence of the government
it was impossible to seize the arsenals without taking the road of open
insurrection.

On the 22nd, there was held an all-city conference of the Red Guard, its
hundred delegates representing about twenty thousand fighters. The
figure is not to be taken too literally – not all those registered had
shown any sign of activity. But at a moment of alarm volunteers would
pour into the companies in large numbers. Regulations adopted the next
day by the conference defined the Red Guard as “an organisation of the
armed forces of the proletariat for the struggle against
counter-revolution and the defence of the conquests of the revolution.”
Observe this: that twenty-four hours before the insurrection the task
was still defined in terms of defence and not attack.

The basic military unit was the ten; four tens was a squad, three
squads, a company; three companies, a battalion. With its commanding
staff and special units, a battalion numbered over 500 men. The
battalions of a district constituted a division.[1] Big factories like
the Putilov had their own divisions. Special technical commands –
sappers, bicycles, telegraphers, machine-gunners and artillery men –
were recruited in the corresponding factories, and attached to the
riflemen – or else acted independently according to the nature of the
given task. The entire commanding staff was elective. There was no risk
in this: all were volunteers here and knew each other well.

The working women created Red Cross divisions. At the shops
manufacturing surgical supplies for the army, lectures were announced on
the care of the wounded. “Already in almost all the factories,” writes
Tatiana Graff, “the working women were regularly on duty as nurses with
the necessary first-aid supplies.” The organisation was extremely poor
in money and technical equipment. By degrees, however, the factory
committees sent material for hospital bases and ambulances. During the
hours of the revolution these weak nuclei swiftly developed. An imposing
technical equipment was suddenly found at their disposal. On the 24th
the Vyborg district soviet issued the following order: “Immediately
requisition all automobiles ... Take an inventory of all first-aid
supplies, and have nurses on duty in all clinics.”

A growing number of non-party workers were now going out for shooting
drill and manoeuvres. The number of posts requiring patrol duty was
increasing. In the factories sentries were on duty night and day. The
headquarters of the Red Guard were transferred to more spacious rooms.
On the 23rd at a pipe foundry they held an examination of the Red Guard.
An attempt of a Menshevik to speak against the insurrection was drowned
in a storm of indignation: Enough, enough. The time for argument is
passed. The movement was irresistible. It was seizing even the
Mensheviks. “They were enrolling in the Red Guard,” says Tatiana Graff,
“participating in all duties and even developing some initiative.”
Skorinko tells how on the 23rd, Social Revolutionaries and Mensheviks,
old and young, were fraternising with the Bolsheviks, and how Skorinko
himself joyfully embraced his own father, who was a worker in the same
factory. The worker Peskovoi says that in his armed detachment, “there
were young workers of sixteen and old men of fifty.” The variety of ages
gave “good cheer and fighting courage.”

The Vyborg side was especially fervent in preparing for battle. Having
stolen the keys of the drawbridges, studied out the vulnerable points of
the district, and elected their military revolutionary committee, the
factory committees established continuous patrols. Kayurov writes with
legitimate pride of the Vyborg men: “They were the first to go to battle
with the autocracy, they were the first to institute in their district
the eight hour day, the first to come out with a protest against the ten
minister-capitalists, the first to raise a protest on July 7th against
the persecution of our party, and they were not the last on the decisive
day of October 25th.” What is true is true. The history of the Red Guard
is to a considerable extent the history of the dual power. With its
inner contradictions and conflicts, the dual power helped the workers to
create a considerable armed force even before the insurrection. To cast
up the general total of the workers’ detachments throughout the country
at the moment of insurrection is hardly possible, at least at the
present moment. In any case, tens and tens of thousands of armed workers
constituted the cadres of the insurrection. The reserves were almost
inexhaustible.

The organisation of the Red Guard remained, of course, extremely far
from complete. Everything was done in haste, in the rough, and not
always skilfully. The Red Guard men were in the majority little trained;
the communications were badly organised; the supply system was lame; the
sanitary corps lagged behind. But the Red Guard, recruited from the most
self-sacrificing workers, was burning to carry the job through this time
to the end. And that was the decisive thing. The difference between the
workers’ divisions and the peasant regiments was determined not only by
the social ingredients of the two – many of those clumsy soldiers after
returning to their villages and dividing the landlords’ land will fight
desperately against the White Guards, first in guerrilla bands and
afterwards in the Red Army. Beside the social difference there existed
another more immediate one: Whereas the garrison represented a
compulsory assemblage of old soldiers defending themselves against war,
the divisions of the Red Guard were newly constructed by individual
selection on a new basis and with new aims.

The Military Revolutionary Committee had at its disposal a third kind of
armed force: the sailors of the Baltic Fleet. In their social
ingredients they are far closer to the workers than the infantry are.
There are a good many Petrograd workers among them. The political level
of the sailors is incomparably higher than that of the soldiers. In
distinction from the none too belligerent reserves who have forgotten
all about rifles, these sailors have never stopped actual service.

For active operations it was possible to count firmly upon the armed
Bolsheviks, upon the divisions of the Red Guard, upon the advanced group
of the sailors, and upon the better preserved regiments. The different
elements of this collective army supplemented each other. The numerous
garrisons lacked the will to fight. The sailor detachments lacked
numbers. The Red Guard lacked skill. The workers together with the
sailors contributed energy, daring and enthusiasm. The regiments of the
garrison constituted a rather inert reserve, imposing in its numbers and
overwhelming in its mass.

In contact as they were from day to day with workers, soldiers and
sailors, the Bolsheviks were aware of the deep qualitative difference
between the constituent parts of this army they were to lead into
battle. The very plan of the insurrection was based to a considerable
degree upon a calculation of these differences.

The possessing classes constituted the social force of the other camp.
This means that they were its military weakness. These solid people of
capital, the press, the pulpit – where and when have they ever fought?
They are accustomed to find out by telegraph or telephone the results of
the battles which settle their fate. The younger generation, the sons,
the students? They were almost all hostile to the October revolution.
But a majority of them too stood aside. They stood with their fathers
awaiting the outcome of the battle. A number of them afterward joined
the officers and junkers – already largely recruited from among the
students. The property holders had no popular masses with them. The
workers, soldiers, peasants had turned against them. The collapse of the
Compromise Parties meant that the possessing classes were left without
an army.

In proportion to the significance of railroads in the life of modern
states, a large place was occupied in the political calculations of both
camps by the question of the railroad workers. Here the hierarchical
constitution of the personnel leaves room for an extraordinary political
variegation, creating favourable conditions for the diplomats of the
Compromisers. The lately formed Vikzhel had kept a considerably more
solid root among the clerks and even among the workers than, for
instance, the army committees at the front. In the railroads only a
minority followed the Bolsheviks, chiefly workers in the stations and
yards. According to the report of Schmidt, one of the Bolshevik leaders
of the trade union movement, the railroad workers of the Petrograd and
Moscow junctions stood closest of all to the party.

But even among the compromisist mass of clerks and workers there was a
sharp shift to the left from the date of the railroad strike at the end
of September. Dissatisfaction with the Vikzhel, which had compromised
itself by talking and wavering, was more and more evident in the lower
ranks. Lenin remarked: “The army of railroad and postal clerks continues
in a state of sharp conflict with the government.” From the standpoint
of the immediate tasks of the insurrection that was almost enough.

Things were less favourable in the post and telegraph service. According
to the Bolshevik, Boky, “the men in the Post and Telegraph Offices are
mostly Kadets.” But here too the lower personnel had taken a hostile
attitude toward the upper ranks. There was a group of mail carriers
ready at a critical moment to seize the Post Office.

It would have been hopeless in any case to try to change the minds of
the railroad and postal clerks with words. If the Bolsheviks should
prove indecisive, the advantage would remain with the Kadets and the
compromisist upper circles. With a decisive revolutionary leadership the
lower ranks must inevitably carry with them the intermediate layers, and
isolate the upper circles of the Vikzhel. In revolutionary calculations
statistics alone are not enough; the co-efficient of living action is
also essential.

The enemies of the insurrection in the ranks of the Bolshevik party
itself found, however, sufficient ground for pessimistic conclusions.
Zinoviev and Kamenev gave warning against an under-estimation of the
enemy’s forces. “Petrograd will decide, and in Petrograd the enemy has
... considerable forces: 5,000 junkers, magnificently armed and knowing
how to fight, and then the army headquarters, and then the shock troops,
and then the Cossacks, and then a considerable part of the garrison, and
then a very considerable quantity of artillery spread out fan-wise
around Petrograd. Moreover the enemy with the help of the Central
Executive Committee will almost certainly attempt to bring troops from
the front ...” The list sounds imposing, but it is only a list. If an
army as a whole is a copy of society, then when society openly splits,
both armies are copies of the two warring camps. The army of the
possessors contained the wormholes of isolation and decay.

The officers crowding the hotels, restaurants and brothels had been
hostile to the government ever since the break between Kerensky and
Kornilov. Their hatred of the Bolsheviks, however, was infinitely more
bitter. As a general rule, the monarchist officers were most active on
the side of the government. “Dear Kornilov and Krymov, in what you
failed to do perhaps with God’s help we shall succeed ...” Such was the
prayer of officer Sinegub, one of the most valiant defenders of the
Winter Palace on the day of the uprising. But in spite of the vast
number of officers, only single individuals were really ready to fight.
The Kornilov plot had already proven that these completely demoralised
officers were not a fighting force.

The junkers were not homogeneous in social make-up, and there was no
unanimity among them. Along with hereditary fighters, sons and grandsons
of officers, there were many accidental elements gathered up under
pressure of war-needs even during the monarchy. The head of an
engineering school said to an officer: “I must die with you ... We are
nobles, you know, and cannot think otherwise.” These lucky gentlemen,
who did after all succeed in evading a noble death, would speak of the
democratic junkers as low-breeds, as muzhiks “with coarse stupid faces.”
This division into the blue blood and the black penetrated deeply into
the junker schools, and it is noticeable that here too those who came
out most zealously in defence of the republican government were the very
ones who most mourned the loss of the monarchy. The democratic junkers
declared that they were not for Kerensky but for the Central Executive
Committee. The revolution had first opened the doors of the junker
schools to the Jews. And in trying to hold their own with the privileged
upper circles, the sons of the Jewish bourgeoisie became extraordinarily
warlike against the Bolsheviks. But, alas, this was not enough to save
the régime – not even to defend the Winter Palace. The heterogeneousness
of these military schools and their complete isolation from the army
brought it about that during the critical hours the junkers began to
hold meetings. They began to ask questions: How are the Cossacks
behaving? Is anybody coming out besides us? Is it worth while anyway to
defend the Provisional Government? According to a report of Podvoisky,
there were about 120 socialist junkers in the Petrograd military schools
at the beginning of October, and of these 42 or 43 were Bolsheviks. “The
junkers say that the whole commanding staff of the schools is
counter-revolutionary. They are being definitely prepared in case
anything happens to put down the insurrection ...” The number of
socialists, and especially Bolsheviks, was wholly insignificant, but
they made it possible for Smolny to know everything of importance that
went on among the junkers. In addition to that, the location of the
military schools was very disadvantageous. The junkers were sandwiched
in among the barracks, and although they spoke scornfully of the
soldiers, they looked upon them with a great deal of dread.

The junkers had plenty of ground for caution. Thousands of hostile eyes
were watching them from the neighbouring barracks and the workers’
districts. This observation was the more effective in that every school
had its soldier group, neutral in words but in reality inclining toward
the insurrection. The school storerooms were in the hands of
non-combatant soldiers. “Those scoundrels,” writes an officer of the
Engineering School, “not satisfied with losing the key to the storeroom
so that I had to give order to break in the door, also removed the
breech-blocks from the machine-guns and hid them somewhere.” In these
circumstances you could hardly expect miracles of heroism from the
junkers.

But would not a Petrograd insurrection be threatened from without, from
the neighbouring garrisons? In the last days of its life the monarchy
had never ceased to put its hope in that small military ring surrounding
the capital. The monarchy had missed its guess, but how would it go this
time? To guarantee conditions excluding every possible danger would have
been to make the very insurrection unnecessary. After all, its aim was
to break down the obstacles which could not be dissolved politically.
Everything could not be calculated in advance, but all that could be,
was.

Early in October a conference of the soviets of Petrograd province was
held in Kronstadt. Delegates from the garrisons of the environs of the
capital – Gatchina, Tsarskoe, Krasnoe, Oranienbaum, Kronstadt itself –
took the very highest note set by the tuning-fork of the Baltic sailors.
Their resolution was adhered to by the deputies of Petrograd province.
The muzhiks were veering sharply through the Left Social Revolutionaries
toward the Bolsheviks.

At a conference of the Central Committee on the 16th, a party worker in
the province, Stepanov, drew a somewhat variegated picture of the state
of the forces, but nevertheless with a clear predominance of Bolshevik
colours. In Sestroretsk and Kolpino the workers are under arms; their
mood is militant. In Novy Peterhoff the work in the regiment has fallen
off; the regiment is disorganised. In Krasnoe Selo the 176th regiment is
Bolshevik (the same regiment which patrolled the Tauride Palace on July
4th), the 172nd is on the side of the Bolsheviks, “and, besides, there
is cavalry there.” In Luga the garrison of 30,000, after swinging over
to the Bolsheviks, is wavering in part; the soviet is still defensist.
In Gdov the regiment is Bolshevik. In Kronstadt the mood has declined;
the garrison boiled over during the preceding months; the better part of
the sailors are in the active fleet. In Schlusselburg, within 60
_versts_ of Petrograd, the soviet long ago became the sole power; the
workers of the powder factory are ready at any moment to support the
capital.

In combination with the results of that Kronstadt conference of soviets,
this information about the first line reserves may be considered
entirely encouraging. The radiation of the February insurrection had
been sufficient to dissolve discipline over a wide area. And it was now
possible to look with confidence upon the nearby garrisons, their
conditions being adequately known in advance.

The troops of Finland and the Northern front were among the second line
reserves. Here conditions were still more favourable. The work of
Smilga, Antonov, Dybenko had produced invaluable results. Along with the
garrison of Helsingfors the fleet had become a sovereign in Finnish
territory. The government had no more power there. The two Cossack
divisions quartered in Helsingfors – Kornilov had intended them for a
blow at Petrograd – had come in close contact with the sailors and were
supporting the Bolsheviks, or the Left Social Revolutionaries, who in
the Baltic Fleet were becoming less and less distinguishable from
Bolsheviks.

Helsingfors was extending its hand to the sailors of the Reval naval
base, whose attitude up to that time had been indefinite. The Congress
of Soviets of the Northern Region, in which also apparently the Baltic
Fleet had taken the initiative, had united the soviets of the garrisons
surrounding Petrograd in such a wide circle that it took in Moscow on
one side and Archangel on the other. “In this manner,” writes Antonov,
“the idea was realised of armouring the capital of the revolution
against possible attacks from Kerensky’s troops.” Smilga returned from
the Congress to Helsingfors to organise a special detachment of sailors,
infantry and artillery to be sent to Petrograd at the first signal. The
Finland flank of the Petrograd insurrection was thus protected to the
last degree. On this side no blow was to be expected, only strong help.
On other portions of the front, too, things were wholly favourable – at
least far more favourable than the most optimistic of the Bolsheviks in
those days imagined. During October committee elections were held
throughout the army, and everywhere they showed a sharp swing to the
Bolsheviks. In the corps quartered near Dvinsk the “old reasonable
soldiers” were completely snowed under in the elections to the
regimental and company committees; their places were taken by “gloomy,
grey creatures ... with angry piercing eyes and wolfish snouts.” The
same thing happened in other sectors. “Committee elections are in
progress everywhere, and everywhere only Bolsheviks and defeatists are
elected.” The governmental commissars began to avoid making trips to
their units.

“Their situation is now no better than ours” We are quoting Baron
Budberg. Two cavalry regiments of his corps, the Hussar and Ural
Cossacks, who remained longest of all in the control of the commanders,
and had not refused to put down mutinous units, suddenly changed colour
and demanded “that they be relieved of the function of punitive troops
and gendarmes.” The threatening sense of this warning was clear to the
Baron and to everybody else. “You can’t command a flock of hyenas,
jackals and sheep by playing on a violin,” he wrote. “The only salvation
lies in a mass application of the hot iron ...” And here follows the
tragic confession: “... a thing which we haven’t got and is nowhere to
be gotten.”

If we do not cite similar testimony about other corps and divisions, it
is only because their chiefs were not as observant as Budberg, or they
did not keep diaries, or these diaries have not yet come to light. But
the corps standing near Dvinsk was distinguished in nothing but the
trenchant style of its commander from the other corps of the 5th Army,
which in its turn was but little in advance of the other armies.

The compromisist committee of the 5th Army, which had long been hanging
in the air, continued to send telegraphic threats to Petrograd to the
effect that it would restore order in the rear with the bayonet. “All
that was mere _braggadocio_ and hot air,” writes Budberg. The committee
was actually living its last days. On the 23rd it failed of re-election.
The president of the new Bolshevik committee was Doctor Skliansky, a
magnificent young organiser who soon developed his talent widely in the
work of creating the Red Army, and who died subsequently an accidental
death while canoeing on one of the American lakes.

The assistant of the government Commissar of the Northern front reports
to the War Minister on the 22nd of October that the ideas of Bolshevism
are making great headway in the army, that the mass wants peace, and
that even the artillery which has held out to the very last moment has
become “hospitable to defeatist propaganda.” This too is no unimportant
symptom. “The Provisional Government has no authority” – reports its own
direct agent three days before the revolution.

To be sure, the Military Revolutionary Committee did not then know of
all these documents. But what it did know was amply sufficient. On the
23rd, representatives of various units at the front filed past the
Petrograd Soviet and demanded peace. Otherwise, they answered, they
would march to the rear and “destroy all the parasites who want to keep
on fighting for another ten years.” Seize the power, the front men said
to the Soviet, “the trenches will support you.”

In the more remote and backward fronts, the South-western and Rumanian,
Bolsheviks were still rare specimens, curiosities. But the mood of the
soldiers here was the same as elsewhere. Efgenia Bosh tells how in the
2nd Corps of the Guards, quartered in the vicinity of Zhmerinka, among
60,000 soldiers, there was one young communist and two sympathisers.
This did not prevent the corps from coming out in support of the
insurrection in the October days.

To the very last hour the government circles rested their hope in the
Cossacks. But the less blind among the politicians of the right camp
understood that here too things were in a very bad way. The Cossack
officers were Kornilovists almost to a man. The rank-and-file were
tending more and more to the left. In the government they did not
understand this, imagining that the coolness of the Cossack regiments to
the Winter Palace was caused by injured feelings about Kaledin. In the
long run, however, it became clear even to the Minister of Justice,
Maliantovich, that “only the Cossack officers” were supporters of
Kaledin. The rank-and-file Cossacks, like all the soldiers, were simply
going Bolshevik.

Of that front which in the early days of March had kissed the hands and
feet of liberal priests, had carried Kadet ministers on its shoulders,
got drunk on the speeches of Kerensky, and believed that the Bolsheviks
were German agents – of that there was nothing left. Those rosy
illusions had been drowned in the mud of the trenches, which the
soldiers refused to go on kneading with their leaky boots. “The
_denouément_ is approaching,” wrote Budberg on the very day of the
Petrograd insurrection, “and there can be no doubt of its outcome. On
our front there is not one single unit ... which would not be in the
control of the Bolsheviks.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. Otryad.



CHAPTER 44 THE CONQUEST OF THE CAPITAL


 

All is changed and yet all remains as before. The revolution has shaken
the country, deepened the split, frightened some, embittered others, but
not yet wiped out a thing or replaced it. Imperial St. Petersburg seems
drowned in a sleepy lethargy rather than dead. The revolution has stuck
little red flags in the hands of the cast-iron monuments of the
monarchy. Great red streamers are hanging down the fronts of the
government buildings. But the palaces, the ministries, the headquarters,
seem to be living a life entirely apart from those red banners,
tolerably faded, moreover, by the autumn rains. The two-headed eagles
with the sceptre of empire have been torn down where possible, but
oftener draped or hastily painted over. They seem to be lurking there.
All the old Russia is lurking, its jaws set in rage.

The slight figures of the militia-men at the street corners remind one
of the revolution that has wiped out the old “Pharaohs,” who used to
stand there like live monuments. Moreover Russia has now for almost two
months been called a republic. And the Czar’s family is in Tobolsk. Yes,
the February whirlwind has left its traces. But the czarist generals
remain generals, the senators senatorialise, the privy councillors
defend their dignity, the Table of Precedence is still in effect.
Coloured hat-bands and cockades recall the bureaucratic hierarchy;
yellow buttons with an eagle still distinguish the student. And yet more
important – the landlords are still landlords, no end of the war is in
sight, the Allied diplomats are impudently jerking official Russia along
on a string.

All remains as before and yet nobody knows himself. The aristocratic
quarters feel that they have been moved out into the backyard; the
quarters of the liberal bourgeoisie have moved nearer the aristocracy.
From being a patriotic myth, the Russian people have become an awful
reality. Everything is billowing and shaking under foot. Mysticism
flares up with sharpened force in those circles which not long ago were
making fun of the superstitions of the monarchy.

Brokers, lawyers, ballerinas are cursing the oncoming eclipse of public
morals. Faith in the Constituent Assembly is evaporating day by day.
Gorky in his newspaper is prophesying the approaching downfall of
culture. The flight from raving and hungry Petrograd to a more peaceful
and well-fed province, on the increase ever since the July Days, now
becomes a stampede. Respectable families who have not succeeded in
getting away from the capital, try in vain to insulate themselves from
reality behind stone wall and under iron roof. But the echoes of the
storm penetrate on every side: through the market, where everything is
getting dear and nothing to be had; through the respectable press, which
is turning into one yelp of hatred and fear; through the seething
streets where from time to time shootings are to be heard under the
windows; and finally through the back entrance, through the servants,
who are no longer humbly submissive. It is here that the revolution
strikes home to the most sensitive spot. That obstreperousness of the
household slaves destroys utterly the stability of the family régime.

Nevertheless the everyday routine defends itself with all its might.
Schoolboys are still studying the old text-books, functionaries drawing
up the same useless papers, poets scribbling the verses that nobody
reads, nurses telling the fairy-tales about Ivan Czarevich. The
nobility’s and merchants’ daughters, coming in from the provinces, are
studying music or hunting husbands. The same old cannon on the wall of
the Peter and Paul fortress continues to announce the noon hour. A new
ballet is going on in the Mariinsky Theatre, and the Minister of Foreign
Affairs, Tereshchenko, stronger on choreography than diplomacy, finds
time, we may assume, to admire the steel toes of the ballerina and thus
demonstrate the stability of the régime.

The remnants of the old banquet are still very plentiful and everything
can be had for big money. The Guard officers still click their spurs
accurately and go after adventures. Wild parties are in progress in the
private dining-rooms of expensive restaurants. The shutting-off of the
electric lights at midnight does not prevent the flourishing of
gambling-clubs where champagne sparkles by candlelight, where
illustrious peculators swindle no less illustrious German spies, where
monarchist conspirators call the bets of Semitic smugglers, and where
the astronomical figures of the stakes played for indicate both the
scale of debauchery and the scale of inflation.

Can it be that a mere tram-car, run-down, dirty, dilatory, draped with
clusters of people, leads from this St. Petersburg in its death-agony
into the workers’ quarters so passionately and tensely alive with a new
hope? The blue-and-gold cupola of Smolny Convent announces from afar the
headquarters of the insurrection. It is on the edge of the city where
the tram-line ends and the Neva describes a sharp turn south, separating
the centre of the capital from the suburbs. That long grey three story
building, an educative barrack for the daughters of the nobility, is now
the stronghold of the soviets. Its long echoing corridors seem to have
been made for teaching the laws of perspective. Over the doors of many
of the rooms along the corridors little enamelled tablets are still
preserved: “Teacher’s Room,” “Third Grade,” “Fourth Grade,” “Grade
Supervisor.” But alongside the old tablets, or covering them, sheets of
paper have been tacked up as best they might, bearing the mysterious
hieroglyphics of the revolution: Tz-K P-S-R, S-D Mensheviki, S-D
Bolsheviki, Left S-R, Anarchist-Communists, Despatching Room of the
Tz-I-K, etc., etc. The observant John Reed notices a placard on the
walls: “Comrades, for the sake of your own health, observe cleanliness.”
Alas, nobody observes cleanliness, not even nature. October Petrograd is
living under a canopy of rain. The streets, long unswept, are dirty.
Enormous puddles are standing in the court of Smolny. The mud is carried
into the corridors and halls by the soldiers’ boots. But nobody is
looking down now underfoot. All are looking forward.

Smolny is more and more firmly and imperiously giving commands, for the
passionate sympathy of the masses is lifting her up. However, the
central leadership grasps directly only the topmost links of that
revolutionary system which as a connected whole is destined to achieve
the change. The most important processes are taking place below, and
somehow of their own accord. The factories and barracks are the chief
forges of history in these days and nights. As in February, the Vyborg
district focuses the basic forces of the revolution. But it has today a
thing it lacked in February – its own powerful organisation open and
universally recognised. From the dwellings, the factory lunch-rooms, the
clubs, the barracks, all threads lead to the house numbered 33
Samsonevsky Prospect, where are located the district committee of the
Bolsheviks, the Vyborg Soviet, and the military headquarters. The
district militia is fusing with the Red Guard. The district is wholly in
the control of the workers. If the government should raid Smolny, the
Vyborg district alone could re-establish a centre and guarantee the
further offensive.

The _denouément_ was approaching close, but the ruling circles thought,
or pretended to think, that they had no special cause for anxiety. The
British Embassy, which had its own reasons for following events in
Petrograd with some attention, received, according to the Russian
ambassador in London, reliable information about the coming
insurrection. To the anxious inquiries of Buchanan at the inevitable
diplomatic luncheon, Tereshchenko replied with warm assurance: “Nothing
of the kind” is possible; the government has the reins firmly in hand.
The Russian Embassy in London found out about the revolution in
Petrograd from the despatches of a British telegraph agency.

The mine owner, Auerbach, paying a visit during those days to the
deputy-minister, Palchinsky, inquired in passing – after a conversation
about more serious matters – as to the “dark clouds on the political
horizon.” He received a most reassuring answer: The next storm in a
series, and nothing more; it will pass over and all will be clear –
“sleep well.” Palchinsky himself was going to pass one or two sleepless
nights before he got arrested.

The more unceremoniously Kerensky treated the Compromise leaders, the
less did he doubt that in the hour of danger they would come punctually
to his aid. The weaker the Compromisers grew, the more carefully did
they surround themselves with an atmosphere of illusion. Exchanging
words of neutral encouragement between their Petrograd turrets and their
upper-crust organisations in the provinces and the front, the Mensheviks
and Social-Revolutionaries created a simulacrum of public opinion, and
thus disguising their own impotence, fooled not so much their enemy as
themselves.

The cumbersome and good-for-nothing state apparatus, representing a
combination of March socialist with czarist bureaucrat, was perfectly
accommodated to the task of self-deception. The half-baked March
socialist dreaded to appear to the bureaucrat a not wholly mature
statesman. The bureaucrat dreaded lest he show a lack of respect to the
new ideas. Thus was created a web of official lies, in which generals,
district attorneys, newspaper-men, commissars, _aides-de-camp_, lied the
more, the nearer they stood to the seats of power. The commander of the
Petrograd military district made comforting reports, for the reason that
Kerensky, faced by an uncomforting reality, had great need of them.

The traditions of the dual power worked in the same direction. Were not
the current orders of the military headquarters, when countersigned by
the Military Revolutionary Committee, implicitly obeyed? The patrolling
squads throughout the city were filled out by the troops of the garrison
in the usual order – and we must add, it had been long since the troops
had gone their patrol duty with such zeal as now. Discontent among the
masses? But “slaves in revolt” are always discontented. Only the scum of
the garrison and the workers’ districts will take part in mutinous
attempts. The soldiers’ sections are against headquarters? But the
military department of the Central Executive Committee is for Kerensky.
The whole organised democracy, with the exception of the Bolsheviks,
supports the government. Thus the rosy March nimbus had turned into a
grey vapour, hiding the actual traits of things.

It was only after the break between Smolny and headquarters that the
government tried to adopt a more serious attitude toward the situation.
There is, of course, no immediate danger, they said, but this time we
must avail ourselves of the opportunity to put an end to the Bolsheviks.
Besides, the bourgeois Allies were bringing every pressure to bear on
the Winter Palace. On the night of the 24th the government summoned up
its courage and passed a resolution: to institute legal proceedings
against the Military Revolutionary Committee; to shut down the Bolshevik
papers advocating insurrection; to summon reliable military detachments
from the environs and from the front. The proposal to arrest the
Military Revolutionary Committee as a body, although adopted in
principle, was postponed in execution. For so large an undertaking, they
decided, it was necessary to secure in advance the support of the
Pre-Parliament.

The rumour of the government’s decision spread immediately through the
town. In the building of the main headquarters alongside the Winter
Palace, the soldiers of the Pavlovsky regiment, one of the most reliable
units of the Military Revolutionary Committee, were on sentry duty
during the night of the 24th. Conversations went on in their presence
about summoning the junkers, about lifting the bridges, about arrests.
All that the Pavlovtsi managed to hear and remember they immediately
passed on to Smolny. Those in the revolutionary centre did not always
know how to make use of the communications of this self-constituted
Intelligence Service. But it fulfilled an invaluable function. The
workers and soldiers of the whole city were made aware of the intentions
of the enemy, and reinforced in their readiness to resist.

Early in the morning the authorities began their preparations for
aggressive action. The military schools of the capital were ordered to
make ready for battle. The cruiser _Aurora_ moored in the Neva, its crew
favourable to the Bolsheviks, was ordered to put out and join the rest
of the fleet. Military detachments were called in from neighbouring
points: a battalion of shock troops from Tsarskoe Selo, the junkers from
Oranienbaum, the artillery from Pavlovsk. The headquarters of the
Northern front was asked to send reliable troops to the capital
immediately. In the way of direct measures of military precaution, the
following orders were given: to increase the guard of the Winter Palace;
to raise the bridges over the Neva; to have all automobiles inspected by
the junkers; to cut Smolny out of the telephone system. The Minister of
Justice, Maliantovich, gave an order for the immediate arrest of those
Bolsheviks released under bail who had again brought themselves to
attention by anti-governmental activity. This blow was aimed primarily
at Trotsky. The fickleness of the times is well illustrated by the fact
that Maliantovich – as also his predecessor, Zarudny – had been
Trotsky’s defence counsel in the trial of the St. Petersburg Soviet of
1905. Then, too, it had been a question of the leadership of the Soviet.
The indictments were identical in the two cases, except that the former
defenders when they became accusers, added the little point about German
gold.

Headquarters developed a particularly feverish activity in the sphere of
typography. Document followed document. No coming-out will be permitted;
the guilty will be held strictly responsible; detachments of the
garrison not to leave their barracks without orders from headquarters;
“all commissars of the Petrograd Soviet to be removed”; their illegal
activities to be investigated “with a view to court martial.” In these
formidable orders it was not indicated who was to carry them out or how.
Under threat of personal liability the commander demanded that owners of
automobiles place them at the disposal of headquarters “with a view of
preventing unlawful seizures,” but nobody moved a finger in response.

The Central Executive Committee was also prolific of warnings and
forbiddings. And the peasant executive committee, the city duma, the
central committees of the Mensheviks and Social-Revolutionaries followed
in its steps. All these institutions were sufficiently rich in literary
resources. In the proclamations which plastered the walls and fences,
the talk was invariably about a handful of lunatics, about the danger of
bloody encounters, about the inevitability of counter-revolution.

At five-thirty in the morning a government commissar with a detachment
of junkers showed up at the Bolshevik printing-plant, and after manning
the exits, presented an order of headquarters for the immediate
suppression of the central organ and the soldiers’ paper. – What?
Headquarters? Does that still exist? No orders are recognised here
without the sanction of the Military Revolutionary Committee. But that
did not help. The stereotypes were smashed, the building sealed. The
government had scored its first success.

A worker and a working-girl from the Bolshevik printing-plant ran
panting to Smolny and there found Podvoisky and Trotsky. If the
Committee would give them a guard against the junkers, the workers would
bring out the paper. A form was soon found for the first answer to the
government offensive. An order was issued to the Litovsky regiment to
send a company immediately to the defence of the workers’ press. The
messengers from the printing-plant insisted that the 6th battalion of
sappers be also ordered out: these were near neighbours and loyal
friends. Telephonograms were immediately sent to the two addresses. The
Litovtsi and the sappers came out without delay. The seals were torn
from the building, the moulds again poured, and the work went on. With a
few hours’ delay the newspaper suppressed by the government came out
under protection of the troops of a committee which was itself liable to
arrest. That was insurrection. That is how it developed.

During this same time the cruiser _Aurora_ had addressed a question to
Smolny: Shall we go to sea or remain in the Neva? The very same sailors
who had guarded the Winter Palace against Kornilov in August were now
burning to settle accounts with Kerensky. The government order was
promptly countermanded by the Committee and the crew received Order
No.1218: “In case of an attack on the Petrograd garrison by the
counter-revolutionary forces, the cruiser _Aurora_ is to protect herself
with tugs, steam-boats, and cutters.” The cruiser enthusiastically
carried out this order, for which it had only been waiting.

These two acts of resistance, suggested by workers and sailors, and
carried out, thanks to the sympathy of the garrison, with complete
impunity, became political events of capital importance. The last
remnants of the fetishism of authority crumbled to dust. “It became
instantly clear,” says one of the participants, “that the job was done!”
If not yet done, it was at least proving much simpler than anyone had
imagined yesterday.

An attempt to suppress the papers, a resolution to prosecute the
Military Revolutionary Committee, an order removing commissars, the
cutting-out of Smolny’s telephones – these pin-pricks were just
sufficient to convict the government of preparing a
counter-revolutionary _coup d’état_. Although an insurrection can win on
the offensive, it develops better, the more it looks like self-defence.
A piece of official sealing-wax on the door of the Bolshevik
editorial-rooms – as a military measure that is not much. But what a
superb signal for battle! Telephonograms to all districts and units of
the garrison announced the event: “The enemy of the people took the
offensive during the night. The Military Revolutionary Committee is
leading the resistance to the assault of the conspirators.” The
conspirators – these were the institutions of the official government.
From the pen of revolutionary conspirators this term came as a surprise,
but it wholly corresponded to the situation and to the feelings of the
masses. Crowded out of all its positions, compelled to undertake a
belated defence, incapable of mobilising the necessary forces, or even
finding out whether it had such forces, the government had developed a
scattered, unthought-out, uncoordinated action, which in the eyes of the
masses inevitably looked like a malevolent attempt. The Committee’s
telephonograms gave the command: “Make the regiment ready for battle and
await further orders.” That was the voice of a sovereign power. The
commissars of the Committee, themselves liable to removal by the
government, continued with redoubled confidence to remove those whom
they thought it necessary to remove.

The _Aurora_ in the Neva meant not only an excellent fighting unit in
the service of the insurrection, but a radio-station ready for use.
Invaluable advantage! The sailor Kurkov has remembered: “We got word
from Trotsky to broadcast ... that the counter-revolution had taken the
offensive.” Here too the defensive formulation concealed a summons to
insurrection addressed to the whole country. The garrisons guarding the
approaches to Petrograd were ordered by radio from the _Aurora_ to hold
up the counter-revolutionary echelons, and, in case admonitions were
inadequate, to employ force. All revolutionary organisations were placed
under obligation “to sit continually, accumulating all possible
information as to the plans and activities of the conspirators.” There
was no lack of proclamations, however, the word was not divorced from
the deed, but was a comment on it.

Somewhat belatedly the Military Revolutionary Committee undertook a more
serious fortification of Smolny. In leaving the building at three
o’clock on the night of the 24th, John Reed noticed machine-guns at the
entrances and strong patrols guarding the gates and the adjacent street
corners. The patrols had been reinforced the day before by a company of
the Litovsky regiment and a company of machine-gunners with twenty-four
machine-guns. During the day the guard increased continually. “In the
Smolny region,” writes Shliapnikov, “I saw a familiar picture, reminding
me of the first days of the February revolution around the Tauride
Palace.” The same multitude of soldiers, workers and weapons of all
kinds. Innumerable cords of firewood had been piled up in the court – a
perfect cover against rifle-fire. Motor-trucks were bringing up
foodstuffs and munitions. “All Smolny,” says Raskolnikov, “was converted
into an armed camp. Cannon were in position out in front of the columns.
Machine-guns alongside them ... Almost on every step those same
‘maxims,’ looking like toy-cannon. And through all the corridors ... the
swift, loud, happy tramp of workers, soldiers, sailors and agitators.”
Sukhanov, accusing the organisers of the insurrection – not without
foundation – of insufficient military precaution, writes: “Only now, in
the afternoon and evening of the 24th, did they begin to bring up armed
detachments of Red Guards and soldiers to Smolny to defend the
headquarters of the insurrection ... By the evening of the 24th the
defence of Smolny began to look like something.”

This matter is not without importance. In Smolny, whence the
compromisist Executive Committee had managed to steal away to the
headquarters of the government staff, there were now concentrated the
heads of all the revolutionary organisations led by the Bolsheviks. Here
assembled on that day the all important meeting of the Central Committee
of the Bolsheviks to take the final decision before striking the blow.
Eleven members were present. Lenin had not yet turned up from his refuge
in the Vyborg district. Zinoviev also was absent from the session.
According to the temperamental expression of Dzerzhinsky, he was “hiding
and taking no part in the party work.”

Kamenev, on the other hand, although sharing the views of Zinoviev, was
very active in the headquarters of the insurrection. Stalin was not
present at the session. Generally speaking he did not appear at Smolny,
spending his time in the editorial office of the central organ. The
session, as always, was held under the chairmanship of Sverdlov. The
official minutes of the session are scant, but they indicate everything
essential. For characterising the leading participants in the
revolution, and the distribution of functions among them, they are
irreplaceable.

It was a question of taking full possession of Petrograd in the next
twenty-four hours. That meant to seize those political and technical
institutions which were still in the hands of the government. The
Congress of Soviets must hold its session under the Soviet power. The
practical measures of the nocturnal assault had been worked out, or were
being worked out, by the Military Revolutionary Committee and the
Military Organisations of the Bolsheviks. The Central Committee was to
underline the final points.

First of all a proposal of Kamenev was adopted: “Today no member of the
Central Committee can leave Smolny without a special resolution.” It was
decided over and above that, to keep on duty here members of the
Petrograd Committee of the party. The minutes read further: “Trotsky
proposes that they place at the disposal of the Military Revolutionary
Committee two members of the Central Committee for the purpose of
establishing communications with the postal and telegraph workers and
the railroad workers; a third member to keep the Provisional Government
under observation.” It was resolved to delegate Dzerzhinsky to the
postal and telegraph workers, Bubnov to the railroad workers. At first,
and obviously at Sverdlov’s suggestion, it was proposed to allot the
watch over the Provisional Government to Podvoisky. The minutes read:
“Objections to Podvoisky; Sverdlov is appointed.” Miliutin, who passed
as an economist, was appointed to organise the supply of food for the
period of the insurrection. Negotiations with the Left
Social-Revolutionaries were entrusted to Kamenev, who had the reputation
of a skilful although too yielding parliamentary. “Yielding,” of course,
only from a Bolshevik criterion. “Trotsky proposes” – we read further –
“that a reserve headquarters be established in the Peter and Paul
fortress, and that one member of the Central Committee be sent there for
that purpose” It was resolved: “To appoint Lashevich and Blagonravov for
general observation; to commission Sverdlov to keep in continual touch
with the fortress.” Further: “To supply all members of the Central
Committee with passes to the fortress.”

Along party lines all threads were held in the hands of Sverdlov, who
knew the cadres of the party as no one else did. He kept Smolny in touch
with the party apparatus, supplied the Military Revolutionary Committee
with the necessary workers, and was summoned into the Committee for
counsel at all critical moments. Since the Committee had a too broad,
and to some extent fluid, membership, the more conspirative undertakings
were carried out through the heads of the Military Organisation of the
Bolsheviks, or through Sverdlov, who was the unofficial but all the more
real “general secretary” of the October insurrection.

The Bolshevik delegates arriving in those days for the Soviet Congress
would come first into the hands of Sverdlov, and would not be left for
one unnecessary hour without something to do. On the 24th there were
already two or three hundred provincial delegates in Petrograd, and the
majority of them were included one way or another in the mechanics of
the insurrection. At two o’clock in the afternoon, they assembled at a
caucus in Smolny to hear a report from the Central Committee of the
party. There were waverers among them who, like Zinoviev and Kamenev,
preferred a waiting policy; there were also newcomers who were merely
not sufficiently reliable. There could be no talk of expounding before
this caucus the whole plan of the insurrection. Whatever is said at a
large meeting inevitably gets abroad. It was still impossible even to
throw off the defensive envelope of the attack without creating
confusion in the minds of certain units of the garrison. But it was
necessary to make the delegates understand that a decisive struggle had
already begun, and that it would remain only for the Congress to crown
it.

Referring to recent articles of Lenin, Trotsky demonstrated that “a
conspiracy does not contradict the principles of Marxism,” if objective
relations make an insurrection possible and inevitable. “The physical
barrier on the road to power must be overcome by a blow ...” However, up
till now the policy of the Military Revolutionary Committee has not gone
beyond the policy of self-defence. Of course this self-defence must be
understood in a sufficiently broad sense. To assure the publication of
the Bolshevik press with the help of armed forces, or to retain the
_Aurora_ in the waters of the Neva – “Comrades, is that not
self-defence? – It is defence!” If the government intends to arrest us,
we have machine-guns on the roof of Smolny in preparation for such an
event. “That also, comrades, is a measure of defence.” But how about the
Provisional Government? says one of the written questions. What if
Kerensky tries not to submit to the Congress of Soviets? The spokesman
replied: If Kerensky should attempt not to submit to the Congress of
Soviets, then the resistance of the government would have created “not a
political but a police question.” That was in essence almost exactly
what happened.

At that moment Trotsky was called out to consult with a deputation just
arrived from the city duma. In the capital, to be sure, it was still
quiet, but alarming rumours were on foot. The mayor put these questions:
Does the Soviet intend to make an insurrection, and how about keeping
order in the city? And what will become of the duma itself if it does
not recognise the revolution? These respected gentlemen wanted to know
too much. The answer was: The question of power is to be decided by the
Congress of Soviets. Whether this will lead to an armed struggle
“depends not so much upon the soviets as upon those who, in conflict
with the unanimous will of the people, are retaining the state of power
in their hands.” If the Congress declines the power, the Petrograd
Soviet will submit. But the government itself is obviously seeking a
conflict. Orders have been issued for the arrest of the Military
Revolutionary Committee. The workers and soldiers can only reply with
ruthless resistance. What about looting and violence from criminal
gangs? An order of the Committee issued today reads: “At the first
attempt of criminal elements to bring about disturbances, looting,
knifing or shooting on the streets of Petrograd, the criminals will be
wiped off the face of the earth.” As to the city duma, it will be
possible in case of a conflict to employ constitutional methods –
dissolution and a new election. The delegation went away dissatisfied.
But what had they as a matter of fact expected?

That official visit of the City Fathers to the camp of the rebels was
only too candid a demonstration of the impotence of the ruling groups.
“Remember, comrades,” said Trotsky upon returning to the Bolshevik
caucus, “that a few weeks ago when we won the majority, we were only a
trade-name – without a printing press, without a treasury, without
departments – and now the city duma sends a deputation to the arrested
Military Revolutionary Committee” for information as to the destiny of
the city and the state.

The Peter and Paul fortress, won over politically only yesterday, is
today completely taken possession of by the Military Revolutionary
Committee. The machine-gun crew, the most revolutionary unit, is being
brought into fighting trim. A mighty work of cleaning the Colt
machine-guns is in progress – there are eighty of them. Machine-guns are
set up on the fortress wall to command the quay and the Troitsky bridge.
The sentry guard at the gates is reinforced. Patrols are sent out into
the surrounding districts. But in the heat of these morning hours it
suddenly becomes known that within the fortress itself the situation is
not assured. The uncertainty lies in a bicycle battalion. Recruited,
like the cavalry, from well-to-do and rich peasants, the bicycle men,
coming from the intermediate city layers, constituted a most
conservative part of the army. A theme for idealistic psychologists: Let
a man find himself, in distinction from others, on top of two wheels
with a chain – at least in a poor country like Russia – and his vanity
begins to swell out like his tyres. In America it takes an automobile to
produce this effect.

Brought in from the front to put down the July movement, the bicycle
battalion had zealously stormed the Palace of Kshesinskaia, and
afterward been installed in Peter and Paul as one of the most reliable
detachments. It was learned that at yesterday’s meeting which settled
the fate of the fortress, the bicycle men had not been present. The old
discipline still held in the battalion to such an extent that the
officers had succeeded in keeping the soldiers from going into the
fortress court. Counting on these bicycle men, the commandant of the
fortress held his chin high, frequently got into telephone connection
with Kerensky’s headquarters, and even professed to be about to arrest
the Bolshevik commissar. The situation must not be left indefinite for
an extra minute. Upon an order from Smolny, Blagonravov confronts the
enemy: the colonel is subjected to house arrest, the telephones are
removed from all officers’ apartments. The government staff calls up
excitedly to know why the commandant is silent, and in general what is
going on in the fortress. Blagonravov respectfully reports over the
telephone that the fortress henceforward fulfils only the orders of the
Military Revolutionary Committee, with which it behoves the government
in the future to get in connection.

All the troops of the fortress garrison accepted the arrest of the
commandant with complete satisfaction, but the bicycle men bore
themselves evasively. What lay concealed behind their sulky silence: a
hidden hostility or the last waverings? “We decided to hold a special
meeting for the bicycle men,” writes Blagonravov, “and invite our best
agitational forces, and above all Trotsky, who had enormous authority
and influence over the soldier masses.” At four o’clock in the afternoon
the whole battalion met in the neighbouring building of the _Cirque
Moderne_. As governmental opponent, Quartermaster-General Poradelov,
considered to be a Social-Revolutionary, took the floor. His objections
were so cautious as to seem equivocal; and so much the more destructive
was the attack of the Committee’s representatives. This supplementary
oratorical battle for the Peter and Paul fortress ended as might have
been foreseen: by all voices except thirty the battalion supported the
resolution of Trotsky. One more of the potential bloody conflicts was
settled before the fighting and without bloodshed. That was the October
insurrection. Such was its style.

It was now possible to rely upon the fortress with tranquil confidence.
Weapons were given out from the arsenal without hindrance. At Smolny, in
the Factory and Shop Committee room, delegates from the plants stood in
line to get orders for rifles. The capital had seen many queues during
the war years – now it saw rifle-queues for the first time. Trucks from
all the districts of the city were driving up to the arsenal. “You would
hardly have recognised the Peter and Paul fortress,” writes the worker
Skorinko. “It’s renowned silence was broken by the chugging automobiles,
shouts, and the creak of wagons. There was a special bustle in the
storehouses ... Here too they led by us the first prisoners, officers
and junkers.”

The meeting in the _Cirque Moderne_ had another result. The bicycle men
who had been guarding the Winter Palace since July withdrew, announcing
that they would no longer consent to protect the government. That was a
heavy blow. The bicycle men had to be replaced by junkers. The military
support of the government was more and more reducing itself to the
officers’ schools – a thing which not only narrowed it extremely, but
also conclusively revealed its social constitution.

The workers of the Putilov wharf – and not they alone – were insistently
urging Smolny to disarm the junkers. If this measure had been taken
after careful preparation, in co-operation with the non-combatant units
of the schools, on the night of the 25th, the capture of the Winter
Palace would have offered no difficulties whatever. If the junkers had
been disarmed even on the night of the 26th, after the capture of the
Winter Palace, there would have been no attempted counter-insurrection
on the 29th of October. But the leaders were still in many directions
revealing a “magnanimous spirit” – in reality an excess of optimistic
confidence – and did not always listen attentively enough to the sober
voice of the lower ranks. In this Lenin’s absence, too, was felt. The
masses bad to correct these omissions and mistakes, with unnecessary
losses on both sides. In a serious struggle there is no worse cruelty
than to be magnanimous at an inopportune time.

At an afternoon session of the Pre-Parliament, Kerensky sings his
swan-song. During recent days, he says, the population of Russia, and
especially of the capital, has been in a constant state of alarm. “Calls
for insurrection appear daily in the Bolshevik papers.” The orator
quotes the articles of the wanted state criminal, Vladimir Ulianov
Lenin. The quotations are brilliant and irrefutably prove that the
above-named individual is inciting to insurrection. And when? At a
moment when the government is just taking up the question of
transferring the land to the peasant committees, and of measures to
bring the war to an end. The authorities have so far made no haste to
put down the conspirators, wishing to give them the opportunity to
correct their own mistakes. “That is just what is wrong!” comes from the
section where Miliukov is leader. But Kerensky is unabashed. “I prefer
in general,” he says, “that a government should act more slowly, and
thus more correctly, and at the necessary moment more decisively.” From
those lips the words have a strange sound At any rate: “All days of
grace are now past”; the Bolsheviks have not only not repented, but they
have called out two companies, and are independently distributing
weapons and cartridges. This time the government intends to put an end
to the lawlessness of the rabble. “I choose my words deliberately:
rabble.” This insult to the people is greeted on the right with loud
applause. He, Kerensky, has already given orders, he says, for the
necessary arrests. “Special attention must be given to the speeches of
the President of the Soviet, Bronstein-Trotsky.” And be it known that
the government has more than adequate forces; telegrams are coming in
continually from the front demanding decisive measures against the
Bolsheviks. At this point Konovalov hands the speaker the telephonogram
from the Military Revolutionary Committee to the troops of the garrison,
instructing them to “make the regiment ready for battle and await
further orders.” After reading the document Kerensky solemnly concludes:
“In the language of the law and of judicial authority that is called a
state of insurrection.” Miliukov bears witness: “Kerensky pronounced
these words in the complacent tone of a lawyer who has at last succeeded
in getting evidence against his opponent.” “Those groups and parties who
have dared to lift their hands against the state,” he concludes, “are
liable to immediate, decisive and permanent liquidation.” The entire
hall, except the extreme left, demonstratively applauded. The speech
ended with a demand: that this very day, in this session, an answer be
given to the question, “Can the government fulfil its duty with
confidence in the support of this lofty assemblage?” Without awaiting
the vote, Kerensky returned to headquarters – confident, according to
his own account, that an hour would not pass before he would receive the
needed decision. For what purpose it was needed remains unknown.

However, it turned out otherwise. From two to six o’clock the Mariinsky
Palace was busy with factional and inter-factional conferences, striving
to work out a formula. The conferees did not understand that they were
working out a formula for their own funeral. Not one of the compromisist
groups had the courage to identify itself with the government. Dan said:
“We Mensheviks are ready to defend the Provisional Government with the
last drop of our blood; but let the government make it possible for the
democracy to unite around it.” Towards evening the left faction of the
Pre-Parliament, worn out with the search for a solution, united on a
formula borrowed by Dan from Martov, a formula which laid the
responsibility for insurrection not only on the Bolsheviks, but also on
the government, and demanded immediate transfer of the land to the Land
Committees, intercession with the Allies in favour of peace
negotiations, etc. Thus the apostles of moderation tried at the last
moment to counterfeit those slogans which only yesterday they had been
denouncing as demagogy and adventurism. Unqualified support to the
government was promised by the Kadets and Cossacks – that is, by those
two groups who intended to throw Kerensky over at the very first
opportunity – but they were a minority. The support of the
Pre-Parliament could have added little to the government, but Miliukov
is right: this refusal of support robbed the government of the last
remnants of its authority. Had not the government itself only a few
weeks before determined the composition of the Pre-Parliament?

While they were seeking a salvation formula in the Mariinsky Palace, the
Petrograd Soviet was assembling in Smolny for purposes of information.
The spokesman considered it necessary to remind the Soviet that the
Military Revolutionary Committee had arisen “not as an instrument of
insurrection, but on the basis of revolutionary self-defence.” The
Committee had not permitted Kerensky to remove the revolutionary troops
from Petrograd, and it had taken under its protection the workers’
press. “Was this insurrection?” The _Aurora_ stands today where she
stood last night. “Is this insurrection?” We have today a
semi-government, in which the people do not believe, and which does not
believe in itself, because it is inwardly dead. This semi-government is
awaiting that swish of the historic broom that will clear the space for
an authentic government of the revolutionary people. Tomorrow the
Congress of Soviets will open. It is the duty of the garrison and the
workers to put all their forces at the disposal of the Congress. “If,
however, the government attempts to employ the twenty-four hours
remaining to it in plunging a knife into the back of the revolution then
we declare once more: The vanguard of the revolution will answer blow
with blow and iron with steel.” This open threat was at the same time a
political screen for the forthcoming night attack. In conclusion Trotsky
informed the meeting that the Left Social-Revolutionary faction of the
Pre-Parliament, after today’s speech from Kerensky and a mouse-riot
among the Compromise factions, had sent a delegation to Smolny to
express its readiness to enter officially into the staff of the Military
Revolutionary Committee. In this shift of the Left Social
Revolutionaries the Soviet joyfully welcomed a reflection of deeper
processes: the widening scope of the peasant war and the successful
progress of the Petrograd insurrection.

Commenting on this speech of the President of the Petrograd Soviet,
Miliukov writes: “Probably this was Trotsky’s original plan – having
prepared for battle, to confront the government with the ‘unanimous will
of the people’ as expressed in the Congress of Soviets, and thus give
the new power the appearance of a legal origin. But the government
proved weaker than he expected, and the power fell into his hands of its
own accord before the Congress had time to assemble and express itself.”
What is true here, is that the weakness of the government exceeded all
expectations. But from the beginning the plan had been to seize the
power before the Congress opened. Miliukov recognises this, by the way,
in a different connection. “The actual intentions of the leaders of the
revolution,” he says, “went much further than these official
announcements of Trotsky. The Congress of Soviets was to be placed
before a _fait accompli_.”

The purely military plan consisted originally of guaranteeing a united
action of the Baltic sailors and the armed Vyborg workers. The sailors
were to come by railroad and detrain at the Finland station, which is in
the Vyborg district, and then from this base by way of a further
assimilation of the Red Guard and units of the garrison, the
insurrection was to spread to other districts of the city, and having
seized the bridges, to advance into the centre for the final blow. This
scheme – naturally deriving from the circumstances, and formulated, it
seems, by Antonov – was drawn up on the assumption that the enemy would
be able to put up a considerable resistance. It was just this premise
that soon fell away. It was unnecessary to start from a limited base,
because the government proved open to attack wherever the
insurrectionists found it necessary to strike a blow.

The strategic plan underwent changes in the matter of dates also, and
that in two directions: the insurrection began earlier and ended later
than had been indicated. The morning attacks of the government called
out by way of self-defence an immediate resistance from the Military
Revolutionary Committee. The impotence of the authorities, thus
revealed, impelled Smolny during the same day to offensive actions –
preserving, to be sure, a half-way, semi-disguised and preparatory
character. The main blow as before was prepared during the night: in
that sense the plan held good. It was transgressed, however, in the
process of fulfilment – but now in an opposite direction. It had been
proposed to occupy during the night all the commanding summits, and
first of all the Winter Palace where the central power had taken refuge.
But time-calculations are even more difficult in insurrection than in
regular war. The leaders were many hours late with the concentration of
forces, and the operations against the palace, not even begun during the
night, formed a special chapter of the revolution ending only on the
night of the 26th – that is, a whole twenty-four hours late. The most
brilliant victories are not achieved without duds.

After Kerensky’s speech at the Pre-Parliament the authorities tried to
broaden their offensive. The railroad stations were occupied by
detachments of junkers. Pickets were posted at the big street-crossings
and ordered to requisition the private automobiles not turned over to
headquarters. By three o’clock in the afternoon the bridges were raised,
except for the Dvortsovy which remained open under heavy guard for the
movement of the junkers. This measure, adopted by the monarchy at all
critical moments and for the last time in the February Days, was
dictated by fear of the workers’ districts. The raising of the bridges
was received by the population as an official announcement of the
beginning of the insurrection. The headquarters of the districts
concerned immediately answered this military act of the government in
their own way by sending armed detachments to the bridges. Smolny had
only to develop their initiative. This struggle for the bridges assumed
the character of a test for both sides. Parties of armed workers and
soldiers brought pressure to bear on the junkers and Cossacks, now
persuading and now threatening. The guard finally yielded without
hazarding a straight-out fight. Some of the bridges were raised and
lowered several times.

The _Aurora_ received a direct order from the Military Revolutionary
Committee: “With all means at your command restore movement on the
Nikolaevsky Bridge.” The commander of the cruiser at first refused to
carry out the order, but, after a symbolic arrest of himself and all his
officers, obediently brought the ship to the bridge. Cordons of sailors
spread out along both quays. By the time the _Aurora_ had dropped anchor
before the bridge, relates Korkov, the tracks of the junkers were
already cold. The sailors themselves lowered the bridge and posted
guards. Only Dvortsovy Bridge remained several hours in the hands of the
government patrols.

Notwithstanding the manifest failure of its first experiments,
individual branches of the government tried to deal further blows. A
detachment of militia appeared in the evening at a big private
printing-plant to suppress the newspaper of the Petrograd Soviet,
_Worker and Soldier_. Twelve hours before, the workers of the Bolshevik
press had run for help in a like case to Smolny. Now there was no need
of it. The printers, together with two sailors who happened by,
immediately captured the automobile loaded with papers; a number of the
militia joined them on the spot; the inspector of militia fled. The
captured paper was successfully delivered at Smolny. The Military
Revolutionary Committee sent two squads of the Preobrazhentsi to protect
the publication. The frightened administration thereupon turned over the
management of the printing-plant to the soviet of worker-overseers.

The legal authorities did not even think of penetrating Smolny to make
arrests: it was too obvious that this would be the signal for a civil
war in which the defeat of the government was assured in advance. There
was made, however, as a kind of administrative convulsion, an attempt to
arrest Lenin in the Vyborg district, where, generally speaking, the
authorities were afraid even to look in. Late in the evening a certain
colonel with a dozen junkers accidentally entered a workers’ club
instead of the Bolshevik editorial rooms located in the same house. The
brave boys had for some reason imagined that Lenin would be waiting for
them in the editorial rooms. The club immediately informed the district
headquarters of the Red Guard. While the colonel was wandering around
from one storey to another, arriving once even among the Mensheviks, a
detachment of Red Guards, rushing up, arrested him along with his
junkers, and brought them to the headquarters of the Vyborg district,
and thence to the Peter and Paul fortress. Thus the loudly proclaimed
campaign against the Bolsheviks, meeting insuperable difficulties at
every step, turned into disconnected jumps and small anecdotes,
evaporated, and came to nothing.

During this time the Military Revolutionary Committee was working day
and night. Its commissars were on continual duty in the military units.
The population was notified in special proclamations where to turn in
case of counter-revolutionary attempts or pogroms: Help will be given on
the instant.” A suggestive visit to the telephone exchange from the
commissar of the Keksgolmsky regiment proved sufficient to get Smolny
switched back into the system. Telephone communications, the swiftest of
all, gave confidence and regularity to the developing operations.

Continuing to plant its own commissars in those institutions which had
not yet come under its control, the Military Revolutionary Committee
kept broadening and reinforcing its bases for the coming offensive.
Dzerzhinsky that afternoon handed the old revolutionist Pestkovsky a
sheet of paper in the form of credentials appointing him to the office
of commissar of the central telegraph station. But how shall I get
possession of the telegraph station? – asked the new commissar in some
surprise. The Keksgolmsky regiment is supplying sentries there and it is
on our side! Pestkovsky needed no further illumination. Two Keksgolmsti,
standing by the commutator with rifles, proved sufficient to attain a
compromise with the hostile telegraph officials, among whom were no
Bolsheviks.

At nine o’clock in the evening another commissar of the Military
Revolutionary Committee, Stark, with a small detachment of sailors under
the command of the former émigré Savin, also a seaman, occupied the
government news agency and therewith decided not only the fate of that
institution, but also to a certain degree his own fate: Stark became the
first Soviet director of the agency, before being appointed Soviet
ambassador to Afghanistan.

Were these two modest operations acts of insurrection, or were they only
episodes in the two-power system – transferred, to be sure, from the
compromisist to the Bolshevik rails? The question may perhaps reasonably
be regarded as casuistic, but for the purpose of camouflaging an
insurrection it had a certain importance. The fact is that even the
intrusion of armed sailors into the building of the news agency had
still a sort of half-way character: it was not yet a question of seizing
the institution, but only of establishing a censorship over despatches.
Thus right up to the evening of the 24th, the umbilical cord of
“legality” was not conclusively severed. The movement was still
disguising itself with the remnants of the two-power tradition.

In working out the plans of the insurrection, Smolny rested great hopes
on the Baltic sailors as a fighting detachment combining proletarian
resolution with strict military training. The arrival of the sailors in
Petrograd had been dated in advance to coincide with the Congress of
Soviets. To call the Baltic sailors in earlier would have meant to take
openly the road of insurrection. Out of this arose a difficulty which
subsequently turned into a delay.

During the afternoon of the 24th, two delegates from the Kronstadt
Soviet, the Bolshevik Flerovsky and the Anarchist Yarchuk, who was
keeping step with the Bolsheviks, arrived in Smolny for the Congress. In
one of the rooms of Smolny they ran into Chudnovsky, who had just
returned from the front, and who, alluding to the mood of the soldiers,
spoke against insurrection in the near future. “At the height of the
argument,” relates Flerovsky, “Trotsky came into the room, Calling me
aside, he advised me to return immediately to Kronstadt: ‘Events are
maturing so fast that everyone must be at his post ...’ In this curt
order I felt keenly the discipline of the advancing insurrection.” The
argument was cut short. The impressionable and hot-headed Chudnovsky
laid aside his doubts in order to take part in drawing up the plans of
the fight. On the heels of Flerovsky and Yarchuk went a telephonogram:
“The armed forces of Kronstadt are to come out at dawn for the defence
of the Congress of Soviets.”

Through Sverdlov the Military Revolutionary Committee sent a telegram
that night to Helsingfors, to Smilga, the president of the regional
Committee of the Soviets: “Send regulations.” That meant: Send
immediately 1,500 chosen Baltic sailors armed to the teeth. Although the
sailors could reach Petrograd only during the next day, there was no
reason to postpone military action; the internal forces were adequate.
Yes, and a postponement was impossible. Operations had already begun. If
reinforcements should come from the front to help the government, then
the sailors would arrive in time to deal them a blow in the flank or
rear.

The tactical plans for the conquest of the capital were worked out
chiefly by the staff of the Military Organisation of the Bolsheviks.
Officers of the general staff would have found many faults in them, but
military academicians do not customarily take part in the preparation of
a revolutionary insurrection. The essentials at any rate were taken care
of. The city was divided into military divisions, each subordinate to
the nearest headquarters. At the most important points companies of the
Red Guard were concentrated in co-ordination with the neighbouring
military units, where companies on duty were awake and ready. The goal
of each separate operation, and the forces for it, were indicated in
advance. All those taking part in the insurrection from top to bottom –
in this lay its power, in this also at times its Achilles’ heel – were
imbued with absolute confidence that the victory was going to be won
without casualties.

The main operation began at two o’clock in the morning. Small military
parties, usually with a nucleus of armed workers or sailors under the
leadership of commissars, occupied simultaneously, or in regular order,
the railroad stations, the lighting plant, the munition and food stores,
the waterworks, Dvortsovy Bridge, the Telephone Exchange, the State
Bank, the big printing-plants. The Telegraph Station and the Post Office
were completely taken over. Reliable guards were placed everywhere.

Meagre and colourless is the record of the episodes of that October
night. It is like a police report. All the participants were shaking
with a nervous fever. There was no time to observe and record and no one
to do it. The information flowing in at headquarters was not always
jotted down, and if so it was done carelessly. Notes got lost.
Subsequent recollections were dry and not always accurate, since they
came for the most part from accidental people. Those workers, sailors,
and soldiers who really inspired and lead the operation took their
places soon after at the head of the first detachments of the Red Army,
and the majority laid down their lives in the various theatres of the
civil war. In the attempt to determine the sequence of separate
episodes, the investigator runs into a vast confusion, which is still
more complicated by the accounts in the newspapers. At times it seems as
though it was easier to capture Petrograd in the autumn of 1917 than to
recount the process fourteen years later.

To the first company of the sapper battalion, the strongest and most
revolutionary, was given the task of seizing the nearby Nikolaevsky
railroad station. In less than a quarter of an hour the station was
occupied by strong guards without a blow. The government squad simply
evaporated in the darkness. The keenly cold night was full of mysterious
movements and suspicious sounds. Suppressing a sharp alarm in their
hearts, the soldiers would conscientiously stop all passers-by, on foot
or in vehicles, meticulously inspecting their documents. They did not
always know what to do. They hesitated – most often let them go. But
confidence increased with every hour. About six in the morning the
sappers held up two truckloads of junkers – about sixty men – disarmed
them, and sent them to Smolny.

That same sapper battalion was directed to send fifty men to guard the
food warehouses, twenty-one to guard the Power Station, etc. Order
followed order, now from Smolny, now from the district. Nobody offered a
murmur of objection. According to the report of the commissar, the
orders were carried out “immediately and exactly.” The movement of the
soldiers acquired a precision long unseen. However rickety and crumbly
that garrison was – good only for scrap-iron in a military sense – on
that night the old soldierly drill re-awoke, and for one last moment
tensed every nerve and muscle in the service of the new goal.

Commissar Uralov received two authorisations: one, to occupy the
printing-plant of the reactionary paper _Russkaia Volia_, founded by
Protopopov a little while before he became the last Minister of the
Interior of Nicholas II; the other, to get a troop of soldiers from the
Semenov Guard regiment which the government for old times’ sake was
still considering its own. The Semenovtsi were needed for the occupation
of a printing plant. The printing-plant was needed to issue the
Bolshevik paper in large format and with a big circulation. The soldiers
had already lain down to sleep. The commissar briefly told them the
object of his visit. “I hadn’t stopped talking when a shout of ‘Hurrah!’
went up on all sides. The soldiers were jumping out of their bunks and
crowding around me in a close circle.” A truck loaded with Semenovtsi
approached the printing-plant. The workers of the night-shift quickly
assembled in the rotary-press room. The commissar explained why he had
come. “And here, as in the barracks, the workers answered with shouts of
‘Hurrah! Long live the Soviets!’” The job was done. In much the same
manner the other institutions were seized. It was not necessary to
employ force, for there was no resistance. The insurrectionary masses
lifted their elbows and pushed out the lords of yesterday.

The commander of the district reported that night to general
headquarters and the headquarters of the Northern front over the
military wire: “The situation in Petrograd is frightful. There are no
street demonstrations or disorders, but a regulated seizure of
institutions, railroad stations, also arrests, is in progress ... The
junkers’ patrols are surrendering without resistance ... We have no
guarantee that there will not be an attempt to seize the Provisional
Government.” Polkovnikov was right: they had no guarantee of that.

In military circles the rumour was going round that agents of the
Military Revolutionary Committee had stolen from the desk of the
Petrograd commandant the password for the sentries of the garrison. That
was not at all improbable. The insurrection had many friends among the
lower personnel of all institutions. Nevertheless this tale about
stealing the password is apparently a legend which arose in the hostile
camp to explain the too humiliating ease with which the Bolshevik
patrols got possession of the city.

An order was sent out through the garrison from Smolny during the night:
Officers not recognising the authority of the Military Revolutionary
Committee to be arrested. The commanders of many regiments fled of their
own accord, and passed some nervous days in hiding. In other units the
officers were removed or arrested. Everywhere special revolutionary
committees or staffs were formed and functioned hand in hand with the
commissars. That this improvised command did not stand very high in a
military sense, goes without saying. Nevertheless it was reliable, and
the question here was decided primarily in the political court.

It is necessary to add, however, that with all their lack of experience
the staffs of certain units developed a considerable military
initiative. The committee of the Pavlovsky regiment sent scouts into the
Petrograd district headquarters to find out what was going on there. The
chemical reserve battalion kept careful watch of its restless
neighbours, the junkers of the Pavlovsky and Vladimirsky schools, and
the students of the cadet corps. The chemical men from time to time
disarmed junkers in the street and thus kept them cowed. Getting into
connection with the soldier personnel of the Pavlovsky school, the staff
of the chemical battalion saw to it that the keys of the weapons were in
the hands of the soldiers.

It is difficult to determine the number of forces directly engaged in
this nocturnal seizure of the capital – and this not only because nobody
counted them or noted them down, but also because of the character of
the operations. Reserves of the second and third order almost merged
with the garrison as a whole. But it was only occasionally necessary to
have recourse to the reserves. A few thousand Red Guards, two or three
thousand sailors – tomorrow with the arrivals from Kronstadt and
Helsingfors there will be about treble the number – a score of infantry
companies: such were the forces of the first and second order with whose
aid the insurrectionists occupied the governmental high points of the
capital.

At 3.20 in the morning the chief of the political administration of the
War Ministry, the Menshevik Sher, sent the following information by
direct wire to the Caucasus: “A meeting of the Central Executive
Committee together with the delegates to the Congress of Soviets is in
progress with an overwhelming majority of Bolsheviks. Trotsky has
received an ovation. He has announced that he hopes for a bloodless
victory of the insurrection, since the power is in their hands. The
Bolsheviks have begun active operations. They have seized the
Nikolaevsky Bridge and posted armoured cars there. The Pavlovsky
regiment has posted pickets on Milliony Street near the Winter Palace,
is stopping everybody, arresting them, and sending them to Smolny
Institute. They have arrested Minister Kartashev and the general
administrator of the Provisional Government, Halperin. The Baltic
railroad station is also in the hands of the Bolsheviks. If the front
does not intervene, the government will be unable to resist with the
forces on hand.”

The joint session of the Executive Committees about which Lieutenant
Sher’s communication speaks, opened in Smolny after midnight in unusual
circumstances. Delegates to the Congress of Soviets brimmed the hall in
the capacity of invited guests. Reinforced guards occupied the entrances
and corridors. Trenchcoats, rifles, machine-guns filled the windows. The
members of the Executive Committees were drowned in this many-headed and
hostile mass of provincials. The high organ of the “democracy” looked
already like a captive of the insurrection. The familiar figure of the
president, Cheidze, was absent. The invariable spokesman, Tseretelli,
was absent. Both of them, frightened by the turn of events, had
surrendered their responsible posts, and abandoning Petrograd, left for
their Georgian homeland. Dan remained as leader of the Compromise bloc.
He lacked the sly good humour of Cheidze, and likewise the moving
eloquence of Tseretelli. But he excelled them both in obstinate
short-sightedness. Alone in the president’s chair the Social
Revolutionary, Gotz, opened the session. Dan took the floor amid an
utter silence which seemed to Sukhanov languid – to John Reed “almost
threatening.” The spokesman’s hobby was a new resolution of the
Pre-Parliament, which had tried to oppose the insurrection with the
dying echo of its own slogans. “It will be too late if you do not take
account of this decision,” cried Dan, trying to frighten the Bolsheviks
with the inevitable hunger and the degeneration of the masses. “Never
before has the counter-revolution been so strong as at the given
moment,” he said – that is, on the night before October 25, 1917. The
frightened petty-bourgeois confronted by great events sees nothing but
dangers and obstacles. His sole recourse is the pathos of alarm. “In the
factories and barracks the Black Hundred press is enjoying a far more
considerable success than the socialist press.” Lunatics are leading the
revolution to ruin just as in 1905 “when this same Trotsky stood at the
head of the Petrograd Soviet.” But no, he cried, the Central Executive
Committee will not permit an insurrection. “Only over its dead body will
the hostile camps cross their bayonets.” Shouts from the benches: “Yes,
it’s been dead a long time!” The entire hall felt the appropriateness of
that exclamation. Over the corpse of Compromise the bayonets of the
bourgeoisie and the proletariat had already crossed. The voice of the
orator is drowned in a hostile uproar, his pounding on the table is
futile, his appeals do not move, his threats do not frighten. Too late!
Too late!

Yes, it is an insurrection! Replying in the name of the Military
Revolutionary Committee, the Bolshevik party, the Petrograd workers and
soldiers, Trotsky now throws off the last qualification. Yes, the masses
are with us, and we are leading them to the assault! “If you do not
weaken there will be no civil war, for the enemy is already
capitulating, and you can assume the place of master of the Russian land
which of right belongs to you.” The astounded members of the Central
Executive Committee found no strength even to protest. Up to now the
defensive phraseology of Smolny had kept up in them, in spite of all the
facts, a glimmering spark of hope. Now that too was extinguished. In
those hours of deep night the insurrection lifted its head high.

That session so rich in episodes closed at four o’clock in the morning.
The Bolshevik speakers would appear in the tribune only to return
immediately to the Military Revolutionary Committee, where from all
corners of the city news uniformly favourable was pouring in. The
patrols in the streets were doing their work, the government
institutions were being occupied one after the other; the enemy was
offering no resistance anywhere.

It had been assumed that the central Telephone Exchange would be
specially well fortified, but at seven in the morning it was taken
without a fight by a company from the Keksgolmsky regiment. The
insurrectionists could now not only rest easy about their own
communications, but control the telephone connections of the enemy. The
apparatus of the Winter Palace and of central headquarters was promptly
cut out.

Almost simultaneously with the seizure of the Telephone Exchange a
detachment of sailors from the Marine Guard, about forty strong, seized
the building of the State Bank on the Ekaterininsky Canal. The bank
clerk Ralzevich recalls that the sailors “worked with expedition,”
immediately placing sentries at each telephone to cut off possible help
from outside. The occupation of the building was accomplished “without
any resistance, in spite of the presence of a squad from the Semenovsky
regiment.” The seizure of the bank had to some extent a symbolic
importance. The cadres of the party had been brought up on the Marxian
criticism of the Paris Commune of 1871, whose leaders, as is well known,
did not venture to lay hands on the State Bank. “No we will not make
that mistake,” many Bolsheviks had been saying to themselves long before
October 25. News of the seizure of the most sacred institution of the
bourgeois state swiftly spread through the districts, raising a warm
wave of joy.

In the early morning hours the Warsaw railroad station was occupied,
also the printing-plant of the _Stock Exchange News_ and Dvortsovy
Bridge under Kerensky’s very windows. A commissar of the Committee
presented the soldier patrol from the Volinsky regiment in Kresty Prison
with a resolution demanding the liberation of a number of prisoners
according to the lists of the Soviet. The prison administration tried in
vain to get instructions from the Minister of Justice: he was too busy.
The liberated Bolsheviks, among them the young Kronstadt leader, Roshal,
immediately received military appointments.

In the morning, a party of junkers who had left the Winter Palace in a
truck in search of provisions, and been held up by the sappers at
Nikolaevsky station, were brought to Smolny. Podvoisky relates the
following: “Trotsky told them that they were free on condition that they
give a promise not to take further action against the Soviet power, and
that they might go back to their school and get to work. The youngsters,
who had expected a bloody end, were unspeakably surprised at this.” To
what extent their immediate liberation was wise, remains in doubt. The
victory was not yet finally achieved. The junkers were the chief force
of the enemy. On the other hand, with the wavering moods in the military
schools, it was important to prove by example that a surrender to the
mercy of the victor would not threaten the junkers with punishment. The
arguments in both directions seemed about equal.

From the War Ministry, not yet occupied by the insurrectionists, General
Levitsky sent word by direct wire to General Dukhonin at headquarters:
“The troops of the Petrograd garrison ... have gone over to the
Bolsheviks. The sailors and a light-armed cruiser have come from
Kronstadt. They have lowered the raised bridges. The whole town is
covered with sentry guards from the garrison. But there has been no
coming-out. (!) The Telephone Exchange is in the hands of the garrison.
The troops in the Winter Palace are defending it only in a formal sense,
since they have decided not to come out actively. The general impression
is that the Provisional Government finds itself in the capital of a
hostile state which has finished mobilisation but not yet begun active
operations.” Invaluable military and political testimony! To be sure,
the general anticipates events when he says the sailors have arrived
from Kronstadt: they will arrive a few hours later. The bridge was
really let down by the crew of the _Aurora_. The hope expressed in
conclusion that the Bolsheviks, “having long been actually in a position
to get rid of us ... will not dare come into conflict with the opinion
of the army at the front,” is rather naïve. However, these illusions
about the front were about all that the rear generals had left, or the
rear democrats either. At any rate that image of the Provisional
Government finding itself in the capital of a hostile state will go into
the history of the revolution forever as the best possible explanation
of the October event.

Meetings were continuous in Smolny. Agitators, organisers, leaders of
factories, regiments, districts, would appear for an hour or two,
sometimes for a few minutes, to get news, to check up on their own
activities and return to their posts. Before room 18, the quarters of
the Bolshevik faction of the Soviet, there was an indescribable jam.
Tired to death, those arriving would often fall asleep right in the
assembly ball, leaning their unbearably heavy heads against a white
column, or against the walls in the corridors, with both arms around
their rifles – or sometimes they would simply stretch out in piles on
the dirty wet floor. Lashevich was receiving the military commissars and
giving them their last instructions. In the quarters of the Military
Revolutionary Committee on the third floor, reports coming in from all
sides would be converted into orders. Here beat the heart of the
insurrection.

The district centres reproduced the picture of Smolny on a smaller
scale. In the Vyborg district opposite the headquarters of the Red Guard
on Samsonevsky Prospect a whole camp was created: the street was jammed
full of wagons, passenger-cars and trucks. The institutions of the
district were swarming with armed workers. The soviet, the duma, the
trade unions, the factory and shop committees – everything in this
district – were serving the cause of the insurrection. In the factories
and barracks and various institutions the same thing was happening in a
smaller way as throughout the whole capital: they were crowding out some
and electing others, breaking the last threads of the old ties,
strengthening the new. The backward ones were adopting resolutions of
submission to the Military Revolutionary Committee. The Mensheviks and
Social-Revolutionaries timidly shrank aside along with the factory
administrations and the commanding staff of the troops. At continuous
meetings fresh information was given out, fighting confidence kept up
and ties reinforced. The human masses were crystallising along new axes;
a revolution was achieving itself.

Step by step we have tried to follow in this book the development of the
October insurrection: the sharpening discontent of the worker masses,
the coming over of the soviets to the Bolshevik banners, the indignation
of the army, the campaign of the peasants against the landlords, the
flood-tide of the national movement, the growing fear and distraction of
the possessing and ruling classes, and finally the struggle for the
insurrection within the Bolshevik party. The final act of the revolution
seems, after all this, too brief, too dry, too business-like – somehow
out of correspondence with the historic scope of the events. The reader
experiences a kind of disappointment. He is like a mountain climber,
who, thinking the main difficulties are still ahead, suddenly discovers
that he is already on the summit or almost there. Where is the
insurrection? There is no picture of the insurrection. The events do not
form themselves into a picture. A series of small operations, calculated
and prepared in advance, remain separated one from another both in space
and time. A unity of thought and aim unites them, but they do not fuse
in the struggle itself. There is no action of great masses. There are no
dramatic encounters with the troops. There is nothing of all that which
imaginations brought up upon the facts of history associate with the
idea of insurrection.

The general character of the revolution in the capital subsequently
moved Masaryk, among many others, to write: “The October revolution ...
was anything but a popular mass movement. That revolution was the act of
leaders working from above and behind the scenes.” As a matter of fact
it was the most popular mass-insurrection in all history. The workers
had no need to come out into the public square in order to fuse
together: they were already politically and morally one single whole
without that. The soldiers were even forbidden to leave their barracks
without permission: upon that point the order of the Military
Revolutionary Committee fell in with the order of Polkovnikov. But those
invisible masses were marching more than ever before in step with the
events. The factories and barracks never lost connection for a minute
with the district headquarters, nor the districts with Smolny. The Red
Guard detachments felt at their back the support of the factories. The
soldier squad returning to the barracks found the new shifts ready. Only
with heavy reserves behind them could revolutionary detachments go about
their work with such confidence.

The scattered government patrols, in contrast, being convinced in
advance of their own isolation, renounced the very idea of resistance.
The bourgeois classes had expected barricades, flaming conflagrations,
looting, rivers of blood. In reality a silence reigned more terrible
than all the thunders of the world. The social ground shifted
noiselessly like a revolving stage, bringing forward the popular masses,
carrying away to limbo the rulers of yesterday.

As early as ten o’clock on the morning of the 25th, Smolny considered it
possible to broadcast through the capital and throughout the whole
country a triumphant announcement: “The Provisional Government is
overthrown. The state power has passed into the hands of the Military
Revolutionary Committee.” In a certain sense this declaration was very
premature. The government still existed, at least within the territory
of the Winter Palace. Headquarters existed; the provinces had not
expressed themselves; the Congress of Soviets had not yet opened. But
the leaders of an insurrection are not historians; in order to prepare
events for the historians they have to anticipate them. In the capital
the Military Revolutionary Committee was already complete master of the
situation. There could be no doubt of the sanction of the Congress. The
provinces were awaiting Petrograd’s initiative. In order to get complete
possession of the power it was necessary to act as a power. In a
proclamation to the military organisations of the front and rear, the
Committee urged the soldiers to watch vigilantly over the conduct of the
commanding staff, to arrest officers not adhering to the revolution, and
not to stop at the use of force in case of attempts to throw hostile
divisions against Petrograd.

The chief commissar of headquarters, Stankevich, having arrived the
night before from the front and not wishing to remain wholly inactive,
placed himself at the head of a half-company of military engineering
students in the morning, and undertook to clean the Bolsheviks out of
the Telephone Exchange. It was in this way that the junkers first found
out who had possession of the telephone connections. “There is a model
of energy for you,” exclaimed officer Sinegub, grinding his teeth. “But
where did they get such leadership?” The sailors occupying the telephone
building could easily have shot down the junkers through the windows.
But the insurrectionists were striving with all their might to avoid
bloodshed, and Stankevich had given strict orders not to open fire lest
the junkers be accused of shooting at the people. The commanding officer
thought to himself: “Once order is restored, who will dare to peep?” and
concluded his meditations with an exclamation: “Damned clowns!” This is
a good formula for the attitude of the officers to the government. On
his own initiative Sinegub sent to the Winter Palace for hand grenades
and sticks of pyroxyle. In the interval a monarchist lieutenant got into
an argument at the gates of the Exchange with a Bolshevik ensign. Like
the heroes of Homer they exchanged mighty epithets before the battle.
Finding themselves between two fires – for the time only wordy ones –
the telephone girls gave free reign to their nerves. The sailors let
them go home. “What’s this? Women? ...” They fled with hysterical
screams through the gates. “The deserted Morskaia,” relates Sinegub,
“was suddenly enlivened with running and jumping skirts and hats.” The
sailors managed somehow to handle the work of the switchboard. An
armoured car from the Reds soon entered the court of the Exchange, doing
no damage to the frightened junkers. They on their side seized two
trucks and barricaded the gates of the Exchange from the outside. A
second armoured car appeared from the direction of the Nevsky, and then
a third. It all came down to manoeuvres and attempts to frighten each
other. The struggle for the Exchange was decided without pyroxyle:
Stankevich raised the siege after negotiating a free passage for his
junkers.

Weapons in general are still serving merely as an external sign of
power: they are not being brought into action. On the road to the Winter
Palace a half-company of junkers runs into a crew of sailors with rifles
cocked. The enemies only measure each other with their eyes. Neither
side wants to fight: the one through consciousness of strength, the
other of weakness. But where chance offers, the insurrectionists –
especially the workers – promptly disarm the enemy. A second
half-company of those same engineering junkers was surrounded by Red
Guards and soldiers, disarmed by them with the help of armoured cars,
and taken prisoner. Even here, however, there was no conflict; the
junkers did not put up a fight. “Thus ended,” says the initiator of it,
“the sole attempt, so far as I know, at active resistance to the
Bolsheviks.” Stankevich has in mind, of course, operations outside the
Winter Palace region.

By noon the streets around the Mariinsky Palace were occupied by troops
of the Military Revolutionary Committee. Members of the Pre-Parliament
were just assembling for a meeting. The præsidium made an attempt to get
the latest news; their hearts sank when they learned that the telephones
of the palace had been cut out. The Council of Elders went into session
to decide what to do. The deputies murmured meanwhile in the corners.
Avksentiev offered consolation: Kerensky has gone to the front, and will
be back soon and fix everything. An armoured car drew up at the
entrance. Soldiers of the Litovsky and Keksgolmsky regiments and sailors
of the Marine Guard entered the building, formed in line on the
staircase, and occupied the first hall. The commander of the detachment
suggested to the deputies that they leave the palace at once. “The
impression created was appalling,” testifies Nabokov. The members of the
Pre-Parliament decided to disperse, “temporarily suspending their
activities.” Forty-eight right wing members voted against submitting to
violence, quite evidently knowing they would be in a minority. The
deputies peacefully descended the magnificent stairway between two rows
of rifles. An eye-witness testifies: “In all this there was no attempt
at dramatics.” “Ordinary, meaningless, obtuse, malicious physiognomies,”
writes the liberal patriot, Nabokov, of these Russian soldiers and
sailors. Down below at the entrance the soldiers inspected their papers
and let them all through. “A sorting of members and some arrests have
been expected,” writes Miliukov himself let out with the others. “But
the revolutionary headquarters had other things to worry about.” It was
not only that. The revolutionary staff had little experience. The
instructions read: Arrest members of the government if found. But none
were found. The members of the Pre-Parliament were freely released,
among them some who soon became organisers of the civil war.

This parliamentary hybrid, which ended its existence twelve hours in
advance of the Provisional Government, had lived in the world for
eighteen days. That was the interval between the withdrawal of the
Bolsheviks from the Mariinsky Palace to the streets and the entry of the
armed street forces into the Mariinsky Palace ... Of all the parodies of
popular representation in which history is so rich, this Council of the
Russian Republic was perhaps the most absurd.

After leaving the unlucky building, the Octobrist Shidlovsky went
strolling through the town to see the fights – for these gentlemen
believed that the people were going to rise in their defence. But no
fighting was to be seen. Instead, according to Shidlovsky, the public in
the streets – the select crowd, that is, along the Nevsky Prospect –
were to the last man laughing. “Have you heard about it? The Bolsheviks
have seized the power. Well, that won’t last more than three days. Ha,
ha, ha!” Shidlovsky decided to remain in the capital “during the period
which social rumour designated for the rule of the Bolsheviks.”

The Nevsky public had begun to laugh, it may be remarked, only towards
evening. In the morning such a mood of alarm had prevailed that hardly
anybody in the bourgeois districts dared go into the streets at all. At
about nine o’clock a journalist, Knizhnik, ran out on Kamenoöstrovsky
Prospect in search of newspapers, but could find no stands. In a little
group of citizens he learned that the Bolsheviks had occupied the
telephone, the telegraph, and the Bank during the night. A soldier
patrol listened to them and asked them not to make so much noise. “But
even without that everybody was unusually subdued.” Armed detachments of
workers were going by. The tramcars moved as usual – that is, slowly.
“The scarcity of passers-by oppressed me,” writes Knizhnik about the
Nevsky. Food could be had in the restaurants, but for the most part in
back rooms. At noon the cannon from the walls of Peter and Paul, now
safely occupied by the Bolsheviks, thundered out neither louder nor more
gently than usual. The walls and fences were pasted over with
proclamations warning against insurrection, but other proclamations were
already making their way, announcing the victory of the insurrection.
There was no time yet to paste them up; they were tossed out from
automobiles. Just off the press, these handbills smelled of fresh inks
as though of the events themselves.

Companies of the Red Guard had emerged from their districts. The worker
with a rifle, the bayonet above hat or cap, the rifle-belt over a
civilian coat – that is the essential image of the 25th of October.
Cautiously and still diffidently, the armed worker was bringing order
into the capital conquered by him, The tranquillity of the street
instilled tranquillity in the heart. The philistines began to dribble
down from their houses. Towards evening they felt even less anxious than
during the preceding days. Business, to be sure, had come to an end in
the governmental and social institutions, but many stores remained open.
Others were closed rather through excessive caution than necessity. Can
this be insurrection? Is an insurrection like this? The February
sentries have merely been replaced by those of October.

By evening the Nevsky was even fuller than usual of that public which
was giving the Bolsheviks three days of life. The soldiers of the
Pavlovsky regiment, although their patrols were reinforced by armoured
cars and even anti-aircraft guns, had already ceased to inspire fear. To
be sure, something serious was going on around the Winter Palace and
they would not let you through there, but still an insurrection could
not very well all be concentrated on Winter Palace square. An American
journalist saw old men in rich fur coats shake their gloved fists at the
Pavlovtsi, and handsomely dressed women scream abuse in their faces.
“The soldiers argued feebly with embarrassed grins.” They were obviously
at a loss on that elegant Nevsky, not yet converted into the “Prospect
of the Twenty-Fifth of October.”

Claude Anet, the official French journalist in Petrograd, was sincerely
surprised that these absurd Russians should make a revolution not at all
as he had read about it in the old books. “The city is quiet.” He calls
up his friends on the telephone, receives visitors, and at noon leaves
the house. The soldiers who block his road on Moika Street march in
perfect order “as under the old régime.” There are innumerable patrols
on Milliony Street. There is no shooting anywhere. The immense square of
the Winter Palace at this noon hour is still almost empty. There are
patrols on Morskaia and Nevsky. The soldiers carry themselves in
military style, and are dressed irreproachably. At first glance it seems
certain that these are government troops. On Mariinsky Square, whence
Anet intends to make his way into the Pre-Parliament, he is stopped by
soldiers and sailors. “Mighty polite, I assure you.” Two streets leading
up to the palace are barricaded with automobiles and wagons – here, too,
an armoured car. These are all under Smolny. The Military Revolutionary
Committee has sent out patrols through the town, posted sentries,
dissolved the Pre-Parliament, taken command of the capital, and
established therein a state of order “unseen since the revolution
began.” In the evening the janitress informs her French lodger that
telephone numbers have been sent over from Soviet headquarters, by which
at any moment he can summon military help in case of attack, suspicious
search-parties, etc. “As a fact they never guarded us better.”

At 2.35 in the afternoon – the foreign journalists looked at their
watches, the Russians were too busy – an emergency session of the
Petrograd Soviet was opened with a report by Trotsky, who in the name of
the Military Revolutionary Committee announced that the Provisional
Government no longer existed. “They told us that an insurrection would
drown the revolution in torrents of blood ... We do not know of a single
casualty,” There is no example in history of a revolutionary movement
involving such gigantic masses being so bloodless. “The Winter Palace is
not yet taken, but its fate will be settled in the course of the next
few minutes.” The following twelve hours were to show that this
prediction was too optimistic.

Trotsky said: “Troops have been moved against Petrograd from the front;
it is necessary at once to send commissars of the soviets to the front,
and throughout the country, to make known that the revolution has
occurred.” Voices from the small right sector: “You are anticipating the
will of the Congress of Soviets.” The speaker answered: “The will of the
Congress has been anticipated by the colossal fact of an insurrection of
the Petrograd workers and soldiers. It now remains only to develop our
victory.”

Lenin, who appeared here publicly for the first time after emerging from
underground, briefly outlined the programme of the revolution: To break
up the old governmental apparatus; to create a new system of
administration through the soviets; to take measures for the immediate
cessation of war, relying upon revolutionary movements in other
countries; to abolish the landlords’ property rights and thus win the
confidence of the peasants; to establish workers’ control over
production. “The third Russian revolution,” he said, “must in the end
lead to the victory of socialism.”



CHAPTER 45 THE CAPTURE OF THE WINTER PALACE


 

Kerensky was in a great state of excitement when he met Stankevich
arriving with his report from the front. He had just returned from a
mutiny of the Council of the Republic where the insurrection of the
Bolsheviks had been conclusively exposed – Insurrection! Don’t you know
that we have an armed insurrection? – Stankevich laughed: Why the
streets are perfectly quiet; surely that isn’t the way a real
insurrection ought to look? But anyway we must put an end to these
everlasting disturbances – To this Kerensky heartily agreed, he was only
waiting for the resolution of the Pre-Parliament.

At nine in the evening the government assembled in the Malachite Chamber
of the Winter Palace to work out methods for a “resolute and final
liquidation” of the Bolsheviks. Stankevich, returning from the Mariinsky
Palace where he had been sent to hurry things up, reported with
indignation the passing of the resolution of semi-non-confidence. Even
the struggle against insurrection the resolution of the Pre-Parliament
proposed to entrust not to the government, but to a special committee of
public safety. Kerensky hotly announced that under those circumstances
“he would not remain a minute longer at the head of the government.” The
Compromise leaders were immediately summoned to the palace by telephone.
The possibility of Kerensky’s resignation surprised them no less than
their resolution had surprised Kerensky. Avksentiev presented their
excuses: they had, you know, regarded the resolution “as purely
theoretical and accidental, and had not believed it would lead to
practical steps.” Moreover they now themselves saw that the resolution
was “perhaps not quite happily worded.” Those people never missed an
opportunity to show what they were worth.

This nocturnal conversation of the democratic leaders with the head of
the State seems absolutely unbelievable on the background of the
developing insurrection. Dan, one of the chief gravediggers of the
February régime, demanded that the government immediately, by night,
plaster the town with posters announcing that it had proposed immediate
peace negotiations to the Allies. Kerensky reported that the government
had no need of such counsels. It is quite possible to believe that the
government would have preferred a sharp division; but Dan could not
offer that. Kerensky, of course, was attempting to throw the
responsibility for the insurrection upon his interlocutors. Dan answered
that the government was exaggerating events under the influence of its
“reactionary staff.” At any rate there was no need of resigning: the
disagreeable resolution had been necessary in order to break the mood of
the masses. The Bolsheviks will be compelled “not later than tomorrow”
to dissolve their headquarters, if the government follows Dan’s
suggestion. “At that very moment,” adds Kerensky in describing this
conversation with legitimate irony, “the Red Guard was occupying the
government buildings one after another.”

This so weighty conference with his Left friends had hardly ended when
Kerensky’s friends from the Right appeared in the form of a delegation
from the Council of the Cossack Troops. The officers pretended that the
conduct of the three Cossack regiments in Petrograd depended upon their
wills, and presented Kerensky with conditions diametrically opposite to
those of Dan: No concessions to the Soviet; this time the settlement
with the Bolsheviks must be carried through to the end, and not handled
as in July when the Cossacks suffered in vain. Kerensky, himself
desiring nothing better, promised everything they asked and apologised
to his interlocutors for the fact that up to now owing to considerations
of prudence he had not arrested Trotsky, the president of the Soviet of
Deputies. The delegates departed, assuring him that the Cossacks would
do their duty. An order was issued from headquarters to the Cossack
regiment: “In the name of freedom, honour and the glory of the homeland
come to the help of the Central Executive Committee, the Provisional
Government, and save Russia from ruin.” That bigoted government which
had so jealously defended its independence of the Central Executive
Committee was compelled to hide humbly behind its back at a moment of
danger. Beseeching commands were also sent to the military schools in
Petrograd and the environs. The railroads were instructed: “to despatch
echelons of troops coming toward Petrograd from the front ahead of all
other trains, cutting off passenger traffic if necessary.”

When the government dispersed at two o’clock in the morning, having done
all it could, there remained with Kerensky in the palace only his
vice-minister, the liberal Moscow merchant, Konovalov. The commander of
the district, Polkovnikov, came to them with a proposal to organise with
the help of the loyal soldiers an immediate expedition for the seizure
of Smolny. Kerensky accepted this admirable plan without hesitation, but
from the words of the commander it was absolutely impossible to make out
upon just what forces he was counting. Only now did Kerensky realise,
according to his own confession, that the reports of Polkovnikov during
the last ten or twelve days about his complete preparedness for the
struggle with the Bolsheviks were “based on absolutely nothing.” As
though Kerensky had no other sources for an appraisal of the political
and military situation but the secretarial reports of a mediocre colonel
whom he had placed – nobody knows why – at the head of the district.
During the aggrieved meditations of the head of the government the
commissar of the city government, Rogovsky, brought a series of
communications: A number of ships from the Baltic Fleet have entered the
Neva in fighting array: some of them have come as far as the Nikolaevsky
Bridge and occupied it; detachments of the insurrectionaries are
advancing on Dvortsovy Bridge. Rogovsky called Kerensky’s special
attention to the circumstances that “the Bolsheviks are carrying out
their whole plan in complete order, meeting nowhere the slightest
resistance on the part of the government troops.” Just what troops were
meant by the word “government” was not quite clear in any case from the
man’s report.

Kerensky and Konovalov rushed from the palace to headquarters: “We must
not lose another minute,” they cried. The impressive red building was
brimful of officers. They had come here not on the business of their
troops, but to hide from them. Civilians unknown to anybody were also
poking their noses in among this military crowd. A new report from
Polkovnikov finally convinced Kerensky that it was impossible to rely
upon the commander or his officers. The head of the government decided
to gather around his own person “all those loyal to their duty.”
Remembering that he was the member of a party – as others remember only
on their death beds about the church – Kerensky called up the Social
Revolutionaries on the telephone and demanded that they send fighting
companies immediately. Before this unexpected appeal to the armed forces
of the party could give any results, however – supposing it could do so
at all – it would inevitably, as Miliukov says, “repel from Kerensky all
the Right Wing elements, who even without that were unfriendly enough.”
Kerensky’s isolation, plainly enough exposed already in the Kornilov
insurrection, assumed here a more fatal aspect. “The long hours of that
night dragged torturingly,” says Kerensky, repeating his autobiographic
phrase.

Reinforcements arrived from nowhere. The Cossacks held sittings.
Representatives of this regiment said that, generally speaking, they
might come out – why not? – but for this it was necessary to have
machine-guns, armoured cars, and, above all, infantry. Kerensky, without
a thought, promised them armoured cars which were getting ready to
abandon him, and infantry of which he had none. In answer he was told
that the regiments would soon decide all questions and “begin to saddle
their horses.” The fighting forces of the Social Revolutionaries gave no
signs of life. Did they indeed still exist? Where in fact was the
boundary between the real and the spectral? The officers assembled in
headquarters adopted a “more and more challenging” attitude toward the
commander-in-chief and head of the government. Kerensky even asserts
that there was talk among the officers of arresting him. The
headquarters building was, as before, unguarded. Official negotiations
were carried on before outsiders in the intervals between excited
private conversations. The mood of hopelessness and disintegration
soaked through from headquarters into the Winter Palace. The junkers
began to get nervous. The armoured car crews became excited. There is no
support below, there is no head above. In such circumstances can
anything but destruction follow?

At five o’clock in the morning Kerensky summoned to headquarters the
general director of the War Ministry, Manikovsky. At the Troitsky Bridge
General Manikovsky was stopped by patrols and taken to the barracks of
the Pavlovsky regiment, but there after brief explanation he was set
free. The general convinced them, we may assume, that his arrest might
upset the whole administrative mechanism and entail damage to the
soldiers at the front. At about the same time the automobile of
Stankevich was stopped near the Winter Palace, but the regimental
committee released him also. “These were insurrectionaries,” relates
Stankevich, “but they behaved very irresolutely. I telegraphed about it
from my house to the Winter Palace, but received tranquillising
assurances that this had been a mistake.” The real mistake was the
release of Stankevich: In a few hours he will try, as we know, to get
the telephone station away from the Bolsheviks.

Kerensky demanded from headquarters in Moghiliev and from the staff of
the Northern front at Pskov the immediate despatch of loyal regiments.
Dukhonin assured him over the direct wire that all measures had been
taken for the despatch of troops to Petrograd, and that certain units
ought already to be arriving. But the units were not arriving. The
Cossacks were still “saddling their horses.” The situation in the city
was getting worse from hour to hour. When Kerensky and Konovalov
returned to the palace to rest a little, a courier handed them an urgent
communication All the palace telephones were cut off; Dvortsovy bridge
under Kerensky’s very windows, was occupied by pickets of sailors. The
square in front of the Winter Palace remained deserted as before. “Of
the Cossacks neither hide nor hair was to be seen.” Kerensky again
rushed over to headquarters, but here, too, he got uncomforting news.
The junkers had received from the Bolsheviks a demand that they abandon
the palace, and were greatly excited. The armoured cars had broken order
inopportunely exposing the “loss” of certain important units. There was
still no news of the echelons from the front. The close approaches to
the palace and headquarters were absolutely unguarded. If the Bolsheviks
had not yet penetrated this far it was only through lack of information.
The building, brimmed with officers since evening, had been rapidly
vacated. Everyone was saving himself in his own way. A delegation from
the junkers appeared: They were ready to do their duty in the future
“only if there is hope of the arrival of some sort of reinforcement.”
But reinforcements were just exactly what were lacking.

Kerensky hastily summoned his ministers to headquarters. The majority of
them had no automobiles. These important instruments of locomotion,
which impart a new tempo to modern insurrection, had either been seized
by the Bolsheviks or cut off from the ministers by cordons of
insurrectionaries. Only Kishkin arrived, and some time later
Maliantovich. What should the head of the government do? Go out at once
to meet the echelons and bring them forward no matter what the obstacles
might be. Nobody could think of anything else.

Kerensky ordered out his “magnificent open touring-car.” But here a new
factor entered into the chain of events, demonstrating the
indestructible solidarity uniting the governments of the Entente in weal
and woe. “In what manner I do not know, but the news of my departure had
reached the Allied embassies.” The representatives of Great Britain and
the United States had immediately expressed the desire that with the
head of the government in making his get-away from the capital, “there
should go an automobile carrying the American flag.” Kerensky himself
thought the proposal excessive, and was even embarrassed, but accepted
it as an expression of the solidarity of the Allies.

The American ambassador, David Francis, gives a different account – not
so much like a Christmas story. According to him an automobile
containing a Russian officer followed the American automobile to the
embassy, and the officer demanded that they turn over the embassy
automobile to Kerensky for a journey to the front. Taking counsel
together, the officials of the embassy arrived at the conclusion that
since the automobile had already been practically “seized” – which was
not at all true – there was nothing left but to bow to the force of
circumstance. The Russian officer – in spite, they say, of protests from
the diplomatic gentlemen – refused to remove the American flag. And no
wonder: it was only that colourful bit which made the automobile
inviolable. Francis approved the action of the embassy officials, but
told them “to say nothing about it to anybody.”

By juxtaposing these two testimonies, which intersect with the line of
truth at different angles, a sufficiently clear picture can be made to
emerge. It was not the Allies, of course, who imposed the automobile
upon Kerensky, but he himself who requested it: but since diplomats are
obliged to pay a certain homage to the hypocrisy of non-interference in
domestic affairs it was agreed that the automobile had been “seized,”
and that the embassy had “protested” against the misuse of the flag.
After this delicate matter had been arranged, Kerensky took a seat in
his own automobile; the American car followed as a reserve. “It is
needless to say,” says Kerensky further, “that the whole street – both
the passers-by and the soldiers – immediately recognised me. I saluted
as always, a little carelessly and with an easy smile.” Incomparable
picture! Carelessly and smiling – thus the February régime passed into
the Kingdom of Shades. At the gates of the city everywhere stood pickets
and patrols of armed workers. At sight of the madly flying automobile
the Red Guards rushed into the highway, but did not venture to shoot. In
general, shootings were still being avoided. Maybe, too, the little
American flag held them back. The automobile successfully rushed on.

And does this mean that there are no troops in Petrograd prepared to
defend the Provisional Government? asked the astonished Maliantovich,
who had up to that moment dwelt in the kingdom of the eternal truths of
law. I know nothing, Konovalov answered, shrugging his shoulders. It’s
pretty bad, he added. And what are these troops that are on their way?
insisted Maliantovich. A bicycle battalion, it seems. The minister
sighed. There were 200,000 soldiers in Petrograd and in the environs.
Things were going badly with the régime, if the head of the government
had to fly off with an American flag at his back to meet a bicycle
battalion.

The ministers would have sighed deeper if they had known that this third
bicycle battalion sent from the front had stopped at Peredolskaia and
telegraphed the Petrograd Soviet to know for just what purpose it was
being sent. The Military Revolutionary Committee telegraphed the
battalion a brotherly greeting and asked them to send their
representatives immediately. The authorities sought and did not find the
bicycle men, whose delegates arrived that same day in Smolny.

It had been proposed in the preliminary calculations to occupy the
Winter Palace on the night of the 25th, at the same time with the other
commanding high points of the capital. A special trio had been formed
already as early as the 23rd to take the lead in seizing the palace,
Podvoisky and Antonov being the central figures. The engineer Sadovsky,
a man in military service, was included as a third, but soon fell away,
being preoccupied with the affairs of the garrison. He was replaced by
Chudnovsky, who had come with Trotsky in May from the concentration camp
in Canada, and had spent three months at the front as a soldier.
Lashevich also took an important part in the operations – an old
Bolshevik who had done enough service in the army to become a
non-commissioned officer. Three years later Sadovsky remembered how
Podvoisky and Chudnovsky quarrelled furiously in his little room in
Smolny over the map of Petrograd and the best form of action against the
palace. It was finally decided to surround the region of the palace with
an uninterrupted oval, the longer axis of which should be the quay of
the Neva. On the riverside the circle should be closed up by the Peter
and Paul fortress, the _Aurora_, and other ships summoned from Kronstadt
and the navy. In order to prevent or paralyse the attempts to strike at
the rear with Cossacks and junker detachments, it was decided to
establish imposing flank defences composed of revolutionary detachments.

The plan as a whole was too heavy and complicated for the problem it
aimed to solve. The time allotted for preparation proved inadequate.
Small inco-ordinations and omissions came to light at every step, as
might be expected. In one place the direction was incorrectly indicated,
in another the leader came late, having misread the instructions: in a
third they had to wait for a rescuing armoured car. To call out the
military units, unite them with the Red Guards, occupy the fighting
positions, make sure of communications among them all and with
headquarters – all this demanded a good many hours more than had been
imagined by the leaders quarrelling over their map of Petrograd.

When the Military Revolutionary Committee announced at about ten o’clock
in the morning that the government was overthrown, the extent of this
delay was not yet clear even to those in direct command of the
operation. Podvoisky had promised the fall of the palace “not later than
twelve o’clock.” Up to that time everything had run so smoothly on the
military side that nobody had any reason to question the hour. But at
noon it turned out that the besieging force was still not filled out,
the Kronstadters had not arrived, and that meanwhile the defence of the
palace had been reinforced. This loss of time, as almost always happens,
made new delays necessary. Under urgent pressure from the Committee the
seizure of the palace was now set for three o’clock – and this time
“conclusively.” Counting on this new decision, the spokesman of the
Military Revolutionary Committee expressed to the afternoon session of
the Soviet the hope that the fall of the Winter Palace would be a matter
of the next few minutes. But another hour passed and brought no
decision. Podvoisky, himself in a state of white heat, asserted over the
telephone that by six o’clock the palace would be taken no matter what
it cost, His former confidence, however, was lacking. And indeed the
hour of six did strike and the _denouément_ had not begun. Beside
themselves with the urgings of Smolny, Podvoisky and Antonov now refused
to set any hour at all. That caused serious anxiety. Politically it was
considered necessary that at the moment of the opening of the Congress
the whole capital should be in the hands of the Military Revolutionary
Committee: That was to simplify the task of dealing with the opposition
at the Congress, placing them before an accomplished fact. Meanwhile the
hour appointed for opening the Congress had arrived, had been postponed,
and arrived again, and the Winter Palace was still holding out. Thus the
siege of the palace, thanks to its delay, became for no less than twelve
hours the central problem of the insurrection.

The main staff of the operation remained in Smolny, where Lashevich held
the threads in his hands. The field headquarters was in the Peter and
Paul fortress, where Blagonravov was the responsible man. There were
three subordinate headquarters, one on the _Aurora_, another in the
barracks of the Pavlovsky regiment, another in the barracks of the
sailors. In the field of action the leaders were Podvoisky and Antonov –
apparently without any clear order of priority.

In the quarters of the general staff a trio was also bending over the
map: the commander of the district Colonel Polkovnikov, the chief of his
staff General Bagratuni, and General Alexeiev, especially invited in as
a high authority. Notwithstanding this so well qualified commanding
staff the plans of the defence were incomparably less definite than
those of the attack. It is true that the inexperienced marshals of the
insurrection did not know how to concentrate their forces rapidly and
deal a punctual blow. But the forces were there. The marshals of the
defence had cloudy hopes in place of forces: maybe the Cossacks will
make up their minds; maybe loyal units will be found in the neighbouring
garrison; maybe Kerensky will bring troops from the front. The feelings
of Polkovnikov are known from his night telegrams to headquarters: he
thought that the game was up. Alexeiev, still less inclined to optimism,
soon abandoned the rotten ship.

Delegates from the military schools were brought into headquarters for
the purpose of keeping in touch, and an attempt was made to raise their
spirits with assurances that troops would soon arrive from Gatchina,
Tsarskoe and the front. However they did not much believe in these misty
promises, and a depressing rumour began to creep through the schools:
“There is a panic in headquarters, nobody is doing anything.” And it was
so. Cossack officers coming to headquarters to propose that they seize
the armoured cars in the Mikailovsky Riding Academy found Polkovnikov
sitting on the window-seat in a condition of complete prostration. Seize
the riding academy? “Seize it. I have nobody. I can’t do anything
alone.”

While this languid mobilisation of the schools for the defence of the
Winter Palace was going on, the ministers assembled at a meeting. The
square before the palace and its adjacent streets were still free from
insurrectionists. On the corner of Morskaia and Nevsky armed soldiers
were holding up passing automobiles and ejecting their passengers. The
crowd was making queries: “Are these soldiers of the government or the
Military Revolutionary Committee?” The ministers had for this once the
full benefit of their own unpopularity: Nobody was interested in them
and hardly anybody recognised them on their way. They all assembled
except Prokopovich who was accidentally arrested in a cab – and was, by
the way, released again during the day.

The old servants still remained in the palace, having seen much and
ceased to be surprised, although not yet cured of fright. Strictly
trained, dressed in blue with red collars and gold braids, these relics
of the old kept up an atmosphere of order and stability in the luxurious
building. They alone perhaps on this alarming morning still gave the
ministers an illusion of power.

Not before eleven o’clock in the morning, did the government finally
decide to place one of its members at the head of the defence. General
Iznikovsky had already refused this honour, offered to him by Kerensky
at dawn. Another military man in the staff of the government, Admiral
Verderevsky, was still less materially inclined. It thus fell to a
civilian to captain the defence – the Minister of Public Charities,
Kishkin. An order of the senate confirming his appointment was
immediately drawn up and signed by all. Those people had plenty of time
to occupy themselves with bureaucratic fandangles. Moreover it never
occurred to any of them that Kishkin as a member of the Kadet Party was
doubly hated by the soldiers both front and rear. Kishkin in turn
selected as his assistants Palchinsky and Ruthenberg. An appointee of
the capitalists and protector of lock-outs, Palchinsky enjoyed the
hatred of the workers. The engineer Ruthenberg was an _aide-de-camp_ of
Savinkov, and Savinkov even the all-embracing party of the Social
Revolutionaries had expelled as a Kornilovist. Polkovnikov, under
suspicion of treason, was discharged. In his place they appointed
General Hagratuni who differed from him in nothing.

Although the city telephones of the Winter Palace and headquarters had
been cut off, the palace remained in connection with the more important
institutions by its own wire – particularly with the War Ministry which
had a direct wire to headquarters. Evidently some of the city apparatus
also had not been cut out in the hurry of the moment. In a military
sense, however, the telephone connections gave nothing to the
government, and in a moral sense they damaged rather than improved its
situation for it robbed them of their illusions.

From morning on, the leaders of the defence kept demanding local
reinforcements while awaiting reinforcements from the front. Certain
people in the city tried to help them. A Doctor Feit who took an active
part in this, a member of the Central Committee of the Social
Revolutionary Party, told some years later at a legal proceeding about
the “astonishing lightning-like change in the mood of the military
units.” You would learn, he said, from the most reliable sources of the
readiness of this or that regiment to come to the defence of the
government, but as soon as you called the barracks directly on the
telephone, one unit after another would flatly refuse. “The result is
known to you,” said the old Narodnik. “Nobody came out and the Winter
Palace was captured.” The fact of the matter is that no lightning-like
changes in the garrison took place, but the remaining illusions of the
governmental parties did crumble to the ground with lightning speed.

The armoured cars upon which they were especially counting in the Winter
Palace and headquarters, were divided into two groups: Bolsheviks and
pacifists. None of them was in favour of the government. On the way to
the Winter Palace a half-company of engineering junkers ran into two
armoured cars which they awaited with a feeling of hope and fear: Are
they friends or enemies? It turned out that they were neutral, and had
come into the street with the purpose of preventing conflicts between
the two sides. Out of the six armoured cars in the Winter Palace only
one remained to guard the palace property; the other five departed. In
proportion as the insurrection succeeded the number of Bolshevik
armoured cars increased, and the neutral army melted away. Such is the
fate of pacifism in any serious struggle.

Noon is approaching. The vast square before the Winter Palace is vacant
as before. The government has nobody to fill it with. The troops of the
Committee do not occupy it, because they are absorbed in carrying out
their too complicated plan. Military units, workers’ detachments,
armoured cars, are still assembling for this wide encirclement. The
palace district begins to look like a plague spot which is being
encircled far away to avoid direct contact with the infection.

The court of the palace opening on the square is piled up with logs of
wood like the court of Smolny. Black three-inch field guns are set up to
left and right. Rifles are stacked up in several different places. The
small guard of the palace clings close to the building. In the court and
the first story, two schools of ensigns from Oranienbaum and Peterhoff
are quartered – not the whole school by any means – and a squad from the
Constantinovsky Artillery School with six cannon.

During the afternoon a battalion of junkers from the engineering school
arrived, having lost half a company on the road. The picture presented
when they arrived could in no wise have increased the fighting spirit of
the junkers which, according to Stankevich, was inadequate even before.
Inside the palace they found a lack of provisions. Even of this nobody
had thought in time. A truckload of bread had been seized, it turned
out, by patrols of the Committee. Some of the junkers did sentry duty;
the rest lay around inactive, uncertain and hungry. No leadership
whatever made itself felt. In the square before the palace, and on the
quay on the other side, little groups of apparently peaceful passers-by
began to appear, and they would snatch the rifles from the junker
sentries, threatening them with revolvers.

“Agitators” also began to appear among the junkers. Had they gotten in
from the outside? No, these were still evidently internal
trouble-makers. They succeeded in starting a ferment among the
Oranienbaum and Peterhoff students. The committees of the school called
a conference in the White Hall, and demanded that representatives of the
government come in and make an explanation. All the ministers came in,
with Konovalov at their head. The argument lasted a whole hour.
Konovalov was heckled and stopped talking. The Minister of Agriculture,
Maslov, made a speech as an old revolutionist. Kishkin explained to the
junkers that the government had decided to stand firm as long as
possible. According to Stankevich one of the junkers was about to
express his readiness to die for the government, but “the obvious
coolness of the rest of his comrades held him back.” The speech of the
other ministers produced actual irritation among the junkers, who
interrupted, shouted and even, it seems, whistled. The blue-bloods
explained the conduct of the majority of the junkers by their low social
origin: “They were all from the plough, half-illiterate, ignorant
beasts, cattle ...”

The meeting in the besieged palace ended nevertheless in conciliation.
The junkers, after they had been promised active leadership and correct
information about what was happening, agreed to stay. The chief at the
engineering school, appointed commander of the defence, ran his pencil
over the plan of the palace, writing in the names of the units. The
forces on hand were distributed in fighting positions. The majority of
the junkers were stationed on the first floor where they could train
their guns on Winter Palace Square through the windows. But they were
forbidden to fire first. A battalion of the engineering school was
brought out into the courtyard to cover the artillery. Squads were
appointed for barricade work. A communication squad was armed with four
men from each unit. The artillery squad was directed to defend the gate
in case of a breach. Fortifications of firewood were laid up in the
court and before the gates, Something like order was established. The
sentries felt more confident.

A civil war in its first steps before real armies have been formed and
before they are tempered, is a war of naked nerves. As soon as a little
activity developed on the side of the junkers – their clearing of the
square with gun fire from behind the barricades – the forces and
equipment of the defence were enormously overestimated in the attacking
camp. In spite of the dissatisfaction of the Red Guard and the soldiers,
the leaders now decided to postpone the assault until they had
concentrated their reserves; they were chiefly awaiting the arrival of
the sailors from Kronstadt.

The delay of a few hours thus created brought some small reinforcements
to the besieged. After Kerensky’s promise of infantry to the Cossack
delegation the Council of the Cossack Troops had gone into session, the
regimental committees had gone into session, and the general assembly of
the regiments had gone into session. Decision: Two squadrons and the
machine-gun crew of the Uralsky regiment, brought in from the front in
July to crush the Bolsheviks, should immediately enter the Winter
Palace, the rest not until the promise was actually fulfilled that is,
not until after the arrival of infantry reinforcements. But even with
the two squadrons this was not accomplished without argument. The
Cossack youth objected. The “old men” even had to lock the young ones up
in the stable, where they could not hinder them from equipping
themselves for the march. Only at twilight, when they were no longer
expected, did these bearded Uraltsi appear in the palace. They were met
like saviours. They themselves, however, looked sulky. They were not
accustomed to fight about palaces. Yes, and it was not quite clear which
side was right.

Some time later there arrived unexpectedly forty of the Knights of St.
George under command of a staff captain on a cork leg. Patriotic
cripples acting as the last reserves of democracy ... But even so they
felt better. Soon came also a shock company of the Women’s Battalion.
What encouraged them most of all was that these reinforcements had made
their way through without fighting. The cordon of the besieging forces
could not, or did not dare, deny them access to the palace. Quite
obviously, therefore, the enemy was weak. “Glory be to God the thing is
beginning to pull itself together,” said the officers, comforting
themselves and the junkers. The new arrivals received their military
allotments, replacing those who were tired. However, the Uraltsi glanced
with no great approval upon those “wenches” with rifles. Where is the
real infantry?

The besiegers were obviously losing time. The Kronstadters were late –
not, to be sure, through their own fault. They had been summoned too
late. After a tense night of preparation they had begun to embark at
dawn. The destroyer _Amur_ and the cruiser _Yastreb_ had made straight
for Petrograd. The old armoured cruiser _Tzaria Svobodi_, after landing
marines at Oranienbaum, where it was proposed to disarm the junkers, was
to anchor at the entrance to the Morskoy Canal, in order, in case of
need, to bombard the Baltic railroad. Five thousand sailors and soldiers
disembarked early in the morning from the Island of Kotlin in order to
embark on the social revolution. In the officers’ cabin a solemn silence
reigns: These officers are being taken along to fight for a cause which
they hate. The commissar of the detachment, the Bolshevik, Flerovsky,
announced to them: “We do not count upon your sympathy, but we demand
that you be at your posts ... We will spare you any unnecessary
unpleasantness.” He received the brief naval answer: “Aye, aye, sir!”
All took their places. The commander ascended the bridge.

Upon arriving in the Neva a triumphal hurrah: the sailors are greeting
their own. A band strikes up on the _Aurora_, anchored in midstream.
Antonov addresses the new arrivals with a brief greeting: “There is the
Winter Palace We must take it.” In the Kronstadt detachment the most
resolute and bold choose themselves out automatically. These sailors in
black blouses with rifles and cartridge belts will go all the way. The
disembarkation on Konnogvardeisky Boulevard takes but a few moments.
Only a military watch remains on the ship.

The forces are now more than adequate on the Nevsky. There are strong
outposts on the bridge of the Ekaterininsky Canal and on the bridge of
the Moika armoured automobiles and Zenith guns aimed at the Winter
Palace. On this side of the Moika the workers have set up machine-guns
behind screens.

An armoured car is on duty on Morskaia. The Neva and its crossings are
in the hands of the attackers. Chudnovsky and Ensign Dashkevich are
ordered to send troops from the Guard regiments to hold Mars Field.
Blagonravov from the fortress, after crossing the bridge, is to get into
contact with the troops on Mars Field. The sailors just arrived are to
keep in contact with the fortress and the crew of the _Aurora_. After
artillery fire the storm is to begin.

At the same time five ships of war arrive from the Baltic battle fleet:
a cruiser, two destroyers, and two smaller vessels. “However sure we may
have been of winning with the forces on hand,” writes Flerovsky, “this
gift from the navy raised everybody’s spirits.” Admiral Verderovsky,
looking from the windows of the Malachite Hall, could probably see an
imposing mutinous flotilla, dominating not only the palace and the
surrounding district but also the principal approaches to Petrograd.

About four o’clock in the afternoon Konovalov summoned to the palace by
telephone the political leaders standing close to the government. The
besieged ministers had need at least of moral support. Of all those
invited only Nabokov appeared. The rest preferred to express their
sympathy by telephone. Minister Tretiakov complained against Kerensky
and against fate: The head of the ministry has fled leaving his
colleagues without defence. But perhaps reinforcements will come?
Perhaps. However, why aren’t they here? Nabokov expressed his sympathy,
glancing stealthily at his watch, and hastened to take his farewell. He
got out just in time. Shortly after six the Winter Palace was at last
solidly surrounded by the troops of the Military Revolutionary
Committee. There was no longer any passage either for reinforcements or
for individuals.

From the direction of Konnogvardeisky Boulevard, the Admiralty Quay,
Morskaia Street, Nevsky Prospect, Mars Field, Milliony Street and
Dvortsovy Quay, the oval of the besiegers thickened and contracted.
Imposing cordons extended from the iron fences of the Winter Palace
garden, still in the hands of the besieged, from the arch between Palace
Square and Morskaia Street, from the canal by the Hermitage, from the
corners of the Admiralty, and the Nevsky near by the palace. Peter and
Paul fortress frowned threateningly from the other side of the river.
The _Aurora_ looked in from the Neva with her six-inch guns. Destroyers
steamed back and forth patrolling the river. The insurrection looked at
that moment like a military manoeuvre in the grand style.

On Palace Square, cleared by the junkers three hours before, armoured
automobiles now appeared and occupied the entrances and exits. The old
patriotic names were still visible on the armour under the new
designations painted hastily in red. Under the protection of these steel
monsters the attackers felt more and more confident on the square. One
of the armoured cars approached the main entrance of the palace,
disarmed the junkers guarding it, and withdrew unhindered.

In spite of the complete blockade now at last established, the besieged
still kept in touch with the outside world by telephone. To be sure, as
early as five o’clock a company of the Keksgolmsky regiment had already
occupied the War Ministry, through which the Winter Palace had kept in
touch with headquarters. But even after that an officer still remained
apparently for some hours at the apparatus of the South-western front,
located in an attic chamber of the ministry where the captors never
thought of looking. However, as before, this contact was of no help. The
answers from the Northern front had become more and more evasive. The
reinforcements had not turned up. The mysterious bicycle battalion never
arrived. Kerensky himself seemed to have disappeared like a diver. The
city friends confined themselves to briefer and briefer expressions of
sympathy. The ministers were sick at heart. There was nothing to talk
about, nothing to hope for. The ministers disagreed with each other and
with themselves. Some sat still in a kind of stupor, others
automatically paced up and down the floor. Those inclined to
generalisation looked back into the past, seeking a culprit. He was not
hard to find: the democracy! It was the democracy which had sent them
into the government, laid a mighty burden on them, and at the moment of
danger left them without support. For this once the Kadets were fully at
one with the socialists. Yes, the democracy was to blame! To be sure, in
forming the Coalition both groups had turned their back to an
institution as near to them as the Democratic Conference. Independence
of the democracy had indeed been the chief idea of the Coalition. But
never mind: what does a democracy exist for, if not to rescue a
bourgeois government when it gets into trouble? The Minister of
Agriculture Maslov, a Right Social Revolutionary, made a note which he
himself described as a dying utterance. He solemnly promised to die with
a curse to the democracy upon his lips. His colleagues hastened to
communicate this fateful intention to the Duma by telephone. His death,
to be sure, remained only a project, but there was no lack of curses
right on hand.

Up above near the chambers of the commandant there was a dining-room
where the court servants served the officer gentlemen a “divine dinner
and wine.” One could forget unpleasantness for a time. The officers
figured out seniorities, made envious comparisons, and cursed the new
power for its slow promotions. They gave it to Kerensky especially:
yesterday at the Pre-Parliament he was vowing to die at his post, and
today he beats it out of town dressed up as a sister of mercy. Certain
of the officers demonstrated to the members of the government the folly
of any further resistance. The energetic Palchinsky declared such
officers Bolsheviks, and tried even to arrest them.

The junkers wanted to know what was going to happen next, and demanded
from the government explanations which it was not in a position to give.
During this new conference between the junkers and the ministers,
Kishkin arrived from staff headquarters, bringing an ultimatum signed by
Antonov and delivered from the Peter and Paul fortress to the
Quartermaster-General, Poradelov, by a bicycle man: Surrender and disarm
the garrison of the Winter Palace; otherwise fire will be opened from
the guns of the fortress and the ships of war; twenty minutes for
reflection. This period had seemed small. Poradelov had managed to
extract another ten minutes. The military members of the government,
Manikovsky and Verderevsky, approached the matter simply: Since it is
impossible to fight, they said, we must think of surrendering – that is,
accept the ultimatum. But the civilian ministers remained obstinate. In
the end they decided to make no answer to the ultimatum, and to appeal
to the city duma as the only legal body existing in the capital. This
appeal to the duma was the last attempt to wake up the drowsy conscience
of the democracy.

Poradelov, considering it necessary to end the resistance, asked for his
discharge: he lacked “confidence in the correctness of the course chosen
by the Provisional Government.” The hesitations of the officer were put
an end to before his resignation could be accepted. In about half an
hour a detachment of Red Guards, sailors and soldiers, commanded by an
ensign of the Pavlovsky regiment, occupied the staff headquarters
without resistance, and arrested the faint-hearted
Quartermaster-General. This seizure of the headquarters might have been
carried out some time before since the building was completely
undefended from within. But until the arrival of armoured cars on the
Square the besiegers feared a sortie of junkers from the palace which
might cut them off.

After the loss of headquarters the Winter Palace felt still more
orphaned. From the Malachite Room, whose windows opened on the Neva, and
seemed, as it were, to invite a few shells from the _Aurora_, the
ministers removed themselves to one of the innumerable apartments of the
palace with windows on the court. The lights were put out. Only a lonely
lamp burned on the table, its light shut off from the windows by
newspapers.

What will happen to the palace if the _Aurora_ opens fire? asked the
ministers of their naval colleague. It will be a pile of ruins,
exclaimed the admiral readily, and not without a feeling of pride in his
naval artillery. Verderevsky preferred a surrender, and was not
unwilling to frighten these civilians out of their untimely bravery. But
the _Aurora_ did not shoot. The fortress also remained silent. Maybe the
Bolsheviks after all will not dare carry out their threat?

General Bagratuni, appointed in place of the insufficiently steadfast
Polkovnikov, considered this the appropriate moment to announce that he
refused any longer to occupy the post of commander of the district. At
Kishkin’s order the general was demoted “as unworthy,” and was requested
immediately to leave the palace. On emerging from the gates the former
commander fell into the hands of the sailors, who took him to the
barracks of the Baltic crew. It might have gone badly with the general,
but that Podvoisky, making the rounds of his front before the final
attack, took the unhappy warrior under his wing.

From the adjacent streets and quays many noticed how the palace which
had just been glimmering with hundreds of electric lights was suddenly
drowned in darkness. Among these observers were friends of the
government. One of the colleagues of Kerensky, Redemeister, has written:
“The darkness in which the palace was drowned presented an alarming
enigma.” The friends did not take any measures toward solving this
enigma. We must confess, however, that the possibilities were not great.

Hiding behind their piles of firewood the junkers followed tensely the
cordon forming on Palace Square, meeting every movement of the enemy
with rifle and machine-gun fire. They were answered in kind. Towards
night the firing became hotter. The first casualties occurred. The
victims, however, were only a few individuals. On the square, on the
quays, on Milliony, the besiegers accommodated themselves to the
situation, hid behind projections, concealed themselves in hollows,
clung along the walls. Among the reserves the soldiers and Red Guards
warmed themselves around camp fires which they had kindled at nightfall,
abusing the leaders for going so slow.

In the palace the junkers were taking up positions in the corridors, on
the stairway, at the entrances, and in the court. The outside sentries
clung along the fence and walls. The building would hold thousands, but
it held hundreds. The vast quarters behind the sphere of defence seemed
dead. Most of the servants had scattered, or were hiding. Many of the
officers took refuge in the buffet, where they compelled those servants
who had not yet made their getaway to set out continual batteries of
wines. This drunken debauch of the officers in the agonising palace
could not remain a secret to the junkers, Cossacks, cripples and women
soldiers. The _denouément_ was preparing not only from without but from
within.

An officer of the artillery squad suddenly reported to the commandent of
the defence: The junkers have left their weapons in the entrance and are
going home, in obedience to orders received from the commandant of the
Constantinovsky school. That was a treacherous blow! The commandant
tried to object: nobody but he could give orders here. The junkers
understood this, but nevertheless preferred to obey the commandant of
the school, who in his turn was acting under pressure from the commissar
of the Military Revolutionary Committee. A majority of the artillery
men, with four of the six guns, abandoned the palace. Held upon the
Nevsky by a soldier patrol, they attempted to resist, but a patrol of
the Pavlovsky regiment, arriving just in time with an armoured car,
disarmed them and sent them to its barracks with two of the guns. The
other two were set up on the Nevsky and the bridge over the Moika and
aimed at the Winter Palace.

The two squadrons of the Uraltsi were waiting in vain for the arrival of
their comrades. Savinkov, who was closely associated with the Council of
the Cossack Troops, and had even been sent by it as a delegate to the
Pre-Parliament, attempted with the co-operation of General Alexeiev to
get the Cossacks in motion. But the chiefs of the Cossack Council, as
Miliukov justly observes “could as little control the Cossack regiment
as the staff could the troops of the garrison.” Having considered the
question from all sides, the Cossack regiment finally announced that
they would not come out without infantry, and offered their services to
the Military Revolutionary Committee for the purpose of guarding the
government property. At the same time the Uraltsy regiment decided to
send delegates to the Winter Palace to call its two squadrons back to
the barracks. This suggestion fell in admirably with the new quite
well-defined mood of the Uralsky’s “old men.” There was nobody but
strangers around: junkers – among them a number of Jews – invalid
officers – yes, and then these female shock troops. With angry and
frowning faces the Cossacks gathered up their saddle-bags. No further
arguments could move them. Who remained to defend Kerensky? “Yids and
wenches ... But the Russian people has stayed over there with Lenin.” It
turned out that the Cossacks were in touch with the besiegers, and they
got free passes through an exit till then unknown to the defenders, It
was about nine o’clock in the evening when the Uraltsi left the palace.
Only their machine-guns they agreed to leave for the defence of a
hopeless cause.

By this same entrance too, coming from the direction of Milliony Street,
Bolsheviks had before this got into the palace for the purpose of
demoralising the enemy. Oftener and oftener mysterious figures began to
appear in the corridors beside the junkers. It is useless to resist. The
insurrectionists have captured the city and the railroad stations; there
are no reinforcements; in the palace they “only keep on lying through
inertia ...” What are we to do next? asked the junkers. The government
refused to issue any direct commands. The ministers themselves would
stand by their old decision; the rest could do as they pleased. That
meant free egress from the palace for those who wanted it. The
government had neither will nor idea left; the ministers passively
awaited their fate. Miliantovich subsequently related: “We wandered
through the gigantic mousetrap, meeting occasionally, either all
together or in small groups, for brief conversations – condemned people,
lonely, abandoned by all ... Around us vacancy, within us vacancy, and
in this grew up the soulless courage of placid indifference.”

Antonov-Ovseenko had agreed with Blagonravov that after the encirclement
of the palace was completed, a red lantern should be raised on the
flagpole of the fortress. At this signal the _Aurora_ would fire a blank
volley in order to frighten the palace. In case the besieged were
stubborn the fortress should begin to bombard the palace with real
shells from the light guns. If the palace did not surrender even then,
the _Aurora_ would open a real fire from its six-inch guns. The object
of this gradation was to reduce to a minimum the victims and the damage,
supposing they could not be altogether avoided. But the too complicated
solution of a simple problem threatened to lead to an opposite result.
The difficulty of carrying this plan out is too obvious. They are to
begin with a red lantern: It turns out that they have none on hand. They
lose time hunting for it, and finally find it. However, it is not so
simple to tie a lantern to a flagpole in such a way that it will be
visible in all directions. Efforts are renewed and twice renewed with a
dubious result, and meanwhile the precious time is slipping away.

The chief difficulty developed, however, in connection with the
artillery. According to a report made by Blagonravov the bombardment of
the capital had been possible on a moment’s notice ever since noon. In
reality it was quite otherwise. Since there was no permanent artillery
in the fortress, except for that rusty-muzzled cannon which announces
the noon hour, it was necessary to lift field guns up to the fortress
walls. That part of the programme had actually been carried out by noon.
But a difficulty arose about finding gunners. It had been known in
advance that the artillery company – one of those which had not come out
on the side of the Bolsheviks in July – was hardly to be relied on. Only
the day before it had meekly guarded a bridge under orders from
headquarters. A blow in the back was not to be expected from it, but the
company had no intention of going through fire for the soviets. When the
time came for action the ensign reported: The guns are rusty; there is
no oil in the compressors; it is impossible to shoot. Very likely the
guns really were not in shape, but that was not the essence of it. The
artillerists were simply dodging the responsibility, and leading the
inexperienced commissars by the nose. Antonov dashes up on a cutter in a
state of fury. Who is sabotaging the plan? Blagonravov tells him about
the lantern, about the oil, about the ensign. They both start to go up
to the cannon. Night, darkness, puddles in the court from the recent
rains. From the other side of the river comes hot rifle fire and the
rattle of machine-guns: In the darkness Blagonravov loses the road.
Splashing through the puddles, burning with impatience, stumbling and
falling in the mud, Antonov blunders after the commissar through the
dark court. “Beside one of the weakly glimmering lanterns,” relates
Blagonravov, “Antonov suddenly stopped and peered inquiringly at me over
his spectacles, almost touching my face. I read in his eyes a hidden
alarm.” Antonov had for a second suspected treachery where there was
only carelessness.

The position of the guns was finally found. The artillery men were
stubborn: Rust ... Compressors ... Oil. Antonov gave orders to bring
gunners from the naval polygon and also to fire a signal from the
antique cannon which announced the noon hour. But the artillery men were
suspiciously long monkeying with the signal cannon. They obviously felt
that the commanders too, when not far-off at the telephone but right
beside them, had no firm will to resort to heavy artillery. Even under
the very clumsiness of this plan for artillery fire the same thought is
to be felt lurking: Maybe we can get along without it.

Somebody is rushing through the darkness of the court. As he comes near
he stumbles and falls in the mud, swears a little but not angrily, and
then joyfully and in a choking voice cries out: “The palace has
surrendered and our men are there.” Rapturous embraces. How lucky there
was a delay! “Just what we thought.” The compressors are immediately
forgotten. But why haven’t they stopped shooting on the other side of
the river? Maybe some individual groups of junkers are stubborn about
surrendering. Maybe there is a misunderstanding? The misunderstanding
turned out to be good news: not the Winter Palace was captured, but only
the general staff. The siege of the palace continued.

By secret agreement with a group of junkers of the Oranienbaum school
the irrepressible Chudnovsky gets into the palace for negotiations: this
opponent of the insurrection never misses a chance to dash into the
firing line. Palchinsky arrests the daredevil, but under pressure from
the Oranienbaum students is compelled to release both Chudnovsky and a
number of the junkers. They take away with them a few of the Cavaliers
of St. George. The unexpected appearance of these junkers on the square
throws the cordons into confusion. But there is no end of joyful
shouting, when the besiegers know that these are surrendering troops.
However only a small minority surrenders. The remainder continue to fire
from behind their cover. The shooting of the attackers has increased.
The bright electric light in the court makes a good mark of the junkers.
With difficulty they succeed in putting out the light. Some unseen hand
again switches on the light. The junkers shoot at the light, and then
find the electrician and make him switch off the current.

The Women’s Battalion suddenly announce their intention to make a
sortie. According to their information the clerks in General
Headquarters have gone over to Lenin, and after disarming some of the
officers have arrested General Alexeiev – the sole man who can save
Russia. He must be rescued at any cost. The commandant is powerless to
restrain them from this hysterical undertaking. At the moment of their
sortie the lights again suddenly flare up in the high electric lanterns
on each side of the gate. Seeking an electrician the officer jumps
furiously upon the palace servants: in these former lackeys of the czar
he sees agents of revolution. He puts still less trust in the court
electrician: “I would have sent you to the next world long ago if I
hadn’t needed you.” In spite of revolver threats, the electrician is
powerless to help. His switch-board is disconnected. Sailors have
occupied the electric station and are controlling the light. The women
soldiers do not stand up under fire and the greater part of them
surrender. The commandant of the defence sends a corporal to report to
the government that the sortie of the women’s battalion has “led to
their destruction,” and that the palace is swarming with agitators. The
failure of the sortie causes a lull lasting approximately from ten to
eleven. The besiegers are busied with the preparation of artillery fire.

The unexpected lull awakens some hopes in the besieged. The ministers
again try to encourage their partisans in the city and throughout the
country: “The government in full attendance, with the exception of
Prokopovich, is at its post. The situation is considered favourable ...
The Palace is under fire, but only rifle fire and without results. It is
clear that the enemy is weak.” In reality the enemy is all-powerful but
cannot make up his mind to use his power. The government sends out
through the country communications about the ultimatum, about the
_Aurora_, about how it, the government, can only transfer the power to
the Constituent Assembly, and how the first assault on the Winter Palace
has been repulsed. “Let the army and the people answer.” But just how
they are to answer the ministers do not suggest.

Lashevich meantime has sent two sailor gunners to the fortress. To be
sure, they are none too experienced, but they are at least Bolsheviks,
and quite ready to shoot from rusty guns without oil in the compressors.
That is all that is demanded of them. A noise of artillery is more
important at the moment than a well-aimed blow. Antonov gives the order
to begin. The gradations indicated in advance are completely followed
out. “After a signal shot from the fortress,” relates Flerovsky, “the
_Aurora_ thundered out. The boom and flash of blank fire are much bigger
than from a loaded gun. The curious onlookers jumped back from the
granite parapet of the quay, fell down and crawled away ...” Chudnovsky
promptly raises the question: How about proposing to the besieged to
surrender. Antonov as promptly agrees with him. Again an interruption.
Some group of women and junkers are surrendering. Chudnovsky wants to
leave them their arms, but Antonov revolts in time against this too
beautiful magnanimity. Laying the rifles on the sidewalk the prisoners
go out under convoy along Milliony Street.

The palace still holds out. It is time to have an end. The order is
given. Firing begins – not frequent and still less effectual. Out of
thirty-five shots fired in the course of an hour and a half or two
hours, only two hit the mark, and they only injure the plaster. The
other shells go high, fortunately not doing any damage in the city. Is
lack of skill the real cause? They were shooting across the Neva with a
direct aim at a target as impressive as the Winter Palace: that does not
demand a great deal of artistry. Would it not be truer to assume that
even Lashevich’s artillerymen intentionally aimed high in the hope that
things would be settled without destruction and death? It is very
difficult now to hunt out any trace of the motive which guided the two
nameless sailors. They themselves have spoken no word. Have they
dissolved in the immeasurable Russian land, or, like so many of the
October fighters, did they lay down their heads in the civil wars of the
coming months and years?

Shortly after the first shots, Palchinsky brought the ministers a
fragment of shell. Admiral Verderevsky recognised the shell as his own –
from a naval gun, from the _Aurora_. But they were shooting blank from
the cruiser. It had been thus agreed, was thus testified by Flerovsky,
and thus reported to the Congress of Soviets later by a sailor. Was the
admiral mistaken? Was the sailor mistaken? Who can ascertain the truth
about a cannon shot fired in the thick of night from a mutinous ship at
a czar’s palace where the last government of the possessing classes is
going out like an oilless lamp.

The garrison of the palace was greatly reduced in number. If at the
moment of the arrival of the Uraltsi, the cripples and the women’s
battalion, it rose to a thousand and a half, or perhaps even two
thousand, it was now reduced to a thousand, and perhaps’ considerably
less. Nothing can save the day now but a miracle, And suddenly into the
despairing atmosphere of the Winter Palace there bursts – not, to be
sure, a miracle, but the news of its approach. Palchinsky announces:
They have just telephoned from the City Duma that the citizens are
getting ready to march from there for the rescue of the government.
“Tell everybody,” he gives orders to Sinegub, “that the people are
coming.” The officer runs up and down stairs and through the corridors
with the joyful news. On the way he stumbles upon some drunken officers
fighting each other with rapiers – shedding no blood, however. The
junkers lift up their heads. Passing from mouth to mouth the news
becomes more colourful and impressive. The public men, the merchantry,
the people, with the clergy at their head, are marching this way to free
the beleaguered palace. The people with the clergy! “That will be
strikingly beautiful!” A last remnant of energy flares up: “Hurrah! Long
live Russia!” The Oranienbaum junkers, who by that time had quite
decided to leave, changed their minds and stayed.

But the people with the clergy come very slowly. The number of agitators
in the palace is growing. In a minute the _Aurora_ will open fire. There
is a whispering in the corridors. And this whisper passes from lip to
lip. Suddenly two explosions. Sailors have got into the palace and
either thrown or dropped from the gallery two hand grenades, lightly
wounding two junkers. The sailors are arrested and the wounded bound up
by Kishkin, a physician by profession.

The inner resolution of the workers and sailors is great, but it has not
yet become bitter. Lest they call it down on their heads, the besieged,
being the incomparably weaker side, dare not deal severely with these
agents of the enemy who have penetrated the palace. There are no
executions. Uninvited guests now begin to appear no longer one by one,
but in groups. The palace is getting more and more like a sieve. When
the junkers fall upon these intruders, the latter permit themselves to
be disarmed. “What cowardly scoundrels!” says Palchinsky scornfully. No,
these men were not cowardly. It required a high courage to make one’s
way into that palace crowded with officers and junkers. In the labyrinth
of an unknown building, in dark corridors, among innumerable doors
leading nobody knew where, and threatening nobody knew what, the
daredevils had nothing to do but surrender. The number of captives
grows. New groups break in. It is no longer quite clear who is
surrendering to whom, who is disarming whom. The artillery continues to
boom.

With the exception of the district immediately adjoining the Winter
Palace, the life of the streets did not cease until late at night. The
theatres and moving-picture houses were open. To the respectable and
educated strata of the capital it was of no consequence apparently that
their government was under fire. Redemeister on the Troitsky Bridge saw
quietly approaching pedestrians whom the sailors stopped. “There was
nothing unusual to be seen.” From acquaintances coming from the
direction of the People’s House Redemeister learned, to the tune of a
cannonade, that Chaliapin had been incomparable in _Don Carlos_. The
ministers continued to tramp the floors of their mousetrap.

“It is clear that the attackers are weak”; maybe if we hold out an extra
hour reinforcements will still arrive. Late at night Kishkin summoned
Assistant-Minister of Finance Khrushchev, also a Kadet, to the
telephone, and asked him to tell the leaders of the party that the
government needed at least a little bit of help in order to hold out
until the morning hours, when Kerensky ought finally to arrive with the
troops. “What kind of a party is this,” shouts Kishkin indignantly,
“that can’t send us three hundred armed men!” And he is right. What kind
of a party is it? These Kadets who had assembled tens of thousands of
votes at the elections in Petrograd, could not put out three hundred
fighters at the moment of mortal danger to the bourgeois régime. If the
ministers had only thought to hunt up in the palace library the books of
the materialist Hobbes, they could have read in his dialogues about
civil war that there is no use expecting or demanding courage from
store-keepers who have gotten rich, “since they see nothing but their
own momentary advantage ... and completely lose their heads at the mere
thought of the possibility of being robbed.” But after all Hobbes was
hardly to be found in the czar’s library. The ministers, too, were
hardly up to the philosophy of history. Kishkin’s telephone call was the
last ring from the Winter Palace.

Smolny was categorically demanding an end. We must not drag out the
siege till morning, keep the city in a tension, rasp the nerves of the
Congress, put a question-mark against the whole victory. Lenin sends
angry notes. Call follows call from the Military Revolutionary
Committee. Podvoisky talks back. It is possible to throw the masses
against the palace. Plenty are eager to go. But how many victims will
there be, and what will be left of the ministers and the junkers?
However, the necessity of carrying the thing though is too imperious.
Nothing remains but to make the naval artillery speak. A sailor from
Peter and Paul takes a slip of paper to the _Aurora_. Open fire on the
palace immediately. Now, it seems, all will be clear. The gunners on the
_Aurora_ are ready for business, but the leaders still lack resolution.
There is a new attempt at evasion. “We decided to wait just another
quarter of an hour,” writes Flerovsky, “sensing by instinct the
possibility of a change of circumstances.” By “instinct” here it is
necessary to understand a stubborn hope that the thing would be settled
by mere demonstrative methods. And this time “instinct” did not deceive.
Towards the end of that quarter of an hour a new courier arrived
straight from the Winter Palace. The palace is taken!

The palace did not surrender but was taken by storm – this, however, at
a moment when the power of resistance of the besieged had already
completely evaporated. Hundreds of enemies broke into the corridor – not
by the secret entrance this time but through the defended door – and
they were taken by the demoralised defenders for the Duma deputation.
Even so they were successfully disarmed. A considerable group of junkers
got away in the confusion. The rest – at least a number of them – still
continued to stand guard. But the barrier of bayonets and rifle-fire
between the attackers and defenders is finally broken down.

That part of the palace adjoining the Hermitage already filled with the
enemy. The junkers make an attempt to come at them from the rear. In the
corridors phantasmagoric meetings and clashes take place. All are armed
to the teeth. Lifted hands hold revolvers. Hand-grenades hang from
belts. But nobody shoots and nobody throws a grenade. For they and their
enemy are so mixed together that they cannot drag themselves apart.
Never mind: the fate of the palace is already decided.

Workers, sailors, soldiers are pushing up from outside in chains and
groups, flinging the junkers from the barricades, bursting through the
court, stumbling into the junkers on the staircase, crowding them back,
toppling them over, driving them upstairs. Another wave comes on behind.
The square pours into the court. The court pours into the palace, and
floods up and down stairways and through corridors. On the befouled
parquets, among mattresses and chunks of bread, people, rifles,
hand-grenades are wallowing. The conquerors find out that Kerensky is
not there, and a momentary pang of disappointment interrupts their
furious joy. Antonov and Chudnovsky are now in the palace. Where is the
government? That is the door – there where the junkers stand frozen in
the last pose of resistance, The head sentry rushes to the ministers
with a question: Are we commanded to resist to the end? No, no, the
ministers do not command that. After all, the palace is taken. There is
no need of bloodshed. We must yield to force. The ministers desire to
surrender with dignity, and sit at the table in imitation of a session
of the government. The commandant has already surrendered the palace,
negotiating for the lives of the junkers, against which in any case
nobody had made the slightest attempt. As to the fate of the government,
Antonov refuses to enter into any negotiations whatever.

The junkers at the last guarded doors were disarmed. The victors burst
into the room of the ministers. “In front of the crowd and trying to
hold back the onpressing ranks strode a rather small, unimpressive man.
His clothes were in disorder, a wide-brimmed hat askew on his head,
eyeglasses balanced uncertainly on his nose, but his little eyes gleamed
with the joy of victory and spite against the conquered.” In these
annihilating strokes the conquered have described Antonov. It is not
hard to believe that his clothes and his hat were in disorder: It is
sufficient to remember the nocturnal journey through the puddles of the
Peter and Paul fortress. The joy of victory might also doubtless have
been read in his eyes; but hardly any spite against the conquered in
those eyes – I announce to you, members of the Provisional Government,
that you are under arrest – exclaimed Antonov in the name of the
Military Revolutionary Committee. The clock then pointed to 2.10 in the
morning of October 26. – The members of the Provisional Government
submit to force and surrender in order to avoid bloodshed – answered
Konovalov. The most important part of the ritual was thus observed.

Antonov summoned twenty-five armed men, choosing them from the first
detachments to break into the palace, and turned over to them the
defence of the ministry. After drawing up a minute of the proceeding,
the arrestees were led out into the square. In the crowd, which had made
its sacrifice of dead and wounded, there was in truth a flare up of
spite against the conquered. “Death to them! Shoot them!” Individual
soldiers tried to strike the ministers. The Red Guards quieted the
intemperate ones: Do not stain the proletarian victory! Armed workers
surrounded the prisoners and their convoy in a solid ring. “Forward!”
They had not far to go – through Milliony and across the Troitsky
Bridge. But the excitement of the crowd made that short journey long and
full of danger. Minister Nikitin wrote later very truly that but for the
energetic intercession of Antonov the consequences might have been “very
serious.” To conclude their misadventure, the procession while on the
bridge was fired on by accident and the arrestees and their convoy had
to lie down on the pavement. But here too, nobody was injured. Somebody
was evidently shooting in the air as a warning.

In the narrow quarters of the garrison club of the fortress, lighted
with a smoky kerosene lamp because the electricity had refused to
function that day, forty or fifty men are crowded. Antonov, in the
presence of the commissar of the fortress, calls the roll of the
ministers. There are eighteen of them, including the highest assistants.
The last formalities are concluded; the prisoners are distributed in the
rooms of the historic Trubetskoy Bastion. None of the defenders had been
arrested: the officers and junkers were paroled on their word of honour
that they would not take any action against the soviet power. Only a few
of them kept their word.

Immediately after the capture of the Winter Palace rumours went round in
bourgeois circles about the execution of junkers, the raping of the
women’s battalion, the looting of the riches of the palace. All these
fables had long ago been refuted when Miliukov wrote this in his
_History_: “Those of the Women’s Battalion who had not died under fire
were seized the Bolsheviks, subjected during that evening and night to
the frightful attentions of the soldiers, to violence and execution.” As
a matter of fact there were no shootings and, the mood of both sides
being what it was at that period, there could not have been any
shootings. Still less thinkable were acts of violence, especially within
the palace where alongside of various accidental elements from the
streets, hundreds of revolutionary workers came in with rifles in their
hands.

Attempts at looting were actually made, but it was just these attempts
which revealed the discipline of the victors. John Reed, who did not
miss one of the dramatic episodes of the revolution, and who entered the
palace on the heels of the first cordons, tells how in the basement
stores a group of soldiers were prying drawers open with the butts of
their guns and dragging out carpets, linen, china, glassware. It is
possible that regular robbers were working in the disguise of soldiers,
as they did invariably during the last years of the war, concealing
their identity in trenchcoats and _papakhi_. The looting had just begun
when somebody shouted: “Comrades, keep your hands off, that is the
property of the people.” A soldier sat down at a table by the entrance
with pen and paper: two Red Guards with revolvers stood behind him.
Everyone going out was searched, and every object stolen was taken back
and listed. In this way they recovered little statues, bottles of ink,
daggers, cakes of soap, ostrich feathers. The junkers were also
subjected to a careful search, and their pockets turned out to be full
of stolen _bric-a-brac_. The junkers were abused and threatened by the
soldiers, but that was as far as it went. Meanwhile a palace guard was
formed with the sailor Prikhodko at the head. Sentries were posted
everywhere. The palace was cleared of outsiders. In a few hours
Chudnovsky was appointed commandant of the Winter Palace.

But what had become of the people, advancing with the clergy at their
head to liberate the palace? It is necessary to tell about this heroic
attempt, the news of which had for a moment so touched the hearts of the
junkers. The city duma was the centre of the anti-Bolshevik forces; its
building on the Nevsky was boiling like a cauldron. Parties, factions,
sub-factions, groups, remnants and mere influential individuals were
there discussing this criminal adventure of the Bolsheviks. From time to
time they would call up the ministry languishing in the palace, and tell
them that under the weight of universal condemnation the insurrection
must inevitably expire. Hours were devoted to dissertations on the moral
isolation of the Bolsheviks. Meanwhile the artillery began to speak. The
minister Prokopovich, arrested in the morning but soon released,
complained to the duma with a weeping voice that he had been deprived of
the possibility of sharing the fate of his comrades. He aroused warm
sympathy, but the expression of this sympathy used up time.

From the general confusion of ideas and speeches a practical plan is at
last produced, and wins stormy applause from the whole meeting. The duma
must march in a body to the Winter Palace in order to die there, if
necessary, with the government.

The Social Revolutionaries, Mensheviks and Co-operators are all alike
seized with a willingness either to save the ministers or fall by their
sides. The Kadets, not generally inclined to risky undertakings, this
time decide to lay down their heads with the rest. Some provincials
accidentally turning up in the hall, the duma journalists, and one man
from the general public, request permission in more or less eloquent
language to share the fate of the duma. The permission is granted.

The Bolshevik faction tries to offer a prosaic piece of advice: Why
wander through the streets in the dark seeking death? Better call up the
ministers and persuade them to surrender before blood is shed. But the
democrats are indignant: These agents of insurrection want to tear from
our hands not only the power, but our right to a heroic death. Meanwhile
the members decided, in the interest of history, to take a vote by roll
call. After all, one cannot die too late – even though the death be
glorious. Sixty-two members of the duma ratify the decision yes, they
are actually going to die under the ruins of the Winter Palace. To this
the fourteen Bolsheviks answer that it is better to conquer with Smolny
than to die in the Winter Palace, and immediately set off for the
meeting of the Soviet Congress. Only three Menshevik-Internationalists
decide to remain within the walls of the duma: They have nowhere to go
and nothing to die for.

The members of the duma are just on the point of setting out on their
last journey when the telephone rings and news comes that the whole of
the Executive Committee of the Peasants’ Deputies is coming to join
them. Unending applause. Now the picture is complete and clear: The
representatives of one hundred million peasants, together with the
representatives of all classes of the city population are going to die
at the hands of an insignificant gang of thugs. There is no lack of
speeches and applause.

After the arrival of the Peasants’ Deputies the column finally set out
along the Nevsky. At the head of the column march the burgomaster,
Schreider, and the minister Prokopovich. Among the marchers John Reed
noticed the Social Revolutionary, Avksentiev, president of the Peasant
Executive Committee, and the Menshevik leaders, Khinchuk and Abramovich,
the first of whom was considered Right, the second Left. Prokopovich and
Schreider each carried a lantern: it had been so agreed by telephone
with the ministers, in order that the junkers should not take friends
for enemies. Prokopovich carried besides this an umbrella, as did many
others. The clergy were not present. The clergy had been created out of
misty fragments of the history of the fatherland by the none too opulent
imagination of the junkers. But the people also were absent. Their
absence determined the character of the whole scheme. Three or four
hundred “representatives” and not one man of those whom they
represented! “It was a dark night,” remembers the Social Revolutionary,
Zenzinov, “and the lights on the Nevsky were not burning. We marched in
a regular procession and only our singing of the _Marseillaise_ was to
be heard. Cannon shots resounded in the distance: that was the
Bolsheviks continuing to bombard the Winter Palace.”

At the Ekaterininsky Canal a patrol of armed sailors was stretched out
across the Nevsky, blocking the way for this column of the democracy.
“We are going forward,” declared the condemned, “What can you do to us?”
The sailors answered frankly that they would use force: “Go home and
leave us alone.” Someone of the marchers suggested that they die right
there on the spot. But in the decision adopted by a roll call vote in
the duma this variant had not been foreseen. The minister Prokopovich
clambered up on some sort of elevation and “waving his umbrella” – rains
are frequent in the autumn in Petrograd – urged the demonstrators not to
lead into temptation those dark and deceived people who might actually
resort to arms. “Let us return to the duma and talk over methods of
saving the country and the revolution.”

This was truly a wise proposal. To be sure, the original plan would then
remain unfulfilled. But what can you do with armed ruffians who will not
permit the leaders of the democracy to die a heroic death? “They stood
around for a while, got chilly and decided to go back,” writes
Stankevich mournfully. He too was a marcher in this procession. Without
the _Marseillaise_ now – on the contrary in a glum silence – the
procession moved back along the Nevsky to the duma building. There at
last it would surely find “methods of saving the country and the
revolution.”

With the capture of the Winter Palace the Military Revolutionary
Committee came into full possession of the capital. But just as the
nails and hair continue to grow on a corpse, so the overthrown
government continued to show signs of life through its official press.
_The Herald of the Provisional Government_, which on the 24th had
announced the retirement of the Privy Councillors with their uniform and
pince-nez, had suddenly disappeared on the 25th – an event which, to be
sure, nobody noticed. But on the 26th it appeared again as if nothing
had happened. On the first page it carried a rubric: “In consequence of
the shutting off of the electric current the issue of October 25 did not
appear.” In all other respects except only the electric current, the
governmental life was going on in due order, and the _Herald_ of a
government now located in the Trubetskoy Bastion announced the
appointment of a dozen new senators. In its column of “administrative
information” a circular of the Minister of the Interior, Nikitin,
advised the commissars of the provinces “not to be influenced by false
rumours of events in Petrograd where all is tranquil.” The minister was
not after all so far wrong. The days of the revolution went by
peacefully enough, but for the cannonading, whose effect was only
acoustic. But just the same the historian will make no mistake if he
says that on October 25th not only was the electric current shut off in
the government printing plant, but an important page was turned in the
history of mankind.



CHAPTER 46 THE OCTOBER INSURRECTION


 

Physical analogies with revolution come so naturally that some of them
have become worn-out metaphors: “Volcanic eruption,” “birth of a new
society,” “boiling point.” ... Under the simple literary image there is
concealed here an intuitive grasp of the laws of dialectic – that is,
the logic of evolution.

Armed insurrection stands in the same relation to revolution that
revolution as a whole does to evolution, it is the critical point when
accumulating quantity turns with an explosion into quality. But
insurrection itself again is not a homogeneous and indivisible act: it
too has its critical points, its inner crises and accelerations.

An extraordinary importance both political and theoretical attaches to
that short period immediately preceding the “boiling point” – the eve,
that is, of the insurrection. Physics teaches that the steady increase
of temperature suddenly comes to a stop; the liquid remains for a time
at the same temperature, and boils only after absorbing an additional
quantity of heat. Everyday language also comes to our aid here,
designating this condition of pseudo-tranquil concentration preceding an
explosion as ’the lull before the storm.”

When an unqualified majority of the workers and soldiers of Petrograd
had come over to the Bolsheviks, the boiling temperature, it seemed, was
reached. It was then that Lenin proclaimed the necessity of immediate
insurrection. But it is striking to observe that something was still
lacking to the insurrection. The workers, and especially the soldiers,
had to absorb some additional revolutionary energy.

The contradiction between word and deed is unknown to the masses, but
the passing over from word to deed – even to a simple strike, and so
much the more to insurrection – inevitably calls out inner frictions and
molecular regroupings: some move forward, others have to crowd back.
Civil war in general is distinguished in its first steps by an
extraordinary indecisiveness. Both camps are as though stuck fast in the
same national soil; they cannot break away from their own environment
with its intermediate groupings and moods of compromise.

The lull before the storm in the lower ranks produced a sudden
hesitation among the guiding groups. Those organs and institutions which
had been formed in the comparatively tranquil period of preparation –
for revolution has like war its peaceful period, its days of calm –
proved even in the most tempered party inadequate, or at least not
wholly adequate, to the tasks of insurrection. A certain reconstruction
and shifting about is unavoidable at the critical moment. Far from all
the delegates of the Petrograd Soviet who voted for a soviet government
were really imbued with the idea that an armed insurrection had become
the task of the day. In order to convert the Soviet into a machine of
insurrection, it was necessary with as little disturbance as possible to
bring them over to this new course. In the circumstances of a matured
crisis this did not require months, or even many weeks, But just in
those last days it was most dangerous to fall out of step, to give
orders for a jump some days before the Soviet was ready to make it, to
bring confusion into one’s own ranks, to cut off the party from the
Soviet even for 24 hours.

Lenin more than once repeated that the masses are far to the left of the
party, just as the party is to the left of the Central Committee.
Applied to the revolution as a whole this was perfectly true. But these
correlations too, have their deep inward oscillations. In April, in
June, and especially at the beginning of July, the workers and soldiers
were impatiently pushing the party along the path toward decisive
action. After the July raids the masses became more cautious. They
wanted a revolution as before, and more than before, but having badly
burnt themselves once, they feared another failure. Throughout July,
August and September, the party was daily holding back the workers and
soldiers, whom the Kornilovists on their part were challenging into the
streets with all their might. The political experience of those last
months had greatly developed the inhibitory centres not only of the
leaders, but of the led. The unbroken success of the agitation had
nourished in its turn the inertia of the time-biding attitude. A new
political orientation was not enough for the masses: they had need of a
psychological readjustment. An insurrection takes in broader masses, the
more the commands of the revolutionary party fuse with the command of
circumstances.

The difficult problem of passing from the political preparation to the
actual technique of insurrection arose throughout the whole country in
different forms, but in essence it was everywhere the same. Muralov
tells how in the Moscow military organisation of the Bolsheviks opinion
as to the necessity of a seizure of power was unanimous; however “the
attempt to decide concretely how this seizure should be carried out
remained unresolved.” The last connecting link was lacking.

During those days when Petrograd was full of the transfer of the
garrison, Moscow was living in an atmosphere of continual strike
conflicts. On the initiative of a factory committee the Bolshevik
faction of the soviet put forward a plan to settle economic conflicts by
means of decrees. The preparatory steps took a good deal of time. Only
on the 23rd of October was _Revolutionary Decree No.1_ adopted by the
soviet bodies. It provided that: Workers and clerks in factories and
shops shall henceforth be employed and discharged only with the consent
of the shop committees. This meant that the soviet had begun to function
as a state power. The inevitable resistance of the government would,
according to the design of the initiators, unite the masses more closely
round the soviet and lead to an open conflict. This idea never came to
the test because the revolution in Petrograd gave Moscow, together with
all the rest of the country, a far more imperative motive for
insurrection – the necessity of coming promptly to the support of the
newly formed soviet government.

The attacking side is almost always interested in seeming on the
defensive. A revolutionary party is interested in legal coverings. The
coming Congress of Soviets, although in essence a Soviet of revolution,
was nevertheless for the whole popular mass indubitably endowed, if not
with the whole sovereignty, at least with a good half of it. It was a
question of one of the elements of a dual power making an insurrection
against the other. Appealing to the Congress as the source of authority,
the Military Revolutionary Committee accused the government in advance
of preparing an attempt against the soviets. This accusation flowed
logically from the whole situation. Insofar as the government did not
intend to capitulate without a fight, it could not help getting ready to
defend itself. But by this very fact it became liable to the accusation
of conspiracy against the highest organ of the workers, soldiers and
peasants. In its struggle against the Congress of Soviets which was to
overthrow Kerensky, the government lifted its hand against that source
of power from which Kerensky had issued.

It would be a serious mistake to regard all this as juridical
hair-splitting of no interest to the people. On the contrary, it was in
just this form that the fundamental facts of the revolution reflected
themselves in the minds of the masses. It was necessary to make full use
of this extraordinary advantageous tie-up. In thus giving a great
political goal to the natural disinclination of the soldier to pass from
the barracks to the trenches, and in mobilising the garrison for the
defence of the Soviet Congress, the revolutionary leaders did not bind
their hands in the slightest degree regarding the date of the
insurrection. The choice of the day and hour depended upon the further
course of the conflict. The freedom to manoeuvre belonged to the
strongest.

“First conquer Kerensky and then call the Congress,” Lenin kept
repeating, fearing that insurrection would be replaced with
constitutional by-play. Lenin had obviously not yet appreciated the new
factor which had intruded into the preparation of the insurrection and
changed its whole character, the sharp conflict between the Petrograd
garrison and the government. If the Congress of Soviets was to decide
the question of power; if the government wanted to dismember the
garrison in order to prevent the Congress from becoming the power; if
the garrison without awaiting the Congress of Soviets had refused to
obey the government, why this meant that in essence the insurrection had
begun, and begun without waiting for the Congress, although under cover
of its authority. It would have been wrong politically, therefore, to
separate the preparation of the insurrection from the preparation for
the Congress of Soviets.

The peculiarities of the October revolution can best be understood by
contrasting it with the February revolution. In making this comparison
it is not necessary, as in other cases, to assume conditionally the
identity of a whole series of circumstances. They are in reality
identical. The scene is Petrograd in both cases: the same arena, the
same social groupings, the same proletariat, and the same garrison. The
victory in both cases was attained by the going over of a majority of
the reserve regiments to the side of the workers. But within the
framework of these fundamental traits what an enormous difference! The
two Petrograd revolutions, historically completing each other in the
course of eight months, seem in their contrasting traits almost
predestined to promote an understanding of the nature of insurrection in
general.

The February insurrection is called spontaneous. We have introduced in
their due place all the necessary limitations to this description. But
it is true in any case that in February nobody laid out the road in
advance, nobody voted in the factories and barracks on the question of
revolution, nobody summoned the masses from above to insurrection. The
indignation accumulated for years broke to the surface unexpectedly, to
a considerable degree, even to the masses themselves.

It was quite otherwise in October. For eight months the masses had been
living an intense political life. They had not only been creating
events, but learning to understand their connections. After each action
they had critically weighed its results. Soviet parliamentarism had
become the daily mechanics of the political life of the people. When
they were deciding by a vote questions of strikes, of street
manifestations, of the transfer of regiments to the front, could the
masses forgo an independent decision on the question of insurrection?

From this invaluable and sole substantial conquest of the February
revolution there arose, however, new difficulties. It was impossible to
summon the masses to battle in the name of the Soviet without raising
the question formally in the Soviet – that is, without making the
problem of insurrection a subject of public debate, and that too, with
the participation of representatives of the hostile camp. The necessity
of creating a special, and to the extent possible a disguised, soviet
organ for the leadership of the insurrection was obvious. But this too
demanded democratic procedures, with all their advantages and all their
delays. The resolution on the Military Revolutionary Committee adopted
on the 9th of October was carried out only on the 20th. But that was not
the chief difficulty. To take advantage of the majority in the Soviet
and compose the Committee of Bolsheviks alone, would have provoked
discontent among the non-party men, to say nothing of the Left Social
Revolutionaries and certain groups of anarchists. The Bolsheviks in the
Military Revolutionary Committee would submit to the decisions of their
party – although not always without resistance – but it was impossible
to demand discipline of the non-party men and the Left Social
Revolutionaries. To get an _a priori_ resolution of insurrection at a
definite date from them was not to be thought of. And moreover it was
extremely imprudent even to put the question to them. By means of the
Military Revolutionary Committee, therefore, it was possible only to
draw the masses into insurrection, sharpening the situation from day to
day and making the conflict irrevocable.

Would it not have been simpler in that case to summon the insurrection
directly in the name of the party? This form of action undoubtedly has
weighty advantages. But its disadvantages are hardly less obvious. In
those millions upon whom the party legitimately counted it is necessary
to distinguish three layers: one which was already with the Bolsheviks
on all conditions; another, more numerous, which supported the
Bolsheviks in so far as they acted through the soviets; a third which
followed the soviets in spite of the fact that they were dominated by
Bolsheviks.

These three layers were different not only in political level, but to a
considerable degree also in social ingredients. Those standing for the
Bolsheviks as a party were above all industrial workers, with the
hereditary proletarians of Petrograd in the front rank. Those standing
for the Bolsheviks in so far as they had a legal soviet cover, were a
majority of the soldiers. Those standing for the soviets, independently
and regardless of the fact that an overplus of Bolsheviks dominated
them, were the more conservative groups of workers – former Mensheviks
and Social Revolutionaries, who dreaded to break away from the rest of
the masses – the more conservative parts of the army even including the
Cossacks, and the peasants who had freed themselves from the leadership
of the Social Revolutionary party and were adhering to its left flank.

It would be an obvious mistake to identify the strength of the Bolshevik
party with the strength of the soviets led by it. The latter was much
greater than the former. However, without the former it would have been
mere impotence. There is nothing mysterious in this. The relations
between the party and the Soviet grew out of the disaccord inevitable in
a revolutionary epoch between the colossal political influence of
Bolshevism and its narrow organisational grasp. A lever correctly
applied makes the human arm capable of lifting a weight many times
exceeding its living force, but without the living arm the lever is
nothing but a dead stick.

At a Moscow regional conference of the Bolsheviks at the end of
September, one of the delegates reported: “In Yegorevsk the influence of
the Bolsheviks is undivided ... But the party organisation as such is
weak. It is in complete neglect; there is neither regular registration
nor membership dues.” This disproportion between influence and
organisation, although not everywhere so marked, was a general
phenomenon. Broad masses knew of the Bolshevik slogans and the soviet
organisation. The two fused completely in their minds in the course of
September and October. What the people were waiting for was that the
soviets should show them when and how to carry out the programme of the
Bolsheviks.

The party itself systematically educated the masses in this spirit. In
Kiev, when the rumour went round that an insurrection was preparing, the
Bolshevik Executive Committee immediately came out with a denial: “No
action without the summons of the Soviet must take place ... Not a step
without the Soviet!” In denying on the 18th of October the rumours of an
insurrection alleged to have been appointed for the 22nd, Trotsky said:
“The Soviet is an elective institution and ... cannot make a decision
which is unknown to the workers and soldiers ...” Repeated daily and
reinforced by practical action, such formula entered into the flesh and
blood of the masses.

According to the report of Ensign Berezin, at an October military
conference of the Bolsheviks in Moscow the delegates were saying: “It is
hard to know whether the troops will come out at the summons of the
Moscow committee of the Bolsheviks. At the summons of the Soviet they
might all come out.” Nevertheless even in September the Moscow garrison
had voted 90 per cent Bolshevik. At a conference of October 16th in
Petrograd, Boky made this report in the name of the party committee: In
the Moscow district “they will come out at the summons of the Soviet,
but not of the party”; in the Nevsky district “all will follow the
Soviet.” Volodarsky thereupon summarised the state of mind in Petrograd
in the following words: “The general impression is that nobody is eager
to go into the streets, but all will appear at the call of the Soviet.”
Olga Ravich corrected him: “Some say also at the call of the party.” At
a Petrograd Garrison Conference on the 18th, delegates reported that
their regiments were awaiting the summons of the Soviet to come out.
Nobody mentioned the party, notwithstanding that the Bolsheviks stood at
the head of many units. Thus unity in the barracks could be preserved
only by uniting the sympathetic, the wavering, and the semi-hostile
under the discipline of the Soviet. The grenadier regiment even declared
that it would come out only at the command of the Congress of Soviets.
The very fact that agitators and organisers in estimating the state of
mind of the masses always alluded to the distinction between the Soviet
and the party, shows what great significance this question had from the
standpoint of the summons to insurrection.

The chauffeur Mitrevich tells how in a squad of motor-trucks, where they
did not succeed in carrying a resolution in favour of insurrection, the
Bolsheviks put through a compromise proposal: “We will not come out
either for the Bolsheviks or the Mensheviks, but ... we will carry out
without delay all the demands of the Second Congress of Soviets.” These
Bolsheviks were applying on a small scale to the motor-truck squad the
same enveloping tactics which were being applied at large by the
Military Revolutionary Committee. Mitrevich is not arguing but telling a
story – the more convincing his testimony!

Attempts to lead the insurrection directly through the party nowhere
produced results. A highly interesting piece of testimony is preserved
regarding the preparation of the uprising in Kineshma, a considerable
centre of the textile industry. After insurrection in the Moscow region
had been placed on the order of the day, the party committee in Kineshma
elected a special trio to take an inventory of the military forces and
supplies, and prepare for armed insurrection – calling them for some
reason “the Directory.” “We must say, however,” writes one of the
members of this directory, “that little appears to have been done by the
elected trio. Events took a somewhat different course ... The regional
strike wholly took possession of us, and when the decisive events came,
the organisational centre was transferred to the strike committee and
the soviet.” On the modest provincial scale the same thing was repeated
here which occurred in Petrograd.

The party set the soviets in motion, the soviets set in motion the
workers, soldiers, and to some extent the peasantry. What was gained in
mass was lost in speed. If you represent this conducting apparatus as a
system of cog-wheels – a comparison to which Lenin had recourse at
another period on another theme – you may say that the impatient attempt
to connect the party wheel directly with the gigantic wheel of the
masses – omitting the medium-sized wheel of the soviets – would have
given rise to the danger of breaking the teeth of the party wheel, and
nevertheless not setting sufficiently large masses in motion.

The opposite danger was, however, no less real – the danger of letting
slip a favourable situation as a result of inner frictions in the soviet
system. Speaking theoretically, the most favourable opportunity for an
insurrection reduces itself to such and such a point in time. There can
be no thought of practically lighting upon this ideal point. The
insurrection may develop with success on the rising curve approaching
this ideal culmination – but also on the descending curve, before the
correlation of forces has yet radically changed. Instead of a “moment”
we have then a section of time measured in weeks, and sometimes months.
The Bolsheviks could have seized the power in Petrograd at the beginning
of July. But if they had done so they could not have held it. Beginning
with the middle of September they could hope not only to seize the power
but also to keep hold of it. If the Bolsheviks had delayed the
insurrection beyond the end of October they would probably – although
far from surely – have still been able for a certain time to make up for
the omission. We may assume conditionally that for a period of three or
four months – September to December approximately – the political
premises for a revolution were at hand. The thing had ripened but not
yet fallen apart. Within these bounds, which are easier to establish
after the fact than in the course of action, the party had a certain
freedom of choice which gave rise to inevitable and sometimes sharp
disagreements of a practical character.

Lenin proposed to raise the insurrection in the days of the Democratic
Conference. At the end of September he considered any delay not only
dangerous but fatal. “Waiting for the Congress of Soviets,” he wrote at
the beginning of October, “is a childish toying with formalities – a
shameful toying with formalities, betrayal of the revolution.” It is not
likely, however, that anybody among the Bolshevik leaders was guided in
this question by formal considerations. When Zinoviev, for example,
demanded a preliminary conference with the Bolshevik faction of the
Soviet Congress, he was not seeking a formal sanction, but simply
counting on the political support of the provincial delegates against
the Central Committee. But the fact is that the dependence of the party
on the Soviet – which, in its turn, was appealing to the Congress of
Soviets – introduced an element of indefiniteness into the insurrection
which greatly and quite justly alarmed Lenin.

The question when to summon the insurrection, was closely bound up with
the question who should summon it. The advantages of summoning it in the
name of the Soviet were only too clear to Lenin, but he understood
sooner than others what difficulties would arise along that road. He
could not but fear, especially from a distance, that the hindering
elements would prove still stronger in the soviet summits than in the
Central Committee, whose policy even without that he considered
irresolute. Lenin approached the question who should begin, the Soviet
or the party, as a choice between two possible alternatives, but in the
first weeks he was decidedly in favour of the independent initiative of
the party. In this there was not the shadow of a thought of contrasting
the two plans in principle. It was a question of two approaches to an
insurrection resting upon one and the same basis, in one and the same
situation, for one and the same goal. But nevertheless these were two
different approaches.

Lenin’s proposal to surround the Alexandrinka and arrest the Democratic
Conference flowed from the assumption that the insurrection would be
headed not by the soviets, but by the party appealing directly to the
factories and barracks. It could not have been otherwise. To carry such
a plan through by way of the Soviet was absolutely unthinkable. Lenin
was clearly aware that even among the heads of the party his plan would
meet resistance; he recommended in advance that they should “not strive
after numbers,” in the Bolshevik faction of the Conference. With
determination up above, the numbers would be guaranteed by the lower
ranks. Lenin’s bold plan had the indubitable advantages of swiftness and
unexpectedness, but it laid the party too bare, incurring the risk that
within certain limits it would set itself over against the masses. Even
the Petrograd Soviet, taken unawares, might at the first failure lose
its still unstable Bolshevik majority.

The resolution of October 10th proposed to the local organisations of
the party to decide all questions practically from the point of view of
an approaching insurrection. There is not a word in the resolution of
the Central Committee about the soviets as organs of the insurrection.
At the conference of the 16th, Lenin said: “Facts show that we have the
advantage over the enemy. Why cannot the Central Committee begin?” This
question on Lenin’s lips was by no means rhetorical. It meant: Why lose
time accommodating ourselves to the complicated soviet transmission if
the Central Committee can give the signal immediately. However, this
time the resolution proposed by Lenin concluded with an expression of
“confidence that the Central Committee and the Soviet will indicate in
good season the favourable moment and expedient methods of action.” The
mention of the Soviet together with the party, and the more flexible
formulation of the question of date, were the result of Lenin’s having
felt out through the party leaders the resistance of the masses.

The next day in his polemic with Zinoviev and Kamenev, Lenin summed up
as follows the debates of the day before: “All agreed that at the
summons of the soviets and for the defence of the soviets the workers
will come out as one man.” This meant: Even if not all are in agreement
with him, Lenin, that you can issue the summons in the name of the
party, all are agreed that you can do it in the name of the soviets.

“Who is to seize the power?” writes Lenin on the evening of the 24th.
“That is now of no importance. Let the Military Revolutionary Committee
take it, or ‘some other institution,’ which will declare that it will
surrender the power only to the genuine representatives of the interests
of the people.” “Some other institution” enclosed in mysterious
quotation-marks – that is a conspirative designation for the Central
Committee of the Bolsheviks. Lenin here renews his September proposal
that action be taken directly in the name of the Central Committee –
this time in case soviet legality should hinder the Military
Revolutionary Committee from placing the Congress before the
accomplished fact of an overthrow.

Although this whole struggle about dates and methods of insurrection
continued for a week, not all those who took part in it were clearly
aware of its sense and significance. “Lenin proposed the seizure of
power through the soviets whether in Leningrad or Moscow, and not behind
the back of the soviets,” wrote Stalin in 1924. “For what purposes did
Trotsky require this more than strange legend about Lenin?” And again:
“The party knows Lenin as the greatest Marxist of our times ... strange
to any tinge of Blanquism.” Whereas Trotsky “gives us not the great
Lenin, but some sort of a dwarf Blanquist ...” Not only a Blanquist but
a dwarf! In reality the question in whose name to raise an insurrection,
and in the hands of what institution to seize the power, is not in the
least pre-determined by any doctrine. When the general conditions for a
revolution are at hand, insurrection becomes a practical problem of art,
a problem which can be solved by various methods. This part of the
disagreements in the Central Committee was analogous to the quarrel of
the officers of a general staff educated in the same military doctrine
and appraising alike the strategic situation, but proposing different
ways of solving their most immediate – extraordinarily important, to be
sure, but nevertheless particular – problem. To mix in here the question
of Marxism and Blanquism is only to reveal a lack of understanding of
both.

Professor Pokrovsky denies the very importance of the alternative:
Soviet or party. Soldiers are no formalists, he laughs: they did not
need a Congress of Soviets in order to overthrow Kerensky. With all its
wit such a formulation leaves unexplained the problem: Why create
soviets at all if the party is enough? “It is interesting,” continues
the professor, “that nothing at all came of this aspiration to do
everything almost legally, with soviet legality, and the power at the
last moment was taken not by the Soviet, but by an obviously ‘illegal’
organisation created _ad hoc_.” Pokrovsky here cites the fact that
Trotsky was compelled “in the name of the Military Revolutionary
Committee,” and not the Soviet, to declare the government of Kerensky
non-existent. A most unexpected conclusion! The Military Revolutionary
Committee was an elected organ of the Soviet. The leading rôle of the
Committee in the overturn did not in any sense violate that soviet
legality which the professor makes fun of but of which the masses were
extremely jealous. The Council of People’s Commissars was also created
_ad hoc_. But that did not prevent it from becoming and remaining an
organ of the soviet power, including Pokrovsky himself in its staff as
deputy People’s Commissar of Education.

The insurrection was able to remain on the ground of soviet legality,
and to a certain degree even within the limits of the tradition of the
dual power, thanks mainly to the fact that the Petrograd garrison had
almost wholly submitted to the Soviet before the revolution. In
numberless memoirs, anniversary articles and early historic essays, this
fact, confirmed by manifold documents, was taken as indubitable. “The
conflict in Petrograd developed about the question of the fate of the
garrison,” says the first book about October – a book written upon the
basis of fresh recollections by the author of the present work in the
intervals between sessions of the Brest-Litovsk conference, a book which
for several years served the party as a textbook of history. “The
fundamental question about which the whole movement in October was built
up and organised” – this is the still more definite expression of
Sadovsky, one of the direct organisers of the uprising – “was the
question of the transfer of the Petrograd garrison to the Northern
front.” Not one of the closest leaders of the insurrection then taking
part in a collective conversation with the immediate purpose of reviving
and establishing the course of events, took it into his head to object
to this statement of Sadovsky or correct it. Only after 1924 did it
suddenly become known that Trotsky had overestimated the significance of
the peasant garrison to the detriment of the Petrograd workers – a
scientific discovery which most happily supplements the accusation that
he underestimated the peasantry. Scores of young historians with
Professor Pokrovsky at their head have explained to us in recent years
the importance of the proletariat in a proletarian revolution, have
waxed indignant that we do not speak of the workers when we are talking
about the soldiers, have arraigned us for analysing the real course of
events instead of repeating copybook phrases. Pokrovsky condenses the
results of this criticism In the following conclusion: “In spite of the
fact that Trotsky very well knows that the armed insurrection was
decided upon by the party ... and it was perfectly clear that the
pretext to be found for the action was a secondary matter, nevertheless
for him the Petrograd garrison stands at the centre of the whole picture
... as though, if it hadn’t been for that, there would have been no
thought of an insurrection.” For our historian the “decision of the
party” regarding the insurrection is alone significant, and how the
insurrection took place in reality is “a secondary matter.” A pretext he
says, can always be found. Pokrovsky gives the name of pretext to the
method by which the troops were won over – to the solution, that is, of
the very problem which summarises the fate of every insurrection. The
proletarian revolution would undoubtedly have taken place even without
the conflict about the transfer of the garrison – in that the professor
is right. But that would have been a different insurrection and would
have demanded a different exposition. We have in view the events which
actually happened.

One of the organisers and afterward a historian of the Red Guard,
Malakhovsky, insists that it was the armed workers in distinction to the
semi-passive garrison which showed initiative, determination and
endurance in the insurrection. “The Red Guard detachments during the
October revolution,” he writes, “occupied the governmental institutions,
the Post Office, the telegraph, and they were in the front rank during
the battles, etc. ...” All that is indubitable. It is not difficult to
understand, however, that if the Red Guard was able to simply “occupy”
these institutions, that is only because the garrison was at one with
them; it supported or at least did not hinder them. This decided the
fate of the insurrection.

The very broaching of such a question as who was more important to the
insurrection, the soldiers or the workers, shows that we are on so
miserably low a theoretic level that there is hardly room for argument.
The October revolution was a struggle of the proletariat against the
bourgeoisie for power, but the outcome of the struggle was decided in
the last analysis by the muzhik. That general schema, which prevailed
throughout the country, found its most perfect expression in Petrograd.
What here gave the revolution the character of a brief blow with a
minimum number of victims, was the combination of a revolutionary
conspiracy, a proletarian insurrection, and the struggle of a peasant
garrison for self-preservation. The party led the uprising; the
principal motive force was the proletariat; the armed detachments of
workers were the first of the insurrection; but the heavy-weight peasant
garrison decided the outcome of the struggle.

It is upon just this question that a contrasting of the February with
the October revolution is most indispensable. On the eve of the
overthrow of the monarchy the garrison represented for both sides a
great unknown; the soldiers themselves did not yet know how they would
react to an insurrection of the workers. Only a general strike could
create the necessary arena for mass encounters of the workers with the
soldiers, for the trying-out of the soldiers in action, for the coming
over of the soldiers to the side of the workers. In this consisted the
dramatic content of the five February days.

On the eve of the overthrow of the Provisional Government the
overwhelming majority of the garrison were standing openly on the side
of the workers. Nowhere in the whole country was the government so
isolated as in its own residence. No wonder it struggled to get away.
But in vain: the hostile capital would not let go. With its unsuccessful
attempt to push out the revolutionary regiments the government
conclusively destroyed itself.

To explain the passive policy of Kerensky before the uprising solely by
his personal qualities, is merely to slide over the surface of things.
Kerensky was not alone. There were people in the government like
Palchinsky not lacking in energy. The leaders of the Executive Committee
well knew that the victory of the Bolsheviks meant political death for
them. All of them, however, jointly and singly, turned out to be
paralysed, fell like Kerensky into a kind of heavy half-sleep – that
sleep in which, in spite of the danger hanging over him, a man is
powerless to lift a hand to save himself.

The fraternisation of the workers and soldiers in October did not grow
out of open street encounters as in February, but preceded the
insurrection. If the Bolsheviks did not now call a general strike, it
was not because they were unable, but because they did not feel the
need. The Military Revolutionary Committee before the uprising already
felt itself master of the situation; it knew every part of the garrison,
its mood, its inner groupings; it was receiving reports every day – not
for show, but expressing the actual facts; it could at any time send a
plenipotentiary commissar, a bicycle man with an order, to any regiment;
it could summon to its office by telephone the committee of the unit, or
give orders to the company on duty. The Military Revolutionary Committee
occupied in relation to the troops the position of a governmental
headquarters, not the headquarters of conspirators.

To be sure, the commanding summits of the state remained in the hands of
the government. But the material foundation was removed from under them.
The ministries and the headquarters were hanging over an empty space.
The telephones and telegraph continued to serve the government – so did
the State Bank. But the government no longer had the military forces to
retain possession of these institutions. It was as though the Winter
Palace and Smolny had changed places. The Military Revolutionary
Committee had placed the phantom government in such a position that it
could do nothing at all without breaking up the garrison. But every
attempt of Kerensky to strike at the troops only hastened his end.

However, the task of the revolution still remained unachieved. The
spring and the whole mechanism of the watch were in the hands of the
Military Revolutionary Committee, but it lacked the hands and face. And
without these details a clock cannot fulfil its function. Without the
telegraph and telephone, without the bank and headquarters, the Military
Revolutionary Committee could not govern. It had almost all the real
premises and elements of power, but not the power itself.

In February the workers had thought, not of seizing the banks and the
Winter Palace, but of breaking the resistance of the army. They were
fighting not for individual commanding summits, but for the soul of the
soldier. Once the victory was won in this field, all remaining problems
solved themselves. Having surrendered its guard battalions, the monarchy
no longer made an attempt to defend either its court or its
headquarters.

In October the government of Kerensky, having irrevocably lost the soul
of the soldier, still clung to the commanding summits. In its hands the
headquarters, the banks, the telephone, were only the façade of power.
When they should come into the hands of the soviets, they would
guarantee the conquest of complete power. Such was the situation on the
eve of the insurrection, and it decided the forms of activity during the
last twenty-four hours.

Demonstrations, street fights, barricades – everything comprised in the
usual idea of insurrection – were almost entirely absent. The revolution
had no need of solving a problem already solved. The seizure of the
governmental machine could be carried through according to plan with the
help of comparatively small armed detachments guided from a single
centre. The barracks, the fortress, the storehouses, all those
enterprises in which workers and soldiers functioned, could be taken
possession of by their own internal forces. But the Winter Palace, the
Pre-Parliament, the district headquarters, the ministries, the military
schools, could not be captured from within. This was true also of the
telephone, the telegraph, the Post Office and the State Bank. The
workers in these institutions, although of little weight in the general
combination of forces, nevertheless ruled within their four walls, and
these were, moreover, strongly guarded with sentries. It was necessary
to penetrate these bureaucratic high points from without. Political
conquest was here replaced by forcible seizure. But since the preceding
crowding-out of the government from its military bases had made
resistance almost impossible, this military seizure of the final
commanding heights passed off as a general rule without conflicts.

To be sure, the thing was not after all settled without fighting. The
Winter Palace had to be taken by storm. But the very fact that the
resistance of the government came down to a defence of the Winter
Palace, clearly defines the place occupied by October 25th in the whole
course of the struggle. The Winter Palace was the last redoubt of a
régime politically shattered during its eight months’ existence, and
conclusively disarmed during the preceding two weeks.

Conspiratorial elements – understanding by this term, plan and
centralised leadership – occupied an insignificant place in the February
revolution. This resulted from the mere weakness and scatteredness of
the revolutionary groups under the press of czarism and the war. So much
the greater was the task laid upon the masses. The insurrectionaries
were not human locusts. They had their political experience, their
traditions, their slogans, their nameless leaders. But while the
scattered elements of leadership in the insurrection proved adequate to
overthrow the monarchy, they were far from adequate to give the victors
the fruits of their victory.

The tranquillity of the October streets, the absence of crowds and
battles, gave the enemy a pretext to talk of the conspiracy of an
insignificant minority, of the adventure of a handful of Bolsheviks.
This formula was repeated unnumbered times in the days, months, and even
years, following the insurrection. It is obviously with a view to
mending the reputation of the proletarian revolution that Yaroslavsky
writes of the 25th of October: “Thick masses of the Petrograd
proletariat summoned by the Military Revolutionary Committee stood under
its banners and overflowed the streets of Petrograd.” This official
historian only forgets to explain for what purpose the Military
Revolutionary Committee had summoned these masses to the streets, and
just what they did when they got there.

From the combination of its strong and weak points has grown up an
official idealisation of the February revolution as an all-national
revolution, in contrast to the October one which is held to be a
conspiracy. But in reality the Bolsheviks could reduce the struggle for
power at the last moment to a “conspiracy,” not because they were a
small minority, but for the opposite reason – because they had behind
them in the workers’ districts and the barracks an overwhelming
majority, consolidated, organised, disciplined.

The October revolution can be correctly understood only if you do not
limit your field of vision to its final link. During the last days of
February the chess game of insurrection was played out from the first
move to the last – that is to the surrender of the enemy. At the end of
October the main part of the game was already in the past. And on the
day of insurrection it remained to solve only a rather narrow problem:
mate in two moves. The period of revolution, therefore, must be
considered to extend from the 9th of October, when the conflict about
the garrison began, or from the 12th, when the resolution was passed to
create a Military Revolutionary Committee. The enveloping manoeuvre
extended over more than two weeks. The more decisive part of it lasted
five to six days – from the birth of the Military Revolutionary
Committee to the capture of the Winter Palace. During this whole period
hundreds of thousands of workers and soldiers took direct action,
defensive in form, but aggressive in essence. The final stage, when the
insurrectionaries at last threw off the qualifications of the dual power
with its dubious legality and defensive phraseology, occupied exactly
twenty-four hours: from 2 o’clock in the early hours of the 25th to 2
o’clock in the early hours of the 26th. During this period the Military
Revolutionary Committee openly employed arms for the conquest of the
city and the capture of the government. In these operations, generally
speaking, as many forces took part as were needed to solve the limited
problem – hardly more than 25 or 30 thousand at the most.

An Italian author who writes books not only about _The Eunuchs’ Nights_,
but also about the highest problems of state, visited soviet Moscow in
1929, misunderstood what little he learned at second or tenth hand, and
upon this basis has created a book: _Coup d’état: The Technique of
Revolution_. The name of this writer, Malaparte, makes it easy to
distinguish him from a certain other specialist in state insurrections
called Bonaparte.

In contrast to “the strategy of Lenin” which was bound up with the
social and political conditions of Russia in 1917, “Trotsky’s tactics,”
according to Malaparte, “were not bound up with the general conditions
of the country.” To Lenin’s opinions about the political premises of a
revolution the author makes Trotsky reply: “Your strategy demands too
many favourable circumstances: an insurrection needs nothing, it is
self-sufficient.” It would be hard to imagine a more self-sufficient
absurdity. Malaparte many times repeats that it was not the strategy of
Lenin that won in October, but the tactics of Trotsky. And these tactics
still threaten the tranquillity of the European states. “The strategy of
Lenin does not constitute an immediate danger to the governments of
Europe. The real and, moreover, permanent danger to them is the tactics
of Trotsky.” And still more concretely: “Put Poincaré in Kerensky’s
place, and the Bolsheviks’ state revolution of October 1917 would
succeed just as well.” It would be futile to try to find out what is the
use of Lenin’s strategy, which depends upon historic conditions, if
Trotsky’s tactics will solve the same problem in any circumstances. It
remains to add that this remarkable book has already appeared in several
languages. The statesmen are evidently learning from it how to repulse a
state revolution. We wish them all success.

A criticism of the purely military operations of October 25th has not
yet been made. What exists in soviet literature upon this theme is not
critical, but purely apologetic in character. Compared with the writings
of the Epigones, even Sukhanov’s criticism, in spite of all its
contradictions is favourably distinguished by an attentive attitude to
facts.

In judging the organisation of the October uprising, Sukhanov has
presented in the course of two years two views diametrically opposed to
each other. In his work on the February revolution he says: “I will
write some day, from personal reminiscences, a description of the
October revolution, which was carried through like a piece of music
played from notes.” Yaroslavsky repeats this comment of Sukhanov word
for word. “The insurrection in Petrograd,” he says, “was well prepared
and played through by the party as though from notes.” Claude Anet, a
hostile and not profound, but nevertheless attentive, observer, speaks
even more emphatically: “The state revolution of November 7 permits only
ecstatic praise. Not one mis-step, not one rift; the government was
overthrown before it could say ‘ouch!’” On the other hand, in his volume
devoted to the October revolution Sukhanov tells how Smolny “stealthily
feeling its way, cautiously, and without system” undertook the
liquidation of the Provisional Government.

There is exaggeration in both these comments. But from a broader point
of view it may be conceded that both appraisals, however they contradict
each other, find some support in the facts. The planned character of the
October revolution grew chiefly out of objective relations, out of the
maturity of the revolution as a whole, the place occupied by Petrograd
in the country, the place occupied by the government in Petrograd, out
of the whole preceding work of the party, and finally out of the correct
political leadership of the revolution. But there remained the problems
of military technique. Here there were no few particular failings, and
if you join them all together it is possible to create the impression of
a job done blindly.

Sukhanov has several times called attention to the military
defencelessness of Smolny itself during the last days before the
insurrection. It is true that as late as the 23rd the headquarters of
the revolution was little better defended than the Winter Palace. The
Military Revolutionary Committee assured its inviolability primarily by
strengthening its bonds with the garrison, and by thus being able to
follow all the military movements of the enemy. More serious measures of
a technical military character were undertaken by the Committee
approximately twenty-four hours before the government undertook them.
Sukhanov feels sure that during the 23rd and the night of the 24th the
government, had it shown some initiative, could have captured the
Committee. “A good detachment of 500 men,” he says, “would have been
enough to liquidate Smolny and everybody in it.” Possibly. But in the
first place, for this the government would have required determination
and daring, qualities inconsistent with its nature. In the second place,
it would have had to have that “good detachment of 500 men.” Where were
they to get it? Make it up out of officers? We have observed them
towards the end of August in the character of conspirators: they had to
be hunted up in the night clubs. The fighting companies of the
Compromisers had disintegrated. In the military schools every acute
question produced conflicting groups. Things were still worse with the
Cossacks. To create a detachment by the method of individual selection
from various units would have involved giving oneself away ten times
before the thing could be finished.

However, even the existence of such a detachment would still not have
settled things. The first shot in the region of Smolny would have
resounded in the workers’ districts and barracks with a shocking
reverberation. Tens of thousands of armed and half-armed men would have
run to the help of the threatened centre of the revolution at any hour
of the day or night. And finally, even the capture of the Military
Revolutionary Committee would not have saved the government. Beyond the
walls of Smolny there remained Lenin, and in communication with him the
Central Committee and the Petrograd committee. There was a second
headquarters in the Peter and Paul fortress, a third on the _Aurora_,
and each district had its headquarters. The masses would not have been
without leadership. And the workers and soldiers in spite of their
slowness to move were determined to conquer at any cost.

It is indubitable, however, that supplementary measures of military
precaution might and should have been taken some few days earlier. In
this respect Sukhanov’s criticism is just. The military apparatus of a
revolution functions clumsily, with delays and omissions, and the
general leadership too much inclined to put politics in the place of
technique. Lenin’s eyes were much lacking in Smolny. Others had not yet
learned.

Sukhanov is also right in asserting that it would have been infinitely
easier to capture the Winter Palace in the early hours of the 25th, or
the morning of that day, than during the second half of it. The palace,
and also the neighbouring headquarters building, were defended by the
usual detachment of junkers: a sudden attack would almost certainly have
been successful. Kerensky had got away unhindered that morning in an
automobile. This alone proved that there was no serious reconnoitring in
progress in regard to the Winter Palace. Here obviously was a bad slip.

The task of keeping watch over the Provisional Government had been laid
upon Sverdlov – too late to be sure, on the 24th! – with Lashevich and
Blagonravov as assistants. It is doubtful if Sverdlov, exploding in
pieces even without that, ever occupied himself with this additional
business at all. It is even possible that the very decision, although
inscribed in the minutes, was forgotten in the heat of those hours.

In the Military Revolutionary Committee, in spite of everything, the
military resources of the government, and particularly the defences of
the Winter Palace, were overestimated. And even had the direct leaders
of the siege known the inner forces of the palace, they might still have
feared the arrival of reinforcements at the first alarm: junkers,
Cossacks, shock-battalions. The plan for capturing the palace was worked
out in the style of a large operation. When civil and semi-civil people
undertake the solution of a purely military problem, they are always
inclined to excessive strategic ingenuities. And along with their
superfluous pedantry, they cannot but prove extraordinarily helpless in
carrying them out.

The mis-steps in the capture of the Palace are explained to a certain
degree by the personal qualities of the principal leaders. Podvoisky,
Antonov-Ovseenko and Chudnovsky, are men of heroic mould. But after all
they are far from being men of system and disciplined thought.
Podvoisky, having been too impetuous in the July Days, had become far
more cautious and even sceptical about immediate prospects. But in
fundamentals he remained true to himself. Confronted with any practical
task whatever, he inclined organically to break over its bounds, to
broaden out the plan, drag in everybody and everything, give a maximum
where a minimum was enough. In the element of hyperbole contained in the
plan it is easy to see the impress of his spirit. Antonov-Ovseenko was
naturally an impulsive optimist, far more apt at improvisation than
calculation. As a former petty officer he possessed a certain amount of
military information. An émigré during the Great War, he had conducted
in the Paris paper _Nashe Slovo_ a review of the military situation, and
frequently revealed a gift for guessing out strategy. His impressionable
amateurism in this field could not, however, counterbalance the
excessive flights of Podvoisky. The third of these military chiefs,
Chudnovsky, had spent some months as an agitator on an inactive front –
that was the whole of his military training. Although gravitating toward
the right wing, Chudnovsky was the first to get into the fight and
always sought the place where it was hottest. Personal daring and
political audacity are not always, as is well known, in perfect
equilibrium. Some days after the revolution Chudnovsky was wounded near
Petrograd in a skirmish with Kerensky’s Cossacks, and some months later
he was killed in the Ukraine. It is clear that the talkative and
impulsive Chudnovsky could not make up for what was lacking in the other
two leaders. No one of them had an eye to detail, if only for the reason
that no one of them had ever learned the secrets of the trade. Feeling
their own weakness in matters of reconnoitring, communications,
manoeuvring, these Red martials felt obliged to roll up against the
Winter Palace such a superiority of forces as removed the very
possibility of practical leadership. An incongruous grandeur of plan is
almost equivalent to no plan at all. What has been said does not in the
least mean, however, that it would have been possible to find in the
staff of the Military Revolutionary Committee, or around it, any more
able military leaders. It would certainly have been impossible to find
more devoted and selfless ones.

The struggle for the Winter Palace began with the enveloping of the
whole district on a wide circle. Owing to the inexperience of the
commanders, the interruption of communications, the unskilfulness of the
Red Guard detachments, and the listlessness of the regular units, this
complicated operation developed at an extraordinarily slow pace. During
those same hours when the detachments were gradually filling up their
circle and accumulating reserves behind them, companies of junkers, the
Cossack squadrons, the Knights of St. George, and the Women’s Battalion
made their way into the palace. A resisting fist was being formed
simultaneously with the attacking ring. You may say that the very
problem arose from the too roundabout way in which it was being solved.
A bold attack by night and a daring approach by day would hardly have
cost more victims than this prolonged operation. The moral effect of the
Aurora’s artillery might at any rate have been tried out twelve or even
twenty-four hours sooner than it was. The cruiser stood ready in the
Neva, and the sailors were not complaining of any lack of gun-oil. But
the leaders of the operation were hoping that the problem could be
solved without a battle, were sending parliamentaries, presenting
ultimatums and then not living up to their dates. It did not occur to
them to examine the artillery in the Peter and Paul fortress in good
season for the simple reason that they were counting on getting along
without it.

The unpreparedness of the military leadership was still more clearly
revealed in Moscow, where the correlation of forces had been considered
so favourable that Lenin even insistently advised beginning there: “The
victory is sure and there is nobody to fight.” In reality it was in
Moscow that the insurrection took the form of extended battles lasting
with intervals for eight days. “In this hot work,” writes Muralov, one
of the chief leaders of the Moscow Insurrection, “we were not always and
in everything firm and determined. Having an overwhelming numerical
advantage, ten to one, we dragged the fight out for a whole week ...
owing to a lack of ability to direct fighting masses, to the
undiscipline of the latter, and to a complete ignorance of the tactics
of the street fight both on the part of the commanders and on the part
of the soldiers.” Muralov has a habit of naming things with their real
names: no wonder he is now in Siberian exile. But in the present
instance in refusing to load off the responsibility upon others, Muralov
lays upon the military command a lion’s share of the blame which belongs
to the political leadership – very shaky in Moscow and receptive to the
influence of the compromisist circles. We must not lose sight, either,
of the fact that the workers of old Moscow, textile and leather workers,
were extremely far behind the Petrograd proletariat. In February no
insurrection in Moscow had been necessary: the overthrow of the monarchy
had rested entirely with Petrograd. In July again Moscow had remained
peaceful. This found its expression in October: the workers and soldiers
lacked fighting experience.

The technique of insurrection carries through what politics has not
accomplished. The gigantic growth of Bolshevism had undoubtedly weakened
the attention paid to the military side of things. The passionate
reproaches of Lenin were well founded enough. The military leadership
proved incomparably weaker than the political. Could it indeed have been
otherwise? For a number of months still, the new revolutionary
government will show extreme awkwardness in all those cases where it is
necessary to resort to arms.

Even so, the military authorities of the governmental camp in Petrograd
gave a very flattering judgement of the military leadership of the
revolution. “The insurrectionaries are preserving order and discipline,”
stated the War Ministry over the direct wire to headquarters immediately
after the fall of the Winter Palace. “There have been no cases at all of
destruction or pogroms. On the contrary, patrols of insurrectionists
have detained strolling soldiers ... The plan of the insurrection was
undoubtedly worked out in advance and carried through inflexibly and
harmoniously.” Not altogether “from the notes” as Sukhanov and
Yaroslavsky have written, nor yet altogether “without system,” as the
former has subsequently affirmed. Moreover, even in the court of the
most austere critic success is the best praise.



CHAPTER 47 THE CONGRESS OF THE SOVIET DICTATORSHIP


 

In Smolny on the 25th of October the most democratic of all parliaments
in the world’s history was to meet. Who knows – perhaps also the most
important.

Having got free of the influence of compromisist intellectuals, the
local soviets had sent up for the most part workers and soldiers. The
majority of them were people without big names, but who had proved
themselves in action and won lasting confidence in their own localities.
From the active army it was almost exclusively rank-and-file soldiers
who had run the blockade of army committees and headquarters and come
here as delegates. A majority of them had begun to live a political life
with the revolution. They had been formed by an experience of eight
months. They knew little, but knew it well. The outward appearance of
the Congress proclaimed its make-up. The officers’ chevrons, the
eye-glasses and neckties of intellectuals to be seen at the first
Congress had almost completely disappeared. A grey colour prevailed
uninterruptedly, in costumes and in faces. All had worn out their
clothes during the war. Many of the city workers had provided themselves
with soldiers’ coats. The trench delegates were by no means a pretty
picture: long unshaven, in old torn trench-coats, with heavy
_papakhi_[1] on their dishevelled hair, often with cotton sticking out
through a hole, with coarse weather-beaten faces, heavy cracked hands,
fingers yellowed with tobacco, buttons torn off, belts hanging loose,
and long unoiled boots wrinkled and rusty. The plebeian nation had for
the first time sent up an honest representation made in its own image
and not retouched.

The statistics of this Congress which assembled during the hours of
insurrection are very, incomplete. At the moment of opening there were
650 delegates with votes: 390 fell to the lot of the Bolsheviks – by no
means all members of the party, but they were of the flesh and blood of
the masses, and the masses had no roads left but the Bolshevik road.
Many of the delegates who had brought doubts with them were maturing
fast in the red-hot atmosphere of Petrograd.

How completely had the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries squandered
the political capital of the February revolution. At the June Congress
of Soviets the Compromisers had a majority of 600 votes out of the whole
number of 832 delegates. Now the compromisist opposition of all shades
made up less than a quarter of the Congress. The Mensheviks, with the
national group adhering to them, amounted to only 80 members – about
half of them “Lefts.” Out of 159 Social Revolutionaries – according to
other reports 190 – about three-fifths were Lefts, and moreover the
Right continued to melt fast during the very sitting of the Congress.
Toward the end the total number of delegates, according to several
lists, reached 900. But this figure, while including a number of
advisory members, does not on the other hand include all those with
votes. The registration was carried on intermittently; documents have
been lost; the information about party affiliations was incomplete. In
any case the dominant position of the Bolsheviks in the Congress remains
indubitable.

A straw-vote taken among the delegates revealed that 505 soviets stood
for the transfer of all power to the soviets; 86 for a government of the
“democracy”; 55 for a coalition; 21 for a coalition, but without the
Kadets. Although eloquent even in this form, these figures give an
exaggerated idea of the remains of the Compromisers’ influence. Those
for democracy and coalition were soviets from the more backward
districts and least important points.

From early in the morning of the 25th caucuses of the factions were held
in Smolny. Only those attended the Bolshevik caucus who were free from
fighting duties. The opening of the Congress was delayed: the Bolshevik
leaders wanted to finish with the Winter Palace first. But the opposing
factions, too, were in no hurry. They themselves had to decide what to
do, and that was not easy. Hours passed. Sub-factions were disputing
within the factions. The split among the Social Revolutionaries took
place after a resolution to withdraw from the Congress had been rejected
by 92 votes against 60. It was only late in the evening that the Right
and Left Social Revolutionaries began to sit in different rooms. At 8
o’clock the Mensheviks demanded a new delay: they had too many opinions.
Night came on. The operations at the Winter Palace were dragging out.
But it became impossible to wait longer. It was necessary to say some
clear word to the aroused and watchful nation.

The revolution had taught the art of filling space. Delegates, guests,
guards, jammed into the commencement hall of the noble maidens, making
room for more and more. Warnings of the danger of the floor’s collapsing
had no effect, nor did appeals to smoke a little less. All crowded
closer and smoked twice as much. John Reed with difficulty fought his
way through the noisy crowd around the doors. The hall was not heated,
but the air was heavy and hot.

Jamming the entries and the side exits, sitting on all the window sills,
the delegates now patiently await the president’s gong. Tseretelli,
Cheidze, Chernov – none of them is on the platform. Only leaders of the
second rank have come to their funeral. A short man in the uniform of a
military doctor opens the session at 10.40 in the evening in the name of
the Executive Committee. The Congress, he says, assembles in such
“exceptional circumstances” that he, Dan, obeying the directions of the
Central Executive Committee, will refrain from making a political
speech. His party friends are now indeed under fire in the Winter Palace
“while loyally fulfilling their duty as ministers.” The last thing these
delegates are expecting is a blessing from the Central Executive
Committee. They look up at the platform with hostility. If those people
still exist politically, what have they got to do with us and our
business?

In the name of the Bolsheviks a Moscow delegate, Avanessov, moves that
the præsidium be elected upon a proportional basis: 14 Bolsheviks, 7
Social Revolutionaries, 3 Mensheviks and 1 Internationalist. The Right
immediately declines to enter the præsidium. Martov’s group sits tight
for the time being; it has not decided. Seven votes go over to the Left
Social Revolutionaries. The Congress watches these introductory
conflicts with a scowl.

Avanessov announces the Bolshevik candidates for the præsidium: Lenin,
Trotsky, Zinoviev, Kamenev, Rykov, Nogin, Skliansky, Krylenko,
Antonov-Ovseenko, Riazanov, Muranov, Lunacharsky, Kollontai, Stuchka.
“The præsidium,” writes Sukhanov, “consisted of the principal Bolshevik
leaders and six (in reality seven) Left Social Revolutionaries.”
Zinoviev and Kamenev were included in the præsidium as authoritative
party names in spite of their active opposition to the insurrection;
Rykov and Nogin as representatives of the Moscow Soviet; Lunacharsky and
Kollontai as popular agitators of that period; Riazanov as a
representative of the trade unions; Muranov as an old worker-Bolshevik
who had carried himself courageously during the trial of the deputies of
the State Duma; Stuchka as head of the Lettish organisation; Krylenko
and Skliansky as representatives of the army; Antonov-Ovseenko as a
leader of the Petrograd battles. The absence of Sverdlov’s name is
obviously explained by the fact that he himself drew up the list, and in
the confusion nobody corrected it. It is characteristic of the party
morals of the time that the whole headquarters of the opponents of the
insurrection turned up in the præsidium: Zinoviev, Kamenev, Nogin,
Rykov, Lunacharsky, Riazanov. Of the Left Social Revolutionaries only
the little fragile and courageous Spiridonova, who had served long years
at hard labour for assassinating the subduer of the Tambovsk peasants,
enjoyed an all-Russian renown. The Left Social Revolutionaries had no
other “name.” The Rights, on the other hand, had now little or nothing
but names left.

The Congress greeted its præsidium with enthusiasm. While the factions
had been assembling and conferring, Lenin with his make-up still on, in
wig and big spectacles, was sitting in the passage-way in the company of
two or three Bolsheviks. On the way to a meeting of their faction Dan
and Skobelev stopped still opposite the table where the conspirators
were sitting, stared at Lenin, and obviously recognised him. Time, then,
to take the make-up off. But Lenin was in no hurry to appear publicly.
He preferred to look round a little and gather the threads into his
hands while remaining behind the scenes. In his recollections of Lenin
published in 1924, Trotsky writes: “The first session of the Second
Congress of Soviets was sitting in Smolny. Lenin did not appear here. He
remained in one of the rooms of Smolny in which, as I remember, there
was for some reason no furniture, or almost none. Later somebody spread
blankets on the floor and put two cushions on them, Vladimir Ilych and I
took a rest there lying side-by-side. But in just a few minutes I was
called: ‘Dan is talking and you must answer him.’ Returned after my
reply, I again lay down beside Vladimir Ilych, who of course had no
thought of going to sleep. Was that indeed possible? Every five or ten
minutes somebody would run in from the assembly hall to tell us what was
going on.”

The president’s chair is occupied by Kamenev, one of those phlegmatic
types designed by nature herself for the office of chairman. There are
three questions, he announces, on the order of the day: organisation of
a government; war and peace; convocation of the Constituent Assembly. An
unusual, dull, alarming rumble breaks into the noise of the meeting from
outside. This is Peter and Paul fortress ratifying the order of the day
with artillery fire. A high tension current runs through the Congress,
which now suddenly feels and realises what it really is: the convention
of a civil war.

Lozovsky, an opponent of the insurrection, demanded a report from the
Petrograd Soviet. But the Military Revolutionary Committee was a little
behind hand. Replying artillery testified that the report was not ready.
The insurrection was in full swing. The Bolshevik leaders were
continually withdrawing to the rooms of the Military Revolutionary
Committee to receive communications or give orders. Echoes of the
fighting would burst up through the assembly like tongues of flame. When
votes were taken hands would be raised among bristling bayonets. A
blue-grey acrid tobacco smoke hid the beautiful white columns and
chandeliers.

The verbal battles of the two camps were extraordinarily Impressive
against a background of cannon-shots. Martov demanded the floor. The
moment when the balance is still oscillating is his moment – this
inventive statesman of eternal waverings. With his hoarse tubercular
voice Martov makes instant rejoinder to the metallic voice of the guns:
“We must put a stop to military action on both sides ... The question of
power is beginning to be decided by conspiratorial methods. All the
revolutionary parties have been placed before a _fait accompli_ ... A
civil war threatens us with an explosion of counter-revolution. A
peaceful solution of the crisis can be obtained by creating a government
which will be recognised by the whole democracy.” A considerable portion
of the Congress applauds. Sukhanov remarks ironically: “Evidently many
and many a Bolshevik, not having absorbed the spirit of the teachings of
Lenin and Trotsky, would have been glad to take that course.” The Left
Social Revolutionaries and a group of United Internationalists support
the proposal of peace negotiations. The Right Wing, and perhaps also the
close associates of Martov, are confident that the Bolsheviks will
reject this proposal. They are wrong. The Bolsheviks send Lunacharsky to
the tribune, the most peace-loving, the most velvety of their orators.
“The Bolshevik faction,” he says, “has absolutely nothing against
Martov’s proposal.” The enemy are astonished. “Lenin and Trotsky in thus
giving way a little to their own masses,” comments Sukhanov, “are at the
same time cutting the ground from under the Right Wing.” Martov’s
proposal is adopted unanimously. “If the Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries withdraw now,” runs the comment in Martov’s group, “they
will bury themselves.” It is possible to hope, therefore, that the
Congress “will take the correct road of creating a united democratic
front.” Vain hope! A revolution never moves on diagonals.

The Right Wing immediately violates the just-approved initiation of
peace negotiations. The Menshevik Kharash, a delegate from the 12th Army
with a captain’s star on his shoulders, makes a statement: “These
political hypocrites propose that we decide the question of power.
Meanwhile it is being decided behind our backs ... Those blows at the
Winter Palace are driving nails in the coffin of the party which has
undertaken such an adventure ...” The captain’s challenge is answered by
the Congress with a grumble of indignation.

Lieutenant Kuchin, who had spoken at the State Conference in Moscow in
the name of the front, tries here also to wield the authority of the
army organisations: “This Congress is untimely and even unauthorised.”
“In whose name do you speak?” shout the tattered trench-coats, their
credentials written all over them in the mud of the trenches. Kuchin
carefully enumerates eleven armies. But here this deceives nobody. At
the front as at the rear the generals of compromise are without
soldiers. The group from the front, continues the Menshevik lieutenant,
“declines to assume any responsibility for the consequences of this
adventure.” That means a complete break with the revolution. “Henceforth
the arena of struggle is transferred to the localities.” That means
fusion with the counter-revolution against the soviets. And so the
conclusion: “The front group ... withdraws from this Congress.”

One after another the representatives of the Right mount the tribune.
They have lost the parishes and churches, but they still hold the
belfries, and they hasten for the last time to pound the cracking bells.
These socialists and democrats, having made a compromise by hook and
crook with the imperialist bourgeoisie, today flatly refuse to
compromise with the people in revolt. Their political calculations are
laid bare. The Bolsheviks will collapse in a few days, they are
thinking: We must separate ourselves from them as quickly as possible,
even help to overthrow them, and thus to the best of our ability insure
ourselves and our future.

In the name of the Right Menshevik faction, Khinchuk, a former president
of the Moscow Soviet and a future Soviet ambassador in Berlin, reads a
declaration: “The military conspiracy of the Bolsheviks ... will plunge
the country into civil dissension, demolish the Constituent Assembly,
threaten us with a military catastrophe, and lead to the triumph of the
counter-revolution.” The sole way out: “Open negotiations with the
Provisional Government for the formation of a power resting on all
layers of the democracy.” Having learned nothing, these people propose
to the Congress to cross off the insurrection and return to Kerensky.
Through the uproar, bellowing, and even hissing, the words of the
representative of the Right Social Revolutionaries are hardly
distinguishable. The declaration of his party announces “the
impossibility of work in collaboration” with the Bolsheviks, and
declares the very Congress of Soviets, although convoked and opened by
the compromisist Central Executive Committee, to be without authority.

This demonstration of the Right Wing does not cow anybody, but causes
alarm and irritation. The majority of the delegates are too sick and
tired of these bragging and narrow-minded leaders who fed them first
with phrases and then with measures of repression. Can it be that the
Dans, Khinchuks and Kuchins still expect to instruct and command us? A
Lettish soldier, Peterson, with a tubercular flush on his cheeks and
burning hatred in his eyes, denounces Kharash and Kuchin as impostors.
“The revolution has had enough gab! We want action! The power should be
in our hands. Let the impostors leave the congress – the army is through
with them!” This voice tense with passion relieves the mind of the
Congress, which has received nothing so far but insults. Other frontline
soldiers rush to the support of Peterson. “These Kuchins represent the
opinions of little gangs who have been sitting in the army committees
since April. The army long ago demanded new elections.” “Those who live
in the trenches are impatiently awaiting the transfer of power to the
soviets.”

But the Rights still hold the belfries. A representative of the Bund
declares that “all that has happened in Petrograd is a misfortune.” and
invites the delegates to join the members of the duma who have decided
to march unarmed to the Winter Palace in order to die with the
government. “Gibes were to be heard in the general uproar,” writes
Sukhanov. “some coarse and some poisonous.” The unctuous orator has
obviously mistaken his audience. “Enough from you!” “Deserters!” shout
the delegates, guests, Red Guards and sentries at the door to the
withdrawing delegates. “Join Kornilov!” “Enemies of the people!”

The withdrawal of the Rights did not leave any vacant space. Evidently
the rank-and-file delegates had refused to join the officers and junkers
for a struggle against the workers and soldiers. Only about 70 delegates
– that is, a little more than half of the Right Wing faction – went out.
The waverers took their place with the intermediate groups who had
decided not to leave the Congress. Whereas before the opening of the
Congress the Social Revolutionaries of all tendencies had numbered not
over 190 men, during the next few hours the number of Left Social
Revolutionaries alone rose to 180. They were joined by all those who had
not yet decided to join the Bolsheviks although ready to support them.

The Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries were quite ready to remain in
a Provisional Government or some sort of a Pre-Parliament under any
circumstances. Can one after all break with cultured society? But the
soviets – that is only the people. The soviets are all right while you
can use them to get a compromise with the bourgeoisie, but can one
possibly think of tolerating soviets which have suddenly imagined
themselves masters of the country? “The Bolsheviks were left alone,”
wrote the Social Revolutionary, Zenzinov, subsequently, “and from that
moment they began to rely only upon crude physical force.” Moral
principle undoubtedly slammed the door along with Dan and Gotz. Moral
principle will march in a procession of 300 men with two lanterns to the
Winter Palace, only to run into the crude physical force of the
Bolsheviks and – back down.

The motion adopted by the Congress in favour of peace negotiations was
left hanging in the air. If the Rights had admitted the possibility of
compromising with a victorious proletariat, they would have been in no
hurry to break with the Congress. Martov could not have failed to
understand this. Nevertheless he clung to the idea of a compromise – the
thing upon which his whole policy always stands or falls. “We must put a
stop to the bloodshed ...” he begins again. “Those are only rumours!”
voices call out. “It is not only rumours that we hear,” he answers. “If
you come to the windows you will hear cannon-shots.” This is undeniable.
When the Congress quiets down, shots are audible without going to the
windows.

Martov’s declaration, hostile through and through to the Bolsheviks, and
lifeless in its arguments, condemns the revolution as “accomplished by
the Bolshevik party alone by the method of a purely military plot,” and
demands that the Congress suspend its labours until an agreement has
been reached with all the socialist parties. To try to find the
resultant of a parallelogram of forces in a revolution is worse than
trying to catch your own shadow!

At that moment there appeared in the Congress the Bolshevik faction of
the city duma, those who had refused to seek a problematic death under
the walls of the Winter Palace. They were led by Joffé, subsequently the
first Soviet ambassador at Berlin. The Congress again crowded up, giving
its friends a joyful welcome.

But it was necessary to put up a resistance to Martov. This task fell to
Trotsky. “Now since the exodus of the Rights,” concedes Sukhanov, “his
position is as strong as Martov’s is weak.” The opponents stand side by
side in the tribune, hemmed in on all sides by a solid ring of excited
delegates. “What has taken place,” says Trotsky, is an insurrection, not
a conspiracy. An insurrection of the popular masses needs no
justification. We have tempered and hardened the revolutionary energy of
the Petrograd workers and soldiers. We have openly forged the will of
the masses to insurrection, and not conspiracy ... Our insurrection has
conquered, and now you propose to us: Renounce your victory: make a
compromise. With whom? I ask: With whom ought we to make a compromise?
With that pitiful handful who just went out? ... Haven’t we seen them
through and through. There is no longer anybody In Russia who is for
them. Are the millions of workers and peasants represented in this
Congress, whom they are ready now as always to turn over for a price to
the mercies of the bourgeoisie, are they to enter a compromise with
these men? No, a compromise is no good here. To those who have gone out,
and to all who made like proposals, we must say, ‘You are pitiful
isolated individuals; you are bankrupts; your rôle is played out. Go
where you belong from now on – into the rubbish-can of history!’”

“Then we will go!” cries Martov without awaiting the vote of the
Congress. “Martov in anger and affectation,” regrets Sukhanov. “began to
make his way from the tribune towards the door. And I began to gather
together my faction for a conference in the form of an emergency session
...” It was not wholly a matter of affectation. The Hamlet of democratic
socialism, Martov, would make a step forward when the revolution fell
back as in July; but now when the revolution was ready for a tiger’s
leap, Martov would fall back. The withdrawal of the Rights had deprived
him of the possibility of parliamentary manoeuvring, and that put him
instantly out of his element. He hastened to abandon the Congress and
break with the insurrection. Sukhanov replied as best he could. The
faction split in half: Martov won by 14 votes against 12.

Trotsky introduced a resolution – an act of indictment against the
Compromisers: They prepared the ruinous offensive of June 18; they
supported the government of treason to the people; they screened the
deception of the peasants on the land question; they carried out the
disarming of the workers; they were responsible for the purposeless
dragging out of the war; they permitted the bourgeoisie to deepen the
economic ruin of the country; having lost the confidence of the masses,
they resisted the calling of a soviet congress; and finally, finding
themselves in a minority, they broke with the soviets.

Here again the order of the day is suspended for a declaration. Really
the patience of the Bolshevik præsidium has no bounds. The president of
the executive committee of the peasant soviet has come to summon the
peasants to abandon this “untimely” congress, and go to the Winter
Palace “to die with those who were sent there to do our will.” This
summons to die in the ruins of the Winter Palace is getting pretty
tiresome in its monotony. A sailor just arrived from the _Aurora_,
ironically announces that there are no ruins, since they are only firing
blanks from the cruiser. “Proceed with your business in peace,” he says.
The soul of the Congress finds rest in the admirable black-bearded
sailor, incarnating the simple and imperious will of the insurrection.
Martov with his mosaic of thoughts and feelings belongs to another
world. That is why he breaks with the Congress.

Still another special declaration – this time half friendly. “The Right
Social Revolutionaries,” says Kamkov, “have gone out, but we, the Lefts,
have remained.” The Congress welcomes those who have remained. However,
even they consider it necessary to achieve a united revolutionary front,
and come out against Trotsky’s sharp resolution shutting the door
against a compromise with the moderate democracy.

Here too the Bolsheviks made a concession. Nobody ever saw them before,
it seems, in such a yielding mood. No wonder; they are the masters of
the situation and they have no need to insist upon the forms of words.
Again Lunacharsky takes the tribune. “The weight of the task which has
fallen upon us is not subject to any doubt,” he says. A union of all the
genuinely revolutionary elements of the democracy is necessary. But have
we, the Bolsheviks, taken any steps whatever to repel the other groups?
Did we not adopt Martov’s proposal unanimously? For this we have been
answered with accusations and threats. Is it not obvious that those who
have left the Congress “are ceasing even their compromisist work and
openly going over to the camp of the Kornilovists?”

The Bolsheviks did not insist upon an immediate vote on Trotsky’s
resolution. They did not want to hinder the attempts to reach an
agreement on a soviet basis. The method of teaching by object-lesson can
be successfully applied even to the accompaniment of artillery! As
before with the adoption of Martov’s proposal, so now the concession of
Kamkov only revealed the impotence of these conciliatory labour pains.
However, in distinction from the Left Mensheviks, the Left Social
Revolutionaries did not quit the Congress: they were feeling too
directly the pressure of the villages in revolt.

A mutual feeling-out has taken place. The primary positions have been
occupied. There comes a pause in the evolution of the Congress. Shall we
adopt the basic decrees and create a soviet government? It is
impossible: the old government is still sitting there in the
semi-darkness of a chamber in the Winter Palace, the only lamp on the
table carefully barricaded with newspapers. Shortly after two o’clock in
the morning the præsidium declares a half-hour recess.

The red marshals employed the short delay accorded to them with complete
success. A new wind was blowing in the atmosphere of the Congress when
its sitting was renewed. Kamenev read from the tribune a telephonogram
just received from Antonov. The Winter Palace has been captured by the
troops of the Military Revolutionary Committee; with the exception of
Kerensky the whole Provisional Government with the dictator Kishkin at
its head is under arrest. Although everybody had already learned the
news as it passed from mouth to mouth, this official communication
crashed in heavier than a cannon salute. The leap over the abyss
dividing the revolutionary class from power has been made. Driven out of
the Palace of Kshesinskaia in July, the Bolsheviks have now entered the
Winter Palace as rulers. There is no other power now in Russia but the
power of the soviets. A complex tangle of feelings breaks loose in
applause and shouting: triumph, hope, but also anxiety. Then come new
and more confident bursts of applause. The deed is done. Even the most
favourable correlation of forces contains concealed surprises, but the
victory becomes indubitable when the enemy’s staff is made prisoner.

Kamenev impressively reads the list of those arrested. The better known
names bring hostile or ironic exclamations from the Congress. Especially
bitter is the greeting of Tereshchenko who has guided the foreign
destinies of Russia. And Kerensky? Kerensky? It has become known that at
ten o’clock this morning he was orating without great success to the
garrison of Gatchina. “Where he went from there is not exactly known;
rumour says to the front.”

The fellow-travellers of the revolution feel bad. They foresee that now
the stride of the Bolsheviks will become more firm. Somebody from the
Left Social Revolutionaries objects to the arrest of the socialist
ministers. A representative of the United Internationalists offers a
warning – “lest the Minister of Agriculture Maslov, turn up in the same
cell in which he sat under the monarchy.” He is answered by Trotsky, who
was imprisoned during the ministry of Maslov in the same “Kresty” as
under Nicholas: “Political arrest is not a matter of vengeance; it is
dictated ... by considerations of expediency. The government ... should
be indicted and tried, first of all for its indubitable connection with
Kornilov ... The socialist ministers will be placed only under house
arrest.” It would have been simpler and more accurate to say that the
seizure of the old government was dictated by the demands of the still
unfinished struggle. It was a question of the political beheading of the
hostile camp, and not of punishment for past sins.

But this parliamentary query as to the arrests was immediately crowded
out by another infinitely more important episode. The 3rd Bicycle
Battalion sent by Kerensky against Petrograd had come over to the side
of the revolutionary people! This too favourable news seemed
unbelievable, but that was exactly what had happened. This selected
military unit, the first to be chosen out from the whole active army,
adhered to the insurrection before ever reaching the capital. If there
had been a shade of restraint in its joy at the arrest of the ministers,
the Congress was now seized with unalloyed and irrepressible rapture.

The Bolshevik commissar of Tsarskoe Selo together with a delegate from
the bicycle battalion ascended the tribune. They had both just arrived
to make a report to the Congress: “The garrison of Tsarkoe Selo is
defending the approaches to Petrograd.” The defensists withdrew from the
soviet. “All the work rested upon us alone.” Learning of the approach of
the bicycle men, the Soviet of Tsarskoe Selo prepared to resist, but the
alarm happily turned out to be false. “Among the bicycle men are no
enemies of the Congress of Soviets.” Another battalion will soon arrive
at Tsarskoe, and friendly greeting is already in preparation there. The
Congress drinks down this report in great gulps.

The representative of the bicycle men is greeted with a storm, a
whirlwind, a cyclone. This 3rd Battalion, he reports, was suddenly sent
from the South-western front to the North under telegraphic orders “for
the defence of Petrograd.” The bicycle men advanced “with eyes
blindfolded,” only confusedly guessing what was up. At Peredolsk they
ran into an echelon of the 5th Bicycle Battalion, also moving on the
capital. At a joint meeting held right there at the station, it became
clear that “among all the bicyclists there is not one man to be found
who would consent to take action against his brothers.” It was jointly
decided not to submit to the government.

“I tell you concretely,” says the bicycle soldier, “we will not give the
power to a government at the head of which stand the bourgeoisie and the
landlords!” That word “concretely,” introduced by the revolution into
the everyday language of the people, sounded fine at this meeting!

How many hours was it since they were threatening the Congress from that
same tribune with punishment from the front? Now the front itself had
spoken its “concrete” word. Suppose the army committees do sabotage the
Congress. Suppose the rank-and-file soldier mass only succeeds in
getting its delegates there rather as an exception. Suppose in many
regiments and divisions they have not yet learned to distinguish a
Bolshevik from a Social Revolutionary. Never mind! The voice from
Peredolsk is the authentic, unmistakable, irrefutable voice of the army.
From this verdict there is no appeal. The Bolsheviks, and they only, had
understood in time that the soldier-cook of the bicycle battalion
infinitely better represented the front than all the Kharashes and
Kuchins with their wilted credentials. A portentous change occurred here
in the mood of the delegates. “They began to feel,” writes Sukhanov,
“that things were going to go smoothly and well, that the horrors
promised on the Right would not after all be so terrible, and that the
leaders might be correct in everything else too.”

The unhappy Mensheviks selected this moment to draw attention to
themselves. They had not yet, it seems, withdrawn. They had been
considering in their faction what to do. Out of a desire to bring after
him the wavering groups, Kapelinsky, who had been appointed to inform
the congress of the decision adopted, finally spoke aloud the most
candid reason for breaking with the Bolsheviks: “Remember that the
troops are riding towards Petrograd; we are threatened with
catastrophe.” “What! Are you still here?” – the question was shouted
from all corners of the hall. “Why, you went out once!” The Mensheviks
moved in a tiny group towards the entrance, accompanied by scornful
farewells. “We went out,” grieves Sukhanov, “completely untying the
hands of the Bolsheviks, turning over to them the whole arena of the
revolution.” It would have made little difference if they had stayed. In
any case they went to the bottom. The waves of events closed ruthlessly
over their heads.

It was time for the Congress to address a manifesto to the people, but
the session continued to consist only of special declarations. Events
simply refused to fit into the order of the day. At 5:17 in the morning
Krylenko, staggering tired, made his way to the tribune with a telegram
in his hand: The 12th Army sends greetings to the Congress and informs
it of the creation of a military revolutionary committee which has
undertaken to stand guard in the Northern front. Attempts of the
government to get armed help have broken against the resistance of the
army. The commander-in-chief of the Northern front, General Cheremissov,
has submitted to the Committee. The commissar of the Provisional
Government, Voitinsky, has resigned, and awaits a substitute.
Delegations from the echelons moved against Petrograd have one after
another announced to the Military Revolutionary Committee their
solidarity ... with the Petrograd garrison. “Pandemonium,” says Reed,
“men weeping, embracing each other.”

Lunacharsky at last got a chance to read a proclamation addressed to the
workers, soldiers and peasants. But this was not merely a proclamation.
By its mere exposition of what had happened and what was proposed, this
hastily written document laid down the foundations of a new state
structure. “The authority of the compromisist Central Executive
Committee is at an end. The Provisional Government is deposed. The
Congress assumes the power ...” The Soviet Government proposes immediate
peace. It will transfer the land to the peasants, democratise the army,
establish control over production, promptly summon the Constituent
Assembly, guarantee the right of the nations of Russia to
self-determination. “The Congress resolves: That all power in the
localities goes over to the soviets.” Every phrase as it is read turns
into a salvo of applause. “Soldiers! Be on your guard! Railway workers!
Stop all echelons sent by Kerensky against Petrograd! ... The fate of
the revolution and the fate of the democratic peace is in your hands!”

Hearing the land mentioned, the peasants pricked up their ears.
According to its constitution the Congress represented only soviets of
workers and soldiers; but there were delegates present from individual
peasant soviets. They now demanded that they be mentioned in the
document. They were immediately given a right to vote. The
representative of the Petrograd peasant soviet signed the proclamation
“with both hands and both feet.” A member of Avksentiev’s Executive
Committee, Berezin, silent until now, stated that out of 68 peasant
soviets replying to a telegraphic questionnaire, one-half had expressed
themselves for a Soviet government, the other half for the transfer of
power to the Constituent Assembly. If this was the mood of the
provincial soviets, half composed of governmental functionaries, could
there be any doubt that a future peasant congress would support the
Soviet power?

While solidifying the rank-and-file delegates, the proclamation
frightened and even repelled some of the fellow-travellers by its
irrevocableness. Small factions and remnants again filed through the
tribune. For the third time a group of Mensheviks, obviously the most
leftward now, broke away from the Congress. They withdrew, it seems,
only in order to be in a position to save the Bolsheviks: “Otherwise you
will destroy yourselves and us and the revolution.” The president of the
Polish Socialist party, Lapinsky, although he remained at the Congress
in order to “defend his point of view to the end,” gave essential
adherence to the declaration of Martov: “The Bolsheviks will not be able
to wield the power which they are assuming.” The United Jewish Workers
party abstained from the vote – likewise the United Internationalists.
How much, though, did all these “united” amount to altogether? The
proclamation was adopted almost unanimously, only two dissenting, with
twelve abstaining! The delegates had hardly strength left to applaud.

The session finally came to an end at about six o’clock. A grey and cold
autumn morning was dawning over the city. The hot spots of the
camp-fires were fading out in the gradually lightening streets. The
greying faces of the soldiers and the workers with rifles were
concentrated and unusual. If there were astrologers in Petrograd, they
must have observed portentous signs in the heavens.

The capital awoke under a new power. The everyday people, the
functionaries, the intellectuals, cut off from the arena of events,
rushed for the papers early to find out to which shore the wave had
tossed during the night. But it was not easy to make out what had
happened. To be sure, the papers reported the seizure by conspirators of
the Winter Palace and the ministers, but only as a passing episode.
Kerensky has gone to headquarters; the fate of the government will be
decided by the front. Reports of the Soviet Congress reproduce only the
declarations of the Right Wing, enumerate those who withdrew, and expose
the impotence of those who remained. The political editorials, written
before the seizure of the Winter Palace, exude a cloudless optimism.

The rumours of the street do not wholly coincide with the tone of the
newspapers. Whatever you say, the ministers are after all locked up in
the fortress. Reinforcements from Kerensky are not yet in sight.
Functionaries and officers confer anxiously. Journalists and lawyers
ring each other up. Editors try to collect their thoughts. The
drawing-room oracles say: “We must surround the usurpers with a blockade
of universal contempt.” Storekeepers don’t know whether to do business
or refrain. The new authorities give orders to do business. The
restaurants open; the tramcars move; the banks languish with evil
forebodings; the seismograph of the Stock Exchange describes a
convulsive curve. Of course the Bolsheviks will not hold out long, but
they may do damage before they tumble.

The reactionary French journalist, Claude Anet, wrote on this day: “The
victors are singing a song of victory. And quite rightly too. Among all
these blabbers they alone acted ... Today they are reaping the harvest.
Bravo! Fine work.” The Mensheviks estimated the situation quite
otherwise “Twenty-four hours have passed since the ‘victory’ of the
Bolsheviks,” wrote Dan’s paper, “and the historic fates have already
begun to take their cruel revenge ... Around them is an emptiness
created by themselves ... They are isolated from all ... The entire
clerical and technical machinery refuses to serve them ... They are
sliding at the very moment of their triumph into the abyss.”

The liberal and compromisist circles, encouraged by the sabotage of the
functionaries and their own light-mindedness, believed strangely in
their own impunity. They spoke and wrote of the Bolsheviks in the
language of the July Days. “Hirelings of Wilhelm” – “the pockets of the
Red Guard full of German marks” – “German officers in command of the
insurrection.” The new government had to show these people a firm hand
before they began to believe in it. The more unbridled papers were
detained already on the night of the 26th. Some others were confiscated
on the following day. The socialist press for the time being was spared:
it was necessary to give the Left Social Revolutionaries, and also some
elements of the Bolshevik party, a chance to convince themselves of the
groundlessness of the hope for coalition with the official democracy.

The Bolsheviks developed their victory amid sabotage and chaos. A
provisional military headquarters, organised during the night, undertook
the defence of Petrograd in case of an attack from Kerensky. Military
telephone men were sent to the central exchange where a strike had
begun. It was proposed to the armies that they create their own military
revolutionary committees. Gangs of agitators and organisers, freed by
the victory, were sent to the front and to the provinces. The central
organ of the party wrote: “The Petrograd Soviet has acted; it is the
turn of the other soviets.”

News came during the day which has especially disturbed the soldiers.
Kornilov has escaped. As a matter of fact, the lofty captive, who had
been living in Bykhov, guarded by Tekintsi, loyal to him, and kept in
touch with all events by Kerensky’s headquarters, decided on the 26th
that things were taking a serious turn, and without the slightest
hindrance from anybody abandoned his pretended prison. The connections
between Kerensky and Kornilov were thus again obviously confirmed in the
eyes of the masses. The Military Revolutionary Committee summoned the
soldiers and the revolutionary officers by telegram to capture both
former commanders-in-chief and deliver them in Petrograd.

As had the Tauride Palace in February, so now Smolny became the focal
point for all functions of the capital and the state. Here all the
ruling institutions had their seat. Here orders were issued and hither
people came to get them. Hence a demand went out for weapons, and hither
came rifles and revolvers confiscated from the enemy. Arrested people
were brought in here from all ends of the city. The injured began to
flow in seeking justice. The bourgeois public and its frightened
cab-drivers made a great yoke-shaped detour to avoid the Smolny region.

The automobile is a far more genuine sign of present-day sovereignty
than the orb and sceptre. Under the régime of dual power the automobiles
had been divided between the government, the Central Executive Committee
and private owners. Now all confiscated motors were dragged into the
camp of the insurrection. The Smolny district looked like a giant
military garage. The best of automobiles smoked in those days from the
low-grade petrol. Motor-cycles chugged impatiently and threateningly in
the semi-darkness. Armoured-cars shrieked their sirens. Smolny seemed
like a factory, a railroad and power station of the revolution.

A steady flood of people poured along the sidewalks of the adjoining
streets. Bonfires were burning at the outer and inner gates. By their
wavering light armed workers and soldiers were belligerently inspecting
passes. A number of armoured-cars stood shaking with the action of their
own motors in the court. Nothing wanted to stop moving, machines or
people. At each entrance stood machine-guns abundantly supplied with
cartridge-belts. The endless, weakly lighted, gloomy corridors echoed
with the tramping of feet, with exclamations and shouts. The arriving
and departing poured up and down the broad staircase. And this solid
human lava would be cut through by impatient and imperative individuals.
Smolny workers, couriers, commissars, a mandate or an order lifted high
in their hand, a rifle on a cord slung over their shoulder, or a
portfolio under their arm.

The Military Revolutionary Committee never stopped working for an
instant. It received delegates, couriers, volunteer informers, devoted
friends, and scoundrels. It sent commissars to all corners of the town,
set innumerable seals upon orders and commands and credentials – all
this in the midst of intersecting inquiries, urgent communications, the
ringing of telephone bells and the rattle of weapons. People utterly
exhausted of their force, long without sleep or eating, unshaven, in
dirty linen, with inflamed eyes, would shout in hoarse voices,
gesticulate fantastically, and if they did not fall half dead on the
floor, it seemed only thanks to the surrounding chaos which whirled them
about and carried them away again on its unharnessed wings.

Adventurers, crooks, the worst off-scouring of the old régime, would
sniff about and try to get a pass to Smolny. Some of them succeeded.
They knew some little secret of administration: Who has the key to the
diplomatic correspondence, how to write an order on the treasury, where
to get gasoline or a typewriter, and especially where the best court
wines are kept. They did not all find their cell or bullet immediately.

Never since the creation of the world have so many orders been issued –
by word of mouth by pencil, by typewriter, by wire, one following after
the other – thousands and myriads of orders, not always issued by those
having the right, and rarely to those capable of carrying them out. But
just here lay the miracle – that in this crazy whirlpool there turned
out to be an inner meaning. People managed to understand each other. The
most important and necessary things got done. Replacing the old web of
administration, the first threads of the new were strung; The revolution
grew in strength.

During that day, the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks was at work in
Smolny. It was deciding the problem of the new government of Russia. No
minutes were kept – or they have not been preserved. Nobody was
bothering about future historians, although a lot of trouble was being
prepared for them right there. The evening session of the Congress was
to create a cabinet of ministers. M-i-n-i-s-t-e-r-s? What a sadly
compromised word! It stinks of the high bureaucratic career, the
crowning of some parliamentary ambition. It was decided to call the
government the Soviet of People’s Commissars: that at least had a
fresher sound. Since the negotiations for a coalition of the “entire
democracy” had come to nothing, the question of the party and personal
staff of the government was simplified. The Left Social Revolutionaries
minced and objected. Having just broken with the party of Kerensky, they
themselves hardly knew what they wanted to do. The Central Committee
adopted the motion of Lenin as the only thinkable one: to form a
government of Bolsheviks only.

Martov knocked at the door of this session in the capacity of
intercessor for the arrested socialist ministers. Not so long ago he had
been interceding with the socialist ministers for the imprisoned
Bolsheviks. The wheel had made quite a sizeable turn. Through one of its
members sent out to Martov for negotiations – most probably Kamenev –
the Central Committee confirmed the statement that the socialist
ministers would be transferred to house arrest. Apparently they had been
forgotten in the rush of business, or perhaps had themselves declined
privileges, adhering even in the Trubetskoy Bastion to the principle of
ministerial solidarity.

The Congress opened its session at nine o’clock in the evening. “The
picture on the whole was but little different from yesterday – fewer
weapons, less of a jam.” Sukhanov, now no longer a delegate, was able to
find himself a free seat as one of the public. This session was to
decide the questions of peace, land and government. Only three
questions: end the war, give the land to the people, establish a
socialist dictatorship. Kamenev began with a report of the work done by
the præsidium during the day: the death penalty at the front introduced
by Kerensky abolished; complete freedom of agitation restored; orders
given for the liberation of soldiers imprisoned for political
convictions, and members of land committees; all the commissars of the
Provisional Government removed from office; orders given to arrest and
deliver Kerensky and Kornilov. The Congress approved and ratified these
measures.

Again some remnants of remnants took the floor, to the impatient
disapproval of the hall. One group announced that they were withdrawing
“at the moment of the victory of the insurrection and not at the moment
of its defeat.” Others bragged of the fact that they had decided to
remain. A representative of the Donetz miners urged immediate measures
to prevent Kaledin from cutting the north off from coal. Some time must
pass, however, before the revolution learns to take measures of such
scope. Finally it becomes possible to take up the first point on the
order of the day.

Lenin, whom the Congress has not yet seen, is given the floor for a
report on peace. His appearance in the tribune evokes a tumultuous
greeting. The trench delegates gaze with all their eyes at this
mysterious being whom they had been taught to hate and whom they have
learned without seeing him to love. “Now Lenin, gripping the edges of
the reading-stand, let little winking eyes travel over the crowd as he
stood there waiting, apparently oblivious to the long-rolling ovation,
which lasted several minutes. When it finished, he said simply, ‘We
shall now proceed to construct the socialist order.’”

The minutes of the Congress are not preserved. The Parliamentary
stenographers, invited in to record the debates, had abandoned Smolny,
along with the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries. That was one of
the first episodes in the campaign of sabotage. The secretarial notes
have been lost without a trace in the abyss of events. There remain only
the hasty and tendentious newspaper reports, written to the tune of the
artillery or the grinding of teeth in the political struggle. Lenin’s
speeches have suffered especially. Owing to his swift delivery and the
complicated construction of his sentences, they are not easily recorded
even in more favourable conditions. That initial statement which John
Reed puts in the mouth of Lenin does not appear in any of the newspaper
accounts. But it is wholly in the spirit of the orator. Reed could not
have made it up. Just in that way Lenin must surely have begun his
speech at the Congress of Soviets – simply, without unction, with
inflexible confidence: “We shall now proceed to construct the socialist
order.”

But for this it was first of all necessary to end the war. From his
exile in Switzerland Lenin had thrown out the slogan: Convert the
imperialist war into a civil war. Now it was time to convert the
victorious civil war into peace. The speaker began immediately by
reading the draft of a declaration to be published by the government
still to be elected. The text had not been distributed, technical
equipment being still very weak. The congress drank in every word of the
document as pronounced.

“The workers’ and peasants’ government created by the revolution of
October 24-25, and resting upon the soviets of workers’, soldiers’ and
peasants’ deputies, proposes to all the warring peoples and their
governments to open immediate negotiations for a just, democratic
peace.” Just conditions exclude annexations and indemnities. By
annexations is to be understood the forceful accession of alien peoples
or the retention of them against their will, either in Europe or in
remote lands over the seas. “Herewith the government declares that it by
no means considers the above indicated conditions of peace ultimative –
that is, it agrees to examine any other conditions,” demanding only the
quickest possible opening of negotiations and the absence of any secrecy
in their conduct. On its part the soviet government abolishes secret
diplomacy and undertakes to publish the secret treaties concluded before
October 25, 1917. Everything in those treaties directed toward the
accruing of profit and privilege to the Russian landlords and
capitalists, and the oppression of other peoples by the Great Russians,
“the government declares unconditionally and immediately annulled.” In
order to enter upon negotiations, it is proposed to conclude an
immediate armistice, for not less than three months at least. The
workers’ and peasants’ government addresses its proposals simultaneously
to “the governments and peoples of all warring countries ... especially
the conscious workers of the three most advanced countries,” England,
France and Germany, confident that it is they who will “help us
successfully carry through the business of liberating the toilers and
the exploited masses of the population from all slavery and all
exploitation.”

Lenin limited himself to brief comments on the text of the declaration.
“We cannot ignore the governments, for then the possibility of
concluding peace will be delayed ... but we have no right not to appeal
at the same time to the people. The people and the governments are
everywhere at variance, and we ought to help the people interfere in the
matter of war and peace.” “We will, of course, defend in all possible
ways our programme of peace without annexations or indemnities” but we
ought not to present our conditions in the form of an ultimatum, as that
will make it easier for the governments to refuse to negotiate. We will
consider also every other proposal. “Consider does not mean that we will
accept it.”

The manifesto issued by the Compromisers on March 14 proposed to the
workers of other countries to overthrow the bankers in the name of
peace; however the Compromisers themselves not only did not demand the
overthrow of their own bankers, but entered into league with them. “Now
we have overthrown the government of the bankers.” That gives us a right
to summon the other peoples to do the same. We have every hope of
victory. “It must be remembered that we live not in the depths of
Africa, but in Europe where everything can become quickly known.” The
guarantee of victory Lenin sees, as always, in converting the national
into an international revolution. “The workers’ movement will get the
upper hand and lay down the road to peace and socialism.”

The Left Social Revolutionaries sent up a representative to present
their adherence to the declaration. Its “spirit and meaning are close
and understandable to us.” The United Internationalists were for the
declaration, but only on condition that it be issued by a government of
the entire democracy. Lapinsky, speaking for the Polish Left Mensheviks,
welcomed “the healthy proletarian realism” of the document. Dzerzhinsky
for the social democracy of Poland and Lithuania, Stuchka for the social
democracy of Latvia, Kapsukass for the Lithuanian social democracy,
adhered to the declaration without qualification. The only objection was
offered by the Bolshevik, Eremeev, who demanded that the peace
conditions be given the character of an ultimatum – otherwise “they may
think that we are weak, that we are afraid.”

Lenin decisively, even fiercely, objected to the ultimative presentation
of the conditions: In that way, he said, we will only “make it possible
for our enemies to conceal the whole truth from the people, to hide the
truth behind our irreconcilability.” You say that “our not presenting an
ultimatum will show our impotence.” It is time to have done with
bourgeois falsities in politics. “We need not be afraid of telling the
truth about our weariness ...” The future disagreements of Brest-Litovsk
gleam out for a moment already in this episode.

Kamenev asked all who were for the proclamation to raise their
delegates’ cards. “One delegate,” writes Reed, “dared to raise his hand
against, but the sudden sharp outburst around him brought it swiftly
down.” The appeal to the peoples and governments was adopted
unanimously. The deed was done! And it impressed all the participants by
its close and immediate magnitude.

Sukhanov, an attentive although also prejudiced observer, noticed more
than once at that first session the listlessness of the Congress.
Undoubtedly the delegates – like all the people, indeed – were tired of
meetings, congresses, speeches, resolutions, tired of the whole business
of marking time. They had no confidence that this Congress would be able
and know how to carry the thing through to the end. Will not the
gigantic size of the task and the insuperable opposition compel them to
back down this time too? An influx of confidence had come with the news
of the capture of the Winter Palace, and afterward with the coming over
of the bicycle men to the insurrection. But both these facts still had
to do with the mechanics of insurrection. Only now was its historic
meaning becoming clear in action. The victorious insurrection had built
under this congress of workers and soldiers an indestructible foundation
of power. The delegates were voting this time not for a resolution, not
for a proclamation, but for a governmental act of immeasurable
significance.

Listen, nations! The revolution offers you peace. It will be accused of
violating treaties. But of this it is proud. To break up the leagues of
bloody predation is the greatest historic service. The Bolsheviks have
dared to do it. They alone have dared. Pride surges up of its own
accord. Eyes shine. All are on their feet. No one is smoking now. It
seems as though no one breathes. The præsidium, the delegates, the
guests, the sentries, join in a hymn of insurrection and brotherhood.
“Suddenly, by common impulse,” – the story will soon be told by John
Reed, observer and participant, chronicler and poet of the insurrection
– “we found ourselves on our feet, mumbling together into the smooth
lifting unison of the _Internationale_. A grizzled old soldier was
sobbing like a child. Alexandra Kollontai rapidly winked the tears back.
The immense sound rolled through the hall, burst windows and doors and
soared into the quiet sky.” Did it go altogether into the sky? Did it
not go also to the autumn trenches, that hatch-work upon unhappy,
crucified Europe, to her devastated cities and villages, to her mothers
and wives in mourning? “_Arise ye prisoners of starvation! Arise ye
wretched of the earth!_” The words of the song were freed of all
qualifications. They fused with the decree of the government, and hence
resounded with the force of a direct act. Everyone felt greater and more
important in that hour. The heart of the revolution enlarged to the
width of the whole world. “We will achieve emancipation. The spirit of
independence, of initiative, of daring, those joyous feelings of which
the oppressed in ordinary conditions are deprived – the revolution had
brought them now ... with our own hand!” The omnipotent hand of those
millions who had overthrown the monarchy and the bourgeoisie would now
strangle the war. The Red Guard from the Vyborg district, the grey
soldier with his scar, the old revolutionist who had served his years at
hard labour, the young black-bearded sailor from the _Aurora_ – all
vowed to carry through to the end this “last and deciding fight.” “We
will build our own new world!” We will build! In that word eagerly
spoken from the heart was included already the future years of the civil
war and the coming five-year periods of labour and privation. “Who was
nothing shall be all!” All If the actualities of the past have often
been turned into song, why shall not a song be turned into the actuality
of the future? Those trenchcoats no longer seemed the costumes of
galley-slaves. The _papakhi_ with their holes and torn cotton took a new
aspect above those gleaming eyes. “The race of man shall rise again!” Is
it possible to believe that it will not rise from the misery and
humiliation, the blood and filth of this war?

“The whole præsidium, with Lenin at its head, stood and sang with
excited enraptured faces and shining eyes.” Thus testifies a sceptic,
gazing with heavy feelings upon an alien triumph. “How much I wanted to
join it,” confesses Sukhanov, “to fuse in one feeling and mood with that
mass and its leaders! But I could not.” The last sound of the anthem
died away, but the Congress remained standing, a fused human mass
enchanted by the greatness of that which they had experienced. And the
eyes of many rested on the short, sturdy figure of the man in the
tribune with his extraordinary head, his high cheekbones and simple
features, altered now by the shaved beard, and with that gaze of his
small, slightly Mongol eyes which looked straight through everything.
For four months he had been absent. His very name had almost separated
itself from any living image. But no. He was not a myth. There he stood
among his own – how many now of “his own” – holding the sheets of a
message of peace to the peoples of the world in his hand. Even those
nearest, those who knew well his place in the party, for the first time
fully realised what he meant to the revolution, to the people, to the
peoples. It was he who had taught them; it was he who had brought them
up. Somebody’s voice from the depth of the hall shouted a word of
greeting to the leader. The hall seemed only to have awaited the signal.
Long live Lenin! The anxieties endured, the doubts overcome, pride of
initiative, triumph of victory, gigantic hopes – all poured out together
in one volcanic eruption of gratitude and rapture. The sceptical
observer dryly remarks: “Undoubted enthusiasm of mood. They greeted
Lenin, shouted hurrah, threw their caps in the air. They sang the
_Funeral March_ in memory of the victims of the war – and again
applause, shouts, throwing of caps in the air.”

What the Congress experienced during those minutes was experienced on
the next day, although less compactly, by the whole country. “It must be
said,” writes Stankevich, in his memoirs, “that the bold gesture of the
Bolsheviks, their ability to step over the barbed-wire entanglements
which had for four years divided us from the neighbouring peoples,
created of itself an enormous impression.” Baron Budberg expresses
himself more crudely but no less succinctly in his diary: “The new
government of Comrade Lenin went off with a decree for immediate peace
... This was now an act of genius for bringing the soldier masses to his
side: I saw this in the mood of several regiments which I made the
rounds of today; the telegram of Lenin on an immediate three months’
armistice and then peace, created a colossal impression everywhere, and
evoked stormy joy. We have now lost the last chance of saving the
front.” By saving the front which they had ruined, those men had long
ceased to mean anything but saving their own social positions.

If the revolution had had the determination to step over the barbed-wire
entanglements in March and April, it might still have soldered the army
together for a time – provided the army was at the same time reduced to
half or a third its size – and thus created for its foreign policy a
position of exceptional force. But the hour of courageous action struck
only in October, when to save even a part of the army for even a short
period was unthinkable. The new government had to load upon itself the
debt, not only for the war of czarism, but also for the spendthrift
lightmindedness of the Provisional Government. In this dreadful, and for
all other parties hopeless, situation, only Bolshevism could lead the
country out on an open road – having uncovered through the October
revolution inexhaustible resources of national energy.

Lenin is again in the tribune – this time with the little sheets of a
decree on land. He begins with an indictment of the overthrown
government and the compromisist parties, who by dragging out the land
question have brought the country to a peasant revolt. “Their talk about
pogroms and anarchy in the country rings false with cowardly deceit.
Where and when have pogroms and anarchy been caused by ‘reasonable
measures?’ The draft of the decree has not been multigraphed for
distribution. The speaker has the sole rough draft in his hands, and it
is written so badly” – Sukhanov remembers – “that Lenin stumbles in the
reading, gets mixed up, and finally stops entirely. Somebody from the
crowd jammed around the tribune comes to his help. Lenin eagerly yields
his place and the undecipherable paper.” These rough spots did not,
however, in the eyes of that plebeian parliament diminish by an iota the
grandeur of which was taking place.

The essence of the decree is contained in two lines of the first point:
“The landlord’s property in the land is annulled immediately and without
any indemnity whatever. The landlord, appanage, monastery and church
estates with all their goods and chattels are given in charge of the
town land committees and county soviets of peasant deputies until the
Constituent Assembly. The confiscated property is placed as a national
possession under the protection of the local soviets. The land of the
rank-and-file peasants and rank-and-file Cossacks is protected against
confiscation.” The whole decree does not come to more than thirty lines.
It smashes the Gordian knot with a hammer. To the fundamental text
certain broader instructions are adjoined, borrowed wholly from the
peasants themselves. In _Izvestia_ of the Peasant Soviet there had been
printed on August 19 a summary of 242 instructions given by the electors
to their representatives at the First Congress of Peasant Deputies.
Notwithstanding that it was the Social Revolutionaries who prepared
these collated instructions, Lenin did not hesitate to attach the
document in its entirety to his decree “for guidance in carrying out the
great land transformation.”

The collated instructions read: “The right to private property in the
land is annulled for ever.” “The right to use the land is accorded to
all citizens ... desiring to cultivate it with their own labour.” “Hired
labour is not permitted.” “The use of the land must be equalised – that
is, the land is to be divided among the toilers according to local
conditions on the basis of standards either of labour or consumption.”

Under a continuation of the bourgeois régime, to say nothing of a
coalition with the landlords, these Social Revolutionary instructions
remained a lifeless Utopia, where they did not become a conscious lie.
Even under the rule of the proletariat, they did not become realisable
in all their sections. But the destiny of the instructions radically
changed with a change in the attitude toward them of the governmental
power. The workers’ state gave the peasants a period in which to try out
their self-contradictory programme in action.

“The peasants want to keep their small properties,” wrote Lenin in
August, “standardise them on a basis of equality, and periodically
re-equalise them. Let them do it. No reasonable socialist will break
with the peasant poor on that ground. If the lands are confiscated, that
means that the rule of the banks is undermined – if the equipment is
confiscated, that means that the rule of capital is undermined. The rest
... with a transfer of political power to the proletariat ... will be
suggested by practice.”

A great many people, and not only enemies but friends, have failed to
understand this far-sighted, and to a certain extent pedagogical,
approach of the Bolshevik Party to the peasantry and its agrarian
programme. The equal distribution of the land – objected Rosa Luxembourg
for example – has nothing in common with socialism. The Bolsheviks, it
goes without saying, had no illusion upon this point. On the contrary,
the very construction of the decree bears witness to the critical
vigilance of the legislator. Whereas the collated instructions say that
all the land, both that of the landlords and the peasants, “is converted
into national property,” the basic decree does not commit itself at all
as to the new form of property in the land. Even a none too pedantic
jurist would be horrified at the fact that the nationalisation of the
land, a new social principle of world-historic importance, is
inaugurated in the form of a list of instructions adjoined to a basic
law. But there was no reactionary slovenliness here. Lenin wanted as
little as possible to tie the hands of the party and the soviet power _a
priori_ in a still unexplored historic realm. Here again he united
unexampled audacity with the greatest caution. It still remained to
determine in experience how the peasants themselves would understand the
conversion of the land into “the property of the whole people.” Having
made so long a dash forward, it was necessary to fortify the positions
also in case a retreat should become necessary. The distribution of the
landlord’s land among the peasants, while not in itself a guarantee
against bourgeois counter-revolution, made impossible in any case a
feudal-monarchic restoration.

It would be possible to speak of socialist perspectives only after the
establishment and successful preservation of the proletarian power. And
this power could preserve itself only by giving determined co-operation
to the peasant in carrying out his revolution. If the distribution of
the land would strengthen the socialist government politically, it was
then wholly justified as an immediate measure. The peasant had to be
taken as the revolution found him. Only a new régime could re-educate
him – and not at once, but in the course of a generation, with the help
of a new technique and a new organisation of industry. The decree
together with the instructions meant that the dictatorship of the
proletariat assumed an obligation not only to take an attentive attitude
toward the interests of the land labourer, but also to be patient of his
illusions as a petty proprietor. It was clear in advance that there
would be a number of stages and turning-points in the agrarian
revolution. The collated instructions were anything but the last word.
They represented merely a starting-point which the workers agreed to
occupy while helping the peasants to realise their progressive demands,
and warning them against false steps.

“We must not ignore,” said Lenin in his speech, “the resolutions of the
lower ranks of the people, even though we are not in agreement with them
... We must give full freedom to the creative capacity of the popular
masses. The essence of the thing is that the peasantry should have full
confidence that there are no more landlords in the country, and let the
peasants themselves decide all questions and build their own life.”
Opportunism? No, it was revolutionary realism.

Before even the applause was over, a Right Social Revolutionary,
Pianykh, arrived from the Peasants’ Executive Committee and took the
floor with a furious protest on the subject of the socialist ministers
being under arrest. “During the last days,” cried the orator pounding
the table as though beside himself, “a thing is on foot which has never
happened in any revolution. Our comrades, members of the Executive
Committee, Maslov and Salazkin, are locked up in a prison. We demand
their immediate release!” “If one hair falls from their heads ...”
threatened another messenger in a military coat. To the Congress they
both seemed like visitors from another world.

At the moment of the insurrection there were about 800 men in prison in
Dvinsk, charged with Bolshevism, in Minsk about 6,000, in Kiev 535 – for
the most part soldiers. And how many members of the peasant committees
were under lock and key in various parts of the country! Finally a good
share of the delegates to this very Congress, beginning with the
præsidium, had passed through the prisons of Kerensky since July. No
wonder the indignation of the friends of the Provisional Government
could not pluck at any heart-strings in this assembly. To complete their
bad luck a certain delegate, unknown to anybody, a peasant from Tver,
with long hair and a big sheepskin coat, rose in his place, and having
bowed politely to all four points of the compass, adjured the Congress
in the name of his electors not to hesitate at arresting Avksentiev’s
executive committee as a whole: “Those are not peasants’ deputies, but
Kadets ... Their place is in prison.” So they stood facing each other,
these two figures: The Social Revolutionary Pianykh, experienced
parliamentarian, favourite of ministers, hater of Bolsheviks, and the
nameless peasant from Tver who had brought Lenin a hearty salute from
his electors. Two social strata, two revolutions: Pianykh was speaking
in the name of February, the Tver peasant was fighting for October. The
Congress gave the delegate in a sheepskin coat a veritable ovation. The
emissaries of the Executive Committee went away swearing.

“The resolution of Lenin is greeted by the Social Revolutionary faction
as a triumph of their ideas,” announces Kalegaev, but in view of the
extraordinary importance of the question we must take it up in caucus. A
Maximalist, representative of the extreme left wing of the disintegrated
Social Revolutionary party, demands an immediate vote: “We ought to give
honour to a party which on the very first day and without any blabber
brings such a measure to life.” Lenin insisted that the intermission
should be at any rate as short as possible. “News so important to Russia
should be in print by morning. No filibustering!” The decree on land was
not only, indeed, the foundation of the new régime, but also a weapon of
the revolution, which had still to conquer the country. It is not
surprising that Reed records at that moment an imperative shout breaking
through the noise of the hall: “Fifteen agitators wanted in room 17 at
once! To go to the front!” At one o’clock in the morning a delegate from
the Russian troops in Macedonia enters a complaint that the Petersburg
governments one after the other have forgotten them. Support for peace
and land from the soldiers in Macedonia is assured! Here is a new test
of the mood of the army – this time from a far corner of south-eastern
Europe. And here Kamenev announces: The Tenth Bicycle Battalion,
summoned by the government from the front, entered Petrograd this
morning, and like its predecessors has adhered to the Congress of
Soviets. The warm applause testifies that no amount of these
confirmations of its power will seem excessive to the Congress.

After the adoption, unanimously and without debate, of a resolution
declaring it an affair of honour of the local soviets not to permit
Jewish or any other pogroms on the part of the criminal element, a vote
is taken on the draft of the land law. With one vote opposed and eight
abstaining, the congress adopts with a new burst of enthusiasm the
decree putting an end to serfdom, the very foundation stone of the old
Russian culture. Henceforth the agrarian revolution is legalised, and
therewith the revolution of the proletariat acquires a mighty basis.

A last problem remains: the creation of a government. Kamenev reads a
proposal drawn up by the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks. The
management of the various branches of the state life is allotted to
commissions who are to carry into action the programme announced by the
Congress of Soviets “in close union with the mass organisation of
working men and women, sailors, soldiers, peasants and clerical
employees.” The governmental power is concentrated in the hands of a
collegium composed of the presidents of these commissions, to be called
the Soviet of People’s Commissars. Control over the activities of the
government is vested in the Congress of Soviets and its Central
Executive Committee.

Seven members of the Central Committee of the Bolshevik Party were
nominated to the first Council of People’s Commissars: Lenin as head of
the government, without portfolio; Rykov as People’s Commissar of the
Interior; Miliutin as head of the Department of Agriculture; Nogin as
chief of Commerce and Industry; Trotsky as head of the Department of
Foreign Affairs; Lomov of Justice; Stalin, president of a Commission on
the Affairs of the Nationalities; Military and naval affairs were
allotted to a committee consisting of Antonov-Ovseenko, Krylenko and
Dybenko; the head of the Commissariat of Labour is to be Shliapnikov;
the chief of the Department of Education, Lunacharsky; the heavy and
ungrateful task of Minister of Provisions is laid upon Theodorovich; the
Posts and Telegraph upon the worker, Glebov; the position of People’s
Commissar of Communications is not yet allotted, the door being left
open here for an agreement with the organisations of the railroad
workers.

All fifteen candidates, four workers and eleven intellectuals have
behind them years of imprisonment, exile and emigrant life. Five of them
have been imprisoned even under the régime of the democratic republic.
The future prime minister had only the day before emerged from the
democratic underground. Kamenev and Zinoviev did not enter the Council
of People’s Commissars. The former was selected for president of the new
Central Executive Committee, the latter for editor of the official organ
of the soviets. “As Kamenev read the list of Commissars,” writes Reed,
there were “bursts of applause after each name, Lenin’s and Trotsky’s
especially.” Sukhanov adds also that of Lunacharsky.

A long speech against the proposed staff of the government was made by a
representative of the United Internationalists. Avilov, once a
Bolshevik, a _littérateur_ from Gorky’s paper. He conscientiously
enumerated the difficulties standing before the revolution in the sphere
of domestic and foreign politics. We must “clearly realise ... whither
we are going ... Before the new government stand all the old questions:
of bread and of peace. If it does not solve these problems it will be
overthrown.” There is little grain in the country; it is in the hands of
the well-to-do peasants; there is nothing to give in exchange for grain;
industry is on the decline; fuel and raw material are lacking. To
collect the grain by force is a difficult, long and dangerous task. It
is necessary, therefore, to create a government which will have the
sympathy not only of the poor but also of the well-to-do peasantry. For
this a coalition is necessary.

“It will be still harder to obtain peace.” The governments of the
Entente will not answer the proposal of the congress for an immediate
armistice. Even without that the Allied ambassadors are planning to
leave. The new government will be isolated: its peace initiative will be
left hanging in the air. The popular masses of the warring countries are
still far from revolution. The consequences may be two: either
extermination of the revolution by the troops of the Hohenzollern or a
separate peace. The peace terms in both cases can only be the worst
possible for Russia. These difficulties can be met only by “a majority
of the people.” The unfortunate thing is the split in the democracy: the
left half wants to create a purely Bolshevik government in Smolny, and
the right half is organising in the city duma a Committee of Public
Safety. To save the revolution it is necessary to form a government from
both groups.

A representative of the Left Social Revolutionaries, Karelin, spoke to
the same effect. It is impossible to carry out the programme adopted
without those parties which have withdrawn from the Congress. To be sure
“the Bolsheviks are not to blame for their withdrawal.” But the
programme of the congress ought to unite the entire democracy. “We do
not want to take the road of isolating the Bolsheviks, for we understand
that with the fate of the Bolsheviks is bound up the fate of the whole
revolution. Their ruin will be the ruin of the revolution. If they, the
Left Social Revolutionaries, have nevertheless declined the invitation
to enter the government, their purpose is a good one: to keep their
hands free for mediation between the Bolsheviks and the parties which
have abandoned the Congress. In such mediations ... the Left Social
Revolutionaries see their principal task at the present moment.” The
Left Social Revolutionaries will support the work of the new government
in solving urgent problems. At the same time they vote against the
proposed government. – In a word the young party has got mixed up as
badly as it knows how.

“Trotsky rose to defend a government of Bolsheviks only,” writes
Sukhanov, himself wholly in sympathy with Avilov and having inspired
Karelin behind the scenes. “He was very clear, sharp, and in much
absolutely right. But he refused to understand in what consisted the
centre of the argument of his opponents ...” The centre of the argument
consisted of an ideal diagonal. In March they had tried to draw it
between the bourgeoisie and the compromisist soviets. Now Sukhanov
dreamed of a diagonal between the compromisist democracy and the
dictatorship of the proletariat. But revolutions do not develop along
diagonals.

“They have tried to frighten us more than once with a possible isolation
of the Left Wing,” said Trotsky. “Some days back when the question of
insurrection was first openly raised, they told us that we were headed
for destruction. And in reality if you judged the grouping of forces by
the political press, then insurrection threatened us with inevitable
ruin. Against us stood not only the counter-revolutionary bands, but
also the defensists of all varieties. The Left Social Revolutionaries,
only one wing of them courageously worked with us in the Military
Revolutionary Committee. The rest occupied a position of watchful
neutrality. And nevertheless even with these unfavourable circumstances
and when it seemed that we were abandoned by all, the insurrection
triumphed ...

“If the real forces were actually against us, how could it happen that
we won the victory almost without bloodshed. No, it is not we who are
isolated, but the government and the so called democrats. With their
wavering, their compromising, they have erased themselves from the ranks
of the authentic democracy. Our great superiority as a party lies in the
fact that we have formed a coalition with the class forces, creating a
union of the workers and poorest peasants.

“Political groupings disappear, but the fundamental interests of the
classes remain. That party conquers which is able to feel out and
satisfy the fundamental demands of a class ... We pride ourselves upon
the coalition of our garrison, chiefly composed of peasants, with the
working class. This coalition has been tried by fire. The Petrograd
garrison and proletariat went hand in hand into that great struggle
which is the classic example in the history of revolutions among all
peoples.

“Avilov has spoken of the vast difficulties which stand before us. To
remove those difficulties he proposes that we form a coalition. But he
makes no attempt to lay bare his formula and tell us what coalition. A
coalition of groups, or classes, or simply a coalition of newspapers?
...

“They tell us the split in the democracy is a misunderstanding. When
Kerensky is sending shock troops against us, when with the consent of
the Central Executive Committee we are deprived of the telephone at the
most critical moment of our struggle with the bourgeoisie, when they
deal us blow after blow – is it possible to talk of misunderstanding?

“Avilov says to us: There is little bread, we must have a coalition with
the defensists. Do you imagine that this coalition will increase the
quantity of bread? The problem of bread is the problem of a programme of
action. The struggle with economic collapse demands a definite system
from below, and not political groupings on top.

“Avilov speaks of a union with the peasantry: But again of what
peasantry is he talking? Today and right here, a representative of the
peasants of Tver province demanded the arrest of Avksentiev. We must
choose between this Tver peasant and Avksentiev who has filled the
prisons with members of the peasant committees. A coalition with the
_kulak_ elements of the peasantry we firmly reject in the name of a
coalition of the working class and the poorer peasant. We are with the
Tver peasants against Avksentiev. We are with them to the end and
inseparably.

“Whoever now chases the shadow of coalition is totally cutting himself
off from life. The Social Revolutionaries will lose support among the
masses to the extent that they venture to oppose our party. Every group
which opposes the party of the proletariat, with whom the village poor
have united, cuts himself off from the revolution.

“Openly and before the face of the whole people we raised the banner of
insurrection. The political formula of this insurrection was: All power
to the soviets – through the Congress of Soviets. They tell us: You did
not await the Congress with your uprising. We thought of waiting, but
Kerensky would not wait. The counter-revolutionists were not dreaming.
We as a party considered this our task: to make it genuinely possible
for the Congress of Soviets to seize the power. If the Congress had been
surrounded with junkers, how could it have seized the power? In order to
achieve this task, a party was needed which would wrench the power from
the hands of the counter-revolution and say to you: ‘Here is the power
and you’ve got to take it!’ (_Stormy and prolonged applause_)

“Notwithstanding that the defensists of all shades stopped at nothing in
their struggle against us, we did not throw them out. We proposed to the
Congress as a whole to take the power. How utterly you distort the
perspective, when after all that has happened you talk from this tribune
of our irreconcilability. When a party surrounded with a cloud of
gunpowder smoke, comes up to them and says, ‘Let us take the power
together!’ they run to the city duma and unite there with open
counter-revolutionists! They are traitors to the revolution with whom we
will never unite

“‘For the struggle for peace’, says Avilov, ‘we must have a coalition
with the Compromisers.’ At the same time he acknowledges that the Allies
do not want to make peace ... The Allied imperialists laughed, says
Avilov, at the oleomargarine delegate Skobelev. Nevertheless if you form
a bloc with the oleomargarine democrats, the cause of peace is assured!

“There are two roads in the struggle for peace. One road is to oppose to
the Allied and enemy governments the moral and material force of
revolution. The other is a bloc with Skobelev, which means a bloc with
Tereshchenko and complete subjection to Allied imperialism. In our
proclamation on peace we address ourselves simultaneously to the
governments and the peoples. That is purely formal symmetry; Of course
we do not think to influence the imperialist governments with our
proclamations, although as long as they exist we cannot ignore them. We
rest all our hope on the possibility that our revolution will unleash
the European revolution. If the revolting peoples of Europe do not crush
imperialism, then we will be crushed – that is indubitable. Either the
Russian revolution will raise the whirlwind of struggle in the west, or
the capitalists of all countries will crush our revolution ...”

“There is a third road,” says a voice from the benches.

“The third road,” answers Trotsky, “is the road of the Central Executive
Committee – on the one hand sending delegates to the west European
workers, and on the other forming a union with the Kishkins and
Konovalovs. That is a road of lies and hypocrisy which we will never
enter.

“Of course we do not say that only the day of insurrection of the
European workers will be the day that the peace treaty is signed. This
also is possible: that the bourgeoisie, frightened by an approaching
insurrection of the oppressed, will hasten to make peace. The dates are
not set. The concrete forms cannot be foretold. It is important and it
is necessary to define the method of struggle, a method identical in
principle both in foreign and domestic politics. A union of the
oppressed here and everywhere – that is our road.”

The delegates of the Congress, says John Reed, “greeted him with an
immense crusading acclaim, kindling to the daring of it, with the
thought of championing mankind.” At any rate it could not have entered
the minds of any Bolshevik at that time to protest against placing the
fate of the Soviet Republic, in an official speech in the name of the
Bolshevik Party, in direct dependence upon the development of the
international revolution.

The dramatic law of this Congress was that each significant act was
concluded or even interrupted, by a short intermission during which a
figure from the other camp would suddenly appear upon the stage and
voice a protest, or a threat, or present an ultimatum. A representative
of the Vikzhel, the executive committee of the railroad workers’ union,
now demanded the floor immediately and on the instant. He must needs
throw a bomb into the assembly before the vote was taken on the question
of power. The speaker – in whose face Reed saw implacable hostility –
began with an accusation. His organisation, “the strongest in Russia,”
had not been invited to the congress ... “It was the Central Executive
Committee that did not invite you,” was shouted at him from all sides.
But he continued: And be it known that the original decision of the
Vikzhel to support the Congress of Soviets has been revoked. The speaker
hastened to read an ultimatum already distributed by telegraph
throughout the country: The Vikzhel condemns the seizure of power by one
party; the government ought to be responsible before the “entire
revolutionary democracy”; until the creation of a democratic government
only the Vikzhel will control the railroad lines. The speaker adds that
counterrevolutionary troops will not be admitted to Petrograd; but in
general the movement of troops will henceforth take place only at the
direction of the old Central Executive Committee. In case of repressions
directed against the railroad workers, the Vikzhel will deprive
Petrograd of food.

The Congress bristled under the blow. The chiefs of the railroad union
were trying to converse with the representatives of the people as one
government with another! When the workers, soldiers, and peasants take
the administration of the state into their hands, the Vikzhel presumes
to give commands to the workers, soldiers, and peasants! It wants to
change into petty cash the overthrown system of dual power. In thus
attempting to rely not upon its numbers, but upon the exceptional
significance of railroads in the economy and culture of the country,
these democrats of the Vikzhel exposed the whole frailty of the
criterion of formal democracy upon the fundamental issues of a social
struggle. Truly revolution has a genius for education!

At any rate the moment for this blow was not badly chosen by the
Compromisers, The faces of the præsidium were troubled. Fortunately the
Vikzhel was by no means unconditional boss on the railroads. In the
local districts the railroad workers were members of the city soviets.
Even here at the congress the ultimatum of the Vikzhel met resistance.
“The whole mass of the railroad workers of our district,” said the
delegate from Tashkent, “have expressed themselves in favour of the
transfer of power to the soviets.” Another delegate from railroad
workers declared the Vikzhel a “political corpse.” That doubtless was
exaggerated. Relying upon the rather numerous upper layers of railroad
clerks, the Vikzhel had preserved more life force than the other
higher-up organisations of the Compromisers. But it belonged indubitably
to the same type as the army committees or the Central Executive
Committee. Its star was swiftly falling. The workers were everywhere
distinguishing themselves from the clerical employees; the lower clerks
were opposing themselves to the higher. The impudent ultimatum of the
Vikzhel would undoubtedly hasten these processes. No, the station
masters can’t hold back the locomotive of the October revolution!

“There can be no questioning the legal rights of this Congress,”
declared Kamenev with authority. “The quorum of the Congress was
established not by us, but by the old Central Executive Committee ...
The Congress is the highest organ of the workers and soldier masses.” A
simple return to the order of the day!

The Council of People’s Commissars was ratified by an overwhelming
majority. Avilov’s resolution, according to the excessively generous
estimate of Sukhanov, got 150 votes, chiefly Left Social
Revolutionaries. The Congress then unanimously confirmed the membership
of the new Central Executive Committee: out of 101 members – 62
Bolsheviks, 29 Left Social Revolutionaries. The Central Executive
Committee was to complete itself in the future with representatives of
the peasant soviets and the re-elected army organisations. The factions
who had abandoned the Congress were granted the right to send their
delegates to the Central Executive Committee on the basis of
proportional representation.

The agenda of the Congress was completed! The Soviet government was
created. It had its programme. The work could begin. And there was no
lack of it. At 5:15 in the morning Kamenev closed the Constituent
Congress of the Soviet régime. To the stations! Home! To the front! To
the factories and barracks! To the mines and the far-off villages In the
decrees of the Soviet, the delegates will carry the leaven of the
proletarian revolution to all corners of the country.

On that morning the central organ of the Bolshevik Party, again under
the old name _Pravda_, wrote: “They wanted us to take the power alone,
so that we alone should have to contend with the terrible difficulties
confronting the country ... So be it! We take the power alone, relying
upon the voice of the country and counting upon the friendly help of the
European proletariat. But having taken the power, we will deal with the
enemies of revolution and its saboteurs with an iron hand. They dreamed
of a dictatorship of Kornilov ... We will give them the dictatorship of
the proletariat ...”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. Tall fur hats.



CHAPTER 48 CONCLUSION


 

A remarkable consecutiveness of stages is to be observed in the
development of the Russian revolution – and this for the very reason
that it was an authentic popular revolution, setting in motion tens of
millions. Events succeeded each other as though obeying laws of
gravitation. The correlation of forces was twice verified at every
stage: first the masses would demonstrate the might of their assault,
then the possessing classes, attempting revenge, would reveal their
isolation the more clearly.

In February the workers and soldiers of Petrograd rose in insurrection –
not only against the patriotic will of all the educated classes, but
also contrary to the reckonings of the revolutionary organisations. The
masses demonstrated that they were unconquerable. Had they themselves
been aware of this, they would have become the government. But there was
not yet a strong and authoritative revolutionary party at their head.
The power fell into the hands of the petty-bourgeois democracy tinted
with a protective socialist colouration. The Mensheviks and Social
Revolutionaries could make no other use of the confidence of the masses
but to summon to the helm the liberal bourgeoisie, who in this turn
could only place the power slipped to them by the Compromisers at the
service of the interests of the Entente.

In the April days the indignation of the regiments and factories again
without the summons of any party – brought them out on the streets of
Petrograd to resist the imperialist policy of the government wished on
them by the Compromisers. This armed demonstration attained an
appearance of success. Miliukov, the leader of Russian imperialism, was
removed from the government. The Compromisers entered the government,
superficially as plenipotentiaries of the people, in reality as
call-boys of the bourgeoisie.

Without having decided one of the problems which had evoked the
revolution, the coalition government violated in June the de facto
armistice that had been established on the front, throwing the troops
into an offensive. By this act the February régime, already marked by
the declining trust of the masses in the Compromisers, dealt itself a
fatal blow. The period opened of direct preparation for the second
revolution. At the beginning of July the government, having all the
possessing and educated classes behind it, was prosecuting every
revolutionary manifestation whatever as treason to the fatherland and
aid to the enemy. The official mass organisations – the soviets, the
social-patriotic parties – were struggling against a demonstration with
all their power. The Bolsheviks for tactical reasons were trying to
restrain the workers and, soldiers from coming into the streets.
Nevertheless the masses came out. The movement proved unrestrainable and
universal. The government was nowhere to be seen. The Compromisers hid.
The workers and soldiers proved masters of the situation in the capital.
Their offensive went to pieces, however, owing to the inadequate
readiness of the provinces and the front.

At the end of August all the organs and institutions of the possessing
classes stood for a counter-revolutionary overturn: the diplomats of the
Entente, the banks, the leagues of landed proprietors and
industrialists, the Kadet Party, the staffs, the officers, the big
press. The organiser of the overturn was no other than the supreme
commander-in-chief with the officer-apparatus of an army of millions to
rely on. Military detachments specially selected from all fronts were
thrown against Petrograd under pretence of strategic considerations and
by secret agreement with the head of the government.

In the capital everything, it seemed, was prepared for the success of
the enterprise: the workers had been disarmed by the authorities with
the help of the Compromisers; the Bolsheviks were under a steady rain of
blows; the more revolutionary regiments had been removed from the city;
hundreds of specially selected officers were concentrated in shock
brigades – with the officer schools and Cossack detachments they should
constitute an impressive force. And what happened? The plot, patronised
it would seem by the gods themselves, barely came in contact with the
revolutionary people when it scattered in dust.

These two movements, at the beginning of July and the end of August,
relate to each other as a theorem and its converse. The July Days
demonstrated the might of the self-dependent movement of the masses. The
August Days laid bare the complete impotence of the ruling groups. This
correlation signalized the inevitability of a new conflict. The
provinces and the front were meanwhile drawing closer to the capital.
This predetermined the October victory.

“The ease with which Lenin and Trotsky overthrew the last coalition
government of Kerensky,” wrote the Kadet, Nabokov, “revealed its inward
impotence. The degree of this impotence was an amazement at that time
even to well-informed people.” Nabokov himself seems hardly aware that
it was a question of his impotence, that of his class, of his social
structure.

Just as from the armed demonstration of July the curve rises to the
October insurrection, so the movement of Kornilov seems a
dress-rehearsal of the counter-revolutionary campaign undertaken by
Kerensky in the last days of October. The sole military force against
the Bolsheviks found at the front by the democratic commander-in-chief
after his flight under cover of the little American flag, was that same
Third Cavalry Corps which two months before had been designated by
Kornilov for the overthrow of Kerensky himself. The commander of the
corps was still the Cossack General, Krasnov, militant monarchist placed
in this post by Kornilov. A more appropriate commander for the defence
of democracy was not to be found.

Moreover nothing was left of the corps but its name. It had been reduced
to a few Cossack squadrons, who after an unsuccessful attempt to take
the offensive against the Reds near Petrograd, fraternised with the
revolutionary sailors and turned Krasnov over to the Bolsheviks.
Kerensky was obliged to take flight – both from the Cossacks and the
sailors. Thus eight months after the overthrow of the monarchy the
workers stood at the head of the country. And they stood firmly.

“Who would believe,” wrote one of the Russian generals, Zalessky,
expressing his indignation at this, “that the janitor or watchman of the
court building would suddenly become Chief Justice of the Court of
Appeals? Or the hospital orderly manager of the hospital; the barber a
big functionary; yesterday’s ensign the commander-in-chief; yesterday’s
lackey or common labourer burgomaster; yesterday’s train oiler chief of
division or station superintendent; yesterday’s locksmith head of the
factory?”

“Who would believe it?” They had to believe it. It was impossible not to
believe it, when ensigns routed the generals, when burgomasters from the
ranks of common labour put down the resistance of yesterday’s lords,
train oilers regulated transport, and locksmiths as directors revived
industry.

The chief task of a political régime, according to an English aphorism,
is to put the right people in the right positions. How does the
experiment of 1917 look from this point of view? During the first two
months Russia was ruled, through right of monarchic succession, by a man
inadequately endowed by nature who believed in saints’ mummies and
submitted to Rasputin. During the next eight months the liberals and
democrats attempted from their governmental high places to prove to the
people that the revolution had been accomplished in order that all
should remain as before. No wonder those people passed over the country
like wavering shadows leaving no trace. From the 25th of October the man
at the head of Russia was Lenin, the greatest figure in Russian
political history. He was surrounded by a staff of assistants who, as
their most spiteful enemies acknowledge, knew what they wanted and how
to fight for their aims. Which of these three systems, in the given
concrete conditions, proved capable of putting the right people in the
right positions?

The historic ascent of humanity, taken as a whole, may be summarised as
a succession of victories of consciousness over blind forces – in
nature, in society, in man himself. Critical and creative thought can
boast of its greatest victories up to now in the struggle with nature.
The physico-chemical sciences have already reached a point where man is
clearly about to become master of matter. But social relations are still
forming in the manner of the coral islands. Parliamentarism illumined
only the surface of society, and even that with a rather artificial
light. In comparison with monarchy and other heirlooms from the
cannibals and cave-dwellers, democracy is of course a great conquest,
but it leaves the blind play of forces in the social relations of men
untouched. It was against this deeper-sphere of the unconscious that the
October revolution was the first to raise its hand. The Soviet system
wishes to bring aim and plan into the very basis of society, where up to
now only accumulated consequences have reigned.

Enemies are gleeful that fifteen years after the revolution the Soviet
country is still but little like a kingdom of universal well-being. Such
an argument, if not really to be explained as due to a blinding
hostility, could only be dictated by an excessive worship of the magic
power of socialist methods. Capitalism required a hundred years to
elevate science and technique to the heights and plunge humanity into
the hell of war and crisis. To socialism its enemies allow only fifteen
years to create and furnish a terrestrial paradise. We took no such
obligation upon ourselves. We never set these dates. The process of vast
transformations must be measured by an adequate scale.

But the misfortunes which have overwhelmed living people? The fire and
bloodshed of the civil war? Do the consequences of a revolution justify
in general the sacrifices it involves? The question is teleological and
therefore fruitless. It would be as well to ask in face of the
difficulties and griefs of personal existence: Is it worth while to be
born? Melancholy reflections have not so far, however, prevented people
from bearing or being born. Even in the present epoch of intolerable
misfortune only a small percentage of the population of our planet
resorts to suicide. But the people are seeking the way out of their
unbearable difficulties in revolution.

Is it not remarkable that those who talk most indignantly about the
victims of social revolutions are usually the very ones who, if not
directly responsible for the victims of the world war, prepared and
glorified them, or at least accepted them? It is our turn to ask: Did
the war justify itself? What has it given us? What has it taught?

It will hardly pay now to pause upon the assertions of injured Russian
proprietors that the revolution led to the cultural decline of the
country. That aristocratic culture overthrown by the October revolution
was in the last analysis only a superficial imitation of higher western
models. Remaining inaccessible to the Russian people, it added nothing
essential to the treasure-store of humanity, The October revolution laid
the foundation of a new culture taking everybody into consideration, and
for that very reason immediately acquiring international significance.
Even supposing for a moment that owing to unfavourable circumstances and
hostile blows the Soviet régime should be temporarily overthrown, the
inexpugnable impress of the October revolution would nevertheless remain
upon the whole future development of mankind.

The language of the civilised nations has clearly marked off two epochs
in the development of Russia. Where the aristocratic culture introduced
into world parlance such barbarisms as _czar_, _pogrom_, _knout_,
October has internationalised such words as _Bolshevik_, _soviet_ and
_piatiletka_. This alone justifies the proletarian revolution, if you
imagine that it needs justification.

THE END



VOLUME 3: NOTE TO THE APPENDICES


 

Besides our historic references on the theory of permanent revolution,
we have transferred into this appendix two independent chapters: _Some
Legends of the Bureaucracy_, and _Socialism in a Separate Country?_ The
chapter on “legends” is dedicated to the critical restoration of a
series of facts and episodes of the October revolution distorted by the
epigone historians. One of the incidental aims of this chapter is to
make it impossible for lazy minds, instead of working over the factual
material, to quiet themselves with the cheap _a priori_ conclusion that
“the truth is probably somewhere in the middle.”

The chapter _Socialism in a Separate Country?_ is dedicated to the most
important question concerning the ideology and programme of the
Bolshevik party. The question here historically illumined by us, not
only still preserves all its theoretical interest, but has in recent
years acquired a first-class practical importance.

We have separated these two chapters from the general text, of which
they form an integral part, only for the benefit of the reader not
accustomed to concern himself with secondary disputes or theoretical
problems. If however a tenth, or even a hundredth, of the readers of
this book take the trouble to read attentively this appendix, the author
will feel abundantly rewarded for the great labour he has performed. It
is through thoughtful, work-loving and critical minds that the truth in
the long run makes its way to broader circles.



VOLUME 3: APPENDIX 1 SUPPLEMENTARY ESSAY: SOME LEGENDS OF THE BUREAUCRACY


 

The conception of the October revolution developed in this book was set
forth by the author more than once during the early years of the Soviet
régime, although to be sure only in its general features. In order to
delineate his thought more clearly he sometimes gave it a quantitative
expression: the task of the overturn, he wrote, was “three-quarters if
not nine-tenths” completed before the 25th of October by the method of
“silent” or “dry” insurrection. If you do not give these figures more
importance than figures could pretend to in such a matter, the idea
itself remains absolutely unquestionable. But since the revaluation of
values began, our conception has been bitterly criticised in this
particular.

“If on the 9th of October a nine-tenths ‘victorious’ insurrection was
already an accomplished fact,” wrote Kamenev, “then how shall we
estimate the intellectual capacities of those who were sitting in the
Central Committee of the Bolsheviks, and on the 10th of October deciding
in heated debates whether to make an insurrection or not, and if so
when? What shall we say of the people who assembled on the 16th of
October ... and again and again estimated the chances for an
insurrection? ... Oh yes, it seems that it was already accomplished on
the 9th of October ‘silently’ and ‘legally’ – so silently indeed that
neither the party nor the Central Committee knew about it.” This
superficially so effective argument, which is canonised in the epigone
literature and has politically outlived its author, is in reality an
impressive piling up of mistakes.

On the 9th of October the insurrection could not possibly have been a
“nine-tenths” accomplished fact, for on that day the question of the
transfer of the garrison had just been raised in the Soviet and it was
impossible to know how the thing would develop in the future. It was for
this reason that on the next day, the 10th, when insisting on the
importance of this question of the transfer of the troops, Trotsky had
not yet sufficient grounds to demand that the conflict between the
garrison and its command form the basis of the whole plan. Only during
the next two weeks of stubborn day-by-day work did the chief task of the
insurrection – the firm winning over to the people’s side of the
government troops – become “three-quarters if not nine-tenths”
accomplished. This was not so on the 10th, nor yet even on the 16th of
October, when the Central Committee took up for a second time the
question of insurrection and when Krylenko did quite definitely present
as a key-note the question of the garrison. But even if the revolution
had been nine-tenths victorious on the 9th – as Kamenev erroneously
presents our thought – this fact could have been reliably ascertained,
not by guessing, but only by action – that is, by making an
insurrection. The “intellectual capacity” of the members of the Central
Committee would not, even in that purely hypothetical case, have been in
the least compromised by their participation in heated debates on the
10th and 16th of October. However, even supposing that the members of
the Central Committee could have unquestionably assured themselves by an
_a priori_ calculation that the victory was actually nine-tenths won, it
would still have remained necessary to accomplish the last tenth, and
that would have demanded just as much attention as though it were
ten-tenths. How many “almost” won battles and insurrections does history
present – battles and insurrections which led to defeat only because
they were not pushed through in good season to the complete defeat of
the enemy! And finally – Kamenev is ingenious enough to forget this too
– the sphere of activity of the Military Revolutionary Committee was
Petrograd only. However important the capital may have been, the rest of
the country did nevertheless exist. And from this point of view the
Central Committee had sufficient ground for carefully weighing the
chances of the insurrection, not only on the 10th and the 16th, but also
on the 26th – that is, after the victory in Petrograd.

Kamenev, in the argument we are discussing, comes to the defence of
Lenin. All the epigones defend themselves under this imposing pseudonym.
How could Lenin, he asks, have fought so passionately for an
insurrection, if it was already nine-tenths accomplished! But Lenin
himself wrote at the beginning of October: “It is quite possible that
right now we might seize the power without an insurrection.” In other
words, Lenin postulated that the “silent” revolution had already taken
place before the 9th of October, and moreover not by nine but by
ten-tenths. He understood however, that this optimistic hypothesis could
only be verified in action. For that reason Lenin said in the same
letter: “If we cannot seize power without an insurrection, then we must
make an insurrection immediately.” It was this question that was
discussed on the 10th and 16th, and on other days.

The recent Soviet histories have completely erased from the October
revolution the extremely important and instructive chapter about the
disagreements between Lenin and the Central Committee – both upon the
basic matter of principle in which Lenin was right, and also upon those
particular, but very important, questions upon which the Central
Committee was right. According to the new doctrine, neither Lenin nor
the Central Committee could make a mistake, and consequently there could
have been no conflict between them. In those cases where it becomes
impossible to deny that there was a disagreement, it is, in obedience to
a general prescription, laid at the door of Trotsky.

The facts speak otherwise. Lenin insisted upon raising an insurrection
in the days of the Democratic Conference. Not one member of the Central
Committee supported him. A week later Lenin proposed to Smilga to
organise an insurrectionary headquarters in Finland, and strike a blow
at the government from that point with the sailors. Again ten days later
he insisted that the Northern Congress become the starting point of an
insurrection. Nobody at the Congress supported this proposal. At the end
of September Lenin considered the postponement of the insurrection for
three weeks, until the Congress of Soviets, fatal. Nevertheless the
insurrection, deferred to the eve of the Congress, was accomplished
while the Congress was in session. Lenin proposed that the struggle
begin in Moscow, assuming that there it would be resolved without a
fight. As a matter of fact, the insurrection in Moscow, notwithstanding
the preceding victory in Petrograd, lasted eight days and cost many
victims.

Lenin was no automaton of infallible decisions. He was “only” a man of
genius, and nothing human was alien to him, therein included the
capacity to make mistakes. Lenin said this of the attitude of epigones
to the great revolutionists: “After their deaths, attempts are made to
convert them into harmless icons, to canonise them, so to speak, to
render a certain homage to their names ...” in order thus the more
safely to betray them in action. The present epigones demand that Lenin
be acknowledged infallible in order the more easily to extend the same
dogma to themselves.[1]

What characterised Lenin as a statesman was a combination of bold
perspectives with a meticulous estimation of tiny facts and symptoms.
Lenin’s isolation did not prevent him from defining with incomparable
penetration the fundamental stages and turns of the movement, but it
deprived him of the possibility of making timely estimates of episodic
factors and temporary changes. The political situation was in general so
favourable to an insurrection as to admit several different
possibilities of victory. If Lenin had been in Petrograd and had carried
through at the beginning of October his decision in favour of an
immediate insurrection without reference to the Congress of Soviets, he
would undoubtedly have given the carrying out of his own plan a
political setting which would have reduced its disadvantageous features
to a minimum. But it is at least equally probable that he would himself
in that case have come round to the plan actually carried out.

We have given in a separate chapter our estimate of the rôle of Lenin in
the general strategy of the revolution. To point our idea in regard to
Lenin’s tactical proposals we will add that without Lenin’s pressure,
without his urgings, his suggestions, his variant plans, it would have
been infinitely more difficult to get over on to the road toward
insurrection. Had Lenin been in Smolny during the critical weeks, the
general leadership of the insurrection – and that not only in Petrograd
but Moscow – would have been on a considerably higher level. But Lenin
as an “emigré,” could not take the place of Lenin in Smolny.

Lenin himself felt most keenly of all the inadequacy of his tactical
orientation. He wrote on September 24th in _Rabochy Put_: “The growth of
a new revolution is obviously in progress – we know little unfortunately
of the breadth and rapidity of this growth.” These words are both a
reproach to the party leaders and a complaint of his own lack of
information. When recalling in his letter the most important rules of
insurrection Lenin did not forget to add: “This is all approximate of
course and merely for illustration.” On the 8th of October, Lenin wrote
to the Northern Regional Congress of Soviets: “I will try to appear with
my advice from the sidelines In case the probable insurrection of the
workers and soldiers of Petersburg ... soon takes place, but it has not
yet taken place.” Lenin began his polemic against Zinoviev and Kamenev
with these words. “A publicist set somewhat aside by the will of destiny
from the main line of history constantly incurs the risk of coming in
late or being uninformed, especially when his writings are delayed in
publication.” Here again a complaint against his isolation together with
a reproach to the editors who had delayed the publicist of those
articles which they judged too incisive, or had thrown out the
prickliest passages. A week before the insurrection Lenin wrote in a
conspirative letter to the members of the party: “As to the raising of
the question of insurrection now, so near to the 20th of October, I
cannot judge _from a distance_ just how much of the thing has been
spoiled by the strike-breaking performance (of Zinoviev and Kamenev) in
the non-party press.” The words “from a distance” are underlined by
Lenin himself.

But how does the epigone school explain the disaccord between the
tactical proposals of Lenin and the actual course of the insurrection in
Petrograd? It gives to the conflict an anonymous and formless character;
or it passes by the disagreements altogether, declaring them unworthy of
attention; or it tries to refute facts indestructibly established; or it
puts the name Trotsky where Lenin was talking about the Central
Committee as a whole or the opponents of insurrection within the Central
Committee; or, finally, it combines all these methods, not bothering
about whether they are mutually consistent or not.

“The conduct of the October insurrection,” writes Stalin, “may be
considered a model of (Bolshevik) strategy. To transgress this
requirement (the correct choice of the moment) leads to a dangerous
mistake called ‘loss of tempo,’ when the party falls behind the course
of events or runs ahead, giving rise to a danger of failure. The attempt
of one group of the comrades to begin the insurrection with the arrest
of the Democratic Conference in August 1917 must be considered an
example of this ‘loss of tempo,’ an example of how not to choose the
moment of insurrection.” The designation “one group of the comrades” in
these lines means Lenin. Nobody but Lenin proposed that the insurrection
begin with the arrest of the Democratic Conference, and nobody supported
his proposal. Stalin recommends the tactical plan of Lenin as “an
example of how not to choose the moment of insurrection.” But the
anonymous form of his account permits Stalin at the same time to deny
flatly that there was any disagreement between Lenin and the Central
Committee.

Yaroslavsky has a still simpler way of getting out of the difficulty.
“It is not a question of particulars, of course,” he writes, “it is not
a question whether the insurrection began in Moscow or Petrograd.” The
thing is that the whole course of events demonstrated “the correctness
of Lenin’s line, the correctness of the line of our party.” This
ingenious historian simplifies his task to an extraordinary degree. That
October verified the strategy of Lenin, and demonstrated in particular
how important had been his April victory over the ruling stratum of “old
Bolsheviks,” is indubitable. But if in a general way there is no
question about where to begin, when to begin, and how to begin, then, to
be sure, nothing is left of the episodic disagreements with Lenin – or
for that matter of tactics in general.

In John Reed’s book there is a story that on the 21st of October the
leaders of the Bolsheviks held a “second historic conference” at which,
as Reed was told, Lenin said: “The 24th of October is too soon to act.
We must have an All-Russian basis for the insurrection, and on the 24th
not all the delegates will have come to the Congress. On the other hand,
the 26th will be too late to act ... We must act on the 25th, the day of
the opening of the Congress.” Reed was an extraordinarily keen observer,
able to transcribe upon the pages of his book the feelings and passions
of the deciding days of the revolution. It was for this reason that
Lenin in his day desired that the incomparable chronicle of Reed be
distributed in millions of copies in all the countries of the world. But
work done in the heat of events, notes made in corridors, on the
streets, beside campfires, conversations and fragmentary phrases caught
on the wing, and that too with the need of a translator – all these
things made particular mistakes unavoidable. This story of a session of
October 21st is one of the most obvious mistakes in Reed’s book. The
argument about the need of an “All-Russian soviet foundation” for the
insurrection could not possibly belong to Lenin, for Lenin more than
once described the running after such a foundation as nothing more or
less than “complete idiocy or complete betrayal.” Lenin could not have
said that the 24th was too early, for ever since the end of September he
had considered inadmissible a postponement of the insurrection for one
unnecessary day. It might come too late, he said, but “in that matter it
is now impossible to be premature.” However, aside from these political
considerations – decisive enough in themselves – Reed’s story is refuted
by the simple fact that on the 21st there was no “second historic
conference” of any kind. Such a conference could not fail to leave
traces in the documents and memories of the other participants. There
were only two conferences with Lenin present: on the 10th and the 16th.
Reed could not have known this. But the documents since published leave
no place for the “historic session” of October 21st. The epigone
historians have not hesitated, however, to include the obviously
erroneous testimony of Reed in all the official publications. By this
means they have achieved a specious calendar-coincidence of Lenin’s
directives with the actual course of events. To be sure, in doing this
the official historians put Lenin in the position of incomprehensibly
and hopelessly contradicting himself. But essentially, you must
understand, they are not here concerned about Lenin. The epigones have
simply converted Lenin into their own historic pseudonym, and are
unceremoniously making use of him in order to establish their own
infallibility _ex post facto_.

But the official historians go even farther than this in the business of
driving facts into the required line of march. Thus Yaroslavsky writes
in his history of the party: “At the session of the Central Committee on
the 24th of October, the last session before the insurrection, Lenin was
present.” The officially published minutes, containing a complete list
of those present, testify that Lenin was absent. “Lenin and Kamenev were
delegated to negotiate with the Left Social Revolutionaries,” writes
Yaroslavsky. The minutes say that this task was allotted to Kamenev and
Berezin. But it ought to be obvious without any minutes that the Central
Committee would not have put upon Lenin this secondary “diplomatic”
task. That decisive session of the Central Committee took place in the
morning. Lenin did not arrive at Smolny until night. A member of the
Petrograd committee, Sveshnikov, relates how Lenin “went out somewhere
in the evening (of the 24th) leaving a note in his room stating that he
had gone at such and such a time. When we learned this we were
frightened to death for Ilych.” Only “late in the evening” did it become
known in the district that Lenin had gone to the Military Revolutionary
Committee.

Most surprising of all, however, is the fact that Yaroslavsky ignores a
political and human document of first-class importance: a letter to the
leaders of the districts written by Lenin during the hours when the open
insurrection had already essentially begun. “Comrades! I am writing
these lines on the evening of the 24th ... With all my power I want to
convince the comrades that everything now hangs upon a thread, that
questions are now in order which will not be decided by conferences, not
by congresses (even though congresses of soviets) but solely by the
people, by the mass, by the struggle of the armed masses. It is
necessary at any possible cost this very evening, this very night, to
arrest the government, disarming (vanquishing if they resist) the
junkers, etc. ...” Lenin feared to such an extent the irresolution of
the Central Committee, that he was trying at the very last moment to
organise a pressure on it from below. “It is necessary,” he writes,
“that all districts, all regiments, all forces mobilise on the instant
and send delegations immediately to the Military Revolutionary
Committee, to the Central Committee of the Bolsheviks, with this
insistent demand: In no case leave the power in the hands of Kerensky
and Co. until the 25th, not in any case – but settle the thing today
without fail, this evening or night.” While Lenin was writing these
lines, the regiments and districts he was summoning to mobilise for
pressure on the Military Revolutionary Committee were already mobilised
by the Military Revolutionary Committee for the seizure of the city and
the overthrow of the government. From this letter – every line of which
quivers with anxiety and passion – it is at least evident that Lenin
could not have proposed on the 21st to defer the insurrection until the
25th, nor have been present at the morning session of the 24th when it
was decided to take the offensive immediately.

There is in this letter nevertheless a puzzling element. How could it
happen that Lenin, in hiding in the Vyborg district, did not know until
evening about a decision of such exceptional importance? From the
account of Sveshnikov – as also from other sources – it is evident that
communications with Lenin were kept up during that day through Stalin.
It can only be assumed that, not having appeared at the morning session
of the Central Committee, Stalin also did not know until evening of the
decision adopted.

The immediate cause of Lenin’s alarm may have been the rumours
consciously and persistently circulated during that day from Smolny,
that until the decision of the Congress of Soviets no decisive steps
would be taken. On the evening of that day, at an emergency session of
the Petrograd Soviet, Trotsky said, in his report on the activities of
the Military Revolutionary Committee “An armed conflict today or
tomorrow is not included in our plan – on the threshold of the
All-Russian Congress of Soviets. We think that the Congress will carry
out our slogan with greater power and authority. But if the government
wants to use that span of life which still remains to it – 24, 48 or 72
hours – in order to take the offensive against us, we will answer with a
counter-offensive, blow for blow, steel against iron.” Such was the
_leitmotif_ of that whole day. These defensive announcements had for
their purpose to lull at the last moment before the blow the none too
lively vigilance of the enemy. It was in all probability this manoeuvre
which gave Dan his grounds for assuring Kerensky on the night before the
25th that the Bolsheviks had no intention at all of making an immediate
insurrection. But on the other hand, Lenin too, if one of these sedative
declarations from Smolny happened to reach him, may, in his state of
tension and distrust, have taken a military trick for good money.

Ruses form a necessary element of the art of war. It is a bad ruse,
however, which may incidentally deceive one’s own camp. Had it been a
question of summoning masses wholesale into the streets, those words
about the next “72 hours” might have proven a fatal act. But on the 24th
the uprising no longer had need of any general revolutionary summons.
The armed detachments designated for the seizure of the principal points
of the capital were under arms and awaiting from the commanders, who
were in telephone communication with the nearest revolutionary
headquarters, the signal to attack. In these circumstances the
double-edged ruse of the revolutionary headquarters was entirely in
place.

Whenever the official investigators run into an unpleasant document they
change its address. Thus Yakovlev writes: “The Bolsheviks did not
surrender to ‘constitutional illusions,’ but rejected the proposals of
Trotsky to accommodate the insurrection necessarily to the Second
Congress of Soviets, and seized the power before the opening of the
Congress of Soviets.” Just what proposal of Trotsky is here spoken of,
where and when it was considered, what Bolsheviks rejected it – of this
the author has nothing to say, and not accidentally. We should search in
vain among the minutes, or among any memoirs whatever, for any
indication of a proposal of Trotsky to “accommodate the insurrection
necessarily to the Second Congress of Soviets.” The ground of this
assertion of Yakovlev is a slightly conventionalised misunderstanding
long ago explained away by no other than Lenin himself.

As is evident from memoirs published long ago, Trotsky had more than
once since the beginning of September pointed out to those opposed to
insurrection that appointing the date for the Congress of Soviets was
for the Bolsheviks equivalent to appointing the insurrection. This did
not mean, of course, that the uprising must not occur except upon the
decision of the Congress of Soviets – there could be no talk of such
childish formalism. It was a question of the outside date, of the
impossibility of deferring it to an indefinite time after the congress.
Through whom and in what form these disputes in the Central Committee
reached Lenin, is not clear from the documents. An interview with
Trotsky, who was too much in view of the enemy, would have been too
great a risk for Lenin. In his attitude of caution at that time he may
therefore have feared that Trotsky would place his emphasis upon the
Congress and not upon the insurrection, or in any case that he would not
put up the necessary resistance to the “constitutional illusions” of
Zinoviev and Kamenev. Lenin may have been anxious also about the new
members of the Central Committee little known to him, the former
Mezhrayontsi (or fusionists), Joffé and Uritzky. There is direct
evidence of this in a speech of Lenin at a session of the Petrogard
committee on November 1st after the victory. “The question was raised at
the session (of October 10th) about an offensive. I had fears of
opportunism from the side of the internationalist-fusionists, but these
were dissipated; in our party, however, (certain old) members (of the
Central Committee) did not agree. This grieved me deeply.” According to
his own words, Lenin became convinced on the 10th that not only Trotsky,
but also Joffé and Uritzky, who were under Trotsky’s immediate
influence, were decisively in favour of insurrection. The question of
dates in general was raised for the first time at that session. When,
then, and by whom, was “a proposal of Trotsky” not to begin the
insurrection without a preliminary decision of the Congress of Soviets
rejected? As though with a special view to enlarge still further the
radius of confusion, the official investigators, with their references
to an apocryphal decision of October 21st, attribute, as we have seen,
exactly the same proposal to Lenin.

At this point Stalin bursts into the argument with a new version which
refutes Yakovlev, but along with him also much more. It seems, according
to Stalin, that the postponement of the insurrection to the day of the
Congress – that is, to the 25th – met no intrinsic objection from Lenin,
but the thing was spoiled by the publication in advance of the date of
insurrection. Here let us give the floor, however, to Stalin himself:
“The mistake of the Petrograd Soviet in openly designating and
publishing abroad the date of the insurrection (October 25th) could not
be corrected except by an actual insurrection before this legal date of
insurrection.” This assertion is disarming in its inconsistency. As
though in those disputes with Lenin it was a question of choosing
between the 24th and 25th of October! As a matter of fact Lenin wrote
almost a month before the insurrection: “To wait for the Congress of
Soviets is complete idiocy for it means letting weeks pass. But weeks
and even days now decide everything.” Where, and when, and from which
side, did the Soviet publish abroad the date of the insurrection? It is
difficult even to invent motives which might induce it to perform so
nonsensical an act. In reality it was not the insurrection, but the
opening of the Congress of Soviets, which was publicly and in advance
set for the 25th, and this was done not by the Petrograd Soviet but by
the compromisist Central Executive Committee. From this fact, and not
from a pretended indiscretion of the Soviet, certain inferences were to
be drawn by the enemy: The Bolsheviks, if they do not intend to retire
from the scene, must attempt to seize the power at the moment of the
Congress. “It flowed from the logic of things,” we wrote subsequently,
“that we appointed the insurrection for October 25th. The thing was so
understood by the whole bourgeois press.” Stalin has converted his
confused recollection of this “logic of things” into an “indiscreet”
publishing abroad of the day of the insurrection. It is thus that
history is being written.

On the second anniversary of the revolution the author of this book,
referring in the sense just explained, to the fact that “the October
insurrection was, so to speak, appointed in advance for a definite date,
for October 25th, and was accomplished upon exactly that date,” added:
We should seek in vain in history for another example of an insurrection
which was accommodated in advance by the course of things to a definite
date. That assertion was erroneous: The insurrection in Paris of August
10, 1792, was also appointed approximately a week in advance for a
definite date, and also not through indiscretion but through the logic
of events.

On August 3 the Legislative Assembly resolved that the petitions of the
Paris sections demanding the overthrow of the king should be taken up on
the 9th. “In thus naming the day of the debate,” writes Jaurés, who has
observed many things which escape the attention of the old historians,
“it also named the day of the insurrection.” Danton, the leader of the
sections, took a defensive position: “if a revolution breaks out,” he
insistently declared, “it will be an answer to the treachery of the
government.” This handing over of the question by the sections to the
consideration of the Legislative Assembly was by no means a
“constitutional illusion” It was merely a method of preparing an
insurrection, and therewith a legal cover for it. The sections, as is
well known, rose in support of their position at the signal of the fire
gong with arms in their hands.

The traits of similarity in these two revolutions separated by an
interval of 125 years, are by no means accidental. Both insurrections
took place not at the beginning of a revolution, but in its second
stage, a fact which made them politically far more conscious and
deliberate. In both cases the revolutionary crisis had reached a high
stage of maturity; the masses were well aware of the irrevocableness and
close approach of the uprising. The demand for unity of action forced
them to concentrate their attention upon a definite “legal” date as the
focus of the approaching events. The leaders subordinated themselves to
this logic of the mass movement. When already in command of the
political situation, with the victory already almost in their hands,
they adopted what seemed to be a defensive position: Provoking a
weakened enemy, they laid upon him in advance the responsibility for the
approaching conflict. It is in this way that insurrection takes place at
a “date appointed in advance.”

These assertions of Stalin, so striking in their inappropriateness – a
number of them have been cited in the preceding chapters – show how
little he has thought over the events of 1917 in their inner connection,
and what summary traces they have left in his memory. How shall we
explain this? It is well known that people make history without
understanding its laws, just as they digest food without understanding
the physiology of digestion. But it would seem that this ought not to
apply to political leaders – above all to leaders of a party acting on a
programme grounded in science. However, it is a fact that many
revolutionists, having taken part in a revolution in prominent
positions, reveal very soon after an inability to comprehend the inner
meaning of the thing which happened with their direct participation. The
extraordinary abundant literature of epigonism gives the impression that
these colossal events roll over human brains and crush them as a steam
roller would crush arms and legs. To a certain degree this is true; an
excessive psychical tension does quickly consume people. Another
circumstance, however, is far more important. A victorious revolution
radically changes the situation of yesterday’s revolutionists. It lulls
their scientific curiosity, reconciles them to rubber-stamp phrases,
moves them to estimate past days under the influence of the new
interests. Thus a web of bureaucratic legend more and more thickly
obliterates the real configuration of events.

In 1924 the author of this book, in his work entitled _Lessons of
October_, tried to explain why Lenin in leading the party to
insurrection was compelled to struggle so violently against the right
wing represented by Zinoviev and Kamenev. Stalin objected to this: “Were
there disagreements at that time in our party? Yes, there were. But
these were exclusively practical in character, not withstanding the
assertions of Trotsky, who is trying to discover a ‘right’ and ‘left’
wing of the party ...” “Trotsky asserts that in the person of Kamenev
and Zinoviev we had in October a right wing of our party ... How did it
happen that the disagreement with Kamenev and Zinoviev lasted only a few
days? ... There was no split and the disagreements lasted only a few
days because, and only because, we had in the person of Kamenev and
Zinoviev Leninist-Bolsheviks.” Did not Stalin in exactly the same way
seven years earlier – five days before the insurrection – accuse Lenin
of excessive sharpness, and assert that Zinoviev and Kamenev stood upon
the common ground of “Bolshevism”? Throughout all Stalin’s zig-zags
there is a certain thread of consistency, resulting not from a
thought-out philosophy but from the general mould of his character.
Seven years after the revolution, just as on the eve of the insurrection
he conceives the depth of the disagreements in the party in the same
vague way.

The touchstone of a revolutionary political leader is the question of
the state. In their letter against the insurrection of October 11th
Zinoviev and Kamenev wrote: “With correct tactics we can win a third,
yes and more than a third, of the seats in the Constituent Assembly ...
The Constituent Assembly plus the Soviet, that is the combined type of
state institution toward which we are travelling.” The “correct tactics”
meant a renunciation of the conquest of power by the proletariat. The
“combined type” of state meant a combination of the Constituent
Assembly, in which the bourgeois parties would constitute two-thirds,
with the soviets, where the party of the proletariat was in command.
This type of combined state subsequently formed the basis of
Hilferding’s idea of including the soviets in the Weimar constitution.
General Lisingen, commandant of the Mark of Brandenburg, in forbidding
the formation of soviets on November 7, 1918, on the ground that
“institutions of this kind conflict with the existing state order,”
showed at least a great deal more penetration than the Austro-Marxists
and the German Independent Party.

Lenin gave warning in April that the Constituent Assembly would sink
into a subordinate place. However, neither he himself nor the party as a
whole ever during the year 1917 formally renounced the idea of
democratic representation, it being impossible to declare confidently in
advance how far the revolution would go. It was assumed that having
seized the power, the soviets would succeed soon enough in winning the
army and the peasants so that the Constituent Assembly – especially
after a broadening of the electorate (Lenin proposed in particular to
lower the voting age to 18) – would give a majority to the Bolsheviks,
and merely supply a formal sanction to the soviet régime. In this sense
Lenin sometimes spoke of a “combined type” of state – that is, of an
accommodation of the Constituent Assembly to the soviet dictatorship.
The thing actually developed along different lines. In spite of Lenin’s
insistence, the Central Committee could not make up its mind after the
conquest of power to postpone for a few weeks the call for the
Constituent Assembly – although without this it was impossible either to
broaden the electorate or, what is most important, give the peasants a
chance to re-define their relation to the Social Revolutionaries and the
Bolsheviks. The Constituent Assembly came into conflict with the Soviet
and was dissolved. The hostile camps represented in the Constituent
Assembly entered upon a civil war which lasted for years. In the system
of soviet dictatorship not even a secondary place was found for
democratic representation. The question of the “combined type” was
withdrawn in fact. Theoretically, however, it retained all its
importance, as was subsequently proven by the experiment of the
Independent Party in Germany.

In 1924 when Stalin, obedient to the demands of an inner-party struggle,
first attempted to make an independent appraisal of the past, he came to
the defence of Zinoviev’s “combined state,” supporting himself in this
with a reference to Lenin. “Trotsky does not understand ... the
peculiarities of Bolshevik tactics when he snorts at the theory of a
combination of the Constituent Assembly with the soviets as
Hilferdingism,” wrote Stalin in his characteristic manner. “Zinoviev,
whom Trotsky is ready to turn into a Hilferdingist, wholly and
completely shares the point of view of Lenin.” This means that seven
years after the theoretical and political battles of 1917, Stalin had
completely failed to understand that with Zinoviev as with Hilferding it
was a question of bringing into accord and reconciling the powers of two
classes, the bourgeoisie through the Constituent Assembly and the
proletariat through the soviets, whereas with Lenin it was question of
combining two institutions expressing the power of one and the same
class, the proletariat. The idea of Zinoviev, as Lenin explained at the
time, was opposed to the very foundation of the Marxian teaching about
the state. “With the power in the hands of the soviets,” wrote Lenin
against Zinoviev and Kamenev on October 17th, “the ‘combined type’ would
be accepted by everybody. But to drag in under the title ‘combined type’
a refusal to transfer the power to the soviets ... is it possible to
find a parliamentary expression for that?” We see, then, that in order
to evaluate this idea of Zinoviev, which Stalin declares to be “a
peculiarity of Bolshevik tactics” supposedly not understood by Trotsky,
Lenin found it difficult even to find a parliamentary expression,
although he was not distinguished by an excessive squeamishness in these
matters. A little over a year later Lenin wrote, applying the same
thought to Germany: “The attempt to combine the dictatorship of the
bourgeoisie with the dictatorship of the proletariat is a complete
renunciation both of Marxism and of socialism in general.” Could Lenin
indeed have written otherwise?

The “combined type” of Zinoviev was essentially an attempt to eternalise
the dual power – that is, a revival of the experiment completely
exhausted by the Mensheviks. And if Stalin in 1924 was still standing on
the same ground with Zinoviev on this question, it means that in spite
of his adherence to the theses of Lenin, he has nevertheless remained at
least half-way true to that philosophy of dual power which he himself
developed in his report of March 29, 1917: “The rôles have been divided.
The Soviet has in fact taken the initiative in the revolutionary
transformation ... The Provisional Government has in fact taken the rôle
of fortifier of the conquests of the revolutionary people.” The mutual
relations between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat are here defined
as a simple division of labour.

During the last week before the insurrection Stalin was obviously
manoeuvring between Lenin, Trotsky and Sverdlov, on the one hand, and
Kamenev and Zinoviev on the other. That editorial declaration of the
20th which defended the opponents of insurrection against Lenin’s blows,
could not – especially from the pen of Stalin – have been accidental. In
questions of intra-party manoeuvring he was a past master. Just as in
April, after Lenin’s arrival, Stalin cautiously pushed Kamenev forward,
and himself waited on the sidelines in silence before again joining
battle, so now on the eve of the insurrection he was obviously making
ready, in case of possible failure, a retreat along the Kamenev and
Zinoviev line. Stalin moved along that road up to the limit beyond which
it would have entailed a break with the majority of the Central
Committee. That prospect frightened him. At the session of the 21st
Stalin repaired his half-destroyed bridge to the left wing of the
Central Committee by moving that Lenin prepare the theses upon
fundamental questions for the Congress of Soviets and that Trotsky make
the political report. Both these motions were unanimously adopted.
Having thus insured himself on the left, Stalin at the last moment
withdrew into the shadow: he would wait. All the newest historians,
beginning with Yaroslavsky, carefully steer around the fact that Stalin
was not present at the session of the Central Committee in Smolny on the
24th, and did not take upon himself any function in the organisation of
the insurrection! Nevertheless this fact, indisputably established by
the documents, characterises better than anything else the political
personality of Stalin and his methods.

Since 1924 innumerable efforts have been made to fill up the vacant
space representing October in the political biography of Stalin. This
has been done by means of two pseudonyms: the “Central Committee” and
the “practical centre.” We shall not understand either the mechanics of
the October leadership, or the mechanics of the latest epigone legends,
unless we now we approach a little more closely the personal staff of
the Central Committee of that time.

Lenin, the recognised leader, authoritative for all but, as the facts
show, far from a “dictator” in the party, for a period of four months
had taken no direct part in the work of the Central Committee, and upon
a number of tactical questions was in sharp opposition to it. The most
prominent leaders in the old Bolshevik nucleus, standing at a great
distance from Lenin but also from those who came after them, were
Zinoviev and Kamenev. Zinoviev was in hiding as well as Lenin. Before
October Zinoviev and Kamenev had come into determined opposition to
Lenin and the majority of the Central Committee. That removed them both
from the ranks. Of the old Bolsheviks, Sverdlov had come swiftly to the
front, but he was then still a newcomer in the Central Committee. His
organising talent developed fully only later during the years of the
construction of the soviet state. Dzershinsky, who had recently joined
the party, was distinguished by his revolutionary temperament, but made
no pretence to independent political authority. Bukharin, Rykov, and
Nogin were living in Moscow. Bukharin was considered a gifted but
unreliable theoretician. Rykov and Nogin were opponents of the
insurrection. Lomov, Bubnov and Miliutin, were hardly counted upon by
anybody in deciding big questions; moreover Lomov was working in Moscow,
Miliutin was on the road. Joffé and Uritzky had been closely associated
in their émigré past with Trotsky, and were working in agreement with
him. The young Smilga was working in Finland. This composition and inner
situation of the Central Committee sufficiently explains why until
Lenin’s return to direct leadership the party headquarters did not play
and could not play even in the slightest degree the rôle it was to
assume subsequently. The minutes show that the most important questions
– that about the Congress of Soviets, the garrison, the Military
Revolutionary Committee – were not discussed in advance in the Central
Committee and did not issue from its initiative, but arose in Smolny out
of the practical activity of the Soviet, and were worked over in the
circle of soviet leaders – oftenest with the participation of Sverdlov.

Stalin, generally speaking, did not show up in Smolny. The more decisive
the pressure of the revolutionary masses became and the greater the
scope assumed by events, the more Stalin would keep in the background,
the paler would become his political thought, the weaker his initiative.
It was so in 1905; it was so in the fall of 1917. The same thing has
been repeated subsequently every time great historic questions have
arisen on the world arena. When it became clear that the publication of
the minutes of the Central Committee for 1917 only laid bare an October
gap in the biography of Stalin, the bureaucratic historians created the
legend of the “practical centre.” An explanation of this story – widely
popularised during these last years – becomes a necessary element of any
critical history of the October revolution.

At the conference of the Central Committee in Lesny on the 16th of
October, one of the arguments against forcing the insurrection was to
point out that “we have not yet even a centre.” At Lenin’s suggestion
the Central Committee decided straightway, at that hasty sitting in a
back corner, to make good the lack. The minutes read: “The Central
Committee organises a military revolutionary centre consisting of the
following members: Sverdlov, Stalin, Bubnov, Uritzky and Dzerzhinsky.
This centre becomes a constituent part of the revolutionary Soviet
committee.” This resolution, which everybody had forgotten, was first
discovered in the archives m 1924. It began to be quoted as a most
important historic document. Thus Yaroslavsky wrote: “This organ (and no
other) guided all the organisations which took part in the insurrection
(the revolutionary military units, the Red Guard).” Those words “and no
other” reveal frankly enough the goal of this whole _ex post facto_
construction. But Stalin has written still more frankly: “In the staff
of the practical centre summoned to lead the insurrection, Trotsky,
strangely enough ... was not included.” In order to be in a position to
develop this idea, Stalin was compelled to omit the second half of the
resolution: “This centre becomes a constituent part of the revolutionary
Soviet committee.” If you bear in mind that the Military Revolutionary
Committee was headed by Trotsky, it is not hard to understand why the
Central Committee was content with naming the new workers who were to
help those already standing in the centre of the work. Neither Stalin
nor Yaroslavsky has ever explained, moreover, why the “practical centre”
was first remembered in 1924.

Between the 16th and 20th of October, as we have seen, the insurrection
conclusively took the soviet road. The Military Revolutionary Committee
from the moment of its birth had the direct leadership not only of the
garrison, but of the Red Guard, which from October 13th on was subject
to the Petrograd Executive Committee. No place remained for any other
directing centre. Neither in the minutes of the Central Committee, nor
in any other material whatever relating to the second half of October,
can you discover the slightest trace of the activity of this supposedly
so important institution. Nobody makes a report of its labours; no tasks
are allotted to it: its very name is never pronounced by anybody,
although its members are present at sessions of the Central Committee,
and take part in the decision of questions which ought to come directly
within the competence of a “practical centre.”

Sveshnikov, a member of the Petrograd committee of the party, who was
almost continually on communication duty in Smolny during the second
half of October, must at least have known where to go for practical
directions upon the problems of the insurrection. Here is what he
writes: “The Military Revolutionary Committee was born: from the moment
of its birth the various elements of the revolutionary activity of the
proletariat acquired a guiding centre.” Kayurov, well known to us from
the February days, tells how the Vyborg district tensely awaited the
signal from Smolny: “At nightfall (of the 24th) came the answer of the
Military Revolutionary Committee – prepare the Red Guard for battle.”
Kayurov at the moment of starting the open insurrection knew nothing of
any other centre. One could cite to the same effect the memoirs of
Sadovsky, Podvoisky, Antonov, Mekhonoshin, Blagonravov and other direct
participants in the uprising. Not one of them remembers that “practical
centre” which according to Yaroslavsky is supposed to have guided all
the organisations. And finally even Yaroslavsky confines himself in his
history to a bare statement of the creation of the centre: of its
activity he has not a word to say. The conclusion follows of itself: A
directing centre of which those who were directed know nothing, does not
exist in the eyes of history.

But still more direct evidence of the fictitiousness of the “practical
centre” can be adduced. At a session of the Central Committee on the
20th of October, Sverdlov read a declaration of the Military
Organisation of the Bolsheviks, containing, as is evident from the
debate, a demand that the leaders of the Military Organisation be
brought in when questions of the insurrection were being decided. Joffé
moved that this demand be rejected: “Everybody who wants to work can
join the revolutionary centre under the Soviet.” Trotsky offered a
milder formulation of Joffé’s motion: “All our organisations can join
the revolutionary centre and there take up in our faction all questions
interesting them.” The decision, which was adopted in this form, shows
that there was but one revolutionary centre, that affiliated with the
Soviet – that is, the Military Revolutionary Committee. If any other
centre for leading the insurrection had existed, somebody ought at least
to have remembered about its existence. But nobody remembered it – not
even Sverdlov, whose name stood first on the staff of the “practical
centre.”

The minutes of October 24th are, if possible, still more instructive
upon this point. During the hours immediately preceding the seizure of
the city, not only was there no talk of the “practical centre” of the
insurrection, but the very resolution creating it had so completely
passed into oblivion in the whirlwind of the eight days intervening,
that, upon a motion of Trotsky, Sverdlov, Dzerzhinsky and Bubnov, were
appointed to be “at the disposal of the Military Revolutionary
Committee” – those very members of the Central Committee, who, according
to the decision of October 16th, should already and without this motion
have become a part of the staff of the Military Revolutionary Committee.
The possibility of such a misunderstanding is explained by the fact that
the Central Committee, having barely emerged from its underground
existence, was still in organisation and methods far from the
all-powerful, all-embracing chancellery of recent years. The main part
of the equipment of the Central Committee was carried by Sverdlov in his
side-pocket.

In those hot times no few episodic institutions were created during the
last moments of a session and immediately drowned in oblivion. At the
session of the Central Committee on October 7th there was created “a
bureau of information on the struggle with the counterrevolution.” That
was the cipher-designation of the first organ created for working on the
problems of the insurrection. As to its personnel the minutes read:
“Three are elected from the Central Committee to the bureau: Trotsky,
Sverdlov, Bubnov, and they are directed to create the bureau.” Did this
first “practical centre” of the insurrection exist? Obviously not, since
it has left no traces. The political bureau created at the session of
the 10th also proved unviable and revealed itself in absolutely nothing:
doubtful if it met even once. In order that the Petrograd organisation
of the party, the direct leader of the work in the districts, should not
become separated from the Military Revolutionary Committee, Trotsky, at
the suggestion of Lenin, who liked a system of double or triple
insurance, was included for the critical week in the highest
administrative organ of the Petrograd committee. However, this decision
also remained only a paper one: never one session was held with Trotsky
present. The so-called “practical centre” met the same fate. As an
independent institution it was never intended to exist but it did not
exist even as an auxiliary organ.

Of the five men appointed to the staff of the “centre,” Dzerzhinsky and
Uritzky entered completely into the work of the Military Revolutionary
Committee only after the overturn. Sverdlov played an immense rôle in
connecting the Military Revolutionary Committee with the party. Stalin
took no part at all in the work of the Military Revolutionary Committee
and never appeared at its meetings. In the innumerable documents and
testimonies of witnesses and participants, as also in the most recent
memoirs, Stalin’s name is not once to be met with.

In the official compendium of the history of the revolution a special
volume is devoted to October, grouping, on the basis of days, all the
factual information from newspapers, minutes, archives, memoirs of
participants, etc. Notwithstanding that this compendium was published in
1925, when the revision of the past was already in full swing, the index
at the back of the book accompanies Stalin’s name with only one number,
and when we open the book at the corresponding page we find again this
same text of the decision of the Central Committee about the “practical
centre,” with the mention of Stalin as one of its five members. We
should seek in vain in that volume – crowded as it is with even
third-class materials – for any information as to just what work Stalin
did in October, whether on the stage of the “centre” or off it.

To define the political physiognomy of Stalin in one word, he was always
a “centrist” in Bolshevism. That is, he tended organically to occupy an
intermediate position between Marxism and opportunism. But this was a
centrist who feared Lenin. Any fragment of Stalin’s orbit up to 1924 can
always be explained as a product of two forces: his own centrist
character and the revolutionary pressure of Lenin. The worthlessness of
centrism should reveal itself most fully under the test of great
historic events. “Our situation is self-contradictory,” said Stalin on
October 20th in justification of Zinoviev and Kamenev. In reality the
self-contradictory character of centrism made it impossible for Stalin
to occupy any independent position in the revolution. On the other hand,
those traits which paralysed him at the great turning point of history –
watchful waiting and empirical manoeuvring – must necessarily assure him
a genuine ascendancy when the mass movement begins to ebb and the
functionary comes to the front with his zeal to consolidate what has
been attained – that is, primarily to insure his own position against
new disturbances. The functionary, ruling in the name of a revolution,
has need of revolutionary prestige. In his capacity as an “old
Bolshevik,” Stalin proved the most suitable incarnation of this prestige
imaginable. In crowding out the masses the collective functionary says
to them: “It is we who did this for you.” He begins to take a free hand
not only with the present, but also with the past. The
functionary-historian makes over history, repairs biographies, creates
reputations. It was necessary to bureaucratise the revolution before
Stalin could become its crown.

In the personal destiny of Stalin, which has outstanding interest for a
Marxian analysis, we have a new refraction of the law of all
revolutions: the development of a régime created by an uprising
inevitably passes through periods of ebb and flow measured by years, and
in this process the periods of moral reaction bring to the front those
figures who by reason of all their fundamental qualities did not play,
and could not play, a leading rôle in the times of the revolutionary
offensive.

The bureaucratic revision of the history of the party and the revolution
is taking place under Stalin’s direct supervision. The sign-posts of
this work clearly mark off the stages in the development of the soviet
machine. On the 6th of November 1918 (new style), Stalin wrote in an
anniversary article in _Pravda_: “The inspirer of the revolution from
beginning to end was the Central Committee of the party headed by
Comrade Lenin. Vladimir Ilych was then living in Petrograd in a
conspirative apartment in the Vyborg district. On the evening of October
24th he was summoned to Smolny for the general leadership of the
movement. All the work of practical organisation of the insurrection was
conducted under the immediate leadership of the president of the
Petrograd Soviet, Comrade Trotsky. It is possible to declare with
certainty that the swift passing of the garrison to the side of the
Soviet, and the skilful direction of the work of the Military
Revolutionary Committee, the party owes principally and first of all to
Comrade Trotsky. Comrades Antonov and Podvoisky were Comrade Trotsky’s
chief assistants.”

Neither the author of this book nor, we must imagine, Lenin, who was
recovering from a Social Revolutionary bullet, gave attention in those
days to this retrospective distribution of rôles and merits. The article
stood forth in a new light only some years later when it revealed the
fact that Stalin had already, in those difficult autumn months of 1918,
been preparing, still with extraordinary caution, a new picture of the
party leadership in October. “The inspirer of the revolution from
beginning to end was the Central Committee of the party headed by
Comrade Lenin.” That phrase is a polemic against those who considered –
and quite rightly – that the real inspirer of the insurrection was
Lenin, acting to a considerable degree in conflict with the Central
Committee. At that period Stalin was still unable to conceal his own
October waverings otherwise than under the impersonal pseudonym of the
Central Committee. His two following statements – that Lenin was living
in a conspirative apartment in Petrograd, and that he was called to
Smolny on the evening of the 24th for the general leadership of the
movement – were designed to weaken the impression prevailing in the
party that the leader of the insurrection had been Trotsky. The
subsequent phrases dedicated to Trotsky sound in the political acoustics
of today like a panegyric; in reality they were the very least that
Stalin could say. They were what he was compelled to say in order to
disguise his polemical hints. The complex construction and careful
defensive colouring of this “jubilee” article themselves convey no bad
impression of the general opinion prevailing in the party at that time.

In this article, by the way, there is absolutely no mention of the
practical centre. On the contrary, Stalin categorically asserts that
“all the work of practical organisation of the insurrection was
conducted under the immediate leadership of ... Trotsky.” But Trotsky,
we recall, was not a member of the “practical centre.” We have heard,
however, from Yaroslavsky that it was “this organ (and no other) which
guided all the organisations which took part in the insurrection.” The
solution of this self-contradiction is simple: In 1918 the events were
still too fresh in the minds of all, and the attempt to fish up out of
the minutes that resolution about a “centre” which never existed could
not have been successful.

In 1924 when much was already forgotten, Stalin explained in the
following manner why Trotsky was not a member of the “practical centre”:
“We must say that Trotsky played no special rôle in the October
revolution and could not have done so.” In that year Stalin flatly
declared it to be the task of the historians to destroy “the legend of
the special rôle of Trotsky in the October insurrection.” How then does
Stalin reconcile this new version with his own article of 1918? Very
simply: He has forbidden anybody to quote his former article. Historians
who try to steer a middle course between the Stalin of 1918 and the
Stalin of 1924 are promptly expelled from the party.

There exists however more authoritative testimonies than this first
anniversary article of Stalin. In the notes to the official edition of
the works of Lenin, under the word _Trotsky_ we read: “After the
Petrograd Soviet went Bolshevik he was elected its president and in that
capacity organised and led the insurrection of October 25th.” Thus the
“legend of the special rôle” was firmly established in the collected
works of Lenin during the life of their author.

In the official reference books you can follow from year to year this
process of revising the historic material. Thus in 1925, when the
campaign against Trotsky was already in full swing, the official
yearbook, _The Communist Almanac_, could still write: “In the October
revolution Trotsky took the most active and leading part. In October
1917 he was elected president of the Petrograd Revolutionary Committee
which organised the armed insurrection.” In the edition of 1926, in
place of this there occurs a brief neutral remark “In October 1917 was
president of the Leningrad Revolutionary Committee.” Since 1927 the
Stalin school has put forward a brand-new story which has been
incorporated in all the soviet textbooks. Being an opponent of
“socialism in one country,” Trotsky must have been essentially an
opponent of the October revolution, but by good luck there existed the
“practical centre” which carried the thing through to a happy ending!
The ingenious historian has only neglected to explain why the Bolshevik
Soviet elected Trotsky president, and why the same Soviet, guided by the
party, placed Trotsky at the head of the Military Revolutionary
Committee.

Lenin was not credulous – especially in matters which involved the fate
of the revolution. You could never set him at rest with verbal
assurances. At a distance he was inclined to interpret every symptom in
a bad sense. He finally believed that the thing was being rightly
conducted when he saw it with his own eyes – that is, when he arrived in
Smolny. Trotsky tells about this in his recollections published in 1924:
“I remember the enormous impression it made upon Lenin when he learned
that I had called out a company of the Litovsky regiment with a written
order to guarantee the publication of our party and soviet papers ...
Lenin was in rapture, and expressed his feeling in exclamations,
laughter, and rubbing of his hands. Afterward he became more silent,
reflected a moment and said: ‘Well, well – it can be done that way too.
Just take the power.’ I understood that only at that moment had he
finally become reconciled to the fact that we had refused to seize the
power by way of a conspirative plot. Up to the last hour he was fearing
that the enemy would cut off our road and catch us unaware. Only now ...
did he feel at rest and finally sanction the course which events were
taking.”

This story too was subsequently disputed. Nevertheless it has
indestructible support in the objective situation. On the evening of the
24th Lenin experienced a last gust of alarm, which seized him with such
force that he made a belated attempt to mobilise the soldiers and
workers for pressure upon Smolny. How violently his mood must have
changed when in Smolny a few hours later he found out the actual
situation! Is it not obvious that he could not help marking the end of
his anxiety, his direct and indirect reproaches addressed to Smolny, at
least with a few phrases, a few words? There was no need of complicated
explanations. To each of the two meeting face to face in that not
altogether ordinary moment, the sources of the misunderstanding were
perfectly understandable. And now they were dissolved. No use returning
to them. One phrase was enough: “It can be done that way!” That meant:
“Maybe I sometimes went too far in urgency and suspicion, but I guess
you understand ...” Who wouldn’t understand! Lenin was not inclined to
sentimentality. One phrase from him, “It can be done that way,” with a
special kind of smile, was plenty enough to set aside the incidental
misunderstandings of yesterday and firmly tie the knots of confidence.

Lenin’s mood on the 25th reveals itself with utter clarity in the
resolution introduced by him through Volodarsky, in which the
insurrection is described as “in rare degree bloodless and in rare
degree successful.” The fact that Lenin took upon himself this appraisal
of the insurrection, scanty in words as always with him, but very high
in substance, was not an accident It was just he himself, the author of
“advice from the sidelines,” whom he considered most free to pay a
tribute not only to the heroism of the masses, but to the services of
the leaders. It is hardly possible to doubt that Lenin had additional
psychological motives for this. He had continually feared the too slow
course taken by Smolny, and he hastened now to be the first to recognise
its advantages as revealed in action.

From the moment Lenin appeared in Smolny he naturally took his place at
the head of all the work, political, organisational, and technical. On
the 29th an insurrection of junkers took place in Petrograd. Kerensky
was moving against Petrograd at the head of a number of Cossack
squadrons. The Military Revolutionary Committee was confronted with a
task of defence. Lenin guided this work. In his recollections Trotsky
writes: “A swift success is as disarming as a defeat. Never to lose
sight of the underlying thread of events; after each success to say to
yourself, ‘Nothing is yet attained, nothing is yet assured’; five
minutes before a decisive victory to carry on with the same vigilance,
the same energy and the same high pressure, as five minutes before the
beginning of an armed action; five minutes after the victory, and before
the first triumphant cries have died away, to say to yourself, ‘The
conquest is not yet assured, we must not lose a minute’ – such was the
approach, such was the manner of action, such the method of Lenin, such
the organic substance of his political character, his revolutionary
spirit.”

The above-mentioned session of the Petrograd committee on November 1st,
where Lenin spoke of his unjustified fears in regard to the
Mezhrayontzi, was devoted to the question of a coalition government with
the Mensheviks and Social Revolutionaries. The right wing, Zinoviev,
Kamenev, Rykov, Lunarcharsky, Riazanov, Miliutin and others, insisted
upon a coalition after the victory. Lenin and Trotsky spoke decisively
against any coalition which should extend beyond the frame of the Second
Congress of Soviets. “The disagreements,” declared Trotsky, “were pretty
deep before the insurrection – in the Central Committee and wide circles
of our party ... The same thing was said then as now after the
victorious insurrection! We will have, you see, no technical machinery.
The colours were laid on thick then in order to frighten us, just as
they are now, in order to prevent our making use of the victory.” Hand
in hand with Lenin, Trotsky waged against the partisans of coalition the
same struggle which he had waged before against the opponents of
insurrection. Lenin said at that same session: “An accord? I can’t talk
about it seriously. Trotsky long ago said that a union was impossible.
Trotsky understood this, and since that time there has been no better
Bolshevik.”

Among the more important conditions of an accord the Social
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks put forward a demand for the removal from
the government of the two figures most hateful to them – “those
primarily guilty of the October insurrection, Lenin and Trotsky.” The
attitude of the Central Committee and the party to this demand was such
that Kamenev, the extreme partisan of an accord – personally ready, even
for this concession – considered it necessary to declare at the session
of the Central Executive Committee of November 2nd: “It is proposed to
exclude Lenin and Trotsky; that proposal would behead our party, and we
do not accept it.”

The revolutionary point of view – for insurrection and against coalition
with the Compromisers – was called in the workers’ districts “the point
of view of Lenin and Trotsky.” These words, as documents and minutes
testify, became an every day expression. At the moment of crisis within
the Central Committee a large conference of women workers in Petrograd
unanimously adopted a resolution hailing “the policy of the Central
Committee of our party, led by Lenin and Trotsky.” As early as November
1917 Baron Budberg writes in his diary of “The new duumvirs, Lenin and
Trotsky.” When in December a group of Social Revolutionaries decided to
“cut off the head of the Bolsheviks,” “it was clear to them,” according
to Boris Sokolov, one of the conspirators, that “the most pernicious and
important Bolsheviks are Lenin and Trotsky – it is with them we must
begin.” During the years of the civil war those two names were always
spoken inseparably, as though they were one person. Parvus, once a
revolutionary Marxist and afterward a malicious enemy of the October
revolution, wrote in 1919; “Lenin and Trotsky – that is a collective
name for all those who out of idealism have taken the Bolshevik road
...” Rosa Luxemburg, who severely criticised the policy of the October
revolution, applied her criticism alike to Lenin and Trotsky. She wrote:
“Lenin and Trotsky with their friends were the _first_ to give an
example to the world proletariat. And they still remain the _only_ ones
who can exclaim with Hutten: _I dared this!_”. In October 1918 at the
triumphal session of the Central Executive Committee Lenin read a
quotation from the foreign bourgeois press. “The Italian workers,” he
said, “are acting as though they would let nobody but Lenin and Trotsky
travel in Italy.” Such testimonies are innumerable. They recur as a
_leitmotif_ throughout the first years of the soviet régime and the
Communist International. Participants and observers, friends and
enemies, those near and those far away, have tied together the
activities of Lenin and Trotsky in the October revolution with so firm a
knot that the epigone historians will not succeed either in untying it
or chopping it apart.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Note

1. During the Third Congress of the Communist International in order to
soften his blows at certain “ultra-Lefts,” Lenin referred to the fact
that he himself had made “ultra-Left” mistakes, especially while an
émigré, including one during his last “emigration” in Finland in 1917,
when he defended a less expedient plan of insurrection than the one
actually carried out. This reference to his own mistake was made by
Lenin, unless our memory deceives us, also in a letter to the commission
of the congress on German affairs. Unfortunately the archives of the
Communist International are not accessible to us, and the declaration of
Lenin in question has evidently not been published.



VOLUME 3: APPENDIX 2 SOCIALISM IN A SEPARATE COUNTRY?


 

“The industrially more developed country shows the less developed only
the image of its own future.” This statement of Marx which takes its
departure methodologically not from world economy as a whole but from
the single capitalist country as a type, has become less applicable in
proportion as capitalist evolution has embraced all countries regardless
of their previous fate and industrial level. England in her day revealed
the future of France, considerably less of Germany, but not in the least
of Russia and not of India. The Russian Mensheviks, however, took this
conditional statement of Marx unconditionally. Backward Russia, they
said, ought not to rush ahead, but humbly to follow the prepared models.
To this kind of “Marxism” the liberals also agreed.

Another no less popular formula of Marx – “No social formation
disappears before all the productive forces have developed for which it
has room” – takes its departure, on the contrary, not from the country
taken separately, but from the sequence of universal social structures
(slavery, mediævalism, capitalism). The Mensheviks, however, taking this
statement from the point of view of the single state, drew the
conclusion that Russian capitalism has still a long road to travel
before it will reach European or American level. But productive forces
do not develop in a vacuum! You cannot talk of the possibilities of a
national capitalism, and ignore on the one hand the class struggle
developing out of it, or on the other its dependence upon world
conditions. The overthrow of the bourgeoisie by the proletariat grew out
of actual Russian capitalism, thereby reducing to nothing its abstract
economic possibilities. The structure of industry, and also the
character of the class struggle in Russia were determined to a decisive
degree by international conditions. Capitalism had reached a point on
the world arena where it ceased to justify its costs of production –
understanding these not in the commercial but the sociological sense.
Tariffs, militarism, crises, wars, diplomatic conferences and other
scourges, swallow up and squander so much creative energy that in spite
of all achievements in technique there remains no room for the further
growth of prosperity and culture.

The superficially paradoxical fact that the first victim to suffer for
the sins of the world-system was the bourgeoisie of a backward country,
is in reality quite according to the laws of things. Marx had already
indicated its explanation for his epoch: “Violent outbursts take place
sooner in the extremities of the bourgeois organism than the heart,
because here regulation is more possible.” Under the monstrous burdens
of imperialism that state must necessarily fall first which has not yet
accumulated a large national capital, but to which world competition
offers no special privileges. The collapse of Russian capitalism was a
local avalanche in a universal social formation. “A correct appraisal of
our revolution,” said Lenin, “is possible only from an international
point of view.”

We have attributed the October revolution in the last analysis not to
the fact of Russia’s backwardness, but to the law of combined
development. The historical dialectic knows neither naked backwardness
nor chemically pure progressiveness. It is all a question of concrete
correlations. The present-day history of mankind is full of “paradoxes,”
not so colossal as the arising of a proletarian dictatorship in a
backward country, but of similar historic type. The fact that the
students and workers of backward China are eagerly assimilating the
doctrine of materialism, while the labour leaders of civilised England
believe in the magic potency of churchly incantations, proves beyond a
doubt that in certain spheres China has outstripped England. But the
contempt of the Chinese workers for the mediæval dull-wittedness of
Macdonald, does not permit the inference that in her general development
China is higher than Great Britain. The economic and cultural
superiority of the latter can be expressed in exact figures. The
impressiveness of these figures does not however, preclude the
possibility that the workers of China may win the power before the
workers of Great Britain. A dictatorship of the Chinese proletariat in
its turn will be far from entailing the building of socialism within the
boundaries of the Great Chinese Wall. Scholastic, pedantically,
single-track, or too short national criteria are no good in our epoch.
World development forced Russia out of her backwardness and her
Asiaticness. Outside the web of this development, her further destiny
cannot be understood.

The bourgeois revolutions were directed in similar degree against feudal
property relations and against the particularism of the provinces.
Nationalism stood beside liberalism on their liberating banners. Western
humanity long ago wore out such baby-shoes. The productive forces of our
time have outgrown not only the bourgeois forms of property, but also
the boundaries of national states. Liberalism and nationalism have
become in like degree fetters upon world economy. The proletarian
revolution is directed both against private property in the means of
production and against the national splitting-up of world economy. The
struggle of the eastern peoples for independence is included in this
world process and will subsequently merge with it. The creation of a
national socialist society, if such a goal were in a general way
attainable, would mean an extreme reduction of the economic power of
men. But for that very reason it is unattainable. Internationalism is
not an abstract principle but the expression of an economic fact. Just
as liberalism was national, so socialism is international. Starting from
the worldwide division of labour, the task of socialism is to carry the
international exchange of goods and services to its highest development.

No revolution has ever anywhere wholly coincided with the conceptions of
it formed by its participants, nor could it do so. Nevertheless the
ideas and aims of those engaged in the struggle form a very important
constituent element of a revolution. This is especially true of the
October revolution, for never in all the past have the conceptions of a
revolution in the minds of revolutionists approached so closely to the
actual essence of the events as in 1917.

A work on the October revolution would remain unfinished if it did not
answer with all possible historic accuracy the question: how did the
party in the very heat of the events represent to itself the further
development of the revolution, and what did the party expect from it?
This question acquires a greater significance, the more past days become
darkened by the play of new interests. Policies are always seeking
support in the past, and if they do not get it as a voluntary offering
they not infrequently undertake to extract it by force. The present
official policy of the Soviet Union rests upon the theory of “socialism
in a separate country” as the alleged traditional viewpoint of the
Bolshevik party. The younger generations, not only of the Communist
International but indeed of all other parties, are being brought up in
the conviction that the soviet power was won in the name of the creation
of an independent socialist society in Russia. Historic reality has
nothing in common with this myth. Up to 1917 the party never admitted
even the idea that the proletarian revolution might be achieved in
Russia before it was achieved in the west. For the first time in the
April conference, under pressure of circumstances then completely laid
bare, the party recognised as its task the seizure of power. Although
opening a new chapter in the history of Bolshevism, this recognition had
nothing in common with the perspective of an independent socialist
society. On the contrary, the Bolsheviks categorically rejected as a
caricature the idea imputed to them by the Mensheviks of creating a
“peasant socialism” in a backward country. The dictatorship of the
proletariat in Russia was for the Bolsheviks a bridge to a revolution in
the west. The problem of a socialist transformation of society was
proclaimed to be in its very essence international.

Only in 1924 did a change occur upon this fundamental question. It was
then first proclaimed that the building of socialism is wholly
realisable within the limits of the Soviet Union independently of the
evolution of the rest of mankind, if only the imperialists do not
overthrow the soviet power by military intervention. This new theory was
immediately endowed with retroactive force. If in 1917 – declared the
epigones – the party had not believed in the possibility of creating an
independent socialist society in Russia, it would have had no right to
take the power. In 1926 the Communist International officially condemned
the non-acceptance of the theory of socialism in a separate country,
extending this condemnation to the whole past, beginning with the year
1905.

Three series of ideas were thenceforth declared hostile to Bolshevism:

-   denial of the possibility of the Soviet Union’s maintaining itself
    for an indefinite length of time in a capitalist environment
    (problem of military intervention);
-   denial of the possibility of its overcoming with its own power, and
    within its national boundaries, the contradiction between city and
    country (problem of economic backwardness and agrarian problem);
-   denial of the possibility of creating a shut-in socialist society
    (problem of the worldwide division of labour).

It will be possible, according to the new school, to defend the
inviolability of the Soviet Union even without revolutions in other
countries by way of the “neutralisation of the bourgeoisie.” The
collaboration of the peasantry in the sphere of socialist construction
must be acknowledged as assured. Dependence upon world economy has been
liquidated by the October revolution and the economic successes of the
soviets. A refusal to accept these three propositions is “Trotskyism” –
a doctrine incompatible with Bolshevism.

The task of the historian here becomes one of ideological restoration.
He must dig out the genuine views and aims of the revolutionary party
from under subsequent political accumulations. Despite the briefness of
the periods succeeding each other, this task is very much like the
deciphering of a palimpsest, for the constructions of the epigone school
are by no means always superior to those theological ingenuities for
whose sake the monks of the seventh and eighth centuries destroyed the
parchment and papyrus of the classics.

In general, throughout this book we have avoided burdening the text with
innumerable quotations, but the present essay, owing to the essence of
its task, will have to supply the reader with the genuine texts, and
that too, on a sufficient scale to exclude the very idea of their having
been artificially selected. We must let Bolshevism speak with its own
tongue. Under the régime of the Stalin bureaucracy it is deprived of
this possibility.

The Bolshevik party was from the day of its birth a party of
revolutionary socialism. But it necessarily saw its immediate historic
task in the overthrow of czarism and the inauguration of a democratic
structure. The principal content of the revolution was to be a
democratic solution to the agrarian problem. The socialist revolution
was pushed away into a sufficiently remote or at least indefinite
future. It was considered irrefutable that this revolution might take
its place practically upon the order of the day only after the victory
of the proletariat in the west. This postulate, forged by Russian
Marxism in its struggle with Narodnikism and anarchism, was one of the
solidest possessions of the party. There followed certain hypothetical
considerations: In case the democratic revolution assumes a mighty scope
in Russia, it may give a direct impetus to the socialist revolution in
the west, and this will enable the Russian proletariat to come to power
afterward with a swifter pace. The general historic perspective remained
unchanged even in this more favourable version. The course of
development was only accelerated and the dates brought near.

It was in the spirit of these views that Lenin wrote in September 1905:
“From the democratic revolution we will immediately begin to pass over,
and in the exact measure of our strength, the strength of a conscious
and organised proletariat, we will begin to pass over to the socialist
revolution. We stand for a continuous revolution. We will not stop
half-way.” This quotation, surprising as it may be, has been employed by
Stalin in order to identify the old prognosis of the party with the
actual course of events in 1917. It only remains incomprehensible why
the cadres of the party were taken unawares by the “April theses” of
Lenin.

In reality the struggle of the proletariat for power was to develop –
according to the old conception – only after the agrarian problem had
been solved within the framework of a bourgeois-democratic revolution.
The trouble was that the peasantry, satisfied in their land hunger,
would have no impulse to support a new revolution. And since the Russian
working class, being an obvious minority in the country, would not be
able to win the power with its own forces, Lenin quite consistently
considered it impossible to talk of a dictatorship of the proletariat in
Russia before the victory of the proletariat in the west.

“The complete victory of the present revolution,” wrote Lenin in 1905,
“will be the end of the democratic overturn and the beginning of a
decisive struggle for the socialist revolution. A realisation of the
demands of the contemporary peasantry, the complete shattering of the
reaction, the winning of a democratic republic, will be the complete end
of the revolutionism of the bourgeoisie, and even of the petty
bourgeoisie. It will be the beginning of the real struggle of the
proletariat for socialism.” By petty bourgeoisie is here meant primarily
the peasantry.

Under these conditions whence arises the slogan “continuous” revolution?
Lenin answers as follows: The Russian revolutionists, standing on the
shoulders of a whole series of revolutionary generations in Europe have
the right to “dream” that they will succeed in “achieving with a
completeness never before seen the whole democratic transformation, all
of our minimum programme ... And if that succeeds – then ... then the
revolutionary conflagration will set fire to Europe ... The European
worker will rise in his turn and show us ‘how it is done’; then the
revolutionary rising of Europe will have a retroactive effect upon
Russia and the epoch of several revolutionary years will become an epoch
of several revolutionary decades.” The independent content of the
Russian revolution, even in its highest development, does not transcend
the boundaries of a bourgeois-democratic revolution. Only a victorious
revolution in the west can open the era of the struggle for power even
for the Russian proletariat. That conception was fully in force in the
party up to April 1917.

If you throw aside episodic accumulations, polemical exaggerations and
individual mistakes, the essence of the dispute about the question of
permanent revolution from 1905 till 1917 reduces itself, not to the
question whether the Russian proletariat after winning the power could
build a national socialist society – about this not one Russian Marxist
ever uttered a peep until 1924 – but to the question whether a bourgeois
revolution really capable of solving the agrarian problem was still
possible in Russia, or whether for the accomplishment of this work a
dictatorship of the proletariat would be needed.

What part of his earlier views did Lenin revise in his April theses? He
did not for a moment renounce either the doctrine of the international
character of the socialist revolution, or the idea that the transfer to
the socialist road could be realised in backward Russia only with the
direct co-operation of the west. But Lenin did here for the first time
declare that the Russian proletariat, owing to the very backwardness of
the national conditions, might come to power before the proletariat of
the advanced countries.

The February revolution proved powerless to solve either the agrarian
problem or the national problem. The peasantry and the oppressed peoples
of Russia in their struggle for democratic goals were obliged to support
the October revolution. Only because the Russian petty-bourgeois
democracy was unable to carry out that historic work performed by its
older sister in the west, did the Russian proletariat gain access to the
power before the western proletariat. In 1905, Bolshevism intended only
after the achievement of the democratic tasks to pass over to the
struggle for dictatorship of the proletariat. In 1917 the dictatorship
of the proletariat grew out of the non-achievement of the democratic
tasks.

But the combined character of the Russian revolution did not stop there.
The conquest of power by the working class automatically removed the
dividing line between “programme-minimum” and “programme-maximum.” Under
the dictatorship of the proletariat – but only there! – the growing over
of democratic into socialist problems became inevitable, notwithstanding
that the workers of Europe had not yet succeeded in showing us “how it
is done.”

This change of revolutionary order between west and east, with all its
importance for the fate of Russia and the whole world, has nevertheless
a historically limited import. No matter how far the Russian revolution
skipped ahead, its dependence upon the world revolution has not
disappeared nor even decreased. The possibility of a growth of
democratic into socialist reforms is directly created by a combination
of domestic conditions – chief among them the interrelation of the
proletariat and the peasantry. But in the last instance the limits of
socialist transformation are determined by the condition of economy and
politics on the world arena. No matter how great the national spurt, it
does not make possible a jump over the planet.

In its condemnation of “Trotskyism,” the Communist International has
attacked with special force the opinion that the Russian proletariat,
having come to the helm and not meeting support from the West, “will
come into hostile conflicts ... with the broad masses of the peasantry
with whose co-operation it came to power ...” Even if you consider that
the historic experiment has completely refuted this prognosis –
formulated by Trotsky in 1905, when not one of his present critics even
admitted the idea of a dictatorship of the proletariat in Russia – even
in that case, it remains an indisputable fact that this view of the
peasantry as an unreliable and treacherous ally was a common property of
all Russian Marxists including Lenin. The actual tradition of Bolshevism
has nothing in common with the doctrine of pre-determined harmony of
interest between workers and peasants. On the contrary the criticism of
this petty-bourgeois theory was always a most important element in the
long struggle of the Marxists with the Narodniks.

“Once the epoch of democratic revolution in Russia is past,” wrote Lenin
in 1905, “then it will be ridiculous even to talk of the ‘united will’
of proletariat and peasantry ...” “The peasantry, as a land-owning class
will play the same treacherous, unstable rôle in this struggle (for
socialism) that the bourgeoisie is now playing in the struggle for
democracy. To forget that is to forget socialism, to deceive oneself and
others about the genuine interests and tasks of the proletariat.”

In working out for his own use in 1905 a scheme of the correlation of
classes during the course of the revolution, Lenin characterised in the
following words the situation which must be formed after the liquidation
of landlord proprietorship: “The proletariat is already struggling to
preserve the democratic conquests for the sake of the socialist
revolution. This struggle would be almost hopeless for the Russian
proletariat alone, and its defeat would be inevitable ... if the
European socialist proletariat did not come to the help of the Russian
proletariat ... At that stage the liberal bourgeoisie and the well-to-do
(plus a part of the middle) peasantry will organise a
counter-revolution. The Russian proletariat plus the European
proletariat will organise the revolution. In these circumstances the
Russian proletariat may win a second victory. The cause is then not
lost. The second victory will be the socialist revolution in Europe. The
European workers will show us ‘how it is done.’”

During approximately the same days Trotsky wrote: “The contradiction in
the situation of a workers’ government in a backward country with the
peasant population an overwhelming majority can find its solution only
on an international scale, in the arena of the world revolution of the
proletariat.” It is these words that Stalin subsequently quoted in order
to show “the vast gulf separating the Leninist theory of the
dictatorship of the proletariat from the theory of Trotsky.” The
quotations testify however that, in spite of indubitable differences
between the revolutionary conceptions of Lenin and Trotsky at that time,
it was exactly upon the question of the “unstable” and “treacherous”
rôle of the peasantry that their views already in those far days
essentially coincided.

In February 1906 Lenin writes: “We support the peasant movement to the
end, but we ought to remember that this is the movement of another
class, not that class which can and will achieve the socialist
revolution.” “The Russian revolution,” he declares in April 1906, “has
enough forces of its own to conquer. But it has not enough forces to
retain the fruits of its victory ... for in a country with an enormous
development of small-scale industry, the small-scale commodity
producers, among them the peasants, will inevitably turn against the
proletarian when he goes from freedom toward socialism ... In order to
prevent a restoration, the Russian revolution has need, not of a Russian
reserve; it has need of help from outside. Is there such a reserve in
the world? There is: the socialist proletariat in the west.”

In various combinations but fundamentally without change these thoughts
are carried trough all the years of the reaction and the war. There is
no need to multiply examples. The party’s conception of the revolution
must have received its most finished and succinct form in the heat of
the revolutionary events. If the theoreticians of Bolshevism were before
the revolution already inclining towards “socialism in a separate
country,” this theory would necessarily have come to full bloom in the
period of the direct struggle for power. Did it prove so in reality? The
year 1917 will give the answer.

When departing for Russia after the February revolution, Lenin wrote in
a farewell letter to the Swiss workers: “The Russian proletariat cannot
with its own forces victoriously achieve the socialist revolution. But
it can ... improve the situation in which its chief, its reliable ally,
the European and American socialist proletariat, will enter the decisive
battle.”

The resolution of Lenin ratified by the April conference reads: “The
proletariat of Russia, taking action in one of the most backward
countries of Europe among the masses of a petty-peasant population,
cannot set itself the goal of an immediate realisation of the socialist
transformation.” Although in these initial lines firmly clinging to the
theoretical tradition of the party, the resolution does, however, take a
decisive step on a new road. It declares: The impossibility of an
independent socialist transformation in peasant Russia does not in any
case give us the right to renounce the conquest of power, not only for
the sake of democratic tasks, but also in the name of “a series of
practically ripened steps towards socialism,” such as the
nationalisation of land, control over the banks and so forth.
Anti-capitalist measures may receive a further development thanks to the
presence of “the objective premises of a socialist revolution ... in the
more highly developed of the advanced countries.” This must be our
starting point. “To talk only of Russian conditions,” explains Lenin in
his speech, “is a mistake ... What tasks will rise before the Russian
proletariat in case the world-wide movement brings us face to face with
a social revolution – that is the principal question taken up in this
resolution.” It is clear that the new point of departure occupied by the
party in April 1917, after Lenin had won his victory over the democratic
limitedness of the “old Bolsheviks,” is as different from the theory of
socialism in a separate country as heaven is from earth!

In all organisations of the party whatever, whether in the capital or
the provinces, we meet henceforth the same formulation of the question:
In the struggle for power we must remember that the further fate of the
revolution as a socialist revolution will be determined by the victory
of the proletariat of the advanced countries. This formula was opposed
by nobody – was, on the contrary, the presupposition of all disputes as
a proposition equally acknowledged by all.

At the Petrograd conference of the party on July 16th, Kharitonov, one
of those Bolsheviks who had come with Lenin on the “sealed train,”
declared: “We are saying everywhere that if there is no revolution in
the west, our cause will be lost.” Kharitonov is not a theoretician; he
is an average party agitator. In the minutes of that same conference we
read: “Pavlov calls attention to the general proposition advanced by the
Bolsheviks that the Russian revolution will flourish only when it shall
be supported by the world revolution which is conceivable only as a
socialist revolution.” Tens and hundreds of Kharitonovs and Pavlovs were
developing the fundamental idea of the April conference. It never came
into the head of anybody to oppose or correct them.

The sixth Congress of the party, taking place at the end of July,
defined the dictatorship of the proletariat as a conquest of power by
the workers and poorest peasants. “Only these classes ... will in
reality promote the growth of the international proletariat revolution,
which is to put an end not only to the war but also to capitalist
slavery.” The speech of Bukharin was built upon the idea that a
world-wide socialist revolution is the sole way out of the existing
situation. “If the revolution in Russia conquers before a revolution
breaks out in the west, we will have to ... kindle the fire of the
world-wide socialist revolution.” Stalin too was at that time compelled
to pose the question in much the same way: “The moment will come when
the workers will rise and unite round them the poor layers of the
peasantry, raise the banner of the workers’ revolution, and open an era
of socialist revolution in the west.”

A Moscow regional conference which met at the beginning of August
permits us best of all to glance into the laboratory of the party
thought. In the principal report, setting forth the decisions of the
sixth Congress, Sokolnikov, a member of the Central Committee, said: “It
is necessary to explain that the Russian revolution must take the
offensive against world imperialism or be destroyed, be strangled by
that same imperialism.” A number of delegates expressed themselves to
the same effect. Vitolin: “We must get ready for a social revolution
which will be the stimulus to the development of social revolution in
western Europe.” Delegate Byelensky: “If you decide the question within
national limits, then we have no way out. Sokolnikov has said rightly
that the Russian revolution will conquer only as an international
revolution ... In Russia the conditions are not yet ripe for socialism,
but if the revolution begins in Europe then we will follow western
Europe.” Stukov: “The proposition that the Russian revolution will
conquer only as an international revolution cannot be subject to doubt
... The socialist revolution is possible only on a general world scale.”

All are in agreement upon three fundamental propositions: the workers’
state cannot stand unless it overthrows imperialism in the west; in
Russia the conditions are not yet ripe for socialism; the problem of
socialist revolution is international in essence. If alongside these
views, which were to be condemned in seven or eight years as heresy,
there had existed in the party other views now recognised as orthodox
and traditional, they would certainly have found expression in that
Moscow conference, and in the congress of the party which preceded it.
But neither the principal speaker nor those who took part in the debate
– nor the newspaper reports – suggest by a word the presence in the
party of Bolshevik views opposing these “Trotskyist” ones.

At the general city conference in Kiev preceding the party congress, the
principal speaker, Gorovitz, said. “The struggle for the salvation of
our revolution can be waged only on an international scale. Two
prospects lie before us: If the revolution conquers, we will create the
transitional state to socialism, if not, we will fall under the power of
international imperialism.” After the party congress, at the beginning
of August, Piatakov said at a new conference in Kiev: “From the very
beginning of the revolution we have asserted that the destiny of the
Russian proletariat is completely dependent upon the course of the
proletarian revolution in the west ... We are thus entering the stage of
permanent revolution.” Commenting on Piatakov’s report, Gorovitz,
already known to us, declared: “I am in complete accord with Piatakov in
his definition of our revolution as permanent.” Piatakov: “... The sole
possible salvation for the Russian revolution lies in a world revolution
which will lay down the foundation for the social overturn.” But perhaps
these two speakers represented a minority? No. Nobody opposed them upon
this fundamental question. In the elections for the Kiev committee these
two received the largest number of votes.

We may, then, consider it fully established that at a general party
conference in April, at the congress of the party in July, and at
conferences in Petrograd, Moscow and Kiev, those very views were set
forth and confirmed by the voting which were later to be declared
incompatible with Bolshevism. More than that: not one voice was raised
in the party which might be interpreted as a presentiment of the future
theory of socialism in a separate country, even to the degree that in
the Psalms of King David foretastes have been discovered of the gospel
of Christ.

On the 13th of August, the central organ of the party explained: “Full
power to the soviets, although far from as yet meaning ‘socialism,’
would in any case break the resistance of the bourgeoisie and – in
dependence upon the existing productive forces and the situation in the
west – would guide and transform the economic life in the interests of
the toiling masses. Having thrown off the fetters of capitalist
government, the revolution would become permanent – that is, continuous.
It would apply the state power, not in order to consolidate the régime
of capitalist exploitation, but in order to overcome it. Its final
success on this road would depend upon the successes of the proletariat
revolution in Europe ... Such was and remains the sole perspective of
the further development of the revolution.” The author of this article
was Trotsky, who wrote it in Kresty prison. The editor of the paper that
published it was Stalin. The significance of the quotation is defined
already in the mere fact that the term “permanent revolution” had been
used in the Bolshevik party up to 1917 exclusively to designate the
point of view of Trotsky. A few years later Stalin will declare: “Lenin
struggled against the theory of permanent revolution to the end of his
days.” Stalin himself at any rate did not struggle: the article appeared
without any editorial comment whatever.

Ten days later Trotsky wrote again in the same paper: “Internationalism
for us is not an abstract idea ... but a directly guiding, deeply
practical principle. A permanent decisive success is unthinkable for us
outside the European revolution.” Again Stalin did not object. Moreover
two days later he himself repeated it: “Let them know (the workers and
soldiers) that only in union with the workers of the west, only after
shaking loose the foundations of capitalism In the west, can we count
upon the triumph of the revolution in Russia!” By “the triumph of the
revolution” is meant not the building of socialism – of that there was
still no talk at all – but only the winning and holding of power.

“The bourgeoisie,” wrote Lenin in September, “is shouting about the
inevitable defeat of the commune in Russia – that is, the defeat of the
proletariat if it wins the power.” We must not be frightened by these
shouts. “Having conquered the power, the proletariat of Russia has every
chance of holding it and bringing Russia through to the victorious
revolution in the west.” The perspective of the revolution is here
defined with utter clearness: to hold the power until the beginning of
the socialist revolution in Europe. This formula was not hastily thrown
out: Lenin repeats it from day to day. He sums up his programme article,
_Will the Bolshevik Be Able to Hold the State Power?_ in these words:
“There is no power on earth which can prevent the Bolsheviks, if they do
not let themselves be frightened and succeed in seizing the power, from
holding it until the victory of the world-wide socialist revolution.”

The Right Wing of the Bolsheviks demanded a coalition with the
Compromisers, citing the fact that the Bolsheviks “alone” could not hold
the power. Lenin answered them on November 1 – that is, after the
revolution: “They say that we alone will not hold the power, etc. But we
are not alone. Before us is all Europe. We must begin.” In this dialogue
of Lenin with the Right Wing, it becomes especially clear that the idea
of the independent creation of a socialist society in Russia never even
came into the head of any of the disputants.

John Reed tells how at one of the Petrograd meetings at the Obukhovsky
factory a soldier from the Rumanian front shouted “We will hold on with
all our might until the peoples of the whole world rise to help us.”
This formula did not fall from the sky, and it was not thought of either
by the nameless soldier or by Reed. It was grafted into the masses by
Bolshevik agitators. The voice of the soldier from the Rumanian front
was the voice of the party, the voice of the October revolution.

The _Declaration of Rights of the Toilers and the Exploited Peoples_ –
the fundamental state programme introduced in the name of the soviet
power into the Constituent Assembly – proclaimed the task of the new
structure to be “the establishment of a socialist organisation of
society and the victory of socialism in all countries ... The soviet
power will proceed resolutely along this road until the complete victory
of the international workers’ insurrection against the yoke of capital.”
This Leninist _Declaration of Rights_, not formally annulled to this
day, converted the permanent revolution into a fundamental law of the
Soviet Republic.

If Rosa Luxemberg, who in her prison was following with passionate and
jealous attention the deeds and words of the Bolsheviks, had caught in
them a shadow of national socialism, she would have sounded the alarm at
once. In those days she was very sternly – in the essence mistakenly –
criticising the policies of the Bolsheviks. But no. Here is what she
wrote about the general line of the party: “The fact that the Bolsheviks
in their policy have steered their course entirely towards the world
revolution of the proletariat is precisely the most brilliant testimony
to their political far-sightedness, their principled firmness and the
bold scope of their policy.”

It is just these views, which Lenin was developing from day to day,
which were preached in the central organ of the party under Stalin’s
editorship, which inspired the speeches of agitators great and small,
which were repeated by soldiers from far-off sectors of the front, which
Rosa Luxemburg considered the highest testimony to the political
farsightedness of the Bolsheviks – it is just these views which the
bureaucracy of the Communist International condemned in 1926. “The views
of Trotsky and his followers upon the fundamental question of the
character and perspectives of our revolution,” says a resolution of the
Seventh Plenum of the Communist International, “have nothing in common
with the views of our party, with Leninism.” Thus the epigones of
Bolshevism have done away with their own past.

If anybody really struggled in 1917 against the theory of permanent
revolution, it was the Kadets and Compromisers. Miliukov and Dan exposed
the “revolutionary illusions of Trotskyism” as the chief cause of the
collapse of the revolution of 1905. In his introductory speech at the
Democratic Conference, Cheidze scourged the effort “to put out the fire
of the capitalist war by converting the revolution into a socialist and
world revolution.” On the 13th of October, Kerensky said in the
Pre-Parliament: “There is now no more dangerous enemy of the revolution,
the democracy and all the conquests of freedom, than those who ... under
the guise of deepening the revolution and converting it into a permanent
social revolution, are perverting, and it seems have already perverted,
the masses.” Cheidze and Kerensky were enemies of the permanent
revolution for the same reason that they were enemies of the Bolsheviks.

At the second Congress of Soviets, at the moment of the seizure of
power, Trotsky said: “If the people of Europe do not rise and crush
imperialism, we will be crushed – that is indubitable. Either the
Russian revolution will raise the whirlwind of struggle in the west, or
the capitalists of all countries will strangle our revolution.” “There
is a third road,” shouted a voice from the benches. Was this perhaps
Stalin’s voice? No, it was the voice of a Menshevik. It was some years
before Bolsheviks discovered that “third road.”

As a result of innumerable repetitions in the international Stalinist
press, it is considered in a great variety of political circles almost
established that two conceptions lay at the bottom of the Brest-Litovsk
disagreements. One had as its point of departure the possibility not
only of holding out, but of building socialism with the inner forces of
Russia; the other rested its hope exclusively on an insurrection in
Europe. In reality this contrast of views was created some years later,
and its author did not take the trouble to bring his invention into the
most superficial accord with the historic documents. To be sure, this
would have been no easy task. All the Bolsheviks without a single
exception were at one in the Brest period in thinking that if a
revolution did not break out in Europe in the very near future, the
Soviet Republic was doomed to destruction. Some counted the time in
weeks, others in months: nobody counted it in years.

“From the very beginning of the Russian revolution ...,” wrote Bukharin
on January 28, 1918, “the party of the revolutionary proletariat has
declared: either the international revolution, unleashed by the
revolution in Russia, will strangle the war and capital, or
international capital will strangle the Russian revolution.” But was not
Bukharin, who then headed the advocates of revolutionary war with
Germany, attributing the views of his faction to the whole party?
However natural such a supposition may be, it is flatly contradicted by
the documents.

The minutes of the Central Committee for 1917 and the beginning of 1918
– published in 1929 – in spite of abridgements and a tendentious
editing, offer invaluable testimony upon this question too. “At the
session of January 11, 1918, Comrade Sergeiev (Artem) points out that
all the orators are agreed upon the fact that our socialist republic is
threatened with destruction in the failure of a socialist revolution in
the west.” Sergeiev stood for the position of Lenin – that is, for
signing the peace. Nobody contradicted Sergeiev. All three of the
contending groups competed in appealing to one and the same general
premise: Without a world revolution we will not pull through.

Stalin, to be sure, introduced a special note into the debate. He based
the necessity of signing a separate peace upon the fact that: “There is
no revolutionary movement in the west, there are no facts, there is only
a potentiality, and we can’t figure on potentialities.” Although still
far from the theory of socialism in a separate country, he nevertheless
clearly revealed in these words his organic distrust of the
international movement. “We cannot figure on potentialities.” Lenin
immediately drew aside “in certain parts” from this Stalinist support.
“It is true that the revolution in the west has not yet begun,” he said.
“However, if in view of this we should change our tactics, then we
should be traitors to international socialism.” If he, Lenin, favoured
an immediate separate peace, it was not because he did not believe in
the revolutionary movement in the west, and still less because he
believed in the viability of an isolated Russian revolution: “It is
important for us to hold out until the coming of a general socialist
revolution, and we can achieve this only by signing the peace.” The
meaning of the Brest capitulation was summed up for Lenin in the words
“breathing spell.”

The minutes testify that after this warning from Lenin, Stalin sought an
opportunity to correct himself. “Session of February 23, 1918. Comrade
Stalin: ... We also are staking our play upon a revolution, but you are
reckoning in weeks, and [we] in months.” Stalin here repeats _verbatim_
the formula of Lenin. The distance between the two wings in the Central
Committee on the question of the world revolution was the distance
between weeks and months.

When defending the signing of the Brest peace at the seventh Congress of
the party in March 1918, Lenin said: “It is absolutely true that without
a German revolution we will perish. We will perish perhaps not in
Petersburg nor in Moscow, but in Vladivostok, or some other remote place
whither we will have to retreat but in any case, under all possible or
conceivable eventualities, if the German revolution does not begin, we
perish.” It is not only a question of Germany, however. “International
imperialism ... which represents a gigantic actual power ... could in no
case and under no conditions live side by side with the Soviet Republic.
Here a conflict would be inevitable. Here ... is the greatest historic
problem ... the necessity of evoking an international revolution.” In
the secret decision adopted, we read: “The Congress sees the most
reliable guarantee of the consolidation of the socialist revolution
which has won the victory in Russia only in its conversion into an
international workers’ revolution.”

Some days later Lenin made a report to the Congress of Soviets:
“Worldwide imperialism and the triumphal march of a social revolution
cannot live side by side.” On April 23 he said at a session of the
Moscow soviet: “Our backwardness has pushed us forward, and we shall
perish if we cannot hold out until we meet a mighty support on the port
of the insurrectionary workers of other countries.” “We must retreat
(before imperialism) even to the Urals,” he writes in May 1918, “for
that is the sole chance of winning time for the maturing of the
revolution in the west ...”

Lenin was clearly aware of the fact that the dragging out of the
negotiations at Brest would make harder the conditions of peace, but he
put the revolutionary international tasks higher than the “national”
ones. On June 28, 1918, notwithstanding episodic disagreements with
Trotsky on the subject of signing the peace, Lenin said at a Moscow
conference of trade unions: “When it came to the Brest negotiations, the
exposures of Comrade Trotsky came out before the whole world, and did
not this policy bring it about that in the enemy-country ... in wartime
an enormous revolutionary movement broke out?” A week later in a report
of the Council of People’s Commissars to the fifth Congress of Soviets,
he returns to the same question: “We fulfilled our duty before all the
peoples ... through our Brest delegation headed by Comrade Trotsky.” A
year later Lenin recalled: “In the epoch of the Brest peace ... the
Soviet power placed the world dictatorship of the proletariat and the
world revolution higher than any national sacrifices, no matter how
heavy they might be.” “What meaning,” asked Stalin, when time had erased
from his memory the never very definite distinctions between ideas –
“What meaning can Trotsky’s assertion that revolutionary Russia could
not stand in the face of a conservative Europe have? It can have only
one meaning: Trotsky does not feel the inward might of our revolution.”

In reality the whole party was unanimous in the conviction that “before
the face of a conservative Europe” the Soviet Republic could not stand.
But that was only the reverse side of a conviction that a conservative
Europe could not stand before the face of revolutionary Russia. In
negative form it expressed an unconquerable faith in the international
power of the Russian revolution. And fundamentally the party was not
mistaken. Conservative Europe did not at any rate wholly stand. The
German revolution, even betrayed as it was by the social democracy, was
still strong enough to trim the claws of Ludendorff and Hoffmann.
Without this operation the Soviet Republic could hardly have avoided
destruction.

But even after the destruction of German militarism, no change was made
in the general appraisal of the international situation. “Our efforts
will inevitably lead to a world-wide revolution,” said Lenin at a
session of the Central Executive Committee at the end of July 1918.
“Things stand in such a way that, having gotten out of the war with one
alliance, [we] immediately experienced the assault of imperialism from
the other side.” In August, when civil war was spreading on the Volga
with the participation of the Czecho-Slovaks, Lenin said at a meeting in
Moscow: “Our revolution began as a universal revolution ... The
proletarian masses will guarantee the Soviet Republic a victory over the
Czecho-Slovaks and the possibility of holding out until the world-wide
socialist revolution breaks out.” To hold out until the outbreak of
revolution in the west – such as before is the formula of the party.

In those same days Lenin wrote to the American workers: “We are in a
besieged fortress until other armies of the international socialist
revolution come to our aid.” He expressed himself still more
categorically in November: “The facts of world history have shown that
the conversion of our Russian revolution into a socialist revolution was
not an adventure but a necessity, for there was no other choice.
Anglo-French and American imperialism will inevitably strangle the
independence and freedom of Russia unless world-wide socialist
revolution, unless worldwide Bolshevism, conquers.” To repeat the words
of Stalin, Lenin obviously did not feel the “inner might of our
revolution.”

The first anniversary of the revolution is past. The party has had time
to look round. And nevertheless in his report to the eighth Congress of
the party in March 1919. Lenin again declares: “We live not only in a
state but in a system of states, and the existence of the Soviet
Republic side by side with imperialist states for an extended period is
unthinkable. In the end either one or the other will conquer.” On the
third anniversary, which coincided with the rout of the Whites, Lenin
recalled and generalised: “If on that night (the night of the October
revolution) someone had told us that in three years ... this would be
our victory, nobody, not even the most cocksure optimist, would have
believed it. We knew then that our victory would be a victory only when
our cause should conquer the whole world, for we began our work counting
exclusively upon world revolution.” More unassailable testimony could
not be asked. At the moment of the October revolution “the most cocksure
optimist” not only did not dream of creating national socialism, but did
not believe in the possibility of defending the revolution without
direct help from outside! “We began our work counting exclusively upon
world revolution.” In order to guarantee the victory in a three years’
fight over legions of enemies, neither the party nor the Red Army had
need of the myth of socialism in a separate country.

The world situation took a more favourable form than could have been
expected. The masses revealed an extraordinary capacity for sacrifices
in the name of the new goals. The leaders skilfully made use of the
contradictions of imperialism during the first and most difficult
period. As a result the revolution revealed more stability than “the
most cocksure optimist” had anticipated. But even so, the party wholly
preserved its former international position.

“If it hadn’t been for the war,” Lenin explained in January 1918, “we
would have seen a union of the capitalists of the whole world, a
consolidation on the basis of the struggle against us.” “Why throughout
weeks and months ... after October did we get a chance to pass so easily
from triumph to triumph?” he asked at the seventh Congress of the party.
“Only because a specially formed international conjuncture temporarily
protected us from imperialism.” In April, Lenin said at a session of the
Central Executive Committee: “We got a breathing spell only because the
imperialist war still continued in the west, and in the Far East
imperialist rivalry is raging wider and wider; this alone explains the
existence of the Soviet Republic.”

This exceptional combination of circumstances could not last for ever.
“We have now passed from war to peace,” said Lenin in 1920. “But we have
not forgotten that war will come again. So long as both capitalism and
socialism remain, we cannot live in peace. Either the one or the other
in the long run will conquer. There will be a funeral chant either for
the Soviet Republic or for world capitalism. This is a moratorium in a
war.”

The transformation of the original “breathing spell” into a prolonged
period of unstable equilibrium was made possible not only by the
struggle of capitalist groupings, but also by the international
revolutionary movement. As a result of the November revolution in
Germany, the German troops were compelled to abandon the Ukraine, the
Baltic States and Finland. The penetration of the spirit of revolt into
the armies of the Entente compelled the French, English and American
governments to withdraw their troops from the southern and northern
shores of Russia. The proletarian revolution in the west was not
victorious, but on its road to victory it protected the Soviet state for
a number of years.

In July 1921, Lenin summarised the situation: “We have got a certain
equilibrium, although extremely fragile, extremely unstable,
nevertheless such an equilibrium that a socialist republic can exist –
of course not for long – in a capitalist environment.” Thus passing from
weeks to months, from months to years, the party only by degrees
assimilated the idea that a workers’ state might for a certain time –
“of course not for long” – peacefully continue to exist in a capitalist
environment.

One not unimportant conclusion flows from the above data quite
irrefutably: If according to the general conviction of the Bolsheviks
the Soviet state could not long hold out without a victory of the
proletariat in the west, then the programme of building socialism in a
separate country is excluded practically by that fact alone; the very
question is withdrawn, so to speak, in its preliminary consideration.

It would be, however, a complete mistake to assume as the epigone school
has attempted to suggest in recent years, that the sole obstacle seen by
the party on the road to a national socialist society, was the
capitalist armies. The threat of armed intervention was in reality
practically advanced to the front rank, but the war danger itself was
merely the most acute expression of the technical and industrial
predominance of the capitalist nations. In the last analysis the problem
reduced itself to the isolation of the Soviet Republic and to its
backwardness.

Socialism is the organisation of a planned and harmonious social
production for the satisfaction of human wants. Collective ownership of
the means of production is not yet socialism, but only its legal
premise. The problem of a socialist society cannot be abstracted from
the problem of the productive forces, which at the present stage of
human development are worldwide in their very essence. The separate
state, having become too narrow for capitalism, is so much the less
capable of becoming the arena of a finished socialist society. The
backwardness of a revolutionary country, moreover, increases for it the
danger of being thrown back to capitalism. In rejecting the perspective
of an isolated socialist development, the Bolsheviks had in view, not a
mechanically isolated problem of intervention, but the whole complex of
questions bound up with the international economic basis of socialism.

At the seventh Congress of the party, Lenin said: “If Russia passes now
– and she indubitably is passing – from a ‘Tilsit Peace’ to a national
boom ... then the outcome of this boom is not a transition to the
bourgeois state but a transition to the international socialist
revolution.” Such was the alternative: either an international
revolution or a sliding back – to capitalism. There was no place for
national socialism. “How many transitional stages there will yet be to
socialism, we do not and cannot know. That depends upon when the
European socialist revolution begins on a real scale.”

In April of the same year, when calling for a re-formation of the ranks
for practical work, Lenin wrote: “We can give serious co-operation to
the socialist revolution in the west, delayed for a number of reasons,
only to the degree that we succeed in solving the organisational problem
which stands before us.” This first approach to economic construction is
immediately included in the international scheme: it is a question of
“co-operation to the socialist revolution in the west,” and not of
creating a self-sufficient socialist kingdom in the east.

On the theme of the coming hunger, Lenin said to the Moscow workers: “In
all our agitation we must ... explain that the misfortune which has
fallen upon us is an international misfortune, that there is no way out
of it but the international revolution.” In order to overcome the famine
we must have a revolution of the world proletariat – says Lenin. In
order to create a socialist society a revolution in a separate country
is enough – answer the epigones. Such is the scope of the disagreement!
Who is right? Let us not forget anyway that, in spite of the successes
of industrialisation, hunger is not yet conquered to this day.

The Congress of the Councils of People’s Economy, in December 1918,
formulated the plan of socialist construction in the following words:
“The dictatorship of the world-proletariat is becoming historically
inevitable ... This is determining the development both of the whole
world society and of each country in particular. The establishment of
the dictatorship of the proletariat and of the soviet form of government
in other countries will make possible the inauguration of the most close
economic relations between countries, an international division of
labour in production, and finally the organisation of international
economic organs of administration.” The fact that such a resolution
could be adopted by a congress of the state bodies confronted with
purely practical problems – coal, firewood, sugar-beets – proves better
than anything else how inseparably the perspective of the permanent
revolution dominated the consciousness of the party during that period.

In the _ABC of Communism_, the party text-book composed by Bukharin and
Preobrazhensky, which went through a great many editions, we read: “The
communist revolution can be victorious only as a world revolution ... In
a situation where the workers have won only in a single country,
economic construction becomes very difficult ... For the victory of
communism the victory of the world revolution is necessary.”

In the spirit of these same ideas Bukharin wrote in a popular brochure
reprinted many times by the party and translated into foreign languages:
“There rises before the Russian proletariat sharply as never before the
problems of international revolution ... The permanent revolution in
Russia grows into a European revolution of the proletariat.”

In a well-known book of Stepanov-Skvortzov, entitled _Electrification_,
issued under the editorship of Lenin and with an introduction by him, in
a chapter which the editor recommends with special enthusiasm to the
attention of the reader, it says: “The proletariat of Russia never
thought of creating an isolated socialist state. A self-sufficient
‘socialist’ state is a petty-bourgeois ideal. A certain approach to this
is thinkable with an economic and political predominance of the
petty-bourgeoisie; in isolation from the outside world it seeks a means
of consolidating its economic forms, which are converted by the new
technique and the new economy into very unstable forms.” These admirable
lines, which were undoubtedly gone over by the hand of Lenin, cast a
clear beam of light upon the most recent evolution of the epigones.

In his theses on the national and colonial questions at the second
Congress of the Communist International, Lenin defines the general task
of socialism, rising above the national stages of the struggle, as “the
creation of a united worldwide economy, regulated according to a general
plan by the proletariat of all nations, as a whole the tendency towards
which is already revealed with complete clarity under capitalism, and
undoubtedly will receive further development and full achievement under
socialism.” In relation to this heritable and progressive tendency, the
idea of a socialist society in a separate country is reaction.

The condition for the arising of a dictatorship of the proletariat and
the conditions for the creation of a socialist society are not
identical, not of like nature, in certain respects even antagonistic.
The circumstance that the Russian proletariat first came to power by no
means implies that it will first come to socialism. That contradictory
unevenness of development which led to the October revolution did not
disappear with its achievement. It was laid down in the very foundation
of the first workers’ state.

“The more backward the country which is compelled, as a result of the
zigzags of history, to begin the socialist revolution,” said Lenin in
March 1918, “the harder for it will be the transition from the old
capitalist to the socialist relations.” This idea finds its way through
the speeches and articles of Lenin from year to year. “For us it is easy
to begin a revolution and harder to continue it,” he says in May of the
same year. “In the west it is harder to begin a revolution, but it will
be easier to continue.” In December, Lenin developed the same thought
before a peasant audience, one which finds it hardest of all to
transcend national boundaries: “There (in the west) the transition to a
socialist economy ... will go faster and be achieved more easily than
with us ... In union with the socialist proletariat of the whole world
the Russian labouring peasantry will overcome all handicaps.” “In
comparison with the advanced countries,” he repeats in 1919, “it was
easier for Russians to begin the great proletarian revolution, but it
will be harder for them to continue it, and carry it through to decisive
victory in the sense of the complete organisation of a socialist
society.” “For Russia,” Lenin again insisted on the 27th of April, 1920,
“... it was easy to begin the socialist revolution, whereas to continue
it and carry it through to the end will be harder for Russia than for
the European countries. I had to point out this circumstance at the
beginning of 1918, and the two years experience since then have fully
confirmed this judgement.”

The ages of history live in the form of different levels of culture.
Time is needed to overcome the past – not new ages, but decades. “The
coming generation, although more developed, will hardly make the
complete transition to socialism,” said Lenin at a session of the
Central Executive Committee on April 29th, 1918. Almost two years later
at a congress of Agricultural Communes he named a still more remote
date: “We cannot now introduce a socialist order. God grant that in the
time of our children, or perhaps our grandchildren, it will be
established here.” The Russian workers took the road earlier than the
rest, but they will arrive later at the goal. This is not pessimism, but
historic realism.

“We, the proletariat of Russia, are in advance of any England or any
Germany in our political structure ...” wrote Lenin in May 1918, “and at
the same time behind the most backward of west European states ... in
the degree of our preparation for the material-productive inauguration
of socialism” The same thought is expressed by him in the form of a
contrast between two states: “Germany and Russia incarnated in 1918 most
obviously of all the material realisation of the economic productive,
socio-industrial conditions of socialism on the one side, and the
political conditions on the other.” The elements of the future society
are split up, so to speak, among different countries. To collect and
subordinate them one to another is the task of a series of national
revolutions building into a world revolution.

The idea of the self-sufficient character of the soviet economy Lenin
laughed out of court in advance: “While our Soviet Russia remains a
solitary suburb of the whole capitalist world,” he said in December,
1920, at the eighth Congress of Soviets, “during that time to think of
our complete economic independence ... would be an utterly ridiculous
fantasy and Utopianism.” On the 27th of March, 1922, at the eleventh
Congress of the Party, Lenin gave warning: We are confronted with “a
test which is being prepared by the Russian and international market, to
which we are subordinate, with which we are bound up, from which we
cannot break away. This is a serious test, for here they may beat us
economically and politically.”

This idea of the dependence of socialist economy upon world economy, the
Communist International now considers “counterrevolutionary.” Socialism
cannot depend upon capitalism! The Epigones have been ingenious enough
to forget that capitalism, like socialism, rests upon a worldwide
division of labour which is to receive its highest development under
socialism. Economic construction in an isolated workers’ state, however
important in itself, will remain abridged, limited, contradictory: it
cannot reach the heights of a new harmonious society.

“The authentic rise of a socialist economy in Russia,” wrote Trotsky in
1922, “will become possible only after the victory of the proletariat in
the most important countries of Europe.” These words have become an
indictment; nevertheless they expressed in their time the general
thought of the party. “The work of construction,” said Lenin in 1919,
“depends entirely upon how soon the revolution is victorious in the most
important countries of Europe. Only after this victory can we seriously
undertake the business of construction.” Those words express not a lack
of confidence in the Russian revolution, but a faith in the nearness of
the world revolution. But now also, after the colossal economic
successes of the Union, it remains true that the “authentic rise of a
socialist economy,” is possible only on an international basis.

From the same point of view the party looked upon the problem of the
collectivisation of agricultural industry. The proletariat cannot create
a new society without bringing the peasantry to socialism through a
series of transitional stages, the peasantry being a considerable – in a
number of countries a predominant – part of the population, and a known
majority on the earth as a whole. The solution of this most difficult of
all problems depends in the last analysis upon the quantitative and
qualitative correlations between industry and agriculture. The peasantry
will the more voluntarily and successfully take the road of
collectivisation, the more generously the town is able to fertilise
their economy and their culture.

Does there exist, however, enough industry for the transformation of the
country? This problem, too, Lenin carried beyond the national
boundaries. “If you take the question on a world scale,” he said at the
ninth Congress of the Soviets, “such a flourishing large-scale industry
as might supply the world with all products does exist on the earth ...
We put that at the basis of our calculations.” The correlation of
industry and agriculture, incomparably less favourable in Russia than in
the countries of the west, remains to this day the basis of the economic
and political crises which threaten at certain moments the stability of
the soviet system.

The policy of so-called “military communism” – as is clear from the
above – was not based upon the idea of building a socialist society
within the national boundaries. Only the Mensheviks, making fun of the
soviet power, attributed such plans to it. For the Bolsheviks the
further destinies of the Spartan régime imposed by the ruin and the
civil war, stood in direct dependence upon the development of revolution
in the west. In January 1919, at the height of military communism, Lenin
said: “We will defend the foundations of our communist policy in
production and we will carry them through unshaken to the time of the
complete and worldwide victory of communism.” Together with the whole
party Lenin was mistaken. It became necessary to change the policy in
production. At present we may consider it established that, even if the
socialist revolution in Europe had taken place during the first two or
three years after October, a retreat along the line of the New Economic
Policy would have been inevitable just the same. But on a retrospective
appraisal of the first stage of the dictatorship, it becomes especially
clear to what a degree the methods of military communism and its
illusions were closely interwoven with the perspective of permanent
revolution.

The deep internal crisis at the end of the three years of civil war
involved the threat of a direct break between the proletariat and the
peasantry, between the party and the proletariat. A radical
reconsideration of the methods of the soviet power became necessary. “We
have to satisfy economically the middle peasant, and adopt freedom of
trade,” Lenin explained. “Otherwise it will be impossible to preserve
the power of the proletariat in Russia in view of the delay of the
international revolution.” Was not the transition to the NEP
accompanied, however, by a break in principle of the bond between
domestic and international problems?

Lenin gave a general estimate of the new stage then opening in his
theses for the third Congress of the Communist International: “From the
point of view of the worldwide proletariat revolution as a single
process, the significance of the epoch Russia is passing through lies in
its practical experimental test of the policy in relation to the
petty-bourgeois mass of a proletariat holding the state power.” His very
definition of the framework of the New Economic Policy, cleanly removes
the question of socialism in one country.

No less instinctive are those lines which Lenin wrote for his own use in
the days when the new methods of industry were being considered and
worked up: “10 to 20 years of correct relations with the peasantry and
victory on a world scale is guaranteed (even with the delay of the
proletarian revolutions, which are growing).”

The goal is set: to accommodate ourselves to the new, more prolonged
period which may be necessary for the maturing of the revolution in the
west. In this sense and only this, Lenin expressed his confidence that:
“From Russia of the NEP will come a socialist Russia.”

It is not enough to say that the idea of international revolution was
not here revised; to a certain degree it received a deeper and more
distinct expression: “In the countries of developed capitalism,” said
Lenin at the tenth Congress of the Party, explaining the historic
position of the NEP, “there is a class of hired agricultural labourers
which has been forming itself in the course of some decades ... Where
this class is sufficiently developed, the transition from capitalism to
socialism is possible. We have emphasised – in a whole series of
writings, in all our speeches, in all our press, the fact that in Russia
the situation is not like this – that in Russia we have a minority of
workers in industry and an enormous majority of petty landowners. In
such a country the social revolution could achieve its final success
only on two conditions: first, on condition of its timely support by a
social revolution in one or several advanced countries ... The other
condition is an agreement between ... the proletariat which holds the
state power and the majority of the peasant population ... Only an
agreement with the peasants can save the socialist revolution in Russia
until the revolution begins in other countries.” All the elements of the
problem are here united in one. A union with the peasantry is necessary
for the very existence of the Soviet power; but it does not replace the
international revolution, which can alone create the economic basis of a
socialist society.

At the same tenth Congress a special report was made on _The Soviet
Republic in a Capitalist Environment_, dictated by the delay of the
revolution in the west. Kamenev was put forward as spokesman for the
Central Executive Committee. “We never set ourselves the task,” he said,
as of something unquestioned by all, “to create a communist structure in
a single isolated country. We find ourselves, however, in a position
where it is necessary to hold the foundation of the communist structure,
the foundation of the socialist state, the soviet proletarian republic
surrounded on all sides by capitalist relations. Can we fulfil this
task? I think that this question is scholastic. To this question in such
a situation no answer should be made. The question stands thus: How in
the given relations can we hold the Soviet power, and hold it up to that
moment when the proletariat in this or that country shall come to our
aid?” If the idea of the spokesman, who had undoubtedly more than once
gone over his outline with Lenin, was in contradiction with the
tradition of Bolshevism, why did the congress not raise a protest? How
did it happen that there was not one delegate to point out that on the
very basic question of the revolution, Kamenev was developing views
having “nothing in common” with the views of Bolshevism? How was it that
nobody in the whole party noticed this heresy?

“According to Lenin,” Stalin affirms, “the revolution finds its force
first of all among the workers and peasants of Russia itself. Trotsky
has it that the necessary forces can be found only on the arena of the
world revolution of the proletariat.” To this manufactured contrast, as
to many another, Lenin made his answer in advance: “Not for one minute
have we forgotten, nor will we forget,” he said on May 14, 1918, at a
session of the Central Executive Committee. “the weaknesses of the
Russian working class in comparison with other detachments of the
international proletariat ... But we must remain at our post until our
ally comes, the international proletariat.” On the third anniversary of
the October revolution, Lenin confirmed this: “We always staked our play
upon an international revolution and this was unconditionally right ...
We always emphasised the fact that in one country it is impossible to
accomplish such a work as a socialist revolution.” In February 1921,
Lenin declared at a congress of the workers in the needle trades: “We
have always and repeatedly pointed out to the workers that the
underlying chief task and basic condition of our victory is the
propagation of the revolution at least to several of the more advanced
countries.” No. Lenin is too much compromised by his stubborn desire to
find forces in the world arena: you cannot wash him white!

Just as Trotsky is placed in opposition to Lenin, so Lenin himself is
placed in opposition to Marx – and with the same foundation. If Marx
assumed that the proletarian revolution would begin in France but be
completed only in England, this is explained, according to Stalin, by
the fact that Marx did not yet know the law of uneven development. In
reality the Marxist prognosis contrasting the country of revolutionary
initiative with the country of socialist accomplishment, was based
wholly upon the law of uneven development. In any case Lenin himself,
who permitted no reticence upon big problems, never and nowhere recorded
his disagreement with Marx and Engels in regard to the international
character of the revolution. Exactly the opposite! If “things have
turned out otherwise than Marx and Engels expected,” Lenin said at the
third Congress of the Soviets, it is only in relation to the historic
sequence of the countries. The course of events has allotted to the
Russian proletariat “the honourable rôle of vanguard of the
international social revolution, and we now see clearly how the
development of the revolution, will proceed further; the Russian began –
the German, the Frenchmen, the Englishmen will carry it through, and
socialism will conquer.”

We are further admonished by an argument from the standpoint of state
prestige. A denial of the theory of national socialism – according to
Stalin – “leads to the uncrowning of our country.” This phraseology
alone, intolerable to a Marxian ear, gives away the depth of the break
with Bolshevik tradition. It was not “uncrowning” that Lenin feared but
national bigotry. “We are one of the revolutionary detachments of the
working class,” he taught in April 1918 at a session of the Moscow
Soviet, “advanced to the front not because we are better than others,
but precisely because we were one of the most backward countries in the
world ... We will arrive at complete victory only together with all the
workers of other countries, the workers of the whole world.”

The appeal to sober self-valuation becomes a _leitmotif_ in Lenin’s
speeches. “The Russian revolution,” he says on June 4, 1918, was due not
to the special merits of the Russian proletariat, but to the course ...
of historic events, and this proletariat was placed temporarily in the
first position by the will of history and made for a time the vanguard
of the world revolution.” “The first rôle occupied by the proletariat of
Russia in the world labour movement,” said Lenin at a conference of
Factory Committees on July 23, 1918, “is explained not by the industrial
development of the country – just the opposite, by the backwardness of
Russia ... The Russian proletariat is clearly aware that the necessary
condition and fundamental premise of its victory is the united action of
the workers of the whole world, or of several countries advanced in
capitalist relations.” The October revolution was evoked not only by the
backwardness of Russia, and this Lenin well understood. But he
consciously bent the stick too far in order to straighten it.

At a congress of the Councils of People’s Economy – the organs
especially called to build socialism – Lenin said on May 26, 1918; “We
do not shut our eyes to the fact that we alone, with our own forces,
could not achieve the socialist revolution in one country, even though
it were a good deal less backward than Russia.” And here, anticipating
the future voice of bureaucratic bigotry, he explained: “This cannot
cause a drop of pessimism, because the task which we have set ourselves
is a task of worldwide historic difficulty.”

At the sixth Congress of the Soviets on November 8, he said: “The
complete victory of the socialist revolution is unthinkable in one
country, but demands the most active co-operation at least of several
advanced countries, among which Russia cannot be numbered ...” Lenin not
only denies Russia the right to her own socialism, but demonstratively
gives her a secondary place in the building of socialism by other
countries. What a criminal “uncrowning” of our country!

In March 1919, at a Congress of the Party, Lenin pulls up on the too
mettlesome; “We have a practical experience in taking the first steps in
the destruction of capitalism in a country with a special relation
between proletariat and peasantry. Nothing more. If we swell ourselves
out like a frog, and puff and blow, this will be utterly laughable to
the whole world. We shall be mere braggarts.” Will anybody be offended
by this? On the 19th of May, 1921, Lenin exclaimed: “Did any one of the
Bolsheviks at any time ever deny that the revolution can conquer in a
final form only when it comprises all or at least several of the more
advanced countries!” In November 1920, at a Moscow provincial conference
of the party, he again reminded his audience that the Bolsheviks had
neither promised nor dreamed of “making over the whole world with the
forces of Russia alone ... Such madness we never reached, but we always
said that our revolution will conquer when the workers of all countries
support it.”

“We have not,” he writes at the beginning of 1922, “completed even the
foundation of a socialist economy. This can still be taken back by the
hostile forces of a dying capitalism. We must be clearly aware of this,
and openly acknowledge it. For there is nothing more dangerous than
illusions and turned heads, especially in high places. And there is
absolutely nothing ‘terrible,’ nothing offering a legitimate cause for
the slightest discouragement, in recognising this bitter truth; for we
always have taught and repeated this ABC truth of Marxism, that for the
victory of socialism the combined efforts of the workers of several
advanced countries are necessary.”

A little over two years later Stalin will demand a renunciation of
Marxism upon this basic question. And upon what ground? On the ground
that Marx remained ignorant of the unevenness of evolution – ignorant,
that is, of the most elementary law of the dialectic of nature as well
as society. But what is to be said of Lenin himself, who according to
Stalin is supposed to have first “discovered” this law of unevenness as
a result of the experience of imperialism, and who nevertheless
stubbornly held fast to the “ABC truth of Marxism?” We should seek in
vain for any explanation of this.

“Trotskyism” – according to the indictment and sentence of the Communist
International – “derived and continues to derive from the proposition
that our revolution in and of itself (!) is not in essence socialistic,
that the October revolution is only the signal, impetus and
starting-point for a socialist revolution in the west.” Nationalistic
degeneration here masks itself with pure scholasticism. The October
revolution “in and of itself” does not exist. It would have been
impossible without the whole preceding history of Europe, and it would
be hopeless without its continuation in Europe and the whole world. “The
Russian revolution is only one link in the chain of international
revolution” (Lenin). Its strength lies exactly where the Epigones see
its “uncrowning.” Exactly because, and only because, it is not a
self-sufficient whole but a “signal,” “impetus,” “starting-point,”
“link” – exactly for that reason does it acquire a socialist character.

“Of course the final victory of socialism in one country is impossible,”
said Lenin at the third Congress of Soviets in January 1918, “but
something else is possible: a living example, a getting to work –
somewhere in one country – that is what will set fire to the toiling
masses in all countries.” In July at a session of the Central Executive
Committee: “Our task now is ... to hold fast ... this torch of socialism
so that it may continue to scatter as many sparks as possible to the
increasing conflagration of the social revolution.” A month later at a
workers’ meeting: “The (European) revolution is growing ... and we must
hold the Soviet power until it begins. Our mistakes must serve as a
lesson to the western proletariat.” A few days later at a congress of
educational workers: “The Russian revolution is only an example, only a
first step in a series of revolutions.” In March 1919, at a congress of
the party: “The Russian revolution was in essence a dress-rehearsal ...
of the worldwide proletarian revolution.” Not a revolution “in and of
itself” but a torch, a lesson, an example only, a first step only, only
a link! Not an independent performance, but only a dress-rehearsal! What
a stubborn and ruthless “uncrowning”!

But Lenin did not stop even here; “If it should happen,” he said on
November 8, 1918, “that we were suddenly swept away ... we would have
the right to say, without concealing our mistakes, that we used the
period of time that fate gave us wholly for the socialist world
revolution.” How far this is, both in method of thinking and in
political psychology, from the bigoted self-complacence of the Epigones,
imagining themselves an eternal belly-button of the earth.

A lie upon a fundamental question, if political interest compels you to
cling to it, leads to innumerable resulting mistakes and gradually
revises all your thinking. “Our party has no right to deceive the
working class,” said Stalin at a plenary session of the Executive
Committee of the Communist International in 1926. “It ought to say
frankly that a lack of confidence in the possibility of building
socialism in our country will lead to a renunciation of power, and the
passing of our party from the position of a ruling to that of an
opposition party.” The Communist International has canonised this view
in its resolution: “The denial of this possibility (the possibility of a
socialist society in a separate country) on the part of the opposition,
is nothing but a denial of the premises for a socialist revolution in
Russia.” The “premises” are not the general condition of world economy,
not the inner contradictions of imperialism, not the correlation of
classes in Russia, but a guarantee given in advance of the possibility
of realising socialism in a separate country!

To this teleological argument advanced by the Epigones in the autumn of
1926, we may reply with the same considerations with which we answered
the Mensheviks in the spring of 1905. “Once the objective development of
the class struggle confronts the proletariat at a certain moment of the
revolution with the alternative: either take upon yourself the rights
and obligations of state power or surrender your class position – the
social democracy will place the conquest of state power on the order of
the day. In doing this it will not in the least ignore developmental
processes of a deeper kind, processes of growth and concentration of
production. But it says: When the logic of the class struggle, resting
in the last analysis upon the course of economic development, impels the
proletariat towards dictatorship before the bourgeoisie has fulfilled
its economic mission ... this means only that history has put upon the
proletariat a task colossal in its difficulty. Perhaps the proletariat
will even become exhausted in the struggle and fall under its weight –
perhaps. But it cannot refuse these tasks through fear of class
degeneration and of plunging the whole country into barbarism.” To this
we could add nothing at the present time.

“It would be an irreparable mistake,” wrote Lenin in May 1918, “to
declare that once the lack of correspondence between our economic and
our political forces is organised, ‘it follows’ that we should not have
seized the power ... Only ‘people in a glass case’ reason that way,
forgetting that there will never be a ‘correspondence,’ that there
cannot be, either in the evolution of nature or in the evolution of
society, that only by way of a whole senses of attempts – each one of
which taken separately will be one-sided, will suffer from a certain
lack of correspondence – can complete socialism be created out of the
revolutionary co-operation of the proletarians of all countries.” The
difficulties of the international revolution will be overcome not by
passive adaptation, not by a renunciation of power, not by a national
watching and waiting for the universal insurrection, but by live action,
by overcoming contradictions, by the dynamic of struggle and the
extending of its radius.

If you take seriously the historic philosophy of the Epigones, the
Bolsheviks ought to have known in advance on the eve of October, both
that they would hold out against a legion of enemies, and that they
would pass over from military communism to the NEP; also that in case of
need they would build their own national socialism. In a word, before
seizing the power they ought to have cast their accounts accurately, and
made sure of a credit balance. What happened in reality was little
similar to this pious caricature.

In a report at the party congress in March 1919, Lenin said: “We often
have to grope our way along; this fact becomes most obvious when we try
to take in with one glance what we have been through. But that did not
unnerve us a bit, even on the 10th of October, 1917, when deciding the
question about the seizure of power. We had no doubt that it was up to
us, according to Comrade Trotsky’s expression, to experiment – to make
the trial. We undertook a job which nobody in the world had ever before
undertaken on such a scale.” And further: “Who could ever make a
gigantic revolution, knowing in advance how to carry it through to the
end? Where could you get such knowledge? It cannot be found in books, No
such books exist. Our decision could only be born of the experience of
the masses.”

The Bolsheviks did not seek any assurance that Russia would be able to
create a socialist society. They had no need of it. They had no use for
it. It contradicted all that they had learned in the school of Marxism.
“The tactics of the Bolsheviks,” wrote Lenin against Kautsky, “were the
only international tactics, for they were based not on the cowardly fear
of the world revolution, not on Philistine lack of confidence in it ...”
The Bolsheviks “contributed the maximum possible in one country to the
development, support, stimulus, of revolution in all countries.” With
such a tactic it was impossible to mark out in advance an infallible
line-of-march, and still less possible to guarantee yourself a national
victory. But the Bolsheviks knew that danger was an element of
revolution, as of war. They went to meet danger with open eyes.

Placing before the world proletariat as an example and a reproach the
manner in which the bourgeoisie boldly risks war in the name of its
interests, Lenin branded with hatred those socialists who “are afraid to
begin the fight until they are ‘guaranteed’ an easy victory ...
Boot-lickers of international socialism, lackeys of bourgeois morality
who think this way deserve triple contempt.” Lenin, as is well known,
did not stop to choose his words when he was choking with indignation.

“But what shall we do,” Stalin has kept on inquiring, “if the
international revolution is destined to be delayed? Is there any light
ahead for our revolution? Trotsky does not give any light.” The Epigones
demand historic privileges for the Russian proletariat: it must have a
road-bed laid down for an uninterrupted movement towards socialism,
regardless of what happens to the rest of humanity. History, alas, has
prepared no such road-bed. “If you look at things from a worldwide
historic scale,” said Lenin at the seventh Congress of the Party, “there
is not the slightest doubt that the ultimate victory of our revolution,
if it should remain solitary would be hopeless.”

But even in this case it would not have been fruitless. “Even if the
imperialists should overthrow the Bolshevik power tomorrow,” said Lenin
in May 1919, at a teachers’ congress, “we would not regret for one
second that we took the power. And not one of the class-conscious
workers ... would regret it, or would doubt that our revolution had
nevertheless conquered.” For Lenin thought of victory only in terms of
an international succession of development in struggle. “The new society
... is an abstraction which can take living body not otherwise than
through a series of differing incomplete concrete attempts to create
this or that socialist state.” This sharp distinction, and in some sense
contrast, between “socialist state” and “new society” offers a key to
the innumerable abuses perpetrated by the Epigone literature upon the
texts of Lenin.

Lenin explained with the utmost simplicity the meaning of the Bolshevik
strategy at the end of the fifth year after the conquest of power. “When
we began at the time we did the international revolution, we did this
not with the conviction that we could anticipate its development, but
because a whole series of circumstances impelled us to begin this
revolution. Our thought was: Either the international revolution will
come to our aid, and in that case our victories are wholly assured, or
we will do our modest revolutionary work in the consciousness that in
case of defeat we have nevertheless served the cause of the revolution,
and our experiment will be of help to other revolutions. It was clear to
us that without the support of the international world revolution a
victory of the proletarian overturn was impossible. Even before the
revolution, and likewise after it, our thought was: immediately, or at
any rate very quickly, a revolution will begin in the other countries,
in capitalistically more developed countries – or in the contrary case
we will have to perish. In spite of this consciousness we did everything
to preserve the soviet system in all circumstances and at whatever cost,
since we knew that we were working not only for ourselves, but for the
international revolution. We knew this, we frequently expressed this
conviction before the October revolution, exactly as we did immediately
after it and during the conclusion of the Brest-Litovsk Peace. And,
generally speaking, this was right.” The dates have shifted, the pattern
of events has formed itself in many respects unexpectedly, but the
fundamental orientation remains unchanged.

What can be added to these words? “We began ... the international
revolution.” If a revolution in the west does not begin “immediately, or
at any rate very quickly” – assumed the Bolsheviks – “we will have to
perish.” But in that case too, the conquest of power will have been
justified: others will learn from the experience of those who perished.
“We are working not only for ourselves but for the international
revolution.” These ideas, saturated through and through with
internationalism, Lenin expounded to the Communist International. Did
anybody oppose him? Did anybody offer a hint of the possibility of a
national socialist society? Nobody. Not one single word!

Five years later, at the seventh Plenum of the Executive Committee of
the Communist International, Stalin developed ideas exactly opposite to
these. They are already known to us: If there is not “confidence in the
possibility of building socialism in our country,” then the party must
pass over “from the position of a ruling, to that of an opposition party
...” We must have a preliminary guarantee of success before taking the
powers: it is permitted to seek this guarantee only in national
conditions; we must have confidence in the possibility of building
socialism in peasant Russia; then we can get along quite well without
confidence in the victory of the world proletariat. Each of these links
in a chain of reasoning slaps in the face the tradition of Bolshevism.

To cover up their break with the past, the Stalin school have tried to
make use of certain lines of Lenin, which seem the least unsuitable. An
article of 1915 on _The United States of Europe_ throws out incidentally
the remark that the working class in each separate country ought to win
the power and enter upon the socialist construction without waiting for
the others. If behind these indisputable lines there lurked a thought
about a national socialist society, how could Lenin so fundamentally
have forgotten it during the years following, and so stubbornly have
contradicted it at every step? But there is no use resorting to oblique
inferences when we have direct statements. The programme theses drafted
by Lenin in the same year, 1915, answer the question accurately and
directly: “The task of the proletariat of Russia is to carry through to
the end the bourgeois-democratic revolution in Russia, in order to
kindle the socialist revolution in Europe. This second task has now come
extremely near to the first, but it remains nevertheless a special and a
second task, for it is a question of different classes co-operating with
the proletariat of Russia. For the first task the collaborator is the
petty-bourgeois peasantry of Russia, for the second the proletariat of
other countries.” No greater clarity could be demanded.

The second attempt to quote Lenin is no better founded. His unfinished
article about co-operation says that in the Soviet Republic we have on
hand “all that is necessary and enough” in order without new revolutions
to accomplish the transition to socialism. Here it is a question, as is
perfectly clear from the text, of the political and legal premises of
socialism. The author does not forget to remind his readers that the
productive and cultural premises are inadequate. In general Lenin
repeated this thought many times. “We ... lack the civilisation to make
the transition directly to socialism,” he wrote in an article of the
same period, the beginning of 1923, “although we have the political
premises for it.” In this case as in all others, Lenin started from the
assumption that the proletariat of the west would come to socialism
along with the Russian proletariat and ahead of it. The article on
co-operation does not contain a hint to the effect that the Soviet
Republic might harmoniously and by reformist measures create its own
national socialism, instead of taking its place through a process of
antagonistic and revolutionary development in the world socialist
society. Both quotations, introduced even into the text of the programme
of the Communist International, were long ago explained in our
_Criticism of the Programme_, and our opponents have not once attempted
to defend their distortions and mistakes. The attempt would be too
hopeless.

In March 1923 – in the same last period of his creative work – Lenin
wrote: “We stand ... at the present moment before the question: shall we
succeed in holding out with our petty and very petty peasant production,
with our ruined condition, until the west European capitalist countries
complete their development to socialism?” We see again: the dates have
shifted, the web of events changed, but the international foundation of
the policy remains unshaken. That faith in the international revolution
– according to Stalin a “distrust in the inner forces of the Russian
revolution” – went with the great internationalist to his grave. Only
after pinning Lenin down under a mausoleum, were the Epigones able to
nationalise his views.

From the worldwide division of labour, from the unevenness of
development of different countries, from their mutual economic
dependence, from the unevenness of different aspects of culture in the
different countries, from the dynamic of the contemporary productive
forces, it follows that the socialist structure can be built only by a
system of economic spiral, only by taking the inner discords of a
separate country out into a whole group of countries, only by a mutual
service between different countries, and a mutual supplementation of the
different branches of their industry and culture – that is, in the last
analysis, only on the world arena.

The old programme of the party, adopted in 1903, begins with the words:
“The development of exchange has established such close bonds between
the peoples of the civilised world that the great liberating movement of
the proletariat must become, and long ago has become, international ...”
The preparation of the proletariat for the coming social revolution is
defined as the task of the “international social democracy.” However,
“on the road to their common final goal ... the social-democrats of
various countries are obliged to set themselves dissimilar immediate
tasks.” In Russia the overthrow of czarism is such a task. The
democratic revolution was thus regarded in advance as a national step to
an international socialist revolution.

The same conception lies at the bottom of our programme adopted by the
party after the conquest of power. In a preliminary discussion of the
draft of this programme at the Seventh Congress, Miliutin proposed an
editorial correction in the resolution of Lenin: “I propose,” he said,
“that we insert the words ‘international socialist revolution’ where it
says ‘the era of social revolution now begun’ ... I think it is
unnecessary to argue this ... Our social revolution can conquer only as
an international revolution. It cannot conquer in Russia alone, leaving
the bourgeois structure in the surrounding countries ... I propose that
this be inserted to avoid misunderstanding.” The chairman Sverdlov:
“Comrade Lenin accepts this amendment, a vote is therefore unnecessary.”
A tiny episode of parliamentary technique (“unnecessary to argue” and “a
vote is unnecessary”) refutes the false historiography of the epigones
more convincingly perhaps than the most painstaking investigation! The
circumstance that Miliutin himself, like Skvortzov-Stepanov whom we
quoted above, and like hundreds and thousands of others, soon after
condemned his own views under the name of “Trotskyism,” makes no change
in the facts. Great historic currents are stronger than human backbones.
The floodtide lifts up and the ebbtide sweeps away whole political
generations. Ideas, on the other hand, are able to live even after the
physical and spiritual death of those who carried them. A year later, at
the eighth Congress of the Party which ratified the new programme, the
same question was again illumined in a sharp exchange of retorts between
Lenin and Podbelsky. The Moscow delegate protested against the fact that
in spite of the October overturn the programme still spoke of the social
revolution in the future tense, “Podbelsky,” says Lenin, “attacks the
fact that in one of the paragraphs the programme speaks of the coming
social revolution ... His argument is obviously inconsequent, for in our
programme we are talking about the social revolution on a world scale.”
Truly the history of the party has not left the Epigones a single
unillumined corner to hide in.

In the programme of the Communist Youth adopted in 1921, the same
question is put forward in an especially popular and simple form.
“Russia,” says one paragraph, “although possessing enormous natural
resources is nevertheless in the matter of industry a backward country
in which a petty-bourgeois population predominates. It can come to
socialism only through the socialist world revolution, the epoch for the
development of which we have now entered.” Ratified in its day by the
Politburo, with the participation not only of Lenin and Trotsky but also
of Stalin, this programme was in full force in the autumn of 1926 when
the Executive Committee of the Communist International converted the
non-acceptance of socialism in a separate country into a mortal sin.

In the two years ensuing, however, the Epigones were compelled to file
away in the archives the programme documents of the Lenin epoch. Their
new documents, patched together out of fragments, they called the
programme of the Communist International. Whereas with Lenin in the
“Russian” programme the talk is of international revolution, with the
Epigones in the international programme the talk is of “Russian”
socialism.

Just when and how did the break with the first openly reveal itself? The
historic date is easy to indicate, since it coincides with a
turning-point in the biography of Stalin. As late as April 1924, three
months after the death of Lenin, Stalin was modestly expounding the
traditional views of the party. “To overthrow the power of the
bourgeoisie and establish the power of the proletariat in one country,”
he wrote in his _Problems of Leninism_, “does not mean to guarantee the
complete victory of socialism. The chief task of socialism – the
organisation of socialist production – lies still ahead. Can this task
be accomplished? Is it possible to attain the final victory of socialism
in one country, without the combined efforts of the proletarians of
several advanced countries. No, it is not. The efforts of one country
are enough for the overthrow of the bourgeoisie – this is what the
history of our revolution tells us. For the final victory of socialism,
for the organisation of socialist production, the efforts of one
country, especially a peasant country like Russia, are not enough – for
this we must have the efforts of the proletarians of several advanced
countries.” Stalin concludes his exposition of these thoughts with the
words: “Such in general are the characteristic features of the Leninist
theory of the proletarian revolution.”

By autumn of the same year, under the influence of the struggle with
Trotskyism, it was suddenly discovered that Russia is the very country,
in distinction from others, which will be able to build the socialist
society with her own forces, if she is not hindered by intervention. In
a new edition of the same work, Stalin wrote: “Having consolidated its
power, and taking the lead of the peasantry, the proletariat of the
victorious country can and must build a socialist society.” Can and
must! Only in order “fully to guarantee the country against intervention
... is the victory of the revolution necessary ... at least in several
countries.” The proclamation of this new conception, which allots to the
world proletariat the rôle of border police, ends with those same words:
“Such in general are the characteristic features of the Leninist theory
of the proletarian revolution.” In the course of one year, Stalin has
imputed to Lenin two directly opposite views upon a fundamental problem
of socialism.

At a plenary session of the Central Committee in 1927, Trotsky said
about these two contradictory opinions of Stalin: “You may say that
Stalin made a mistake and afterward corrected himself. But how could he
make such a mistake upon such a question? If it were true that Lenin
already in 1915 gave out the theory of building socialism in a separate
country (which is utterly untrue), if it were true that subsequently
Lenin only reinforced and developed this point of view (which is utterly
untrue) – then how, we must ask, could Stalin think up for himself
during the life of Lenin, during the last period of his life, that
opinion upon this most important question which finds its expression in
the Stalinist quotation of 1924? It appears that upon this fundamental
question Stalin had always been a Trotskyist, and only after 1924 ceased
to be one. It would be well if Stalin could find at least one quotation
from his own writings showing that before 1924 he said something about
the building of socialism in one country. He will not find it!” This
challenge remained unanswered.

We should not, however, exaggerate the actual depth of the change made
by Stalin. Just as in the question of war, of our relation to the
provisional government, or the national question, so on the general
perspectives of the revolution. Stalin had two positions: one
independent, organic, not always expressed, or at least never wholly
expressed, and the other conditional, phraseological, borrowed from
Lenin. Between two people belonging to one and the same party it would
be impossible to imagine a deeper gulf than that which separated Stalin
from Lenin, both upon fundamental questions of revolutionary conception
and in political psychology. Stalin’s opportunist character is disguised
now by the fact that his power rests upon a victorious proletarian
revolution. But we have seen the independent position of Stalin in March
1917. Having behind him an already accomplished bourgeois revolution, he
set the party the task of “putting brakes on the splitting away” of the
bourgeoisie – that is, of actually resisting the proletarian revolution.
If that revolution was achieved, it is not his fault. But together with
all the bureaucracy Stalin has taken his stand upon the basis of
accomplished fact. Once there is a dictatorship of the proletariat,
there must be socialism too. Turning inside out the argument of the
Mensheviks against the proletarian revolution in Russia, Stalin, with
his theory of socialism in a separate country, began to barricade
himself against international revolution. And since he has never thought
any question of principle through to the end, it could not but seem to
him that “in essence” he always thought as he thought in the autumn of
1924. And since he moreover never got into contradiction with the
prevailing opinion of the party, it could not but seem to him that the
party too “in essence” thought as he did.

The initial substitution was unconscious. It was not a question of
falsification, but of ideological shedding. But in proportion as the
doctrine of national socialism came up against a well-armed criticism,
there was need of an organised, and predominantly surgical, interference
on the part of the machine. The theory of national socialism was then
decreed. It was proven by the method of contraries – by the arrest of
those who did not agree with it. At the same time the era was opened of
systematic remaking of the party’s past. The history of the party was
turned into a palimpsest. This destruction of parchments still
continues, and moreover with steadily increasing fury.

The decisive factor, however, was not repressions nor falsifications.
The triumph of the new views corresponding to the situation and
interests of the bureaucracy, has rested upon objective circumstances –
temporary but extremely powerful. The possibility has opened before the
Soviet Republic of playing both in foreign and domestic politics a far
more significant rôle than anybody before the revolution could have
estimated. The isolated worker state has not only held its own among a
legion of enemies, but has elevated itself economically. This weighty
fact has formed the social opinion of the younger generation, who have
not yet learned to think historically – that is, to compare and foresee.

The European bourgeoisie got too badly burned in the last war to lightly
undertake another. A fear of revolutionary consequences has so far
paralysed the plans of military intervention. But the factor of fear is
an unstable one. The threat of a revolution has never yet replaced the
revolution itself. A danger which remains long unrealised loses its
effect. At the same time the irreconcilable antagonism between the
workers’ state and the world of imperialism pushes towards the surface.
Recent events have been so eloquent that the hope of a “neutralisation”
of the world bourgeoisie up to the completion of the socialist
structure, has been abandoned by the present ruling faction; to a
certain degree it has even been converted into its opposite.

The industrial successes attained during these peaceful years are an
imperishable demonstration of the incomparable advantages of a planned
economy. This fact in no wise contradicts the international character of
the revolution: socialism could not be realised in the world arena, were
not its elements and its points of support prepared in separate
countries. It is no accident that the enemies of the theory of national
socialism were the very protagonists of industrialisation, of the
planning principle, the Five Year Plan, and collectivisation. Rakovsky,
and with him thousands of other Bolsheviks, are paying for their fight
for a bold industrial initiative with years of exile and prison. But
they too, on the other hand, have been the first to rise against an
overestimation of the results attained, against national complacency. On
the other hand, the mistrustful and short-sighted “practicals,” who
formerly thought that the proletariat of backward Russia could not
conquer the power, and after the conquest of power denied the
possibility of broad industrialisation and collectivisation, have taken
subsequently exactly the opposite position. The successes attained
against their own expectations, they have simply multiplied into a whole
series of Five Year Plans, substituting the multiplication table for a
historic perspective. That is the theory of socialism in a separate
country.

In reality the growth of the present soviet economy remains an
antagonistic process. In strengthening the workers’ state, the economic
successes are by no means leading automatically to the creation of a
harmonious society. On the contrary, they are preparing a sharpening of
the contradictions of an isolated socialist structure on a higher level.
Rural Russia needs, as before, a mutual industrial plan with urban
Europe. The worldwide division of labour stands over the dictatorship of
the proletariat in a separate country, and imperatively dictates its
further road. The October revolution did not exclude Russia from the
development of the rest of humanity, but on the contrary bound her more
closely to it. Russia is not a ghetto of barbarism, nor yet an Arcadia
of socialism. It is the most transitional country in our transitional
epoch. “The Russian revolution is only one link in the chain of
international revolution.” The present condition of world economy makes
it possible to say without hesitation: Capitalism has come far closer to
the proletarian revolution than the Soviet Union to socialism. The fate
of the first workers’ state is inseparably bound up with the fate of the
liberating movement in the west and east. But this large theme demands
independent investigation. We hope to return to it.



VOLUME 3: APPENDIX 3 HISTORIC REFERENCES ON THE THEORY OF “PERMANENT REVOLUTION”


 

In the Appendix to the first volume of this history we gave extended
excerpts from a series of articles written by us in March 1917 in New
York, and from our more recent polemic articles against Professor
Pokrovsky. In both cases the matter concerned was an analysis of the
moving forces of the Russian, and partly also of the international,
revolution. It was upon the basis of this problem that the fundamental
principled groupings had crystallised themselves in the Russian
revolutionary camp ever since the beginning of the century. In
proportion as the revolutionary tide rose, they acquired more and more
the character of a strategic programme, and then finally a directly
tactical character. The years 1903 to 1906 were a period of intensive
crystallisation of political tendencies in the Russian social democracy.
It was at that time that our work, _Summaries and Perspectives_ was
written. It was written in sections and for different purposes. An
imprisonment in December 1905 permitted the author to expound more
systematically than before his views on the character of the Russian
revolution and its prospects. This collected work appeared as a book in
the Russian language in 1906. In order that the excerpts from it given
below may take a proper place in the mind of the reader, we must remind
him again that in 1904-5 no one of the Russian Marxists defended, or
even uttered, the thought of the possibility of building a socialist
society in a single country in general, and particularly in Russia. This
conception was first expressed in print only twenty years later, in the
autumn of 1924. In the period of the first revolution, as also in the
years between the two revolutions, the dispute concerned the dynamics of
the bourgeois revolution, and not the chances and possibilities of a
socialist revolution. All the present partisans of the theory of
socialism in one country, without a single exception, were during that
period confining the prospects of the Russian revolution to a
bourgeois-democratic republic, and until April 1917 they were
considering impossible not only the building of national socialism, but
also the conquest of power by the proletariat of Russia before the
dictatorship of the proletariat should be inaugurated in more advanced
countries.

By “Trotskyism,” in the period from 1905 to 1917, was meant that
revolutionary conception according to which the bourgeois revolution in
Russia would not be able to solve its problems without placing the
proletariat in power. Only in the autumn of 1924 did “Trotskyism” begin
to mean the conception according to which the Russian proletariat,
having come to power, would not be able to build a national socialist
society with its own forces alone.

For the convenience of the reader we shall present the dispute
schematically in the form of a dialogue in which the letter T signifies
a representative of the “Trotskyist” conception, and the letter S means
one of those Russian “practicals” who now stands at the head of the
soviet bureaucracy.

1905-1917

T.: The Russian revolution cannot solve its democratic problem, above
all the agrarian problem, without placing the working class in power.
S.: But does not that mean the dictatorship of the proletariat?
T.: Unquestionably.
S.: In backward Russia? Before it happens in the advanced capitalist
countries?
T.: Exactly so.
S.: But you are ignoring the Russian village – that is, the backward
peasantry stuck in the mud of semi-serfdom.
T.: On the contrary, it is only the depth of the agrarian problem that
opens the immediate prospect of a dictatorship of the proletariat in
Russia.
S.: You reject, then, the bourgeois revolution?
T.: No, I only try to show that its dynamic leads to the dictatorship of
the proletariat.
S.: But that means that Russia is ripe for the building of socialism?
T.: No, it does not. Historic evolution has no such planned and
harmonious character. The conquest of power by the proletariat in
backward Russia flows inexorably from the correlation of forces in the
bourgeois revolution. What further economic prospects will be opened by
the dictatorship of the proletariat depends upon the domestic and world
conditions under which it is inaugurated. It goes without saying that
Russia cannot arrive at socialism independently. But once having opened
an era of socialist transformation, she can supply the impetus to a
socialist development of Europe and thus arrive at socialism in the wake
of the advanced countries

1917-1923

S.: We must acknowledge that Trotsky “even before the revolution of 1905
advanced the original and now especially famous theory of Permanent
Revolution, asserting that the bourgeois revolution of 1905 would go
directly over into a socialist revolution and prove the first of a
series of national revolutions.” (The quotation is from the notes to the
_Complete Works of Lenin_, published during his life.)

1924-1932

S.: And so you deny that our revolution can arrive at socialism?
T.: I think, as before, that our revolution can and should lead to
socialism after having acquired an international character.
S.: You do not believe, then, in the inner forces of the Russian
revolution?
T.: Strange that this did not prevent me from foreseeing and preaching
the dictatorship of the proletariat when you rejected it as Utopian.
S.: But you none the less deny the socialist revolution in Russia?
T.: Until April 1917 you accused me of rejecting the bourgeois
revolution. The secret of your theoretical contradictions lies in the
fact that you got way behind the historic process and now you are trying
to catch up and pass it. To tell the truth, this also is the secret of
your industrial mistakes.

The reader should have always before him these three historic stages in
the development of revolutionary conceptions in Russia, if he wishes
correctly to judge the actual issues in the present struggle of factions
and groups in Russian communism.

------------------------------------------------------------------------


Excerpts from the Article of the Year 1905, _Summaries and Perspectives_

Section 4 Revolution and the proletariat

The proletariat will grow and strengthen together with the growth of
capitalism. In this sense the development of capitalism is the
development of the proletariat toward dictatorship. But the day and hour
when the power will pass to the hands of the working class depend
directly not upon the level obtained by the productive forces, but upon
relations in the class struggle, upon the international situation, and
finally upon a series of subjective factors – traditions, initiatives,
preparedness for fighting ...

In a country economically more backward the proletariat may come to
power sooner than in a country capitalistically advanced ...

The idea of some sort of automatic dependence of the proletarian
dictatorship upon the technical forces and resources of a country is a
prejudice derived from an extremely over-simplified “economic”
materialism. Such a view has nothing in common with Marxism.

The Russian revolution, according to our view, will create conditions in
which the power may (and with the victory of the revolution must) pass
to the proletariat before the politicians of bourgeois liberalism get a
chance to develop their statesmanly genius to the full.

Marxism is above all a method of analysis – not analysis of texts but
analysis of social relations. Is it true in regard to Russia that the
weakness of capitalistic liberalism necessarily means a weakness of the
labour movement?

The numbers of the industrial proletariat, their concentration, their
culture, their political weight, undoubtedly depend upon the degree of
development of capitalist industry. But this dependence is not direct.
Between the productive forces of the country and the political force of
its classes at each given moment various sociopolitical factors of
national and international character intervene, and they displace, and
even completely change the form of, the political expression of economic
relations. Notwithstanding that the productive forces of industry in the
United States are ten times higher than ours, the political rôle of the
Russian proletariat, its influence upon the policy of the country, and
the possibility of its coming influence upon world politics, is
incomparably higher than the rôle and significance of the American
proletariat.

Section 5 The Proletariat in Power and the Peasantry.

In the event of a decisive victory of the revolution the power will come
into the hands of that class which played the leading rôle in the
struggle – in other words, into the hands of the proletariat. We add at
once as self-evident that this does not exclude the entry into the
government of revolutionary representatives of non-proletarian social
groups ... The whole question is, who will supply the content of the
government policy? Who will consolidate in the government a homogeneous
majority? It is one thing when representatives of the democratic layers
of the people participate in a government which is working-class in its
majority. It is another thing when representatives of the proletariat
participate, in the character of more or less respected hostages, in a
definitely bourgeois-democratic government. The proletariat cannot
perpetuate its power without broadening the base of the revolution. Many
strata of the toiling masses, especially in the country, will be first
drawn into the revolution and acquire political organisation only after
the vanguard of the revolution, the city proletariat, stands at the helm
of state.

... The character of our socio-historic relations, which throws the
whole weight of the bourgeois revolution upon the shoulders of the
proletariat, will not only create enormous difficulties for the workers’
government, but will also, at least in the first period of its
existence, give it priceless advantages. This will express itself in the
relations between the proletariat and the peasantry.

The Russian revolution does not permit, and for a long time will not
permit, the creation of any sort of bourgeois-constitutional order which
might solve the most elementary problems of democracy ... In consequence
of this the fate of the most elementary revolutionary interests of the
peasantry – even of the entire peasantry as a caste – is bound up with
the fate of the whole revolution – that is, with the fate of the
proletariat. The proletariat in power will appear to the peasantry as an
emancipator class.

But perhaps the peasantry itself will crowd out the proletariat and
occupy its place? That is impossible. All the experience of history
protests against this assumption. It shows that the peasantry is
completely incapable of playing an _independent_ political rôle.

The Russian bourgeoisie will surrender all revolutionary positions to
the proletariat. It will have to surrender also the revolutionary
leadership of the peasantry. In the situation which will be created by a
transfer of power to the proletariat the peasantry will have nothing
left to do but adhere to the régime of workers’ democracy. Granted even
that they will do this with no more consciousness than they have in
adhering to the bourgeois régime! But whereas every bourgeois party
after winning the votes of the peasants makes haste to use its power in
order to rob them and deceive them of all their hopes and faith in
promises, and then when worst comes to worst yields its place to another
capitalist party, the proletariat, relying upon the peasantry, will
bring all its forces into play to raise the cultural level of the
village and develop in the peasantry a political consciousness.

Section 6 The Proletarian Régime

The proletariat can come to power only while relying upon a national
awakening, upon a universal popular inspiration. The proletariat will
enter the government as a revolutionary representative of the nation, as
the recognised leader of the people in their struggle with absolutism
and feudal barbarism. But having come to power, the proletariat will
open a new epoch – an epoch of revolutionary legislation, of affirmative
politics – and here the preservation of its rôle as recognised spokesman
of the nation is by no means guaranteed.

Each day will deepen the policy of the proletariat in power, and more
and more define its class character. And therewith the revolutionary
bond between the proletariat and the nation will be broken. The class
dismemberment of the peasantry will appear in political form. The
antagonism between its constituent parts will increase in the same
degree that the policy of the workers’ government defines itself and
from being a general democratic policy becomes a class policy.

The destruction of feudal serfdom will have the support of the entire
peasantry as a burdened caste ... But legislative measures in defence of
the agricultural proletariat not only will win no such active sympathy
from the majority, but will come up against the active resistance of the
minority. The proletariat will find itself obliged to carry the class
struggle into the country, and thus destroy that community of interests
which is undoubtedly to be found in every peasantry, although within
comparatively narrow limits. The proletariat will be obliged, in the
very earliest moments of its rule, to seek support in opposing the rural
poor to the rural rich, the agricultural proletariat to the peasant
bourgeoisie.

Once the power is in the hands of a revolutionary government with a
socialist majority, at that moment the difference between minimum and
maximum programme loses both its significance in principle and its
directly practical significance. A proletarian government cannot
possibly restrain itself within the limits of this distinction.

Entering the government not as impotent hostages but as a ruling power,
the representatives of the proletariat will by this very act destroy the
boundary between minimum and maximum programme. That is, they will place
collectivism on the order of the day. At what point the proletariat will
be stopped in this direction depends upon the correlation of forces, but
not at all upon the original intentions of the party of the proletariat.

That is why there can be no talk of any special form of proletarian
dictatorship in a bourgeois revolution, namely a democratic dictatorship
of the proletariat (or of the proletariat and the peasantry). The
working class cannot guarantee the democratic character of its
dictatorship without transgressing the limits of its democratic
programme. Any illusions on this point would be absolutely ruinous.

Once the party of the proletariat takes the power, it will fight for it
to the end. While one means of waging this struggle for the preservation
and perpetuation of its power will be agitation and organisation,
especially in the country, another means will be a collectivist policy.
Collectivism will become not only an inevitable inference from the
position of the party in power, but also a means of preserving its
position while relying upon the proletariat.

***

When the idea was formulated in the socialist press of an uninterrupted
revolution, linking up the liquidation of absolutism and of civil
serfdom with a socialist revolution, thanks to multiplying social
clashes, uprisings of new layers of the masses, unceasing attacks of the
proletariat upon the political and economic privileges of the ruling
classes, our “progressive” press raised a unanimous howl of indignation.

The more radical representatives of that same democracy ... not only
considered fantastic the very idea of a workers’ government in Russia,
but also denied the possibility of a socialist revolution in Europe in
the coming historic epoch. The necessary “premises” are not yet at hand.
Is this true? It is not, of course, a question of setting the date of a
socialist revolution, but of giving it a place in the actual historic
perspective ...

(Here follows an analysis of the general premises of a socialist economy
and the proof that at the present time – the beginning of the 20th
century – these premises, if you take the question on a European and
world scale, are already at hand.)

... Within the closed boundaries of separate states a socialist
production could not in any case be introduced – both for economic and
political reasons.

Section 8 A Workers’ Government in Russia and Socialism.

We have shown above that the objective premises of a socialist
revolution have already been created by the economic development of the
advanced capitalist countries. But what can be said in this respect
about Russia? Can we expect that the transfer of power to the Russian
proletariat will be the beginning of a transformation of our national
economy upon socialist principles?

The Parisian workers, as Marx said, did not demand miracles of the
Commune. Now, too, you cannot expect instantaneous miracles of the
dictatorship of the proletariat. The state power is not omnipotent. It
would be absurd to imagine that the proletariat has only to receive the
power and it will replace capitalism by socialism with a few decrees. An
economic structure is not a product of the activity of the state. The
proletariat can only employ the state power with all its might in order
to promote economic evolution in the direction of collectivism, and
shorten its road.

The socialisation of production begins in those branches which offer the
least difficulties. During the first period socialised production will
take the form of oases united with private industrial enterprises by the
laws of commodity circulation. The broader the field already seized by
socialised industry the more obvious will be its advantages, the solider
will the new political régime feel, and the more bold will be the
further industrial undertakings of the proletariat. In these
undertakings the proletariat will be able to, and will, rely not only
upon the national productive forces, but also upon international
technique, just as in its revolutionary politics it will rely not only
upon the experience of national class relations, but also upon the whole
historic experience of the international proletariat.

The proletarian régime will be compelled from the very first to
undertake the solution of the agrarian problem, with which is bound up
the fate of the immense mass of the population of Russia. In solving
this problem, as in solving all others, the proletariat will take as its
point of departure the fundamental effort of its economic policy: to
conquer as large a field as possible for the organisation of socialist
industry. And the forms and tempo of this policy on the agrarian problem
will have to be determined both by those material resources in the
command of the proletariat, and by the necessity of so deploying its
activities as not to push possible allies into the ranks of the
counter-revolution.

But how far can the socialist policy of the working class go in the
industrial conditions of Russia? Only one thing can be said with
certainty. It will run into political obstacles long before it comes up
against the technical backwardness of the country. Without direct state
support from the European proletariat the working class of Russia cannot
remain in power and cannot convert its temporary rule into a prolonged
socialist dictatorship ...

Political “optimism” may take two forms. It may exaggerate its own
forces and the advantageous aspects of the revolutionary situation, and
set itself tasks whose solution is not permitted by the given
correlation of forces. But it may, on the other hand, optimistically set
a bound to its revolutionary tasks beyond which the logic of the
situation will inevitably push us.

We may set a bound to all the problems of the revolution by asserting
that our revolution is bourgeois in its objective aims, and therefore in
its inevitable result, and we may thus shut our eyes to the fact that
the chief agent of this bourgeois revolution will be the proletariat,
and the proletariat will be pushed toward the power by the whole course
of the revolution ...

You may lull yourself with the thought that the social conditions of
Russia are not yet ripe for a socialist economy, and therewith you may
neglect to consider the fact that the proletariat, once in power, will
inevitably be compelled by the whole logic of its situation to introduce
an economy operated by the state.

The general sociological definition, “bourgeois revolution,” does not by
any means solve those politico-tactical problems, contradictions and
difficulties which will be put forward by the mechanics of the given
bourgeois revolution.

Within the framework of the bourgeois revolution at the end of the 18th
century, whose objective task was to establish the rule of capital, a
dictatorship of the _Sansculottes_ proved possible. In a revolution at
the beginning of the 20th century, which is also bourgeois in its
immediate objective tasks, there appears in the near perspective the
inevitability, or at the very least the probability, of a political
rulership of the proletariat. That this rulership shall not prove a mere
passing “episode,” as certain realistic philistines hope – the
proletariat itself will see to this. But it is not too early now to pose
the question: Must this dictatorship of the proletariat inevitably be
shattered against the boundaries of the bourgeois revolution? May it
not, upon the given world-historic foundations, open before itself the
prospect of a victory to be achieved after shattering these limited
boundaries?

(Here follows a development of the thought that the Russian revolution
may, and in all probability will, unleash a proletarian revolution in
the west, which in its turn will guarantee the socialist development of
Russia.)

***

It should be added that during the first years of the existence of the
Communist International the above-quoted work was officially published
in foreign languages as a theoretic interpretation of the October
revolution.
